Tai chi may be a great help. Best of luck!To my eternal shame, when she said "the men don't check me out", I caved.  

I lied.

I said, "Oh, they do! You are so cute! You are adorable!"  I utterly and completely caved. 

And it only made things worse.Oh yes, some people will be naturally thin, have conditions that do make weight gain difficult, can work out all day long, but will not build the same muslce mass as another person, etc.  But extra fat is extra fat.  I've had extra fat.  I've been underweight.  Every single time it came down to food intake.  When I was a skeleton (I was sick) certain women thought it was ok to say to my face that "I starved myself" (no, I was vomiting my guts out from pain and wasn't exactly in the mood to eat). Had I said, "You sure stuff your  face!" I would've been hit in the face.This in Israel? Lessee, weapons for obvious reasons. Puppies because puppies!Yes! Figured it was Israel. Wonderful place!Very much probably the case.  I had a paralyzed bf and when we saw shit like that go down, we had no hesitation in blocking someone in. 
"Don't hate me because I'm beautiful."

(To all you young whippersnappers, this was from a big-haired beautiful model fro the 80s who said that tagline in a TV ad for Pantene shampoo.  There there would be  close-up of her walking towards the camera, luxurious cloud of hair slowly bouncing in slo-mo.No way. Maybe she was my height (5'2ish) but one shove from her and I'd be fucked.We women like to stay clean.  Better to buy an extra pack a month and have a clean gf, right? TP is also used to remove eye makeup (no need for cotton balls), instead of Kleenex (less expensive since who needs fancy Kleenex to blow their schnozz?) and certainly required for that monthly issue.Poor guy.  I hear that is a torturous condition.He just left clogged toilets for you?
And why didn't he just invest in baby wipes? Used TP for the intial wipe, then make sure you are nice and clean with a baby wipe (that goes in the trash, NOT toilet).I really had a crush on Jeremy Renner in  many of his movie roles.

Then, I heard him speak during interviews and my fantasy was ruined.

Edit: He played Hawkeye, right?I love watching a handsome man sleep with his dog.  The dog is so relaxed and trusting and feels so safe, and the man just looks so ....manly.  Sigh.Its the rich ones.  My husband was a journalist and spent a few months in Saudi. Behind closed doors during the fasting month of Ramadan.....heaps of food set out all day long, expensive alcohol and naked strippers running around in the compounds.

Then, you got to a place like Mexico, which I think is now ahead of the US in obesity % of population.  MX is a country where so many people are indigent and starving and have barely any food....yet a good portion are pretty heavy.How did your roommate react? The writers and producers (and actors and everyone) did such an incredible job in that episode.  I was so wrapped up in the "train robbery" excitement of it all, I forgot that these guys were doing bad things.

Then Creepy Todd at the end and that innocent look on the kid's face  - it was like a punch in the gut.Skyler cheated because she broken. She was being lied to and she knew it.  She was being manipulated and was desperate for the human touch and to feel normal.  It doesn't excuse it, but she wasn't murdering people (until she turned a knowingly blind eye to Walt's conduct).

Everyone one of them fucked up (except the kids, obviously). Skyler cheating was, I think a very human reaction in a desperate situation in which she didn't have the emotional strength to pack up and leave Walter White.Hank's death was hard.  Andrea's was just too much to process.Wow, you managed to pull off all of them so well. Nicely done, girlfriend.

Heal up well.It is ok to feel relieved she is no longer in your life.

Repeat that until you actually believe it. 

You are not forced to have kind and loving thoughts of a deceased parent just because you were blood related.Can I just ask, you said that every single thing that made you happy has "been taken away".

What were those things that made you happy and who took them away?

Why will you drop out of school? How did they "fuck you over"? Maybe some of these problems are not the world against you, but are the results of choices you've made?This used to happen to me so often when I lived in LA, it reached a point when while the guy was asking me out and telling me which day/tme he'd pick me up, I'd already know he wouldn't show.  I'd be nice and smilng and pleasant, but with certain guys I just knew.

I stopped even getting ready when I had a feeling they wouldn't show up.

Then one day I was proven wrong, and the guy (who I really, really liked and was really attracted to) showed up. We got married.

Unsurprisingly, he was not from LA. He was European and we had and still have a very special connection.

I don't know why men (and women) ask people out and stand them up. At least fucking call if you've changed your mind. Show that level of respect.  I think those people just get an ego boost from a girl/guy agreeing to go out and do it fifty other times with fifty other unsuspecting people.Please come visit us in subreddit chronicpain.

I also had a spinal tumor at 26, was misdiagnosed for five years, it exploded, blah blah blah, now I have permanent nerve damage and am fucked. Chronic pain for nearly 15 years.

Nobody who has not experienced this can remotely relate to you.

It turns your life upside-down. Every day, every hour, is a fight to survive and to talk yourself out of suicide, because human beings can only tolerate sustained, severe chronic pain for so long.

Is there any way you can talk to your current pain management docs, or get better ones, so your pain can be better managed? I realize sometimes there are no solutions, but is talking to them an option?

My heart truly goes out to you.  None of us expect to be disabled by spinal tumors or illnesses that create chronic pain at a youthful age.  We watch other people enjoying life, free to do whatever they want, not having any clue just how beautiful it is to live without agonizing pain every day (I sure took it for granted myself when I was healthy).  

PM me any time for support, or to vent, or for anything.BTW, I also, like you, despised the idea of going on disability.   For years I tried working through the pain until I had to accept reality that I just couldn't. 

Working w/my level of pain meant taking more pain meds, which make it impossible to focus, added way more stress to my life, caused more pain from having to sit, and even when I worked from home with my laptop on my legs laying in bed, it was still too much.

You paid into the system, I presume from your years of working.  That is why the safety net is there.  There is no shame in using benefits when you legitimately need them, and it sounds like you do.  Your first job is taking care of your health.  Chronic pain, as you already know, causes horrible stress, insomnia, exhaustion, and severe depression.  

If going to work makes your pain worse, thing long and hard about whether the cost-benefit ratio is working in your favor to stay at work if the only real reason is pride.

I would MUCH rather be working than bee on disabilty. I didn't spend 7 years of college to do nothing.  But, a spinal tumor ruined my plans and turned shit upside down. 

Now, I am so, so grateful I have benefits.  I am trying to slowly get better, and it took me a long time to accept I had to alter my lifestyle into one that took into consideration that I just couldn't keep up with the level of pain I was in.  That is a difficult process that requires a lot of soul searching and being brutally honest with yourself.

You've accomplished a lot more than you give yourself credit for.  Suicide is more common from chronic pain than people realize.  Or, losing your damn mind.  You have stayed alive and kept yourself together overall.  Just think how much effort it takes you every single day to do simple tasks - like take a shower, or clean the house - that healthy people take for granted.   

Don't sell yourself short.  You may have to take a different and unexpected, unplanned-for path in life, but it not need be meaningless or worthless.  Fuck them all.  What selfish, useless pieces of shit.  How foolish they are to not reciprocate and spend 30 seconds forwarding you something that requires no effort on their part, particularly as you have always been there for them.

Just wait until the next time they come to you for help and you say no. Fuck them. I am sorry you have such a sad sack of shit as classmates.Even in their early 20s they know better.  They know you need help and you are barely asking more than they push a few buttons on a cell phone or computer.
They are just selfish, entitled little shits. I hope you stick to your guns and never, ever help any of them again.5'2 127lbs, I shall always be polite to you.

Damn, that alien growing out of your neck must've hurt like a mofo.  It's huge.  No need to bulk.  You are a runner and pretty young, you're great the way you are.Was that pointy end what poked out of your flesh that made it appear to be a pimple?That is actually the worst part.  She must've been so terrified and was facing death and didn't want to be left alone.  That primal terror of death, shock and the desperation and fear that the one person there will leave you is one of the scariest things during a life threatening experience, and he fucking stole her shit and left her.  

Do they know the shithead who did this?

Remember the other guy that did a similar thing? Stole the wedding rings off a woman who died in a car crash, pretending to be helping? That guy was caught.Reminds me of the time my husband sat me down for a very serious talk about how lonely he felt and that he felt I never listened to him, often fell asleep when he was talking to me, and overall he felt like I didn't give a damn.

During this talk, I fell asleep.  I woke up, found him staring at me, with that look of utter astonishment, hurt and shock.  I'll never forget it.

(In my defense, this falling asleep issue was the result of me being highly medicated because I had recently become very, very sick and my meds made me very tired and unable to operate heavy machinery.)At least he didn't have you view the literal shit he endured from the unintentional food issue (it was nice of you to cook for him) and force you to review the results of your cooking efforts.American here.  What is a "bogan"? Similar to a wanker? Douche?Three months.  There is truth to muscle memory.  What made you decide to whip yourself back into shape, and was there any particular reason why you did it quite drastically (I don't mean unhealthily).  Were you just tired of being out of shape?How did you handle the hunger? A guy your size eating barely anything, and lifting and doing all that exercise.  That takes some serious determination.Yes. It is always a good idea. It cannot hurt, it may very well help. This is the first time I have been compelled to laugh at someone getting hurt.That is adorable.

When my pointer/dalmation (ie: unbearably cute) was newly adopted and still very naughty at 1 year old, she once bolted on me at a park and ran off to the other end where people were BBQing and kids playing.

I was thinking FUUUCKKK the whole crowd is going to go Gestapo on me for my off-leash dog and I started heading over.

30 second later, I see my dog flying back towards me, with a huge hotdog (no bun) in her mouth.  Not sure if she stole it or some nice person gave it to her.  It was very cute.Thanks for responding. 18 beers a day? And you were able to function?  Really though, incredible job.  Its that first week or two that are the hardest once you get firm with your choice to get in shape. Very impressive.So...is that "friend" being nicer now? What a little shit.Pics!When I typed that earlier post, I was thinking of a friend from Sheboygan Wisconsin.  5'10, about 200lbs of solid muscle, and this guy barely worked out and didn't eat all that much.  He could easily throw back 20 beers and not appear drunk.

Until the one time the dumbass was pulled over on New Years Eve. I read the police report since he was too ashamed to tell me what happened. He literally fell out of his Chevy Tahoe when he tried to gt out of his car.  Splat.  Right at the feet of the cops.  He politely thanked them for pulling him over. (While driving very slowly about 2 blocks from a bar/club, he nearly slammed into a cop car at a red light; cop had to take evasive action).

I think BAC was about .20. This was the asshole who said he could "safely drive" when he'd drive 10+ beers in one evening.Yes.  I was 26, 5'3 and 125lbs and in the best shape of my life.  Thoracic spine pain literally came out of nowhere. Got worse and worse until I had to go on disability.

Numerous MRIs, CTs, xrays, myelogram, angiomgram, nerve blocks, PT, blahblahblah. Every doc says they can't find anything wrong and everything looks normal.

Pain gets to the point I plan suicide. Husband takes me to Europe (he's French) for a 40th opinion. They take another MRI and agree with my argument for the pat 4 years that the "harmless hemangioma" in T9 is definiely the cause of my agonizing pain, and as a vasular tumor, has been growing aggressively, has burst, I am currently bleeding out and have about a day before I am dead.

Now, for four horrible years the docs dismissed the possibility that the hemangioma was the source of my pain.  They outright told me, "hemangiomas do NOT cause pain" even when I found all sorts of scientific sources that of course they can cause pain if they are pressing nerves. They can also squish spinal cords and cause paralysis, or explode and cause death.

Fight for your diagnosis. Read your own records, do your own research, and continue seeing new docs until you get a diagnosis.  It will not fix itself on its own.

I was 26 when this started and went from a successful lawyer, active, happily married, traveling, ripped, all that, to a skeleton, depressed, suicidal, in fucking AGONY, and on heaps of opiates that made me stupid and hell and constantly sleepy. Had the docs diagnoised me properly and not dismissed my pain as some "mental thing" and did the surgery I needed, I would not now have permanent nerve  damage and likely need opiates for the rest of my life.

You know your body best. Never give up on getting a diagnosis and treatment.Cow:  "I'll never live this down. My friends saw me run into a car.  I'd best act cool."Aye. I take back that "compelled to laugh".  Now I feel quite a bit ashamed.What? What? Burst in your spine and you feel fluid running internally?
I am sitting here in front of my laptop literally agape. 
I never felt an 'oozing' but I kept describing an increased feeling of something like a tennis ball stuffed down my spine that was smushing everything and pushing everything in a 3-d circle, trying to get out.  I felt pain in lower solar plexus as well, like an chestburster from Alien wanted out.

One night I was sure I felt a burst, and the pain was so hot I thought a portion my spine was melting.  I never knew such pain.  That was another ER night.

I got brushed off, just like you. They did not care for what I was describing.  I was just "being dramatic".

Turned out that my description was entirely accurate with an aggressively growing vascular tumor that did explode.

I am stunned, yet not stunned, that you are getting the brush off. The spine is not something you fuck around with.  I especially don't get when docs brush off a person who clearly is not one to complain, who they know likes being active, keep fit, can handle a lot of pain before going in for help.  If anything, because you are young and are (were) fit), it means you do NOT like being immobile and on meds.

What has shown up on your MRI? Because my hemangioma showed up clearly, but for 3 years I never knew b/c I just believed them when they read the report, called me at home and said, "well, the report can't find a thing; it says you have a beautiful perfect spine."

No. It did not say that. It said they noticed a small 3mm hemangioma in T9, but it was 'not causing the pain and just an artifact." I only found this out because I was an idiot and didn't read my own MRI reports until three years in.

How the fuck can a radiologist, or any doctor, look at a mass on an image and say, "oh, THAT type of mass that is in your bone doesn't cause pain, even though its RIGHT where your pain is located; its just not possible."

No, its very possible, and that mass grew really quick in no time.

Please continue to get diagnosed.  Get new docs.  I wish I had been treated six months into it, instead of 4 years. I might still be able to walk straight and have a life. There is definitely something very, very wrong.Ah, thank you. If I ever make it to Australia that is one word of Australian I won't need a dictionary for.Oh, in that case its all in good fun. And, he can get taller if he wants. Just do that femur breaking surgery and have those metal contraptions put on that you wrench apart over time so new bone grows between the break.

Its only about 6 months of agonizing pain.  Not as hard as eating 800-1200 calories a day and busting your ass for three months.One thing that is really hurting you is your current illness.  Come visit us over at the sub chronicpain if you want to vent or talk.

You are in a tough situation.  I applaud you for not forcing yourself to have fake friendships with people you did not connect with earlier in college.  I also know how lonely that can be.

Is your pain being managed the best it can? I speak from personal experience.  No matter how outgoing you are, throw in a chronic illness and pain that affects you from living a normal life, and you will notice that socially, things really change.

I promise you, it can get better. As I got older, I met women that I was more able to connect with. Not like I was some brilliant, mature woman in college, but I just didn't click with the girls there. They were not bad or evil, but simply interested in things or conversations I found boring. Getting older helps.

I hope you can find some better treatment so you can also have a better quality of life.  I had to quit all my fitness stuff, and that makes meeting people hard, but we are still out there. Just harder and will take longer to meet someone you click with.  Don't give up!This is actually a very good point.  I had very few friends in high school and college and felt so lonely that it physically hurt. Then, I one day accepted that I was not going to force myself to have pretend friendships with people around whom I could not be myself. I got used to being very independent.

Time passed, I met some great women here and there, and I would be stunned to hear them go into a panic because "my boyfriend will be gone for an ENTIRE WEEKEND. I don't know what I'm going to do."  Or, the one girl I invited to my wedding, but she didn't show up...because she was "too embarrassed to go alone."  Or the women that are unable to get their car fixed, or any normal task done without drama and emailing 30 people or posting on FB all their stupid shit.

I didn't realize how much drama I allowed to occur - or contributed to by not stepping away - until once my therapist said, "why all the drama?"

Took a good hard look at myself, and got  my shit together. If a friend was doing crazy shit I'd communicate with them my unhappiness, and if it didn't improve, I'd walk away.  Same for family (with more effort put in).

Whatever happens in our past, its on us to accept bad shit happened and try to make our present and future as drama-free as possible.I had it done at about 25.  I was married, and in shape, yet always hated my 34B breasts.

I loved the look, but I hated it overall. Men would constantly stare.  They felt so unreal. They were under the muscle and I was always aware of them.  And sleeping on my stomach was a thing of the past.

I eventually had them removed (each one leaked after about 8 years, and I was having major health issues unrelated to the implants) and let me tell you, I was utterly terrifying and furious with myself because after that length of a period, the skin will be stretched. 

Well, to my relief, within a few months after surgery, my now-small but lovely breasts have returned to what they looked like before - just even smaller than pre-surgery as I lost 15lbs.

At my age (41) I do not give a fuck. I am so happy they are out of my body. I feel so free.  I don't even need to wear a bra if I don't want (just a bit of medical tape of cover up the headbeams).   No man ever stares.  I can wear any top I like.

Of course I'd love it if I were a natural C, but at my age, I've learned to really appreciate health, and my boobs are small, but I love the softness, perkiness and look.  My doc pushed for a new set of implants, but by then I was fighting for my life (literally) with spine issues and the last thing I cared about was another set of potential problems.

However, I remember very well my feelings at 25.  I wanted them SO badly, and knew while they wouldn't solve my problems, I'd look "better".  I was in great shape, and my body did look more "proportionate" (based on what we see in mags) and I was thrilled at first, but over time, the unpleasant feeling of their constant presence just made it all not worth it.This is wonderful. I wasn't on Reddit when you posted last year, and to see the change between your first post, and now this post, is incredible.  You fought.  Depression is not kicked over night. You stuck it out.  You didn't cheat yourself. You were yourself, in fact, and your employers saw the real you and loved it and hired you.

And, you have a great new man in your life who obviously find the entire you, the whole package, beautiful.

Thank you for sharing such private and personal moments, and your inspiring triumphs. You write beautifully.  I hope you continue writing, save everything, and maybe one day get some of your material on your personal growth published.I remember so many details when I was doing my research and making the decision.  My husband told me at the time it was completely my decision. He never, ever said anything but wonderful comments about my boobs.

I secretly wished, at the time, that he spoke out against it.  He did lecture me on all the risks, did his own research, and made sure I knew what I was getting into.  It was not fair of me to wish he had spoken out more, as he was just trying to make me feel as free to make my OWN choice as possible.

Well, fast forward 8 years and I'm having all these unrelated spine problems and then I noticed one implant is looking all wrong, and both have been very hard for some time.  He and I have a talk, and he is hoping I will get them removed.  He actually told me he wished so much he made more of an effort to tell me I did not need them, I wasn't born with a deformity or have breast cancer so that was not an issue, it was purely for a larger size.  He said he regrets not that he didn't talk me out of it, because it was my choice, but that he did not spend more time convincing me he preferred me the way I was.

What was strange was after the surgery, he became sort of hesitant to touch them. He finally admitted that they were so different, he felt he was touching another woman and it felt wrong! I thought that was pretty sweet.

Its a very personal choice. Many women love the results and are happy.  I liked the look (but one thing that pissed me off is my doc made a decision during surgery that he needed more cc's of fluid to reach what size he "thought" I wanted, and they ended up being a bit larger than I wanted.)  Also, being short and with a small frame, losing 10lbs made an enormous difference and at my thinnest, they looked very out of proportion (to me).  Men loved it, but that was not why I had gotten them. I got them for me - to feel proportionate and feminine.  

I hated that every where I went, men stared (and I don't blame them for staring, but it would be nice for them to exercise discretion). I was in great shape and loved the overall look, but it was just not worth the baggage it came with.  

You will likely feel very differently at 40 than right now, just as you will feel differently at 30 than right now. I suggest that any woman who is considering implants first gets herself into her best shape as possible (I don't mean go crazy), but if you are unhappy with your figure, do what you can through healthy eating and exercise and see how your body transforms.

Now, if you are already very happy with your figure, and its only larger breasts you want, try wearing those silicon inserts for a few weeks (a good cosmetic surgeon will lend you some for free) and see what it feels like. 

Remember - it will likely feel good! Because they are not under your muscle or stretching your skin.  Once those foreign objects are inside you, you may hate the way it feels. I felt every single movement.  Just wasn't for me.oh god, that ketchup packet comparison was horrible.  It's one of the worst descriptions I have heard, and I completely believe you are in agony and something need to be checked out.

I was like you.  I used to race amateur motorcycle and could handle a lot of pain (got good at crashing hard) and didn't like complaining and stirring up trouble.  I later learned that when it comes to your health, that is a terrible attitude to have.  Problems like that usually do not fix themselves. Especially if you are young and fit, you will be dismissed and often treated like a drug seeker. Or a complainer.

You need to do whatever you can to get diagnosed.  Ive had similar things happen (docs never following up, outright lying, one yelled at me for being in their pain clinic for "too long" as if that was my fault, the literal eye rolling, the many, many impatient sighs as I described my symptoms to be told, "have you seen a psychiatrit recently"?).


And, this was all in the Bay Area, CA.  With excellent insurance that cost me a damn fortune.  Five years of fighting with the "best" doctors from Stanford Hopsital, San Francisco research universities, etc.

At the time, I was married to a French national.  He knew I was dying and was planning suicide if I didn't die anytime soon, so he said fuck this all, and took me to France.  His parents were in Paris and were able to set up appointments for me.  I was not yet a French citizen, so this was all uncovered by my insurance.  

They took me seriously right away, did an MRI, realized I was bleeding out and saved my life.   When I returned to the US and told all the docs how I was right and they were wrong all those years and it was just dumb luck I went to France when I did, otherwise I'd be dead, they brushed it off.  Some bullshit of they were not specialists (they were). That was one of the worst violations of it all.

Given you are on NHS, and it takes forever to get into specialists, you may have to pay for this n your own.  I went to La Pitie hosptial in Paris and was expecting a crazy bill I'd have to put on my credit cards.  I was bankrupt by then.  Turned out the surgery and testings and everything together was about 8k...which for an American is like an Xmas gift and very cheap.

You will need to do your own research and expect the brush off , because docs hate it when patients come in with their own research.  Of course we did not go to med school and don't know shit, but we do know your bodies better than them, and we know when something is wrong.

Trying to convince a doc you are not exaggerating your pain and are not a hypochondriac is a terrible thing to endure.

I believe that deaths or disability due to misdiagnoses are very common.  Not because docs are human and can make reasonable mistakes, but because they brush off an outwardly healthy looking individual.  They judge us the moment we walk in.  If you are young, especially if you worked out, and the problem is not obviously well then it must be in your head or you are exaggerating.  Then people die, or like me are fucked for life with permanent pain and nerve damage, and you get all heaps of bullshit excuses that make you want to ram your fist in their faces.Btw, there are any more tests that can be done. Not being a specialist or knowing your symptoms I can't recommend any, but there are many, many other tests.  Gandolinium MRI, CT scan, and invasive tests like a myelogram, nerve blocks and many others.  

Make sure to look actually read the reports and look at your own MRI images.  I cant read an MRI worth a damn, but I sure noticed an obvious blob on my spine that was dismissed by three radiologists.Had a friend who had exactly that.  It was horrifying the way he described being flipped, but for him it worked out very well and he was able to stop drinking to self medicate and have a life again.  Jesus fucking Christ!! That asshoe of a prof who failed you, the school not accommodating you, then your new prof loses his and s TA won't give you the grade you deserve and busted your ass beyond anyone else did?   

You are far stronger than any of them, and you came out on top, but damn, talk about pouring salt into the wound.Thank you for sharing this very valuable info.  I hope things can improve for you.Im glad you were never my doc.  It's docs like you who don't know shit about meds (and maybe that is not your fault, if this is what you were taught) who made my spinal tumor, chronic pain and insomnia all the more difficult to deal with.

Ambien is something I used for years and which helped me get far more that "15 minutes" more of sleep.  Sedatives like clonozapam also helped a lot.

You are a licensed doctor saying for insomnia all meds are "essentially ineffective". Have you studied pharmacology beyond your basic class in first year med school?

I'm not saying this to be mean, but because you are not only dead wrong, but are the exact type of doctor that caused me, and may others, so much needless suffering when we went in, desperate for treatment and care.I am so happy my dog is a female. 

Now, time to find a therapist in PTSD for canine-auto-blow-jobia.As soon as I read "my dear", I stopped reading.You need a diagnosis.  I do not agree with anyone saying you need PT, because nobody knows what is wrong with you.

PT can worsen an unknown condition. It is irresponsible to do PT when you are in that level of pain and do not have a diagnosis.  I speak from personal experience.

See as many docs as you must to get a diagnosis. Your GP is useless for this.  You need a specialists, and you may need to see 20 different ones before you get an accurate diagnosis.  Keep all your records in order, and fight and be your best advocate.Why are people responding with "you need PT, maybe its a nerve issue, sounds like a disk herniation"?

This is reckless and not helping.  Even if you are physicians, you are not OP's physicians, have never examined him or seen him. this sub is not meant for diagnosing others, but for support and discussion.  Once OP has a diagnosis, then it makes sense to discuss things that are relevant that may help or not help his condition.

Stop. I know you are trying to be helpful, but this person is suffering, can't think straight and you are making things more difficult for him.I second that you need MRIs and CTs, and if those show nothing, a gandolinium MRI.  There are many, many diagnostic tests that are available, and even then, they are often misinterpreted, so get second opinions once you have the test results.She looks like a young Hermione Granger.Was she related to Barbara Bach (a Bond girl, I think?) They look quite similar.This was awesome. Now, why can't Spain do this? Take away the spears, and have the bullfighters be like these dudes. Please remember to take good care of yourself, as best as is possible.  Its ok to take breaks from it all. Your friends sound very supportive and can help out so you can get way for a few hours, or a weekend trip.  I am sure your wife would want it too.

Very often, people forget about the pressure, exhaustion and worry that the healthy "carer" undergoes.  Everyone is understandably focused on the sick person.

Wishing the best outcome for your wife.I remember being there. Studying very hard in college, honors, working as a bank teller, and my parents screaming at me that I was the "whore of the neighborhood" because I had a boyfriend and on Fri/Sat nights spent the night as his house.

Get out as early as you can. Balance the cost-benefit analysis of having your own place and how much that may take away from schoolwork by having to work to pay for it, and the emotional trauma from living at home.

I was never so thrilled when I transferred far away into a 4 year college.  I literally went to the school farthest away from home for the very reason of not wanting them to be near me.  

All I can say, for now, do the best you can in school, because those good grade will open doors.  Its shitty, I know, but until you have enough money to move out, it just might be what you are stuck with for awhile.Hey, where are you? You in the US? Because you can get excellent (yes) dental care/surgery in Mexico at a fraction of what it costs in the US.  I paid $300 for what would've cost $3000 in the US  (two root canals) and the dentist was great, clean offices, top of the line equipment, and was very nice on top of it.

Many Americans fly into MX for this very purpose - dental and eye care.

BTW, an infection in your upper-jaw teeth can lead to sinus infections and can enter your brain.   My husband had that happen - one small abcess was not diagnosed correctly, he needed a surgeon to take a goddamn circular saw to his sinuses because the infection calcified so horribly.  I would just be strong, say fuck it, and leave when your work is done.  I started at a law firm as a new lawyer and wasn't sure what the work culture was like.  I'd leave at 6, even if my work was done at 5.  I stopped feeling guilty about it when trial time came around, and for several weeks I'd be working from 7am to 11pm.  

Fuck your colleagues. It sounds like the only one who has an issue with you leaving is them. You aren't leaving "early" if your work is done. You don't owe them any explanations so long as you leaving when you do doesn't impact some group project."Sleep hygiene is far better than drugs.  That is a fact."  

Care to give me scientific sources as a citation?

You are a fool. Will you give your patients a healing crystal and aromatherapy with essential oils when they come in like a zombie because they are in so much chronic pain that they can't sleep? Nobel prize for you.

I do not believe I know better than doctors, but my own research and advocacy for my own disease sure saved my life. It was doctors just like you who said my pain was "mental", and that "hemangiomas do not cause pain, as a FACT."

Had I not fought for an accurate diagnosis and vertebroplasty, I'd be dead.  Now THAT is a fact.Why "give up"?  You just haven't found anyone with whom you connect.  Why all the drama? No need to go to the extreme and give up on things.  There are plenty of ways to meet nice women w/o using Tinder.

You are young, and sound fit and active.  If you keep a positive attitude, are ok with being single and are a pleasant guy to be around, I am sure you will eventually meet a nice woman.Jesus, I couldn't even read all that.  So its not really fair for me to say this, since I didn't read every word, but you are a mess.  That is ok. But you sound pretty self entitled and are quite critical of this girl, yet awed by her looks and physique.

Take a deep look inside yourself and next time around, less judgmental about her. You played games and that is immature.  Grown men who are confident and can handle rejection do not play games.  It bit you in the ass and you seem surprised.Boo hoo.  You played games, you refer to her as a "hot piece of ass" then you whine like a little boy that she was not fair to you with how she broke it off?

Jesus, this whining is unattractive - if this is how you were around her, its no wonder she dumped you via text.Hey, what you need is professional help.  Your friends are not equipped to deal with this, and likely have no idea just how much effort you put in to putting that fake smile on, and pretending to be happy.  If they brush you off, it won't be surprising given how well you may be at hiding your depression.

You are in a very deep hole, but with the right help, and time and patience you can get out of it.  But not on your own. Please get help. The fact that you've tried suicide twice is very scary and I hope you do not make a 3rd attempt.  Help is out there and you can find affordable professionals, but you have to put in the effort, as hard as that may seem right now.

Best of luck.This person is right.  We all put on our happiest, most put-together look whether at work, while socializing, or on-line.  Very few people are completely honest with their personal problems because its embarrassing and can make one feel like they are failing while everyone else has it "together".

Older you get, more you will realize that most people who seem to love life all have their own issues and their happiness is not out of Miller Lite commercial.Unless you have experienced rude men saying obnoxious things to you on a regular basis to get a piece of ass (and when it doesn't work you see them move on to the next woman with the same line) you have no idea how exhausting it can be.  Even a woman just observing an  obnoxious guy doing it to another woman is exhausting.

When we know a guy is gay, and we've just met him and struck up a convo, we know 100% it is safe.  We do not have to be overly careful that we might be "too nice" and send the wrong message, or walk that tightrope where a "nice guy" will later call us a fucking ugly bitch for not wanting to date him.

I can see that that must feel weird to you if a woman suddenly pours out all sorts of personal stuff upon finding out you are gay. That isn't what I personally do.  I just relax once I know the guy is talking to me with zero intention of wanting a piece of ass.

(Now, I am very well aware that there are plenty of hetero men who talk to women and only want to talk, have no interest in a piece of ass and will be polite, may already be married or have a gf, or simply just want a nice person to talk to for a few moments.  Unfortunately, if you get harassed by  a shithead often enough, it puts a woman on edge with any man she is meeting for the first time.  Its not fair, but its just the way it is for some women.)You can do it.  Sometimes a new place and a new chapter is a great experience in life.I pick asshole. Fuck off.Well...do you have a passport? Anyone relying on you to live (kids, family). What are your obligations? Are you a male that can do manual labor, or of either gender that has skills?

Are you willing to have a lower standard of living? Live without (I am guessing) comforts that you currently have?)

I moved from one of the richest areas in CA (note:  I was not rich, just working my ass off) to MX.  Even with kids its very possible.  You just have to research into which place is best for you, never compare the new place to what you are used to, because you will be disappointed, prepare well, be realistic, and take the leap.

Are you in the US? Europe? Somewhere  else?His doctor "thinks" it is a muscle spasms.  That is not a diagnosis.  He has also lost a tremendous amount of weight.  He has not run the gamut of testing that proves what is his underlying condition.

Know how many times "muscle spasms" is thrown out there as a "diagnosis"? Months of PT is far too long to have no results and a worsening of symptoms.  I tried PT for a month and it increased my pain into ER visits. There is a point where you simply cannot do PT until you get the pain managed.

Muscles spasms are often another symptom of the underlying problem. Fixing  spasms is not fixing the problem. A spinal tumor in me caused so much pain bone and nerve pain that my entire back spasmed.  I had so many treatments (including injections of botox, muscle relaxers, etc) for the spasms, all of which were useless, because with the underlying problem not yet being diagnosed or treated, the spasms returned.

Again, the doc probably spent ten minutes with him, and his doc 'THINKS' its a muscle spasm. That is not a diagnosis. That is a doc who has no clue or is too lazy or busy to look further into it and order tests that are out there and can help tremendously.

Had I continued doing PT like my doc ordered I would've caused the vascular tumor to explode earlier and would've dropped dead within 30 minutes.  Doing PT when you do not have a FIRM, ACCURATE, diagnosis can be very dangerous.This is great advice.  You need both a pain management clinic, AND a specialist (and you might have to go through several different disciplines to find the right one) to get a firm and accurate diagnosis that is backed up with at least some sort of medical evidence. 

A GP is not able to do any of this.  You need MRIs and CTs and all that stuff.  Your GP either should refer you out, or if you can pick your own, research who is the best in town.  This is way beyond the capabilities or interest of your GP.Yes, with back issues it can be an orthopedist, neurosurgeon/neurologist (they do spines, I thought they only did brains before I got sick), and other specialists.  Your GP is way in over his/her head, and is not trained to safely prescribe and manage strong opiate and non opiate painkillers.   I would start with that. Also, see a neurologist or neurosurgeon.  You need as many opinions as possible, to be as informed as possible.  You also must educate yourself all about your spine and nerves a bit beyond lay terms so you can explain things and understand what your doc is saying.
You also, unfortunately, have to play the "game". Not sure of your age, but if you are young, doctors get suspect that you are either wanting to get out of school or work, or are depressed, or want opiate meds for the fun of it.  It shouldn't be that way, but it is.

one thing that helped me, is I typed up a timeline of trauma, or days I woke up and had agonizing pain and made a clear timeline.

Have another paragraph that accurately describes your pain (on fire? numb? pins and needles? crushing? etc) and what  relieves it (meds; laying down w/legs elevated, a pint of bourbon.  Then, upon seeing new docs, I'd just hand over the paper which saved time (and my emotions, because I felt I was on a job interview). The doc could read it quickly,then ask me follow up questions.

For me, I found that when I answered that I did have physical childhood abuse, and had seen a therapist about it, OHHHHH they loved to jump on that as my reason for pain.  They said for years I was "keeping it all inside, and this new pain that came out of nowhere was a manifestation of my depression and stress."  Now, stress will certainly make pain worse, and chronic pain can easily lead to depression for obvious reasons, but generally, pain that comes from pent-up depression is not pain to the degree that makes you meticulously plan your suicide.  If you are crawling on your hands and knees and screaming and fainting from pain, there is something way wrong far beyond depression.

I just stopped putting depression down on my intake notes until I knew they wouldn't lose focus and insist depression was the cause of all my pain.YES.  You absolutely need to do what this poster has said.  Blood tests are also a good thing to get done.

neuropathy meds are also incorrect for certain types of pain, like this poster says.  i was given gabapentic and cymbalta (meds for nerve pain) and for me they did nothing.  against doc orders i stopped taking them after three years.  I never had numbness or the pins and needles.  For others, these nerve pain meds may help a lot, but it may take awhile before you find the right meds, in the right combo, for you.PT is a wonderful thing once you are diagnosed and know that PT can help. Doing core work was damn hard for the first six months for me, but it paid off.  It stabilized my spine and I got super strong abs ad core muscles.  Now, it won't make your pain magically go away, but it may improve it a lot.  Just wait until you know what is wrong before going into PT, and only have a licensed PT introduce you into the proper exercises.  You will need this professional guidence at first until you know the proper body positioning.  If you do them even slightly incorrectly, you will not only get no benefit, but may further aggravate your pain and underlying condition.  Even if you have to pay someone the first few months, do it, and pay well attention and take notes.  The wrong exercises done in the wrong order can really fuck you up.  I found that Pilates worked wonderfully for me. I would be utterly furious and feel so violated.  You went above and beyond, worked so hard through such pain and exhaustion and a legitimate disability, when so many others would've thrown in the towel (and understandably so).  Of course that grade won't ruin your life, but damn, just that one accurate reflection of your work, testing, etc and knoweldge of the material would've been a nice boost that you needed after pouring in your heart and soul to get your degree.Yes, you are like the doctor that injected me with nubain, for break through pain, knowing I had methadone in my system, as he prescribed it every single month.  I am sure you already know what happened without having to look up what happens when you combine those two meds?

You must be a very special doctor:  only YOU know that meds are "useless" for sleeplessness due to chronic pain, and only add at most "15" minutes per night. I guess the millions of other docs and patients are all wrong and its all a placebo and all one big conspiracy between big pharma and clueless doctors.  It must be so hard being special, and the only doc on the planet that knows better.

And if something as simple as a typo or misspelling gets you such a hard-on of superiority and convinced you are an experienced doctor, wise beyond your years...I feel sorry for you.

Now, go do your "serious business" and go make someones life miserable by refusing them meds to help them sleep through chronic pain and recommend a nice, hot shower before bed on nice clean sheets.  Don't forget the incense.Thanks, I've never seen anything like that. It looked like what they do in rugby (scrum?) when all the players (and bull, in this case) form a circle and have a power struggle of some sort.

Did those blue pokey things cause anything more than annoying discomfort to the bull? And they let him enjoy the pasture and some hot female cows after the show, right?

Or...am I just fooling myself?Jesus, its not that hard. My point was you are just as arrogant as that doc was.  He injected me with nubain for break through pain, without knowing the very elementary fact that unless you want to send your patient into precipitated withdrawal from hell, you don't do that unless the patient is suffering from a life-threatening overdose.  Which, I was not.  

 The sad thing is there are always are doctors, lawyers, rocket scientists, etc., who will get their degree, but will be at the bottom of their class and barely scrape by. 

I already said I was going to be an asshole about it, why are you still fighting and trying to convince me otherwise? Go play with your incense.  I am done here.Well, hey! You have every chance to go, and at your age, its the best time! No kids, no long-term career or job set up yet, no obligations aside from school and regular stuff, it sounds like.

Is your health good?

Have you traveled out of the US before? Speak Spanish? Or any foreign language You don't need any of that at all, as once you are in an new culture, if you make the effort, it will come easy.  And Spanish is pretty easy - not like Russian or Japanese or German. 

How long before you graduate? Are you in a position to take a year off once you complete your current semester? Not sure about if you are on loans or what its like, but travel can be a fabulous, life changing experience.

If you want to tell me privately what major city you are close to, maybe  I can help.  I lived in Los Angeles for 5 years during grad school and a bit after, and let me tell you, that subculture down there made me want to run away.  

After I took the bar exam, I had time on my hands, hated my little subculture, was depressed, said fuck it all and took off to Thailand.  Very cheap, the food is incredible, people are outgoing and friendly. And you do not need to learn to speak Thai. You can live like on a kind on a few hundred bucks a month. Your plane ticket will be the largest expense. 

How about a summer/winter trip to Thailand?Oh, velcro pad, pshaw, I don't know much about it, but it seems like the bull is not being tortured and is enjoying flipping up those guys in circles.  Jesus, your arrogance and stupidity is underwhelming.  "Pretending to be a doctor" and "getting all jealous".  That is the go-to response of a 16  year old high school girl who can't back up her own claims. 

I have enough knowledge to know that you are wrong and full utter horse shit with your two earlier statements, that you still refuse to back up, that only "sleep hygiene" works and meds only give at most "15 extra minutes of sleep".

I have great doctor care NOW because I stood up to dumb, arrogant fucks like you, did my own research, got it confirmed with docs who were not lazy and were open minded enough to look outside the box.

The fact that you just accuse me of being "jealous" (jealous of what?) shows your level of immature.

Does the Taylor Swift song, "Haters Gonna Hate, Shake it Off" or whatever, serve as your inspiration?

I will remember you. You are the doc from the top ten school with a "flawless practice" who insists "meds don't help".

This is getting boring.  Bye.Would your family understand that you really need a break? It sounds like Latin American is the perfect getaway for you.  

You sound like a very good son who wants to do the right thing.  How about a summer in Latin America? That would mean no time off school? Would that be an option?

Or....an exchange program? Continue studying, but do a semester or year abroad in a Latin country? You get the best of both worlds.  There are many opportunities for this.

Edit: Check out your uni's study abroad program. There are also many programs that your school may not even know about, but would honor and allowed the credits to be transferable.  My friend did a semester in Argentina (he had Mexican roots, perfect Spanish) and he had the time of his life.  He got out of the Los Angeles culture which he couldn't stand, made some lifetime friends, got to do things he'd never do in LA (cost, lack of motivation, etc) and came back with a tan and a huge smile.  It did wonders for him.Can't you at least knit him a sweater, or buy some doll clothes for him? He must be kind of chilly.This involves a dog, obviously very different than a ferret, but just in case:  I noticed a few years ago she was getting a bald patch on her tail. She wasn't chewing on it, but the skin was very dry - just on the tail.

Vet later explained it was related to a low thyroid condition, and that there is some gland on the tail that gets affected when the thyroid is off.

We put her on levothyroxin (hormones) and the fur grew back, she lost some weight, and is a very happy doggie again.

I'm in no way comparing a dog's health to that of a ferret, but am curious if a ferret has a similar type of gland on its tail that would be affected if there was a thyroid issue.I would go back and delete my earlier comment about "couldn't you kit her a sweater".  A sweater-wearing ferret is adorable.

Edit: that red sweater is adorable.  It looks like the red hoodie my dog wears during winter and when she wants to look like a thug.I'm sorry, I wrote that comment before reading the entire thread.  I made another comment once I saw you indeed put a very cute sweater on your sweet baby. Schlongasaurus Rex?Um...you ass, that title was very unfairly misleading.I heard trampolines are dangerous, and I've seen some horrifying pix of ankle injuries, but an injury suffered prior to usage of trampoline is new to me.

heal up!Don't forget to update us...did you keep the piece? Were the able to reattach it? Do you get a discount on manicures now?So he has an excuse when women repeatedly refuse to have sex with him.  Now he can blame it on his "intimidatingly sized dick" (which is perfectly True).Sure - but I am a woman. As long as question is legitimate and not something about my mom (you sound like a decent guy, but with Reddit, you never know what surprise you may get).100%, absolutely NOT.
How do you think you are failing your family? Will they somehow not be able to pay their bills, or drop dead if you decide to move, or spend time out of the country? 

I realize your culture and upbringing are putting a lot of stress on you.  While I am not latin, I come from a Middle Eastern country where you can imagine how women are expected to behave and what choices they are expected to make in life.

I got tremendous shit throughout high school and college from my dad, despite my excellent grades, and was not into drugs, because he expected me to be a virginal good little girl who didn't dare ride or race motorcycles (my passion).

You will have to look deep into your soul to make a healthy break from your parents' expectations. All you owe them is respect (depending on how they treat you) and depending on the degree to which they support you financially.  You owe it to yourself to study well and do a good job in school.

I do not believe you owe it to them, or anyone, to not follow interests, passions, or dreams in life simply because they think its stupid, wasteful, or silly.  Now, if your dream was getting stoned all day, or dropping out of school to sketch  chalk drawings on the sidewalk and live off change people throw at you, I would agree with your parents.

Very often, parents of a different generation or country have grown up in such difficult and different conditions, they cannot fathom doing something different, such as going to Argentina.   

Then you have the cultural expectations.  If your dad followed all the rules his parents set up, he may likely expect the same from you.

If you want to be your own man, you will have to find a way to make boundaries where you still can respect your parents, let them know you love them, but also pursue your passions and not feel guilty no matter how much shit they may give you about it.

It is your life.  I read a few of your older posts, and you do not at all seem happy or motivated.  Only you can break away.  I was much happier once I broke away.   I was so tired of hiding my motorcycle, of hiding boyfriends, of getting into arguments when I wanted to travel to Europe.

The better grades you get, the more you can succeed and take care of yourself without having to financially rely upon them.

If you never break out of your shell, you will end up like my older brother.  He followed all the "rules".  He married only a Jewish girl (my parents threw a fit and lost their shit when I married a non-Jew, and I am not religious and they are hardly religious).  They were controlling and manipulative by heaping guilt on me when I made life choices that were good life choices,but not what they wanted. My brother is now still working with them dependent on them for a job, unable to do things an adult should know how to do because with the control my father had over him, my brother also got lazy and just handed any task over to my dad.  My brother is 45 and doesn't even know how to buy car insurance.  

My long winded answer is:  why would broadening your horizons and traveling to a foreign country hurt them?  If you make good use of the time and study abroad and do well, it is not "running away." 

If you go on a vacation and its not a study thing, its a wonderful life experience you may not have a chance to do later in life once your career gets going.  The time is well spent if you don't hide in your room the entire vacation and go out, explore, meet interesting people, and do stuff beyond getting drunk.

Fuck what society thinks.  You are making choices to make your life better and enriched not to make society happy.

Finally -- what do you feel you are running from? From a bit of what I read, part of the problem is you are unmotivated to take good care of yourself.  I found myself much, much happier and confident after I got myself whipped into shape and lost 20lbs.  This was awhile ago, and my only regret was not doing it earlier.  It will completely change your outlook and confidence.  It will motivate you to try harder with everything, because as you build strength and endurance, and lose weight and get fit, you will be so impressed with what you are actually capable of doing.

I suggest, why not start on getting healthy right now.  Because if not, you run the risk of going to Argentina but being just as miserable there if overall, you are unhappy with yourself.Of course she does. She stand on her hind paws and pops that hoodie on all on her own. I'd record it, but she's shy.Was it a symmetrical hair loss? Or just on the tail? I had no idea that thyroid conditions could cause dogs to lose hair just on a patch on their tail, but since read a little about it, and sometimes the hair loss from thyroid issues can turn up in an "interesting" pattern.If a doc started in about her personal MRI looking "worse", and because it looked worse it was therefore impossible that you were in worse pain that she, I would really struggle to prevent myself from beating the stupidity out of her face.Get as many new opinions until you get help, both in treatment and pain management.

It is truly depressing as many doctors can graduate from a good med  school, pass their exams and not get sued on a daily basis but be so damn stupid, arrogant and stubborn.

I just had a lengthy dispute with an MD on Reddit who insists pain meds "do not help for long term, and that is a fact", and that prescription meds do NOT help one suffering insomnia, whether the insomnia be from stress, chronic pain or otherwise, "and at most, as a fact, such meds only add 15 minutes extra sleep."

This is a practicing doctor who treats patients.  When I asked for cites  from peer-reviewed scientific journals that meds were all worthless, I got none, and was told that the only thing that helps a suffering patient to sleep is "good sleep hygiene".  I also asked, did that mean millions of patients and docs who use and prescribe pain and sleep meds are all morons or there is some big conspiracy, and all patients who do get relief from meds are just experience an odd placebo? No answer.

Instead, he accused me of being "the typical patient who is jealous, trying to play doctor and is the patient all docs hate because [we] always causes problems."  I've had doctors tell me some pretty ridiculous shit, but never had one say "you're just jealous!" when I disagree with their opinions.

This is why we have so many people needlessly suffering.  Because docs like him will refuse to properly manage pain and tell you to take a nice shower, buy 1000 thread count Egyptian sheets, use some incense and essential oils on your pain area, and grope a healing crystal while chanting some useless shit.I think they are showing compassion.  Its a lot better than those people who say, "you look too good to be sick!" or, "for someone who complains about so much pain, you seem to walk and get around ok".

It can get frustrating, but these people who ask if you are ok are just trying to be there for you.  I told my MIL, who was quite literally asking me every 10 minutes if I was ok, that it wasn't necessary and was actually making me think of my pain the few times I was able to forget it.

If its just a random friend you occasionally see, I am grateful that they remember and are thoughtful enough t ask.  Feeling any better? Those brain zaps are something horrible.Had no idea. Maybe some of those girls who post those selfies of ridiculously shaped eyebrow actually have thyroid conditions.I have this big, fat vascular tumor in my spine that popped up one day and has made my life pure hell.  I am in chronic, agonizing pain.

I so miss sleeping through the night, being able to work out hard (or at all) and I was  a fool for taking my health for granted.

Kids: be active, work out, do not take health for granted. Shit can literally change overnight.Try buying European cuts.  My husband is 6'4 and slim.  American cuts were always too short on the sleeve and about two feet too wide in the torse/waist.I'm so sorry to hear this.  Chronic pain really fucks everything up.Nobody understands how this affects people physically and mentally unless they experience it themselves. Hey, my husband is 6'4, 180lbs.  He has some stretch marks because he grew very quick during puberty.  I still thing he's hot. That height and his personality/confidence is what makes for a sexy man.Its quite unbelievable how much losing 10-15lbs can change how your family and friends will perceive and treat you. I'm about 5'3, and the sudden change in how I was treated, by both friends and family and the general public, when I lost 15lbs seemed ridiculous.   I was worthless 15lbs heavier, and a sudden star everyone admired and loved 15lbs lighter.  That shit will give any teeanger or young adult a complex.Serious? People do this?Thank you for this. I sometimes need to use my handicapped placard and I want to kill motherfucker who pull this shit. You dudes are my heroes for the day.I guess being out of work has made him salty.I made FB friends with a guy who, like me, was into motorcycle roadracing and dirtbikes.  I was perusing his pix, and there were some pics of him and his dual-sport. Not knowing how to ride a dual-sport, I commented on a pic of him and hs gf and dual-sport, "That looks like so much fun, so jealous."

Within a few minutes I get a psychotic, raging private message from the gf demanding to know who the FUCK I am and why am I JEALOUS over HER BOYFRIEND.

The fact that my facebook profile pic, that was public to her, showed me knee-dragging on the track still gave her no indication that MAYBE I was referring to dual-sport riding.

I sent him a polite message that I was unfriending him as It was apparent me being his "friend" would be upsetting someone.When my husband, without asking or telling me, bought some extra tampons to keep in case of emergency for me in his Tundra glovebox.  When I asked why he had tampons in this truck, he looked at me like I was retarded and said, "uh...because you're a woman and may need them when we're on the road."   That was exceptionally sweet.Ah, the opposite of my husband. When he was out of work for awhile and I was a brand new lawyer, I would want to sleep in on Saturday mornings, while he wanted to be up and doing fun shit at 8am.  So, while I'd still be in a blissful sleep, I'd hear him whispering, "Are you stillll sleeeeepingggggg?" about two inches from my face.Did I read this right? You are losing your shit and declare you are "never getting laid again" because you have had "no action" in two freakin' months????

That's a nanosecond. That is nothing. Tinder is a lazy way to go about it. It may be great for some people, but stop using it as your only means to meet women. Go out and meet them in person, get used to making conversation, even if just to talk (I mean in person).

I may be misreading, but you sound like its all about you, and the sex you want, and the way you refer to it as "action" makes you sound self-entitled, spoiled and immature.  Most women don't want that, and can read it a mile away once they are past 21 or so.  

Desperation turns people off, and so does drama.  Whining that you will never get laid again because of lack of "action" in two months reeks of not only desperation, but of an inability to function without getting "laid".

And stop comparing yourself to what your ex "gets".  Her sex life is not your business.  You are competing with her.  

And why do you state "its not fair" that its harder for you to get laid? Why isn't it "fair"? Since when are you entitled to have the same amount of sexual experiences she has? Jesus, kid, grow the fuck up. Its very fair.  

Grow up, learn to meet women in public, treat them with respect (maybe you do, but your method of writing about it her sounds really immature, and that is a huge turnoff).How about, when someone is describing a story, "queue entrance of person I thought was out of earshot."

Its CUE, motherfucker.  Don't you people read books?Part of me hopes this was truly written by a woman, and I think "cool."  The other part feels it was written by some neckbeard to beat off to.If this picture was taken from Christmas, 2015, the little boy would be crying because he got the wrong color iPhone 6 and his little brother is comforting him.  

Edit: I love this picture and while I know 1969 doesn't make things nostalgically perfect, it looks so much more beautiful and real.When I was 17 I didn't know what to buy my 28 year old bf for our for first Xmas.  After much consideration, I went to the local gun store he once took me to that had a range (this was CA, not Texas, so we didn't have one on every street corner).  I had remembered him commenting on this case of beautiful knives.  


I used all my waitressing savings and bought him a Cold Steel knife with the most beautiful case (scabbard?). When I asked the cashier if I could return it if he didn't like, all the dudes hanging out said if my boyfriend didn't like the knife, I should dump his sorry ass and anyof them would be happy to date me.  

I think it was the most beloved gift I've ever given. I'm now 41 and I still can't seem to outdo that gift. No, I realized he was really immature and dumped his ass.  But, he kept the knife.  Just the other day he told me is the nicest gift anyone has ever given him. I wish I had a picture.  I think it was a Tanto? It was huge (to me). Longer than his palm, and that case was a work of art.This just breaks my heart. Reading that entire thread of spoiled, rotten little shits ruining expensive and perfectly working phones or cars, and their enabling parents made me physically ill.Oh, come on now, Miley Cyrus is where its at. 

(I hope a sarcasm indication is not necessary here.)I once told this guy how I missed ballet and other dancing I did.  He has zero dance experience (which is of course fine) yet replied, "Oh, I know how you feel! My wife and I love watching Dancing With the Stars!"

Yuugggggrrrrrrblerg.Dogs are the most incredible of creatures. Sometimes I stare at my dog and I marvel in just how perfect she is.  Dogs have such pure hearts, they care so much, just want love and food, don't care if you are rich, poor, fat, skinny, pretty, ugly; are so happy when you come home after being gone a mere 5 minutes, and all in the most adorable furry package of warmth and love. Even the ugliest of dogs are cute.

Even dogs that are raging assholes aren't malicious. Certainly some need to be put down, but their aggression either came from being poorly treated or bad socialization. There is never malice.This is actually very useful when people are willing to listen.  I was about 20lbs overweight and absolutely miserable about it in my mid-20s.   I thought I knew the basic stuff of don't stuff your face and work out, but until I met my husband, who, when I asked, started training me, I had no idea of the importance of diet, the right nutrition, and doing certain exercises in a certain order  with the correct body position.  I was so put-off into getting in shape as I was convinced that not only would I have to starve and eat salad forever, but I'd have to do death workouts.

Within one year, my body transformed into (and I mean this humbly, but with pride) something I never thought possible.  It wasn't perfect by any means, but the transformation was incredible.  I did work out hard at the gym, and changed my diet, but I never felt deprived and I actually got to love it.Ha.  I felt nostalgic a few weeks ago and contacted him on FB after some 20-odd years.  Within one week I realized he had not matured one bit and knew I could never speak to him again. 

He deserved that gift, but I sure wish I had given it to my husband.

Although, in college, I did give a very inexpensive b-day gift to the guy I was dating at the time.  I bought a 1st place trophy at an awards store and had engraved on it : "World's Finest Diver".

No creepy PMs, please.Its pretty sad that given all the weird, twisted shit I have seen on the internet, THIS is one of the most disgusting things I've encountered.Um, no? It was a 10.5 year difference.  If I were 18 and he were 29 would it still be ew? Believe it or not, it is possible for people of those ages to have a non-"ew" relationship. I wasn't 14 for fuck's sake.Oh, dear.  That is all I can say. Oh hellz no.  A year later I had matured, wised up and realized he was really a putz.    No.  It was much larger. The blade was wider and longer and the handle (I know that is the wrong terminology) was wider.  I bought it in 1992 or 1993.  The case/scabbard/whatever its called was gorgeous - all black, with an Asian looking tassle


Edit: Looked similar to one of these:  https://www.google.com/search?q=cold+steel+knives+tanto+from+1992&amp;espv=2&amp;biw=1242&amp;bih=606&amp;source=lnms&amp;tbm=isch&amp;sa=X&amp;ved=0CAcQ_AUoAmoVChMI6pK6x8qpyAIVzIsNCh0-pAXo#imgrc=U7fasx1wgjMXRM%3ADammit, now I really wish I didn't tell him "please never contact me again" a few weeks ago. I wish I had a pic for you. And for me.  I will never forget that little tassel.

After I left him when I was 18, he tried to get back at me and one day called me to say "Guess what? I sold the knife!"   Then he broke down and said he could never sell it, he just wanted to try and hurt me.That current selection has some long-ass swords! His was definitely not a sword, but a knife.  Now I wish I could get into some knife-training lessons so I would know the basics of handling one without slicing my fingers off.Fair enough. And only 7 years old than 10.

And user Pangolini007 says "EWW  GROSS" just based on age. Fool.  At 17 I was living on my own, going to school full time and working part time as a bank teller and waitress.  Piss off with your judgmental 14-year-old-sounding language and keep the discussion on-point:  ie: Cold Steel knives.Oh, fuck off. This isn't a thread asking your opinion on appropriate dating ages or statutory rape.  I could care less why you find it "gross" and "eww" and would prefer you just keep your nose out of my business.

You pontificate:  "Its just wrong".  Good for you. Now, piss off and take that shit somewhere else.

Edit:  And for fuck's sake, using "gross" and "eww" and "nasty" and "um" really distracts from your message of trying to appear mature and moral and enlightened.   Some parents get married legally at 17 or 18.  They are not still "just children". But, if an 18-year-old's mental state is anywhere as similar as yours, then I can see why you think the way you do.I'm sure Roger Waters would have a snappy comeback for that question.Wow! Incredible change, determination and transformation. The closer you get to your goal, the harder you will have to work and more patient you will have to be to get the body you want.

If you haven't already done so, hire a bad-ass trainer that can ensure you do not hit plateaus and will change up your workouts. Keep it up.  You are blooming into a lovely flower!Did you sit on his feet and wrap your arms around his leg and make him walk around? I was so sad the day he told me I was too heavy for it.  He was a little dude - maybe 150lbs.  His poor back...Shoo.Because however bad it currently may be, there is a good chance it can get better.Shoo.This must be heartbreaking. Can you ever dance on pointe again?
The arabesque is beautiful.  Could you share any more pics with us?

I hope you heal up quick. Very sorry your career has ended.Would you have had a different result with your feet had you not started pointe until 13 or so?What? WHAT THE  FUCK? I have been outside the US for a few years, and last time I saw the bear commercial they were fairly innocuous little cubs with mama playing with toilet paper and not speaking.  Now they are talking about skid marks and not washing underwear? What the holy fuck is wrong with advertising companies? Yeah, get my attention, but not in a manner that revolts me so much I will never purchase your ass-wiping product again.I clicked on it.  I couldn't stop myself.  Those maggots on the palate. What happens when those poor souls run their tongue over it and scoop up some wrigglies? Why did I click on it..Going public with this took some serious bravery.  Thanks for posting the followup.  He's turning into quite the handsome young man.  What a damn shame he couldn't get treatment earlier - cannot imagine the emotional toll.Luna, this one is spectacular.  I'm subbed to you and this one has moved me more than any other one.  What a great WP as well. Thank you.Its the Pakistan version of OkCupid.I realize you are trying to be positive and uplifting, but you are not being realistic.  For people suffering when their body fails, and are in daily pain and cannot do the most basic tasks of life, and they know they are dying, it is very hard to have a "winning spirit".  I am not saying it is not possible, but the reality is that the spirit and body are very much connected.  If you have never experienced severe, chronic pain that never goes away, an inability to do basic life tasks, watch your once-strong body turn into a skeleton with dark circles under your eyes, need help with every little thing and watch your loved ones hide their broken heart with a fake smile around you, its very easy to toss out  empty platitudes.ALS is truly such a cruel disease.  I hope you were being facetious when you say you got "yelled at" for losing weight.  Its hard to have an appetite with what you are going through.  Are you the only one in your family affected by ALS?

I know nothing I say can help.  All I can hope is that you are not alone, have a loving friend or family member that makes you smile every now and then, and that you continue to not be in pain.

I realize I am a complete internet stranger, but PM me any time if you wish.I am so sorry.  To see your loved one, once strong and hearty and healthy to shrivel up into a skeleton and beg for death is something you never forget.  To be in the position of the healthy caretaker - where you have to hide your tears for fear of bringing down your loved one - is often forgotten in the shuffle to care for the sick one.  That last last month must have been hell on earth for all of you.  My attorney colleague said he did the math with his wife, and it just made much more financial sense for his wife to not return to work once they had kids.  Daycare was 1k a month - for a 3 year old. It made no sense for both of them to bust their asses at work, come home exhausted and have barely any time with their kids, when her salary mostly would be going to pay for day care.

So, she is happy at home and caring for the kids and can take care of the house, he comes home and is happy to see everyone, and it works out great for them.This is wonderful news.Why? He was making plenty as an attorney for them to buy a house and have a comfortable, modest lifestyle.  She already has two kids. Why does she need to watch other peoples' kids just because she is watching her own? It involves all sorts of liabilities most people don't even think about. And she isn't just "watching" her kids, but teaching and parenting them.  Throw in a handful of other kids, and that dynamic changes completely.

Its also about quality of life.  Just because a person can work 15 hours a day it doesn't meant they necessarily should or that its a good idea for their circumstances.It was exactly what he told me.  After doing all the math, they would make an extra 3k a year.  Not worth it at all, particularly as the costs of that 3k (exhaustion, less happy marriage, less time raising kids, house a disaster) made zero change in their personal financial circumstances.  Its not like that 3k (or even if it were 10k) a year put them above drowning.  Nor could they significantly improve their quality of life in any meaningful way with an additional 3k a year.

For a different set of circumstances, maybe you are forced to work for that 3k to not be on the streets.  But if you are not forced to bust your ass at such a cost, why bother?I just responded to another post that my friends realized if the mom went back to work, they'd net 3k a year. Makes no sense if you don't need that 3k to survive. 

There is a very common theme (and I was guilty of it myself until life happened) in the US that there is something inherently shameful and lazy in not busting your ass and working every hour of the day and maximize income production to the limit.I think the mental exhaustion alone from the constant noise and need to always be aware of what is going on would be overwhelming.  Its your home, and your home is not designed as a daycare.  Its your furniture, your stuff, your yard.  Can we really say most people have homes that you'd willingly open up to your kids plus a handful of others to make a few hundred bucks a week that you don't need to survive?I think the mental exhaustion alone from the constant noise and need to always be aware of what is going on would be overwhelming.  Its your home, and your home is not designed as a daycare.  Its your furniture, your stuff, your yard.  Can we really say most people have homes that you'd willingly open up to your kids plus a handful of others to make a few hundred bucks a week that you don't need to survive?I think that is possible if she has a unique situation where she is not exhausted from being a stay at home mom, her kid operates on a schedule and can be relied upon to never interrupt class schedules, live lectures, etc.  That's hard to come by, but if it does exist, and the mom has the energy and desire, it can be a wonderful opportunity.  People like to judge.  They expect you to be "perfect" according to their own rules and expectations.  They expect you and mom to work full time no matter what, even if you net $1 a year after taxes, daycare, etc.  Its a common American theme - bust your ass as hard as you can and if both parents do not work every waking hour, you are lazy.

If you had 10k in savings, or 50k, you'd still find someone bitching that that is not enough for emergencis.So....they need to plan for every single contingency, even a tidal wave, at the expense of quality of life.

Everyone has their own balance that works for them but may not work for you. OP is a responsible parent and they are doing what works for them and their values, not relying on handouts.

And let's face reality:  I was making 100K a year with no kids, an emergency funds, with a husband making about 65k.  I got catastrophically sick and I had great insurance --- through work.

When I eventually threw in the towel and went on disability, the COBRA alone, for me, was $800 a month just for that, nevermind copays for meds and doc appointments.  We burned through our savings despite being the managers of our apartment complex and thus having rent of $600 a month (very cheap for Silicon Valley).  I still had to file bankruptcy.

My point:  you cannot plan for every single contingency.  If you think you can, you are just fooling yourself.  Yes, be responsible, but be realistic. Its like thinking just because you bought home owner's insurance, you're covered.  You know how many clients I've represented in fighting insurance companies because the insurance fought to pay out a covered event? These families did the responsible thing, yet they still got fucked.  

I am not saying don't buy insurance, but rather, don't oversimplify what it means to build your own safety net.  Shit happens.Ok, that makes sense! Yes, from what I have read, ALS really makes the body so very fragile.  I am relieved to hear you have supportive friends.  Its so common that when people get serious illness, certain friends drop off. 
I can understand why some people just can't handle being around someone very sick.  Doesn't mean I like it, but if that is how they feel (ie: they get so depressed or uncomfortable they cannot bear it) well, how can I change that?

But then you have those other "friends" who simply cannot be bothered to be the one to drive to your house to meet up because you are too ill or in too much pain to drive.  They have no issue driving even farther to visit their boyfriend that they bitch and while about 5x a week, but to come visit me once a week for girl time, oh no, too much out of their way!

Ok, I shall shut up now.Yep, very True. I was one of those obnoxious little shits in my early 20s when I bought into my parents' belief that if you are poor you "must've fucked up somewhere down the line", so long as you lived in the US, because in the US, "there is ALWAYS a way".

Nevermind that my dad narrowly avoided losing his home in the 80s by sweet talking a billionaire (yes, billionaire) family friend/old lady to "invest" half a million that he would "manage" so she could "have something in her own name".  She never saw a DIME of that money.

So yeah, I relied on the government to pay for grad school and felt so high and mighty, and then I graduated and life got real.  Housing prices skyrocketed.  I was lucky to become a baby attorney before the economy tanked, so I had no problem finding a job.  

Then, I got very, very sick and it all went away. You can't work if you are sick.  If you can't work, you lose your insurance, or you can wait 2 years and apply for federal social security and go through the additional 2 year application process and get denied until you hire a lawyer. Or you can get medicaid and then discover doctors don't have to take medicaid patients. And that's just the medical shit.

My 45 year old brother, who only has a job because mommy and daddy created a small business for him that they now all run together - thinks himself a hugely, self-made successful businessman and that Rush Limbaugh should be president.  He once offered to help me a bit with medical bills, but only if I faked monthly receipts so he, and my parents, who are millionaires and have homes in Hawaii, could get a tax write off.

Yes.  Knowing I was bankrupt due to a catastrophic illness and was near death, they still had that mindset that I must be lazy or must've fucked up, so they think its fair to help their dying daughter with medical bills, so long as dying daughter commits tax fraud (felony) and fakes receipts while they commit their own tax fraud by taking phony write offs.

When I pointed this out, he said I was being my typical selfish self and slammed down the phone.  The three of them still believe that they are living comfortably because of their own hard word.  While my dad did bust his ass, my mom and brother sure haven't, and all three of them see no problem with defrauding 500k from that woman because she was wealthy enough that it didn't affect her.I wrote another response that would also address this:

It is neither practical nor realistic to try and plan for every single life contingency. Be responsible, plan for reasonable things, but damn, "did they do the math to see what will happen if they get divorced?"

Serious?

In that case, what about if there is a earthquake and you live in CA and the CA Earthquake Authority only allows insurance payouts for a fraction of your home's worth? Or, you buy disability insurance and get disabled, but insurance companies being what they are, find any reason not to pay? Or, you work for an Enron-type company and your "safe" investment and IRA suddenly goes up in smoke?

You cannot plan for every single contingency.  That is a fact.  My husband and I did not have kids, worked great jobs and saved what we could and I got disabled and very sick. I still went bankrupt. 

Edit:  I completely agree that is irresponsible for people to have kids if they know very well they cannot afford them and will need handouts from the government.  But that is not the case with OP.  100k a year won't get you very far in Silicon Valley, but 30k a year may get you far enough in the mid-west, along with side jobs.  OP isn't relying on government help.  So what's the problem?I've been through freakin' 20 different docs.  Its always the same fucking shit.  I do appreciate your kind words.Thank you, that's what I thought. Two fucking years? I don't think so.  I appreciate your response.That's what I figured.  Its very standard. I had an Indian friend and she told me how tough it was when moms of potential husbands would meet her for the first time, and with my friend standing right there, tell my friend's mom, "You lied to me. Your daughter is much darker skinned than you said.  And she is ugly." (I thought she was very pretty.)Never in my life have I heard that neurontin "promotes nerve healing and repair" or that it takes two goddamn years to notice an effect.  Your response made me laugh - I needed that.  She's a freakin' anesthesiologist. For 7 years.  I've had 5 different pain management docs and every single one fucks up in some significantly stupid way at some point.  Thanks for your input. I also notice over time that I build up tolerances.  With certain meds, (like clonozopam) I just stop taking them for a few months, but with others that are my only significant pain-killing drugs, stopping is just not an option.

I won't be taking the neurontin. I'm glad it helped for you. I have heard for many people it can make a huge improvement.  I think a 3 month period is a more than reasonable time to give a drug intended for pain killing a try.   

I remember when my pain got so bad, I couldn't wear a ring or watch.  I would jump like a startled cat if someone would brush up even just a finger against me.  Like you, I needed a warning.

Its like we became IEDs. Appreciate your help.  It seems with pain management docs, every single one has a certain belief of one thing or another that they REFUSE to reconsider, or accept does not apply to a particular patient.  I have learned to (grudgingly) bite my tongue so I can get the meds I need.  

Its so frustrating when a doc rolls their eyes because they OBVIOUSLY know your body better than you since you are not a doctor.I'm so sorry for your anxiety. Isn't the system so fucked when we pain patients actually have cold sweats and anxiety attacks just because we fear that our pain management docs will not believe us, or suddenly refuse to give us meds which might as well be a death sentence or stop taking us seriously?

Even with docs that knew my file well, every single month when I go in for my refill, I feel like its a job interview.

Except, my worst case scenario is not getting the job, but denied medications that quite literally keep me alive.

It is so damn sad that we can have files 5 inches thick that prove we are legitimate pain patients, but we constantly have to play the game and figure out within the first few seconds, "does this doctor want to see me cry to believe me? Should I fake a limp? Should I hide my limp so they don't think I am pretending because I wasn't limping last month? Am I ruining my chances to get sufficient medication by being strong and smiling and holding in my tears? If I've had a three week flareup from hell, will he send me to a therapist because my pain is "clearly all stress related" because I break down in his office because I am in utter agony and have not slept in a week?"For me, I think it was so many years of being in such severe spine pain, that it referred out to all over my body.  If my husband would inadvertently brush his finger up my arm very gently, I would jump through the ceiling.  

My skin hurt.  I cut off all my hair because it felt heavy.  I think its years of sensory overload and your body just can't handle it. I had to wear only very loose clothing.  I could no longer handle any audio or visual sensory overload, and it came quick. I hated crowds, music on the radio unless it was very soft, and driving down major streets with many billboards. 

All those things that were easy to ignore in my healthy life became actual stressors.  I stopped listening to music for ten years, and I used to live in my music.

Right now, where I live, these fireworks go off (they are cohetes - a MX thing; no pretty colors, they just make a fuckton of noise).  My reaction is embarrassing. I lose it.  My dog gets understandably scared and runs outside and starts barking and I feel a surge of adrenaline and anger (actual anger) and fear and FUCK I want to scream and sometimes I do.  These things are freakin' LOUD.

I think with years of severe pain, the human body gets its central nervous system affected in many ways, and we become hypersensitive to so many things.That is a very fair point.  Considering I got no reaction (good or bad) the last time I took it, I could give it a try for a few months.  It very well have a different effect on me.  I already filled the script as it is.  Thank you! You got me to take a good look outside the box.That is bad.  Is there any way you can get what you need with your doc or through another doc? I had years of violent nightmares that were so evil I became terrified to go to sleep.  Nightmare that my own parents were drilling holes in my spine, or sawing my legs off, or being thrown into a prison 10 floors underground where souls were left to die.  These dreams to not belong in a healthy, peaceful person.  Chronic pain is evil in so many ways.I can't even click on this, because I will only contribute to this guy's humiliation.  He worked his ass off, trained hard, probably got his ass beat during the years of training and of all things did not expect this to happen in the ring.

So...uh...who won the fight?Just try a yoga class.  Women are ripping them so often its gotten to the point where we just laugh it off.Ok, I couldn't resist. I clicked it.

And I didn't feel as bad as I thought I would.  I expected some ripped guy who clearly had trained for this. Instead is a clearly out of shape dude with a beer gut.  And if he is not serious enough to eat properly before a fight in front of hundreds of people, then I don't have that much pity.  It sucks, but hey...what did he expect?In 1st grade  I was so excited to be going on a field trip to a natural history museum, particularly as our teacher hyped up the "two headed snake".  I was so disappointed when I saw it.  For months I had been visualizing a snake one with head at each end.Just wait until the writing geniuses at that sub NoSleep get offers to shill this.Parents that hunt, live in more woodsy or rural areas, maybe those parents grew up shooting while they were 11 years old but didn't blow little kids away when they were told "no".Its actually quite beautiful, as long as I imagining him (her?) not suffering in death, and this type of "burial" (propping the dead up overlooking the water) was the norm.Is the guy holding the foot wearing a red gi? Maybe it was a failed training exercise on the whole "put your car key between your fingers and make a fist" that women are told to do while walking alone in parking lots.To hear Russians laughing is a beautiful sound. They have it  so rough - nice to see them having a good time for a change.Well, that "happy birthday" card sorts of fucks the "they weren't a gift...he was holding them because they were too heavy for me to carry in my pockets."

What kind of asshat does that? Are you a lawyer? That is such a ridiculous myth.  So if someone comes and steals my dog and removes her collar and microchip, that person now has 9/10s of the law on his side? I read the title as "Subway".  As in the restaurant. Then I saw the drawing of the flute and somehow connected it with that perv who was molesting children and, well, yeah.Thank you for this! I was wondering if insurance companies would try to weasel their ways out of paying policies in these cases.And you wonder why she is your ex...Do you truly think a few bobby pins is going to hurt her after 7 years of emotions, no matter how good or bad?   She left you.  That means she doesn't give a flying fuck if she sees bobby pins, and also knows you well enough to know you put them there yourself.

BTW, I am sure there was warning and red flags despite the "without much warning", but maybe you didn't or wouldn't let yourself see them.  I'm not saying she was right and you were wrong.  I know nothing about the details.

But you are acting like a child, then posting about it on Reddit which is even more childish, and seemed surprised ou are being called out as a grownass man acting like a child.Then if its civil, why bother trying to get petty revenge, as you call it? Keep it civil until you can get out.Or, she may feel a huge sense of relief. "Thank god he is moving on and no longer pining over me and a lost cause, because his whining and clinginess was making me batshit insane."Now, this is how its done! Self respect, and respect for the ex, and none of this "petty revenge" shit of trying to make someone jealous.What was it like in person? It must've been enchanting.  I think I'd feel very small.Oh, those sobbing voicemails.  One one hand, its heartbreaking. On the other, its really unfair to do that to an ex.  Do it with a friend or therapist, a person you are just going to cause to feel bad, then resent you.Someone when through and downvoted every single one of your comments? Because you were brave enough to post what you did?

What a fucking asshole. (Now you gonna go and downvote all of my comments, jerkoff? Do you really have that much free time? Enjoy.)Thanks!  I do appreciate the lengthy response, and I hope more people read that. I actually am a lawyer, and when people yammer, "Possession is 9/10s of the law!" and think just because something is in their hand the law is automatically 9/10s on their side, I want to just slap them a few times across the face.Sacre bleu.  Is this all of 4chan? Is this supposed to be funny?

And why in the hell do they write like that?
Be me.
Be so and so.
Be fucktard.
Etc.Another jumping caique! We need a subreddit of JumpingCaiques. Last week there were a handful of jumping caique videos that were so damn cute.My dog does that when she spies a napkin or paper towel.  Grabs it, and must hold it between her paws and shred.  She's now 13, so she shreds very slowly, but still, she shreds. I must have 20 different shredding pix.Its a caique thing.  Google "jumping caiques" and you will see some incredibly cute stuff.  They are like little puppies and will roll on their backs and let you gently rub their tiny tummies while they squawk with glee and wriggle their feet and very gently beak you.I hope you  get what you need. Another poster made a very good point a few weeks ago on a different thread, although I can't remember it.  Something along the lines of "we are not in pain because we are crazy, but are becoming crazy because of the pain."

People actually die if they are intentionally sleep deprived.  So just imagine what happens when chronic pain prevents a person from getting a good night's sleep for months or years at a time.How long did it take before you started noticing an improvement once you started taking neurontin?I love it.  I give her my old napkins now.  Its adorable.And not only that, but OP just made advertised to the public that he is a whining little twat.   The people encouraging him are also whiny twats.  I'd be so embarrassed if my ex did or said something like that - embarrassed for myself that I dated such a putz for 7 years.Hey, now THIS is a response that makes you look human, real, compassionate and not like a douche..

4 months is nothing. I know it doesn't feel that way now, but its a nanosecond. Right now is not a time you should be thinking of getting a "piece of ass" but recovering from the break up.  You describe your hurt  very well, and its all understandable.  Take some time to grieve and get over her. And don't put her down. That only makes you look bad.

I also imagine there are plenty of women who would be interested in you, but women can sense when a guy's heart isn't into it, or he just wants a piece of ass.  If she just wants a piece of ass, then it'll work.  But many women don't want that.  

Stop following your ex on FB or asking mutual friends about her, if that is something you are already doing, no matter how tempting.  That is just sticking a knife into your own heart.I love this! You did a great job and your wife also did the cushions so beautifully.

Can I come over now with some books I'm reading and my cat?That looks like it hurts like hell.

Serious question: until it heals, how on earth to you defecate without splitting it open? How do you keep it clean? With a mirror and cotton and alcohol? How did you sit?Can you put a wound vac on that, or is it just too impractical, or not appropriate for that kind of wound?Why in the hell did they place you on your back coming out of surgery? Was it a breathing issue? Afraid you might asphyxiate if you were on your stomach?   

I broke my tail bone and while of course its nothing like what you're going through, that shit hurt like hell for a year.  I was too stupid to get a donut pillow for my office job.

Pain meds make quality of life much, much better for things like this.  No reason to play tough and suffer.  I hope you don't need a 3rd surgery.Had no idea about the donut - obviously, I don't know a thing about these types of cysts.  I wish you a quick healing.  This makes me want to punch his mother in the jaw.  Her perfect little son didn't mean any harm when he committed a felony and drugged this woman because she wouldn't give him what he was entitled to? Her loser son ruined his own damn life.  His mom has some serious fucking gall to even approach OP.  To even speak to her anything more than a genuine apology.  Yes  - I had it (one ovary sort of got knotted up with some other organs and tissue and needed rearranging).  It went very well.  I was in the usual exhaustion and pain you get from invasive surgery ane anesthesia.  I needed a week off to recover, although it can take longer depending on how many hours you are under and what is going on.

Every procedure and body is different. If you need it NOW, do it now. Your health is the number one importance in your life.  If it can be put off for a few months, make an informed decision and if it can safely be done later, you have that option.The user enlightenedmark was very kind and very accurate with her assessment.

You are "not awesome" in his eyes and will never be.  Accept it.  Move on. You are now doing things to try and be awesome for him.  That is not healthy. That means instead of making major life decisions and choices for you and your self-development, you are doing in with fantasies that it will get him to "see the light".  This is delusional.

So I'll be more to the point. You are obsessed. I don't mean you are crazy. But your post makes it clear you are obsessed and believe he is the one.

If you have not already, please leave him alone.  You are bothering him.  He has been very patient and kind but this is not fair to him if you ask him one more time.  

He is not into you.  It doesn't matter what you think. He only needs to say no once, and you need to respect it.

Imagine if the roles were reversed and a man were writing this about you, about he believes you would be so happy together, he's so sad, you keep having "excuses" to turn him down.  He'd look like an out of control, delusional stalker.

Keep up with your counseling. You will get over him. It takes time.Stop following him on social media.  You might as well stick a knife in your heart.  You only have yourself to blame if you continue following a man that has zero interest in you and each time he posts something, you get sad.

I know its not easy.  But be a responsible adult and take control over things that hurt you. Hurts to see him posting about his happy life? Then don't follow him on social media.  Nobody is forcing you to keep up with his social postings.Thanks - now with all the feedback here, I know she is full of shit with her "two year" minimum argument.How about mail order from the internet and have it shipped to a PO box that is in your name?If you don't mind me asking, are you over 18?She intentionally puts up pictures of her nearly naked, knowing she is out of shape, knowing she looks ridiculous, knowing people WILL comment, and then she claims people are violently raping her through the internet.

She doesn't even merit having all these acting/"directing" opportunities, but has them, and still doesn't accept the fact that when a celebrity intentionally puts themselves out like that, you will get hammered along with adoration from angsty teens.No need to apologize.

I truly understand how hard it is to get over unrequited "love".  And I say "love" because when it happened to me, I was sure I was in love, and that if maybe I was prettier or lived closer or just something, we'd have a chance.

Then I met my husband, and then I understood what love meant.  I never loved that other guy. I was infatuated.  

But until you get over him, its very hard.  You are like a prisoner to your emotions.  The best thing you can do is cut him out of your life in every way possible.  Especially following him on social media.

It is impossible to be in love with him because you've never dated him or truly gotten to know him. You know know what little bit of him he has chosen to show you.  Only after really learning to know someone closely after years of intimacy, do you truly understand the difference b/t love and infatuation.

Until you get past him, keep doing things  for you, not for him.  Keep distracted, keep bettering yourself, and I promise, you will move on.

I will never forget the day I met my husband - I woke up, depressed yet again for being so caught up in that other guy, mad at the world, knowing I'd be miserable for yet another 2 years, and BOOM.  Met my husband who was the most incredible person I've ever known.Huh? How is this possible? You are an adult. Get your shit together!!! 

You are nearly 19 years old but you DO NOT HAVE AN ID? Aren't you ashamed to be asking people for free pregnancy tests on the internet? 

I don't say this to be mean, and I get your mom may be a narcissist, but you are completely, utterly irresponsible and at fault here.  You don't live under Sharia law.  

This means you don't even have your own bank account! How can you live like this? When do you plan on actually being an adult? 

You could potentially be pregnant and you DON'T HAVE AN ID????

Jesus, woman, get your shit together!!! No excuses!I completely agree with you.  You are not being an "ass". OP is nearly 19. She is a grown woman and needs to start acting it and stop blaming her mom and ask for handouts.

If her mom is a nightmare, move out. People do it all the time. I did it at 17. Its not easy, but it can be done.

OP states elsewhere she has no ID. No driver's license and no birth certificate. 
That also means no bank account. 

No adult life skills.

Its time for OP to get her shit together.  She will thank herself later.  This is called being a responsible adult.  You are making excuses. Move out, get a roommate, rent a room.  Work 2 jobs (I did).  Be an adult! All I see are excuses that your mom is mean and manipulative, but you are full of manipulation too with you excuses.

I am not saying this to be mean, but this is your life. If you don't take control and be an adult you will be living with your mom for a long time.  If you can't even by tampons with her losing her shit, how does that sound to you? Living with your mom until you are 30?No ID. No driver's license. No bank account.

You need to get those documents. These are basic, life necessities. Do you realize what you CANNOT get without an ID? No, she cannot call CPS, she is an adult.  She is nearly 19.  She needs to find a way to get out.Everyone here who is saying you are being an "ass" or otherwise enabling her are doing her NO favors. She is acting like a 14 year old (and speaking like one). Not like a grown woman.  She has an excuse for everything.  Nobody is saying its easy to move out, but c'mon, its clear she has never made any plans or tried to save up any money.  

All I hear is "NMom this, Nmom that", and that in itself is ridiculously annoying.  She has manipulated the enablers who just want to coddle her.

She doesn't have a real job (no, watching your little brothers is not a job, it is not a life skill, it teaches you nothing, it is not something you can put on your resume that is meaningful).  If her mother truly refuses to let her have a real job, then she already knew that years ago and should have moved out.  Fucking couch surf if you have to.

OP knows all this, and says if she happens to be pregnant she will get a ride and get an abortion? Is there even accessible abortion where she lives? She doesn't even have a freakin' ID!    

I would be utterly ashamed to be asking strangers on the internet to ship me firth control at the age of nearly 19.  Able to have sex, but not able to get an identification or DL? 

Her excuse that she can't leave because her mother "needs" her is bullshit and its an easy way to continue this childish, irresponsible and lazy lifestyle.  She will sadly end up just like her "NMom" if she thinks she can rely on handouts just because she does not want to put in the hard effort some of us had to do at that age to get out of a bad home.But you are working hard and busting ass.  OP is barely doing anything and has plenty of excuses that just do not add up.I am slowly accepting the reality that  no matter how obvious my disability and pain issues are, my pain management docs (about 7 different ones over 13 years) inevitably fuck up big at one point or another. I am not talking understandable errors.  But FUCK UPS.  As in, send me into withdrawal with the wrong meds.  Suddenly say I should be "feeling better by now" and not want to write a script. Outright fucking LIE and accuse me of abusing meds.  Whine when I am in too much pain to show up, and I still pay for the missed appt, and do not seem to remember that I am a single chronic pain patient who relies on herself to get her ass to appointments that may be an hour's drive away.

I've learned you have to be nice, play their fucking game, do as they say, because they hold so much damn power over you.

I hope you get a better doc. I really feel for you.It is horrible. The brain  zaps, the feeling of your brain being crushed. The headaches.

For some people, it can take months.  Everyone is different. Took one friend - who is highly sensitive to meds - one year to get off a low dose, and he had only been taking it for a year.

Please, if you feel the way you to, it sounds like you have gone too far too soon, and please talk to your doc.  There are much better ways to safely get off cymbalta.

But, it can take years for the body to adjust to not having these meds in the system. They are quite powerful and do quite a number on your brain.You are very angry, and I  am truly sorry.  My intent was never to hurt you.  

And I never slut-shamed you.  But the reality is you are living a very irresponsible lifestyle and not owning it.
Go have sex, enjoy yourself, I believe a woman has every right to sleep with 50 different men a week if she wants, but be responsible about it. If you cannot afford pregnancy tests, how is that being responsible? If you do not have an ID, which is needed to be a well-adapted adult in society, that is hardly responsible.

I am sorry your reaction to asking for free pregnancy tests despite being a healthy 19 year old woman who is capable of working feels as if I am "pissing" on you.  I truly want you to have a good life, even though I do not know you.

It is good to hear you are trying to learn life skills.  And you are right - not these skills are not taught in schools.  

That means only you can teach yourself.  Nobody will sign you up for community college, or force you to educate yourself with readily available information on the web or at a public library.

I do not need to rely on anonymity. I would say this to someone face-to-face, and since tone doesn't come out on-line, I want you be sure that I say everything not with a feeling of superiority, but of "look, you can't ask for free pregnancy tests at your age and not expect some people to respond like this." If you were 14, this type of request would make sense.

But you are a grown woman.  Whatever you need to learn, there are many resources out there.  I know its hard and it can be scary.  Is there a community college near you? That sounds like what would be best for you. It will teach discipline, along with the education, you will socialize with all sorts of people, and there are many resources that can help with finding a place to live, a part time job, safe sex, etc.

I wish you the best, and hope that you can get out of the situation you are in. 

Edit: I just noticed you said you feel "no shame in asking for free pregnancy tests...because that shit is expensive."   If you cannot afford a OTC pregnancy test, how are you paying for birth control? Does this sound like responsible behavior? It is not.  Be as angry as you want, but this is not adult or responsible behavior, and I personally, for me, would be very ashamed for asking for free pregnancy tests if I were in your shoes.Ah, well in that case it sure makes sense.I think unless your disease is specifically due to an allergy or some food-related issue, its a bunch of horseshit.

There is no such thing as a chronic pain diet.  There are no scientific peer-reviewed studies with the golden-standard of a double-blind study that proves that certain foods will help reduce chronic pain, outside of very special exceptions.

There are many hoaxes out there that prey upon desperate people looking for anything to help.

I recently got into a debate with this with a so-called MD on Reddit who could not provide a single resource to back up his claim and instead spent his/her time yelling that I was the idiot who was the typical 'problem patient who always knows more than the doctor'

Eat healthy so your body has the nutrients to be in good shape, but until I see scientific, peer-reviewed proof, I believe the entire industry that looks at "toxins" or "gluten free" (most people do NOT have allergies to gluten) or "eat your way to cancer free health" is nothing but a steaming crock of shit.I second this.  You are suffering so damn much. If the chocolate gives you 15 minutes of pleasure, eat the damn chocolate.I am so, so sorry.  Obviously you need a diagnosis, pain management and treatment for your emotional issues, and other people are addressing that.

A BIG help, as someone suggested, is researching into any available state, federal or local program that can help.  Disability, etc.  This can change your life for the better.  I'd be fucked without disability.Have you exhausted your state's disability? Because before you apply for disability from Social Security, you must first exhaust your state benefits, if any.

Applying is a daunting task.  You will have to face, in detail, everything that sucks in your life.  And expect (for federal disability) to get rejected several times.  This is why its a good idea to hire a lawyer - they take their cut from your payout, and you don't need to pay them anything up front.This is also great advice.  Most people have no idea how easy it is to get medical bills reduced, written off or put on a payment plan.  All medical providers will bill you at the highest amount and hope you just pay without complaint.  Call them up and explain your situation.  They get plenty of tax-benefits (write offs) for not getting a bill paid in full.I...jesus, what can anyone say to possibly lessen your pain? I cannot imagine your daily suffering and that of your family and parents. Let me me start by saying I thing FPH is vile, and I do not hate Lena Dunham because of how she looks, but because of who she is.

To me, she is out of shape.  You can be skinny and out of shape. But she is not only moderately overweight but definitely out of shape.  

And no, for those who may scream at me, there is no "HAES", and yes, people can tell if someone is not healthy if that person is clearly overweight or obese, and having a few tests that come out 'normal' (such as cholesterol, an EKG, etc. is just cherry-picking.)

Lena Dunham isn't huge and she won't drop dead of a weight-related heart attack,but she's definitely out of shape.  I don't get why she gets so surprised that with her attitude, the shit she publishes in her books, the story lines she creates in "Girls" that there are people who will attack her on-line.

I wouldn't attack her, and I'd support any overweight/obese person trying to better their life and the fact that I even feel compelled to qualify my post with all this sort of demonstrates how out of control this obesity-glorifying and accepting we have become.

I've been fat. I was 5'3 and 155 at my highest.  I was out of shape, depressed, miserable and hated life.  It took one year to whip my ass into a beautiful, muscular, not "work of art" but something strong and that made me feel a million times better.  I was no great athelete, nor was I without cellulite and perfect, but it was a huge life change to drop those 30 extra lbs.  And, it truly wasn't that hard once you get a trainer and solid nutrition advice.

And fuck, I am babbling so much because I fear an imminent attack by HAES supporters.Before going on disability, I was an attorney.  While administrative (disability) law is not my primary area, I handled my own case and about three others for some desperate clients.  Feel free to PM me.  A huge load of stress can be removed once some financial/medical help comes in.

Edit: Do you in in CA? How many years have you worked and paid taxes as an employee? I ask because all this will determine how much federal disability you qualify for.

I also do not know a thing about Medicaid (health care for the indigent) but I am sure there is a treasure trove of lay-language info online that can guide you to how to apply for it.Thank you for sharing your wonderful and inspiring progress! You deserve to feel very proud. You are changing your life for the better in ways you haven't even noticed yet.  Keep it up and thank you for sharing!I appreciate you taking the time to respond to me - a complete stranger.  I don't have kids, so I can't being to comprehend what its like to be a parent in that sort of situation.  I can only say that parents need to do whatever they can to continue to survive.  I hate to sound cliche, and I know you are moving on, but here's an "internet hug and beer (or teddy bear, whichever you prefer)."When my husband once told me he didn't agree with me eating nothing but bagels (I was in so much pain the thought of any protein made me want to hurl) I felt an anger surge inside of me and had to physically stop myself from lunging at him.

I knew he meant well.  I knew he wanted me to have the best nutrition and it was not about the 10lbs I had gained.  But he also knew I was in SO much misery, every fucking minute of the day, so if that chocolate mint ice cream, or eating nothing but carbs made me happy and comforted for 30 minutes a day, it was fucking worth it for me.  

If you are not dangerously overweight, I see no problem in eating what makes you feel good. People without chronic pain simply do not understand that we are under daily torture, and the only thing that keeps us from slashing our wrists are the very few moments that, for whatever reason, our pain is reduced. Even if for 30 minutes.

That means if I'm going to get a reduction in pain by eating a bagel, or some ice cream, I fucking damn well will eat it.Hey, I'm a woman! 

I'd play ping pong with her too, and she'd probably kick my ass, and I remember that scene.  I wish I had her confidence with running around naked, and I wont even touch on the whole sexual abuse with her sister thing.

She isn't a monster.  She's a moderately fat girl who, if she wanted to, could whip her ass into shape in 6 months if she wanted.  Key:  IF she wanted.  If she doesn't want to, who the fuck cares? She isn't a Tess Holliday.  I only raise my eyebrows when Lena gets upset that people say mean things.  Its maybe not fair, but is the way our society works.   She gets to make a heap of money by running around naked on her show and by "empowering" women, and it also opens her up to criticism.You inspire me. For whatever I need to do, to see someone stick with discipline and hard work and throw away the excuses, now that is something I admire. I hope you share with us another progress pic 6 months from now.

I know you didn't ask for help, but for what its worth:  in my 20s I was very unhappy at 155lbs at barely 5'3.  When I finally allowed my very fit and loving husband to start training me, I was also stunned with how much my body changed, but damn the closer I got to my goal, the harder I had to work for smaller changes.

You will hit that point soon, so just make sure to alter your routine, do different things, hire a trainer if you need to, because I remember seeing women at the gym bust their asses 6 days a week, and not see any noticeable change  - because they were doing the same workout over and over.Well, in the pre-internet, caveman days when I was in my early 20s, I had no idea this was an option.  I'd get an ambulance bill for $1,500 and think FUUUCKKKKK. Later, when I got a catastrophic illness and the fucking whores at Stanford Hospital billed me $80k (yes) for an outpatient angiogram, I did some calling, and found out they had a program where for people without means, they provided all required care for FREE.

All I had to do was submit a couple of very informal forms.  It was their own program, and I realize not every hospital has it, and Stanford makes an obscene amount of money. 

But like you said, Stanford didn't advertise that program. I only heard about it because some kindly nurse mentioned it to me. I saved tens of thousands and was able to get better pain management and care. They simply wrote off whatever my insurance wouldn't pay, so no more nightmares of me fighting with insurance or deciding to get a pain reduction treatment that required me to sell my damn car.My husband, a 6'4 martial arts, motorcycle racing, engineering badASS, ties hs shoes like a first grader.  He puts his finger in between the pre-bow to hold it down before knotting the laces.  I thnk it's absolutely adorable and hope he never stops doing it that way.Jesus.  In high school I called it the "Black Plagg" and for the next ten years my family never let me forget about it.As bad as any of you think these are, none of you have outdone Shia LaDouche's "epitome".  On TV. In front of the world. Forever.That's almost out of a Bugs Bunny cartoon. "What a nin-cow-poop! What a ma-roon!"I had to ban those people from Facebook. And I barely use FB. That's how bad it was.  Every fucking day another goddamn meme about "Obummer/Obozo" being a muslim communist terrorist socialist fascist dictator who wants to ban the constitution, introduce Sharia law and take away our 2nd amendment rights and jesus fucking CHRIST enough with this shit you are a 45 year old man."Today I am BADASS because I told my male neighbor to clean up the mess he made in front of my lawn! BOOM!"

Then the, "You go girl! You da bomb!"

I am a woman.  Shit like this (celebrating normal, human interaction that is expected in civilized society) does not make other women look good.  Occasionally there are posts in TwoX that are good or aimed at women who have experience in that area, but so often it become this "cheering" crowd for a woman who does something that she should be able to do without expecting accolades and a Scooby Snack.Lawyer.  My starting salary at 26 was 100k with great benefits and on average I worked 40 hours a week.  (Except during trial and that is hell.)

But, I owed 100k.  So it sort of meant I might as well made 20k a year.And you get to help people. I would thing your clients are nice to you since you are either helping them, or if they piss you off, you can make their PT a very painful hell.

I was always very respectful to my PTs.It was a huge help for me. On its own, a political science degree is pretty useless, but I had a very demanding course load and profs with high demands, and over the 4 years my writing ability and comprehension improved drastically and prepared me well for law school.In college my bf said "put on some good music" when we were about to get busy. I put on music I thought was perfect and we got busy.

Halfway into it he stopped and said, "I can't take this shit anymore! Change it."

It was "Money" by Pink Floyd.  What was I thinking? At the time I thought it was perfect.https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=j5j3jypUCo8

Sorry, I don't know how to make the cool blue links. La Douche got shit for this for at least a year and rightly so.That is one of the most disturbing things I've encountered on the web. Good god.I told him he looked so ridiculously DUMB when he used kindergarten terms to try and emphasize his point.  That his message is lost by acting the fool. That I cannot even see past the "Obozo", but he just doesn't get it.

And those ridiculous memes with extreme statements or comparisons of Obama with Hitler.  Are they really that fucking stupid that they believe that?Merci.What was that flick with Daniel Day Lewis as some badass Butcher in pre-civil war NY and Leonardio DeCatchAHo? DDL was incredible.  Leo was ok.

And Cameron Diaz was a disgrace.

Gangs of NY?I once again feel like one of only a very few handful of women in the US who hated Friends and never found it funny.

And why did the writers make the women look so vapid and shallow while the male characters were portrayed (ok, maybe not Joey) as reasonably intelligent people?You would never let me cook unsupervised in your kitchen.

Many friends have instituted that blanket rule with me.The whole "leave the lid on" brings back memories of me really fucking up.  I was house sitting for a friend, and I just wanted some fucking toast.  I forget about said toast in the toaster over while playing online, sniff smoke, look up and see smoke is now concealing kitchen and crap pants.

Run in, see flaming inferno inside toaster oven is slowly making its way out, and dumb motherfucker friend of mine had installed a fucking full roll of paper towels right under the cabinet directly over the flaming toaster oven.  I manage to unplug it.  Fire goes out. Yay.

But NOOOO.  I had to "make sure" the fire was out.  I opened that little door, and WHOOOMP and no more eyebrows and time to call the fire department.Actually, that video did make me go out and buy two extinguishers for my home and one for my car.Often I make jokes about home owner's associations or security guards acting like brainless Nazis...but this.....Three months - that is really great work and discipline. Nicely done.I think that your comment was meant for the person I replied too. "Black Pagoo".  Beds of trucks? The first time I took my newly-adopted dog to the park, I suppose she didn't want to leave.  I had her in the front passenger seat next to me, and crazy ho jumped out through the half-open window as I was pulling away from the curb, crashed and faceplanted hard, then ran back to the park like it was nothing. 

Like watching a horror film in slo mo.And when we see Sandra Bullock in "All About Steve" we applaud her uniqueness and wish more people were like her, but in real life we shun people like her.Have you gone to chegg.com? You can get university books dirt cheap by renting them.I am so sorry for your wife's injury.   Spinal cord injury really turns everyone's life upside down.  I am sure you already have but just in case go to:
Apparalyzed.com.  Also, google "care cure forum". Each of those forums are SCI-specific.  I truly hope you can get the funds to get your wife the treatment she needs.  Wish you the best, and I wish I could help financially, but I have my own spinal cord crap myself.Have you checked with your state and local medical aid for those without financial resources? Also, many for-profit hospitals have the resources to provide treatment for free. They just don't advertise these programs for obvious reasons.  You'd be surprised how much assistance, or bill reduction, you can get just by asking and digging around.

Finally, what about county hospitals?  I am very sorry for a shitty diagnosis and hope you get what you need to have a decent quality of life.  

Also, if you have questions or need to vent, come visit us at the subreddit ChronicPain.He probably had been sneaking in food and violating doctor's orders to not eat extra food many, many times. They don't boot patients for one infraction.Both forums are very helpful with care, information on cure, and what I think may be most important, a large amount of people who either have an SCI or care for a loved one with an SCI.

People don't realize that SCI is not just an inability to walk but bladder and bowel issues, constant worry of blood pressure, pressure sores, bone issues and a heap of other diseases and conditions because the human body is not meant to not move.  Not to mention - pain, pain and more pain.

If your wife has an injury where its possible for her to walk again, I would get ahold of Dr Samuel Wise.  He is only on the Care Cure forum. In fact, I think it is his own forum. Maybe he has contact info for resources that could get your wife to a good treatment and recovery center, especially since she has the possibility of walking once again.

SCI is devastating on everyone, not just the injured person, and I wish you the best of outcomes.  Him, after he called me a "dirty Jew" while drunk yet again, and stopped returning my calls because I complained about his drunken behavior: "Hey DragonToothGarden, its great to see you! Wanna go out?"

Me:  "Patrick? Is that you? I'm sorry. I didn't recognize you without a beer in your hand."I have heard the first 5 years are the worst.  Suicide rates are the highest the first four years. Of course, everyone is different, but it can help if you have family and friends and a good support network. And good pain management. 

A friend of mine (motorcycle racer) just got permanently paralyzed at age 45 in 2013, and he is very depressed, but has a good family and kids.  Another racer also got injured at the same age, but was single, recovering alcoholic, and couldn't handle it.  Two months after being released from rehab, he commit suicide.  He was not a happy guy beforehand, and had many problems, and he just felt this injury was too much for him.

I know therapy won't change the underlying injury that is making your wife (and I am sure you, at times) so unhappy, but are there any resources for her to deal with depression? Anti depressants and therapists that work with SCI patients?  

Please also take good care of yourself. I see you've sold your home and everything possible to take care of your wife, and you are an incredible husband and man to be at her side.  Not everyone can handle such a catastrophic injury to a loved one.  Make time for your own emotions, as you also are affected by this life-changing event. The caretaker often gets forgotten about, but you will need escapes and outlets as well.

The absolutely great news is that your wife can recover.  This in itself is a great reason to be optimistic.   With the right contacts, you CAN get to the Craig Center (one of the best rehab places in the US) or one of several others that are rated very, very well.  The other injuries that have zero hope to ever recover will never have that hope.

I hope your wife can get some help for that depression, and if she is in pain, enough pain meds so she isn't constantly suffering. One option is having the work done in Mexico.  If you are in the US or Canada, this is quite common. I've had all my major dental work (route canals, crowns) done in Mexico, and it is a fraction of the price, and you can get excellent dentists with all the latest high-tech equipment.  Fly in to Puerto Vallarta or Guadalajara and you can have it done there.  The big expense will be the plane ticket and the dental work itself.  A crown, for example, in the US was $3,000 each.  I had two (everything included) done in PV for a grand total of $800.  

Mexico! I had crowns done here and I am so happy with result, cost and experience.Everything!
No. I think its his "art" performances that are him just sitting on his ass. His stupid antics when he gets drunk in public. His shit acting. His douche antics. His rattail. His insistence on trying to look cool by wearing the same damn pants and tshirt every day.  His rattail. 

I'm getting myself worked up.  I must stop.Shit, I'd kick his ass out too. What a waste of resources.  Like a drug addict sneaking in meth to his rehab clinic. Except, eating healthy and reasonable amounts does not cause withdrawal from hell that makes you wish you were dead.  Yeah, you may get irritable or a headache if you stop eating sugar, but you won't start hallucinating, sweating bullets or die of a heart attack.  (That is for all you assholes that insist sugar "withdrawal" is just as bad as an opiate withdrawal.)

Edit:  I knew this would happen.  I am getting responses that "withdrawal" from sugar and food is still "not easy".  Of course its not easy, but it is nothing, NOTHING like an opiate, benzo or alcohol withdrawal, some of which can kill you, and some of which cause such agony that you scream uncontrollably, hallucinate, lose consciousness from pain, sweat until you are drenched and pass out from being overheated while also experience chills, suffer a central nervous system breakdown, pain throughout your entire body, and a 100% honest-to-god fear that you will die of a heart attack or because you are convinced someone injected lava into your veins and throat.  

I have been there.  Not from drug abuse, but when my idiot doctor, who prescribes me legal methadone for severe, chronic pain due spinal nerve root damage, injected me with an antagonist for break through pain, knowing full well I was taking methadone three times a day, as prescribed.  This triggered precipitated withdrawal, and it was so horrible, so terrifying, so awful, and so dangerous (and yes, in my case I did come close to dying) you could not pay me enough to ever go through that again.

Food "withdrawal" in no way, shape or form is similar to drug or alcohol withdrawal, and people who say otherwise are not only wrong, but are minimizing what True withdrawal actually entails.This is brilliant! I'm trying this tomorrow.Your dog sure ain't no fool. He knows when some shady shit is up.My mother beat my ass so often and so hard when I was a kid, she broke my nose.

She never went to jail, but I imagine someone like OP and her brother - who were maliciously and repeatedly abused and will feel the effects for life - does not need a lecture from you on how she should feel or hope for when her "father" is jailed.

I hope they beat the holy living shit out of him. A person like that cannot be reformed.  He continued to rape and abuse people after his kids were no longer accessible.  

I didn't grow up beating up little kids and breaking THEIR noses.  I don't give a damn about what maybe happened to her "father" when he was a kid.  He knew damn well what he was doing was evil.It isn't? According to whom? You?  Maybe you don't want a repeat child-rapist who also drugs and rapes women to be raped in jail, but I would have no sympathy if it happened to him.

Edit:  Downvote away.  I understand. I don't wish for him to get raped, and if I were there when/if it happens, and a strong male, and armed, I'd try to stop it.  But I have no problem in joking about a monster rapist like this guy getting what's coming to him in jail.  This guy doesn't deserve my sympathy or respect.  That is merely my opinion.  I am not pontificating that everyone should feel this way, nor am I trying to change anyone, so let's not all lose our shit here.

He has to pay for his crimes.  Jail society will distribute their own justice as they see fit.Is that how they speak there?  It was in CA.Well, that may still be applicable for a certain percentage of the British population's teeth.This is great advice.  If you are her friend, be honest.  With love, not with shame.  Shame truly only works in a tiny fraction of people.  She will need the confidence to want to better herself.  I didn't read your entire post, but I sure hope you speak to her.

Then, its up to her to take action.  Its not your responsibility to monitor her meals, or force her to go to the gym. I had a "friend" who was like that. Wanted to get in shape, and when I'd ask "hey, how did your swim go last night", she always had some bullshit excuse such as, "I wanted to go but you went swimming earlier, so I didn't go."  Your friend will also have to take responsibility once you've said your part.I wish I had a link to this pic. I was browsing images made by people with chronic pain. One was of a pretty large iceberg somewhere in the Artic ocean.  You can see a medium-sized part of the iceberg above the water, and below the water, sort of hidden, you see a gigantic mass, 10x the size of what is visible above water.  

The caption was something along the lines of, "This is the pain that is visible in the outside, but this is the pain I feel on the inside."

Edit:  Here are some.  https://www.google.com/search?q=images+of+chronic+pain+iceberg&amp;espv=2&amp;biw=1242&amp;bih=606&amp;source=lnms&amp;tbm=isch&amp;sa=X&amp;ved=0CAYQ_AUoAWoVChMIvYCWuNmxyAIVTfuACh11JgWaThat is a truly moving sculpture, and I am a person who is too uncultured and oblivious to be moved by art.  But that sculpture encapsulates it so well.  The resignation, yet refusal to lay down.Thank you for sharing the rare bit of good news we get.  It is inspiring, and even for those of us who have lost hope, it is always good to hear.  I know you are hardy feeling 100% better, but just to know someone got some improvement makes me smile.

I hope it stays this way!Yes.  At my highest pain level (it was about 3 years straight over the past 12 years) I turned into a skeleton.  I'm a woman with an ass and always thought I'd look hot at a size 0.  

No.  It was horrible.   I was very frail and my husband would buy me the only thing I could or would eat - toasted chocolate poptarts or plain white bread.  Just chewing hurt.  The idea of eating healthy food or even picking up a damn fork caused physical pain.

But, as long as the weight loss is not making your pain worse, fuck it, do not worry about it.  It is the least of your worries.  Unless you have brittle bones or can no longer support your own body weight I would try to not weigh yourself at all, because it will only add to your existing anxiety.  

What you do need (don't we all) is better pain management.  Fuck worrying about being a rail.  That is temporary.  Just make sure you aren't about to keel over from starvation or nutrition loss, try and take vitamins and supplements so your body gets what it needs (and cannot currently get since you cannot eat).Yes on this - and certainly ask about meds you can take to reduce the abdominal/gastro pain from side effects of your other meds.All I can say is: you know your body best.  This sounds like its very new, and you don't appear to have had chronic issues in the past, so be open minded with what the PTs have to say, even if you feel it won't work.

Distinguish between pain and intensity. Intensity can be good.  PT sometimes involves a bit of pain. 

But exercises that cause outright agony, to me, are not good.  They can aggravate an undiagnosed condition and make things worse (did for me).  I don't mean discomfort, but the feeling of "something is very, very wrong."

Other than that, research your options and listen well to your PT, but they are human, not gods, and can make mistakes. So if you don't feel the treatment is going in the right  direction, you can always get a second opinion or new PT.

Finally, be patient. It takes time. It took a good 6 months for my pilates work to get my core strong.  I remember the first 3 months. I'd cry silently into a towel and felt I was so weak that I'd never be able to do enough exercises to make a difference.

It may have taken me longer than a person not in serious pain, but I stuck with it and it did make a difference, and my core got much, much stronger.   Don't cheat, posture is important, and always remember, quality over quantity.

Let us know how it goes.Yes, I had sacro-iliac (if that is what you mean) agony. I mean, AGONY.  I was on heavy opiates, bent in half and sobbing my fuckin eyes out.

I had the injections and they helped a lot, but I needed a few rounds.  That area is a huge bundle of nerves and they may not get it the first time around.   Those injections were by far some of the most painful invasive procedures I've had (and I was sedated) but it really, really helped.

I hope it works for you.Good luck! Please update us. I am always so pleased when I see a bit of good news on this sub. They (sacro iliac nerve root injections) really, really helped for me.   I literally could not walk, despite heavy opiates, and was sobbing from the pain (and I can handle a lot of pain).

The bundle of nerves is quite complicated, from what my doc told me, so you may need more than one round.  It really saved me from jumping off a cliff.

If you are not fully convinced, see another doctor.  A 2nd opinion is always a good idea, even if just for peace of mind. We are, after all, talking about an invasive procedure with its inherent risks, so its best to get yourself as much info as possible before agreeing to the procedure.

As for the fusion: FUCK NO. Unless you have tried every single other option, have tried to tough it out a few years (because sometimes over time the body can manage to not heal, but tolerate the pain), have seen multiple docs that concur with this assessment, and truly cannot live. Fusion can never, ever be undone.  

Edit:  Read some more, and it appears that this doc had not even adequately diagnosed you and was pushing for the SI injections.  That is reckless.  Before any invasive procedure you must first make a diagnosis and try non-invasive treatments.  I would not see that doc or trust him/her for anything again.

Aleve?  WTF? You need real painkillers and that means a real pain management doc.  Aleve is about as useful as M&amp;Ms at this point.  I would not trust any doctor who will recommend spinal fusion but will not give you anything stronger than Aleve? Do you live in the US? State disability, at least in CA, is very easy to get on. Federal disability (via social security) is quite another story.

I am so sorry your family has dumped you.  You tried so hard to work through an unsustainable condition.  Your best bet is to try to get on benefits.  You simply cannot work.

Fuck your family.  They are just dragging you down and not helping you despite you going above and beyond what a sick person should be doing.  To treat their disabled/sick/suffering child in such a manner is downright evil.   My family did the same, and they are worth millions.

Right now, if possible, you need a roof over your head and treatment.  Do you have a place to sleep?  And do you have docs that treat you? Are you even diagnosed?   Please ask any questions about the disability options.I know its easy for me to say, but I have been there and I know the hopelessness and agony you are in.  Please do not give up.

Why did disability cut you off, and what sort of disability was it? Via state, federal or some private coverage?Are they not giving her any strong medications? Opiates? Does she not respond to them, or are they just not available? Or are they available, but are the docs being diffiicult?

The forums have a LOT of info on pain management for SCIs.  Baclofen pumps, other drugs for nerve damage and spasms.  I have no neurological damage and can walk, so my knowledge in that area is limited.  But I do know a fair amount about pain.  

If her pain is constant, it affects everything - ability to sleep, think, breathe, focus, shower, relax, do physical therapy, transfer from her chair, and of course, causes immense depression.

Its a terrible cycle.  The more pain she is in, the less able she can cope or do PT, which is so important at during the first few years of her injury.

What is the situation with getting a doctor who does pain management? I know nothing about how it works in your home country but I do know overall, doctors can be very difficult in prescribing opiates even when they are needed for a legitimate condition.In college, one of the smartest, nicest guys in class, who participated the most and had very meaningful things to say (and was a hunk on top of it) was named "Nimrod". 

We heard his name a lot because the prof would say our names to cue us it was our turn to speak if we had our hands raised.  Nobody made a peep but I wondered how many people didn't realize his name was actually a respectful Biblical name and pronounced quite differently.  For years I also thought "nimrod" meant something like "moron".   Education via Looney Tunes.I am SO sorry, and I wish I lived close by so I could come hang out and prove to you that your family is dead wrong.  

Acting "defeated?" They clearly have no idea what a fighter you are, and you are literally fighting to stay alive by forcing yourself to work despite constant agony.  I know what its like to have a job that requires 100% focus, and chronic pain, sleep deprivation and pain meds completely affect one's ability to focus.

Friends will dump you.  Its a shock.  Only at your lowest do you really realize who is there for you, both in terms of friends and family.  Your family clearly thinks you are exaggerating.  I doubt they could handle your level of agony half as well as you do if they were in your shoes.

When the pain is so bad you start thinking of death and wishing it would just happen to you, that is just the most miserable fucking point.

Your one doctor is a fucking asswipe.  Is there any way you can get stronger meds that actually have an effect? 

And since I am from the US, what are your options for going on disability?  I see all sorts of lazy, healthy losers getting cheap or free homes and benefits who don't do shit or claim they are too fat to work.  You have an obvious disability and are struggling to work in an unsustainable situation.  What are your options?If you had stronger meds, do you think you'd be able to work better without suffering so much?yes, those same tax payers who pay for boob jobs not for women who suffered breast cancer or some other deformity, but are simply "depressed" and want a "better quality of life" with a larger rack?  I am sure those tax payers would much rather their money goes to YOU, a productive member of society.  better meds means you are able to work, which means you contribute to society.Oh man, first your dad, then your dog.  I am so sorry. Would you be open to trying a different therapist? It can take a few tries to get someone you are comfortable with.

I also got anxiety via therapy at first.  Its natural.  You are forced to open up and discuss and face the most painful experiences of your life.  I'd leave each appointment sobbing and so drained  I'd go straight to sleep.  But it was the only way for me to face and deal with my shit.

Within about 18 months, I felt a lot better, and didn't feel the need to see her anymore. I had more work to do on my own, and needed time to pass, but things can get better.

But sounds like most important on your list of to-do is to get some decent pain management!Withdrawal is fucking agony. I've been there.  Once when a doc fucked up my script and I couldn't get an opiate filled on time, and another when I decided I wanted to go off cymbalta and did it too fast. 

The cymbalta withdrawal was terrible - just as you say. I was vomiting violently.  I simply had dropped too much, too soon. Please see your doc, no matter how much you hate him/her, and at least get started on a manageable program where you can phase out cymbalta without suffering so much.  It is not necessary to rush it! I know you want to be done with cymbalta and its taking so long, but the reality is your body will give you hell if you go too fast.  Take as long as you need.I have heard he is good in some movies I haven't seen. That war movie with Brad Pitt?  You are inspiring me to give him a second chance and look at him only at his abilities as an actor, and not pay attention to his non-acting life.I believe he does. In that one (one of the top five, in my opinion) cartoon with the bull where the bull swallows a shotgun.  I shall do just that! Thanks for the recommendation.  Yes, Tom Cruise is (to me) batshit crazy and an egomaniac, but I still will watch his movies. 

Maybe I get such an extreme reaction to Shia because apart from the self-centered and highly obnoxious antics (plagiarize people's work and make it appear as his own, put a paper bag over his head during a press event, the non-apology apology for the plagiarism thing) he looks like he really needs a shower.Cymbalta is completely different than xanax and other types of sedatives, or from opiates.  It affects "mood" receptors in the brain.  Over time, it can really affect, or even alter, neurotransmitters in the brain.  I know of only one guy who took cymbalta for about six months, decided it was worthless, and stopped cold turkey.  He felt perfectly fine.  I think he's a rarity! Most people have severe withdrawal if they go off cymbalta too quickly. Do some research and you will see that even if it is out of your system, your body may require months or years to return to its pre-cymbalta state with things like memory, ability to focus, etc.I am so sorry.  I am an American currently living in MX, and my pain meds are about $3000 MX pesos a month.  I know that local residents could never, ever afford this.  I don't know if their government insurance would cover this but I do know that a person in severe pain is in agony if they don't get strong enough meds (and sometimes the best and strongest meds will still not help.)

You are in a terrible situation.  Catastrophic accident, no access to painkillers or treatment that is required to manage pain and get your wife mobile, and caught up in economic warfare that you had no choice to partake in.

I think your best bet is to get on those forums, start a fund raising campaign (Dr Wise Young on the Care Cure Forum actually responds to people who post directly to him -  he devotes his entire practice to finding treatments and the cure for SCI) to get you and your wife to the US or Canada.  I think the fact that she CAN walk again, but the only thing stopping her is your country's lack of resources, is a good thing to focus on.  Its not one of those hopeless cases, but one where if many people just chip in a little bit, your lives can be changed.  

Is there any way you can get the opiates from a neighboring country? I've heard there is even a toilet paper shortage (maybe I am confused with Argentina - pardon my ignorance) and the gov't had to take over the toilet paper industry awhile back because people were hoarding.
I wonder what's gonna happen when this kid's parents see this video.
Mom: (smack across kid's face)
Dad: "Well done son. You are now a man."How can that woman feel remotely comfortable being surrounded by so many men, who are likely drunk and on the verge of that out of control group mentality?No, no no no no.  Nope.  I am sure the doc threw in extra just as a gag.  Just not possible for this dude to crap out that many worms from his intestines.

It IS NOT POSSIBLE, ok?Dammit, now I have to google it.  Why do you guys with knowledge of these parasitical diseases do this to me?

Edit:  Thanks, man.  https://learnzoology.files.wordpress.com/2014/04/ascariasis-roundworms-in-the-rectum.jpgIf you are short, you don't need to invest in no stinkin' squatty potty.  Just bring your legs up and prop your heels on the edge of the seat.  Scoot back so your back is against the toilet lid cover. Completely changes your posture and less stress on the rectum and anus and all that.I pronounced "plague" like "rag" (a dish rag, for example.)This is damn cute. And it makes an evil disease that wiped out millions in a terrible manner sound so much more innocuous and mild.To me, while I don't actively wish for the guy to get raped, I would see it as a form of justice in a karmic manner.  Downvote me all you want, but that is how I feel.

Now, let's say I were a guard, I would of course try to stop it, because its my job, and also because I hate seeing human suffering, even if the sufferer is a fucking scumbag. 

But if it happens to him, I'm not going to lose any sleep.  Just will hope it'll make him think of what he put his kids through.First, I am not "acting" anything. It is a FACT.  Withdrawal from opiates or alcohol is NOT the same as "withdrawal" from not stuffing your face with horrible food.   

Easy? No, and I never said it was "easy".  Necessary to save his damn life so many take responsibility and only eat the food the hospital gives you and not order a pizza? Yes.That would be awesome if it existed.Not easy, but it is NOTHING like, for example an opiate withdrawal or alcohol withdrawal if you are addicted to either or have built up a tolerance.

There are plenty of people who were either overweight or dangerously obese who finally put their foot down (and the fork) and took personal responsibility.  It was not easy in the sense that it takes self-control and discipline to not stuff your face. But, virtually all of them say once they passed that first  one to three month mark, it got easier.  

And these people further say its the best thing they could have done and wish they did it sooner.For fuck's sake, listen to you. I bring up my concern, for example, that there is the single woman who is naked and surrounded by what appear to be over 30 men dressed in only shorts at most and likely drunk.

Why can't I say that without including, "oh, I don't mean to say there is not also the danger that he is getting hazed" (sort of obvious on its face), or add that maybe he will die of alcohol poisoning, or one of those drunk guys might fall and crack his skull open or that there might be at tidal wave.

Why can't I say what I observe as something that disturbs or concerns with without including every other possible concern in order to make people like you happy?

Why do you my post was "my first thought"? You don't know jack about what my "first" thought was.  Don't make assumptions and don't rush to judgment and you won't look so foolish.So be it.Very hard on its own, but you can.  If you have a weak heart, or from dehydration.  Or, you can hallucinate badly and harm yourself.  It is pure, fucking hell. I went through it once when my doc injected me with an antagonist for breakthrough pain despite knowing I was on methadone for chronic pain (which is an agonist) for the past 10 years.

You could not pay me 500k to go through that again.  It is pure, prolonged hell and you are 100% convinced you will die, and if untreated, you can die. Not likely, but you can.  I sure as shit was 100% convinced I was going to die and it was the worst 8 hours of my life.For FUCKS SAKE. You are the second person whining that I am "not concerned" about the kid.  

Why must I include every single concern of mine when I also happen to observe this woman is in a tenuous position? She is there by CHOICE, and likely agreed to mess around with ONE guy, not participate in a gang rape of 30 men.

And on that note, HE is there by choice, so that destroys your argument in that direction you are heading.

You have no idea what my concerns are about him, so why assume I don't care about him? Why make the assumption that because I dare speak about a single naked woman who has agreed to participate in a sex act with one man, in front of 30 drunk men, might get violently raped, that I don't care for the participating guy who also agreed to engage in the act?Really? Oh, that makes me feel much better.  I had no idea - I thought she was just a nice girl who dropped in. (Yes I realize she's a stripper/escort/prostitute/whatever you want to call it/ that appears to have agreed to this.

That doesn't change the dynamics. Things might go badly if one or more frat boys decides he wants some and she gets gang raped by 30 guys despite agreeing to only allow the one guy to do what he is doing.But eating food doesn't give you a high like opiates or other drugs may do. Nor does it affect opiate receptors in the manner opiates do. I cannot believe we are equating eating with "using".

But food IS NOT AN OPIATE.  You don't get a high.  Your opiate receptors are not affected as if you took an oxycontin. You don't risk dying from an overdose if you suddenly start using again.

Food is something that can be managed, over time, but it takes personal responsibility and control.  Believe it or not, there are people out there that do not want to put in the effort or have a million excuses to justify their being unhealthy and ordering a pizza at 800lbs and while at the hospital on the verge of death.  Have you seen The Prestige?In martial arts when I was a kid, there were three brothers we called The Tran Clan.  There were badass.  My crushes on them circulated depending on which one was the flashiest sparrer of the day.  Thank you! No fucking shit, eh? Did he sleep through pharmacology 101? He gave me ten mgs of nubain. Took me ten minutes to hit the floor.  Lost consciousness numerous times, uncontrollably screaming at full lung capacity until I'd faint,  uncontrolled banging of my head and hands against the tile floor, vomiting, while the fucker is standing over me yelling, "What else did you take? You are having this reaction because you took something else and lied to me!" 

 No. I am having that reaction because you created it, shithead.   The worst was the pain, oh god the pain, those shakes, and the absolute primal fear that death was going to snatch me up at any moment.

For eight hours I was on his tile floor and not once did he check my vitals.

 Later, after I recovered (and the fucker refused to call the ambulance I was quite literally begging, screaming and sobbing for) I told him I felt that combo was a huge mistake after doing some research of my own.  

He insists nope, perfectly normal and safe, does it for other patients (lie) and that my body was just unusually "sensitive".  That is hardly a reasonable comparison.  Heroin and food? Cmon. This is so silly it doesn't merit a response.  I am very sorry for your friend.  People do not realize that the side effects of a methadone withdrawal can kill you.  This was a terrible, preventable death that never shouldve happened.

And this is why I get so irate when people start equating sugar and food "withdrawal" as something similar to a drug or alcohol withdrawal.  Have you gone through precipitated opiate withdrawal?  I am hoping you just mistyped your claim that you'd take opiate withdrawal over food withdrawal.  Have you ever gone through precipitated opiate withdrawal?  I would imagine not.  Because that experience is one that opens the gates to hell and you can die from it, and only after intense suffering.  You will hallucinate, vomit, shit yourself, lose all sense of reality and suffer pain so bad you will thnk someone set you on fire.  You will bang your head against a cement wall to stop the pain.

Is that how you truly feel when cutting down on food intake and trying to eat healthy?  The physical effects go away much faster with drugs than they do with food? Are you truly that naive? Is this your own excuse? Are you a pain management or drug rehab MD? You have no clue what you are talking about.

I have done both.  Suffered opiate withdrawal due to a doctors mistake, and lost 30lbs by eating less crap and eating reasonable portions.  The better I ate, the better I felt, and the more I wanted o eat healthily.  In fact, if I would splurge, I'd feel terrible and have no desire to do it again.

Along with this new fad of glorifying obesity as healthy or beautiful, this inane comparison that eating healthily is akin to suffering opiate or benzo withdrawal and since you must eat you can "relapse" at any point is further making a mockery of people who truly suffer from drug withdrawals (whether from prescription drugs and a docs mistake, or illegal drugs) and is just another dramatic, bullshit excuse people can fall back on when they refuse to take responsibility for the crap they shovel in their mouths.If you only have your experience on the obese side of things, then why on earth are you making statements of purported fact when you truly have no experience or training in what you are taking about???

Are you hallucinating? Vomiting? In so much pain you want to run into traffic?  Have you lost control of your body and are you slamming your head and hands against the floor? Are you terrified and convinced you are dying of a heart attack? Is your central nervous system going haywire?

Will you suffer relapse or a potential overdose of you eat again?  No. Of course not.  You need to eat for the rest of your life.  

I am not saying this to be mean, but please do not spout of utter bullshit as fact when you have truly no idea, either via training or personal experience, with what you are talking about.How am I trivializing it? This one guy is sneaking pizza into his hospital when he could drop dead from a heart attack at any minute.  By equating food intake and eating healthy with drug withdrawal, you're actually minimizing the True suffering and dangerously life-threatening medical conditions that people on drugs, for whatever reason, legal or not, suffer through.  I give up.  You are full of excuses and are still putting eating healthy and in reasonable amounts in the same category as precipitated withdrawal of drugs, or, conflating the effect of food intake with drug intake.  Finally, a voice of fucking reason.  I have great admiration and support for people who decide to take control and stop hurting their bodies and out in the actual effort to lose weight and get healthy.

I have zero respect for those of you who have the audacity to equate a healthy diet with drug withdrawal and compare eating food to being "forced to use".   You are just relying upon dramatic, bullshiit excuses to not be a responsible adult and take care of yourself. These excuses are fucking out of control.  Maybe his father is sick of waiting hand and foot for a grown ass man who will refuse to stop eating? I'm guessing this guy is an adult.  Maybe the dad did enable him.  And maybe the dad just can't handle it anymore.  This guy fucking ordered a pizza on the sly while at the damn hospital for weight loss to save his life!! Just imagine what a nightmare he must be at at home.  Maybe his dad is tired of wiping the guy's ass and giving him sponge baths through that 800lb mass of flesh. If the guy is an adult, the dad is allowed to reach the breaking point and say no more, I am not equipped to deal with this.  Even the hospital could not deal with it.at that weight they can't even walk to, or fit on a toilet.  He likely shits on incontinence pads on top of his bed and his dad cleans his ass up.  Because, as I predicated, a bunch of responders are claiming that the poor guy can't lose weight because food withdrawal is just as bad as drug withdrawal.  You just equated food with heroin.  I therefore cannot be expected to give a response.I mean the "withdrawal" these people are referring to. That reducing sugar or portion amounts will cause suffering equal to drug withdrawal.

But, I thnk you already knew that.If you think I am "humble bragging about withdrawal" you are truly a hopelessly stupid moron.  That was a life threatening experience that was by far the most painful, most terrifying experience of my life.  

You clearly cannot read.  Also, if you equate food to drugs, you are nothing but one of those lazy people who come up with excuses to justify your inability to put the fork down.  And to refuse to call an ambulance to hide his mistake? Yes, if this happened in the US he'd be in deep shit.  Unfortunately, it was an American doctor who did this to me at his Mexican practice.  So my recourse is minimal.  I wish.  It was an American doc but in Mexico.  The laws here are limited.  I could press for criminal charges for failing to provide care by refusing to call me an ambulance, but as angry as I am at him, I don't really want hm to spend two years in a Mexican jail.

Instead, I spread it all over town.  Small town, full of older expats that rely on medical care, and word got out.

But ohhhh I would love to slam my fist in hs face if I could.Jesus can't you fucking read?

Oh yes, I made up this story just for attention for my ego.

Serious? Fuck you.No.  Spoke to a lawyer, my options are very limited.  This didn't happen in the US.What the fuck are you taking about? Handle my shit? I'm not rereading your prattle. My "withdrawal" occurred because my former idiot doctor injected me with an antagonist knowing full well I had an agonist in my system.  Once that happens, no willpower or strength in the world will save you from the suffering.

If you are babbling about food being as addictive as drugs, well that is just bullshit.  I've been overweight in my younger years and I lost it.  It wasn't as hard as I thought it would be once I had the right information on diet and training.Dumbfuck.  Can't you read?Honestly, I'd be happy giving him a good, solid kick in the nuts.This is adorable.  This should be enlarged and in a frame.Lovely! I was hoping a woman would post.I am so sorry.  You are not a loser because the job market is notoriously tough, and you are certainly not a loser because your husband is cheating.  He is the loser.

Any way you can leave? Get out and stay with a friend?Well...live and learn. Yes, it was very premature and naive to make a huge decision to sell your house without having absolute proof and assurance the job would come through.

But you know what? He could've gotten the job, loved it and been laid off one month in, after you sold your house.

So don't be so hard on yourself. Life throws all sorts of unexpected shit at you.   I promise you your life is not fucked up.  It will just be difficult and stressful as you allow it to be until you can straighten things out.

You can plan as well as you want in life, but things may happen you don't plan for.  I was 28 and making a 6 figure job and got sick, lost it all, had to stop work and filed BK.  I never, ever expected that to happen.

I assume you are both healthy, and I know that may not mean much, it makes  a huge difference in being able to get through rough times.If you are 28 and that is truly the worst about your life, you aren't doing badly at all.  Nobody expects you to be married or have that "perfect" relationship (it doesn't really exist anyway).  

One thing I learned entering my 30s is that for most people, you never really figure life out, but rather, figure out how to handle life.  It is an ongoing process and we make up these unwritten rules that by certain ages we are supposed to have achieved certain status goals with our jobs, relationships, material object ownership, etc.  

Fuck all that noise and just try and live life according to the way you want it to be.hey, i don't say this to be mean, but there is something you will have to accept: nobody is deserving or is entitled to a relationship.  

its just not your time yet. you will meet a woman who wants to have a romantic relationship with you, but until that happens, it doesn't mean you are "supposed to be forever alone".   your time will come.  in the meantime, women can really read body language and if they sense you seem angry or bitter, it will not make you invited or approachable.Then, be your old, simple nerdy self! You are very aware of your mistakes and your problems, and that alone is a huge first step.

Now, all you have to do is start being disciplined. Don't go to malls or go shopping unless its for necessities and don't fuel the fire by watching TV that focusing on materialistic shit.

Rediscover nature.  All the beautiful, simple, cheap or free things that are available to you in life.

I don't mean to sound cheesy, but I had lots of material things in my mid 20s.  I made 6 figures and always thought I'd make more.  I loved nice cars.

Then one day I woke up at age 28 with a spinal tumor and my world changed completely.  Its been 14 years of a chronic illness, but life sure has become so much simpler as I have less interest and care for material possessions I don't need.  Of course, being a woman, I like to look nice, and I have learned I can look stylish and hot if I have patience and buy at places like Marshall's. 

My biggest "splurge" purchase for which I felt a big guilty (before I was sick) was a $70 pair of jeans at Banana Republic.  I bought them because they fit well.

Think about that. $70 on a PAIR OF JEANS. I had to work hard for that $70! And I should've saved that $70!  I then made a rule I would never, ever spend mor than $25 on a pair of jeans, no matter what, and usually I can find very nice, comfy jeans at Marshall's or Ross.  

It just takes a little practice, but once you start getting rid of material shit you don't need, and realizing that buying brand name crap just makes you the naive fool who has been brainwashed into exactly what corporate marketing is hoping for - in that you feel emotionally better, more fulfilled (although not for long, which is why you need to go shopping next weekend) and "happier", and more self assured, with a brand name item.

In reality, you are just a cog in the wheel of a clever marketing machine. You are clearly not ready, so don't do it.  Plenty of other methods of birth control. I know none are as safe as a vasectomy, but its a pretty invasive procedure, and "oh but they can be reversed" is not always True.

Don't do anything to your body unless you are absolutely sure.How about you ask her not to talk about it to you anymore?  I'm not sure the degree to which she is mentioning things to you, but for some couples, the subject of past flings are off-limits.  There is nothing unreasonable about not wanting to hear about her past escapades, no matter the context.Beyonce has that 'confidence' as part of her marketing-team-assembled persona.  That is not necessarily her in real life.  Beyonce doesn't Twitter pix of herself on bad hair days, or without her team of photoshop masters.  Its all an illusion to keep up her persona.

I think the best thing is to eat well and exercise, not because you "need" to lose weight, but because your body needs the endorphins (from exercise) to combat the depression you've fallen in to, and because proper nutrition will help you feel much, much better.  I've been there, and I hated me. I hated mirrors. I felt proper nutrition and exercise would not only be worthless, but would be a waste of time and my body would never change.

Well, I stuck with it (with a great trainer) and a year later I had a bangin' body and I was so very changed.  Of course it didn't solve all my problems or cure my personal demons, but it made it a lot easier to tackle this things.Fucking shit.  The principals laughed it off and said you should basically be enjoying it.  I would take it up a level - I mean, to the district supervisor.  This guy has already had fucked up issues and can't believe he's still on the payroll.  I would make a written report to the county attorney/city attorney.  Not a threat to sue, just a "this is everything that happened and this is what the principals did when I notified them."

That paper trail is very important if they later try to claim you never notified them, or, if this horrible custodian hurts someone, that they had no idea he was creepy and stalking (yes, stalking) you.   

It also goes without saying that the principals are clearly unable or unwilling to be responsible adults and handle it, hence, notify whomever is above them."Oh, high Mr. Creepy. Please, I am not being rude, but I get uncomfortable that you literally wait for me until I get off work.  And, that you stand right next to me. Oh, that you blatantly stare at my breasts.  You scare me when you follow me around. I also heard you were showing off women's lingerie.

I sure hope you aren't mad at me and won't later take revenge and rape me in the bathroom and slash my throat with a boxcutter then drag me out and dump me in the woods like that one 14 year old kid did to his teacher. 

Did I insult you? I'm sorry, because this really is all about your special, fragile feelings and not at all about me.  I really understand that I am exaggerating my discomfort and the real victim, Mr. Custodian, is you. Poor you, who never got a woman.  I am sorry you find me attractive and cannot have me.  Truly, that is tragic.

So, we are good? You will stop sexually harassing me and stalking me? You won't take revenge? You are rational and reasonable and will respond with maturity despite your well-established creepy, stalking behavior? Of course you will. And, again, I am sorry if I hurt your feelings or were rude.  I know my feelings and fear don't county."A dermatologist can do wonders.  Go see one. I didn't read the whole thing, but I do hope you realized at one point that it wasn't fair to resent your parents. They were likely doing the best they knew how, and they had no control of what the Air Force would do.  Having to pack up and leave town can be really, really hard on a kid, but I hope you no longer resent them over that.Ah, yes. That shock when shit we thought was fail-safe and all planned out goes to hell.

I know its hard, and it sucks and its a kick in the gut to your self -esteem and pride.  I've been there.  Highly educated husband could not find work for 2 years, and when he did, it was a soul-crushing, mind numbing job where his boss was as dumb as an ox.

It can get better, and maybe in the mean time, try and focus on the good things.  I so wish I had done more of that before I got sick.  I missed out on nature, on being active (things that cost little or nothing), but I always thought "I can do that tomorrow.)

Now, I fantasize of what life would be like to be healthy again. Until you are both gainfully employed, try and get a daily dose of nature and exercise. The human soul needs that and it may help you through this tough time.You apologize to the people on your floor that you disturbed and tell them you were clearly drinking too much.

You don't give up your life.  Its just a mistake.  You clean up, no more drinking, and study hard.

The best thing you can do from all this is succeed in school and sobriety.Can you see a doc for a sleep aid? Chronic insomnia can really fuck you up.Did something happen to you to make you so filled with this hate?I'm so sorry you are just finding out. A dog is truly a best friend.  Their love is pure - never dependent on your looks or income. They are a bundle of sweetness and love and to me, they are perfect creatures.  Cry as much as you need.  Do you truly believe you ruin "everything"?  Really? Is everything that goes wrong truly your fault? I don't think that is possible.My god, this is horrible. You were assaulted in a terrible way and have been trying to white-knuckle your way through this without help.  You are compounding your torture by keeping this all inside.  You need to get help. Please for your sanity and mental well being, get professional help.

None of this is your fault, you are not a horrible person, but you can't get through this on your own. Please, get some professional help.My yoga teacher insists that certain poses "activate" certain organs to "release bad toxins".  Its hard not to scream at her that she is a fucking idiot, and that kidneys work just fine without twisting yourself into a pretzel, and what the fuck is a "toxin" anyway?I am so happy you wrote back!  I also eat when I am sad or bored.  You are not a worthless person. You are someone who has really been through a lot and you are human and doing what you can.

Please stick with it, give it at least 8 weeks before expecting any sort of change.  In fact, those first few weeks you may feel exhausted or irritable if you are switching to a low-sugar, hi protein diet, and doing exercises your body is not used to.  But stick it out! 

And take a before pic, because you may not notice improvements along the way.  

Imagine if you stick with it and give it your best - four months from now, you will feel and look quite a big different. You will feel stronger, sleep better and be better equipped to face the stuff life is tossing your way. This is beautiful!Well, you gotta take steps to change that then. I remember feeling sub-human when I moved to Los Angeles for college.  I truly felt that at 30lbs overweight, I had no right to be there.  I was "too ugly" to have the right to live there. And boy, some of the people sure treated me that way. Then when I got in shape, suddenly they were nice and friendly. FUCK them.

Be kind to yourself. You've gone through some serious trauma losing your dad and watching him deteriorate further and further.  You need to heal emotionally.

When I got married, I was again 25lbs overweight and I finally allowed my husband, who was a trainer and knew a heap about nutrition, to help me.  I remember the first day, doing what he told me, bored to death, thinking, "this is a total waste of time; I'll never be able to starve myself and I am too far gone."

I was so, so wrong.  I never starved, and of course there were times it took frustrating discipline to not gorge on some unhealthy crap, but I stuck with it, did what he told me to do, changed up my routine so I didn't hit plateaus, and ate dessert when I wanted (just a lot less of it).  The better shape I got in, the more inspired I was to work out even harder and eat better.

Eventually I got bored with the gym so I started different stuff. Don't bother doing stuff that you hate, because its very hard to stick with it.

Best of luck, and I hope the workouts and healthy eating will distract you, and give you strength, all of which may help in the healing with the loss of your dad.My evil brother used to fart and walk in diagonal line when people were walking behind him to ensure everyone suffered.I didn't want to embarrass him by saying no.  So, pity.

Or, when I was younger, if the guy took me out to dinner. I felt I owed him.  I was pretty naive.I guess I need to grow a dick to enjoy the benefits, then?Yes, i take it (prescription methadone) for chronic pain. I don't abuse it and I don't take anything else "on the side". My idiot doc nearly killed my ass when he injected nubain, which you never injected into someone saturated with methadone, unless the person is suffering a life threatening overdose.  I will never, ever forget it, or forgive him.In college I met a very fun guy who I was immediately attracted to on-site.  He was also paralyzed from about T4 down due to a motorcycle crash 15 years before I met him. I had no issue with it.THANK YOU. Another reasonable response. Of course we like food that tastes good and makes us feel good. Of course I will get irritable and get headaches if I've been eating like crap for awhile and make a significant change. But I have no right to bitch about it because I caused it myself.  You are never supposed to starve, and its ok to eat, wait 20 minutes and see if you are truly still hungry.

And for fuck's sake people, if you want it that much, you will do it.  Stop your fucking excuses with PCOS or thyroid or genetics or low metabolism or any of that shit.  I've been 30lbs overweight so I know the excuses.  With the exception of very rare diseases, all those bullshit "conditions" will at most cause a minor, insignificant gain so long as you moderate your food intake.

Can't work out? Neither can I.  For the past 13 years I have been fighting spinal tumors which put me in fucking agony on a daily basis.  I am mostly sedentary. It hurts to simply stand up. I make sure to eat less and eat well.  My weight will go up quick if I don't.

If you want to be fat and are happy, that's great for you. I am not an asshole from FPH. But if you truly want to change yet have nothing but bullshit excuses, I have zero patience or respect.

15 years ago, people would've been laughed at if they referred to food management (ie: "healthy diet") as similar to "withdrawal", or using drug-terms such as "relapse" or "triggers".   We have become so used to these words we now mindlessly associate drug withdrawal or effect with  the effect of food. No.

I have no empathy for someone who whines 'its harrrdddd!" while making no effort.  I have plenty of empathy and respect for people who bust their ass, do what needs to be done, and maybe occasionally remark, "damn, I really wanted that cookie but I didn't eat it".  Or, "I fucking ate the cookie, its not the end of the world, tomorrow is a new day."  If I twist EXTRA hard, I have been told I will "massage my liver".  Yes.  Massage an internal organ.If this happened in the US, you bet I'd sue his ass and file a complaint with the medical board. He'd be in deep shit and also face criminal charges by hiding me and refusing to call the ambulance.

But Mexico is pretty backwards.  There really isn't an overseeing medical board. I can either press criminal charges because he did violate the law by creating the condition and then refusing to provide care/get an ambulance, but he'd last about 2 weeks in a MX prison before getting sodomized and I really wouldn't want that.  I could file a civil suit which would drag through the corrupt courts for 5 years and get zero since there is no such thing as "pain and suffering". Also, he is broke.  Or, my best route is to file a complaint to this sort of arbitration board, who will review the evidence, and at best, determine he fucked up, and...that's about it.Yes, I am firmly convinced he hid me because he knew he fucked up bad.  In addition to having his own practice (where he injected me) he is also the medical director of the Cruz Roja, which is the only ambulance service in town.  Had the ambulance come, EVERYONE would've known he fucked up royally. 

So, he first tried to blame me.  Then just kept me there, hoping I wouldn't die, knowing I needed about 8 hours before I'd come back to reality and stop fainting, screaming, etc.  I was able to stagger to my car at midnight.  

This didn't happen in the US, so my recourse options are very limited.  He was so clueless with my reaction that he kept leaving me on the floor to research the drug interactions on Google.  He told me later, "Oh, I knew you were still alive when I left you in the waiting room because I could easily hear you screaming."

Thanks, fuckface.Its hard to describe those twitches and shakes.  While the pain, itching, feeling of bugs beneath your skin, are all horrible, those shakes...my god...its something from hell.  You try "pushing" them out of your body by rubbing your skin hard.  You must've been in fucking agony.  It is pure hell.

I can't stop thinking of that one girl another poster wrote about who died from withdrawal while in prison.  It must've been such a miserable, terrifying horrible death with the guards not giving a shit and not getting her medical attention.  Her poor, poor parents.  This happens all too often when a person gets tossed in jail for whatever reason and is either abusing drugs or is on prescription meds and nobody gives a shit. Its actually a big fear of mine - what if something happens and they lock me up and take away the meds (I always keep some on my person when I leave the house).  Yes. Unless you have experienced withdrawal (whether from drug abuse, a doctor making a mistake, not getting your prescription meds on time, trying new meds, etc) you have NO IDEA what hell it is on the body and brain to go through withdrawal.

You truly feel you are dying.  It is terrifying. You lose all connection with reality.  You hallucinate, vomit violently, shit and piss yourself, and are in a level of pain as if someone set you on fire, both outside your body and inside.  You can quite literally feel "fire" running through every single vein in your body. I felt like my fingers were glowing from fire and pain.  

Your opiate receptors in your brain and other neurological and chemical reactions are fighting to do ANYTHING to get that drug back into your system because your body is not yet ready to drop to that low of a dosage. Your body will take over rational thought and put you into hell and terror until it gets that drug.  You will fucking wish you were dead if you don't get help.I think that is in the advanced class.  I'm not there yet.Good.  I have been accosted and aggressively questioned by too many motherfuckers (and I have my placard hanging on the mirror) who have the fucking balls to tell me to my face I "don't look crippled" or "look too good".  FUCK you all.  You never, ever know what a person is feeling like on the inside.  We look good? We appear to walk ok? We are busting our ass to walk without a cane, holding in our tears, smiling to be pleasant because that is socially required, and are likely having a low-pain moment when you see us.  

You don't see us the rest of the time when we are crying our fucking eyes out at home from the pain.I knew this one self-entitled bitch from high school who always used her grandfather's placard. He rarely drove.  She would strut out of the are swinging her hips.  I was in the car once when she did that. Never drove with her again.  I was so ashamed.What? Jesus, that is horrible.

I would call it in and get her ticketed.  That sounds like the only way to stop her.  Someone in a wheelchair needs that spot.  (And also people not in chairs).  But especially chairs, because they cannot exit their car in regular spaces.  Your mom is literally making life far more difficult for disabled people, an intentionally so. A punkass kid working for Target did it to me while he was collecting carts.  Sneered, and said, "oh yeah, like YOU are really a cripple."  

I lost my SHIT.  I threw a fit to his manager, whipped out all my meds and told him he was a fucking moron.

What does his manager say? "But..you do look really good."Its the law of self-serving fuckers who think they are doing some handicapped person (who isn't there) a favor, or who thinks you are trying to sneak away unmerited conveniences (like being able to go to the head of the line because its too painful to stand).  I get it so often because I am pretty young and I don't use a cane. Its a shitty thing to go through.When I was dating a paralyzed (from mid-chest down) guy in my 20s, he would get shit all the time when he'd be waiting in his car, or if he already threw his wheelchair in the passenger seat and had pulled himself in. People would literally scream at him for being a fraud (I guess because he was 25 and had bleached blond hair?) He would say, "I'm paralyzed. Come look at my wheelchair." They'd say "yeah, its probably fake, like YOU."  

It really hurt him.  Fuck. Like he didn't have enough to deal with.Yeah, disabled people particularly love and feel greatly respected when they are referred to as a "cripple".This one instructor fucking SINGS during those last 5 minutes when you are supposed to lay there in silence and relax your mind.

Yes, the bitch sings. Some Hindi shit. I don't need a fucking lullaby and you are ruining the whole point of this process, ho.I wish I had.  I kept running into him when I later kept shopping there. I was just so sick at the time, and so tired of fighting to just not die.  I didn't have the energy.

I'm sure that had I reported it higher up, they would've sacked his ass.  I never got an apology from his stupid face, and employees should never, ever accost customers like that.Lots of people do take advantage of them, but having been on the receiving end, let me tell you: you do not approach someone if you see they have a license plate or placard displaying their right to park there. You are not the police or parking enforcement.  If they are breaking the law, or you believe they are, then call the police.  

That's like me coming up to you if I see you holding an expensive purse, or with an expensive mountain bike and I  say, "Is that really yours? Because you don't look like you can afford it."

There are many invisible disabilities.  I used to be unaware of it as well. But the general public or Target employees are not law enforcement and its not your place to investigate if a person is disabled.  If you do, you enrage us, you infuriate us, you make us have to demonstrate to you that we are not a fraud and that we are truly disabled.  

Until it happens to you, you have  no idea how degrading and infuriating it is. You are already suffering so much, and some asshole off the streets interrogates or sneers at you?

If you truly thing someone is abusing the spot and the police aren't there, look for the placard or license plate. If you don't see one, here is what I do:

"Excuse me, but I think you forgot your placard. I would hate for you to get a ticket." Say it nicely.  You will know how to react based on their reaction.

If they have the placard and you don't know them, keep your nose out of it.  Your social justice desires do not entitle you to interrogate me or sneer at me just because you do not have x-ray vision and cannot see my spinal tumors, or because I am trying not to limp, or because I don't want to use a cane. Disabled people don't owe the general public any explanations when they park in handicapped spots and have the proper plates or placards.To be fair, he looked really angry while doing it, was stomping around like a pouting 3 year old, his hair was a fucking mess, and he had the vest on. There. Enough proof?Even better idea. Or mail it in to the DMV.I'm still mad at myself for not taking it further.  I was just in so much pain that day, and so tired, and so exhausted of having to prove I was truly disabled and in fucking agony and just because I was rail thin it didn't mean that I "worked out", it meant I had no fucking appetite because at that time I was quite close to dying.The one thing I did do when I ran into him (collecting carts again) the next time I shopped there was this:

(With a big, sarcastic smile) "Oh, hello Einstein, its you. The person who knows who is disabled just by looking at them.  How's your job going collecting carts at your age? Have you made stupid remarks to any other disabled customers or have you learned to keep your fucking mouth shut?"

I knew I'd be on camera so I made sure to smile the entire time in case he reported me for harassing him.  He just stood there, so angry that I swear I saw smoke coming out of his ears.

(Note:  There is nothing wrong or shameful to have that job. I just knew to go for the jugular in that particular case.)Huh? I'm bitter? Because assholes like you accost people like me who park in handicapped spots using our placards?

Fuck off, dickwad.  You think you are helping your family members but you are fucking over people who are disabled.  How would your family members feel if they got shit from asswipes like you? 

It is laughable that you are so stupid you don't see the irony in accusing me of not being "grateful" for people like you  -  who harass disabled people who do display their placards when they park.  You aren't doing me, or anyone else you accost, any favors.   

Are you the police? No? Then don't fucking harass people who are not breaking the law.I am so, so sorry.  Why do they do that?  The eye roll. The forcing you to wait, hoping you will just leave.  The stubborn belief that you are a drug addict abusing the system and lying to try and score a hit.

And then when they offer a non opiate I want to fucking strangle them. Are they that stupid?  That's about as useful as M&amp;Ms.  Do they not realize how opiods work?

And someone like you that has a pain pump - its pretty damn obvious you are legitimate pain patient.  I am so sorry that shit happened to you.

Disabled people really get fucked.  Everything is so expensive and has to be custom made (wheelchairs, etc.)  You have a great system to preserve what's left of your joints but look at how much you had to pay for it.Of course I'm going to insult you when you say I should be grateful for people who come up to me and accuse me of being a fraud and faking a disability.  Of course I'm going to get angry at someone like you who claims that such policing is fair behavior that "benefits" me.  

No, it doesn't benefit me. And what tests will you give me to be convinced I am disabled?  

FUCK you.All I am seeing is Kim Kardashian who applied her makeup in a dark, moving car.I believe that is someone being random.Ah....Thank you.  I shall have a look.Well, you have been to fucking hell.

I once had an Indian roommate, mid 30s. This was in the US, her family was still in India.  Her parents put so much pressure on her to get married and put out ads, and when moms of potential husbands would see my friend for the first time, the moms would scream, "She is ugly! And fat, and much darker skinned than you said!"

This roommate of mine was certainly not ugly or fat, and to me, was exotic and pretty.  I could see how it was destroying her confidence and it made her into a pretty mean person.

You have an education which is your ticket out of there.  Is there any way you can get a visa to work far away from India and from your family?For people who take those spots seriously, of course I am grateful.  I am not grateful to people who think they can approach people who don't appear disabled, and who have parked with their placard or plate displayed and think its acceptable to question the person to determine if they are truly disabled.  That just makes my already difficult day ten times worse.  Being accused of being a disability fraud when you are fighting just to not die is a really shitty thing to experience.Funny, I also wish that the doctor who triggered withdrawal in me, or the staff at the ERs I visit a few times a year when the pain gets out of control (and I bring my heap of medical records proving my spine is fucked up) could all experience my level of pain, and withdrawal, for a few hours.

I'm sure they'd change their attitude really damn fast.

I have no experience with alcohol or benzo withdrawal, but to think that that can easily kill a person is really terrifying.  Alcohol is in so many products - I'm just thinking of cleaning products alone, or personal hygiene or wound care.  I've never been addicted so I cannot comprehend that level of hell, just built up a tolerance from years of taking prescription opiates.  

A few times I stopped SSRIs cold turkey, for some stupiid reason or another.  Violently vomiting, the brain zaps, the inability to stand straight - its fucking horrible.Dammit China, get your shit together.  You put out some of the smartest students and engineers out there but can't create and enforce standardized safety programs?

Edit:   I was wrong. It was Korea.  However, I read today that a little kid died in China when he somehow got trapped and suffocated under the handrail of an escalator.  But maybe there was no malfunction at all.  Maybe he was so tiny he kept his hand on, or clothes got caught, and he got dragged under.  Apparently his mom was there, holding his hand, as he died before they could dismantle the thing and save him.I guess its a good thing I didn't waste my time writing letters to higher-ups. 

I hope he is still collecting those fucking carts.I was hoping my comment didn't come out that way.  I should've been more clear. Wheelchair users don't necessarily need them more.  Many disabilities make walking very difficult.  On a bad pain day, I can barely walk (if at all) ten feet.  

Someone in a chair, if all spots are taken, may have to park way the fuck far away, or park taking up two spots so nobody can park near then and unwittingly block them in, but then they get their car keyed or a nasty note on the hood for "parking like an asshole". 

I certainly didn't mean to imply that any one group is more deserving of another.

Except, of course, when it comes to some gigantic lardass who has "painful knees" because they simply ate too much.  No! You do NOT deserve to take away someone else's much needed spot because you refuse to take reasonable care of yourself!  

Ok, rant done.Funny you mention it. I have one of those collapsible canes I keep in my car in case I get a flareup while I'm out.  But my ego gets in the way.  However, the few times I've used it, I notice I do not get any glares or eye rolling when I step out of my car.  Suddenly, people smile kindly as if we are sharing some sort of secret.

As for your brother-in-law, please tell him I think he is a disgusting, revolting sad excuse for a human being and is a lazy slob.   

Edit:   How can your own brother in law feel NO shame in using a handicapped placard when he clearly is not disabled knowing you need to rely on a cane?Kevin, if this is all True, thank you and than you to everyone else who busted ass, whatever your job was, or whomever you helped.Will someone please create a new sub for SportsAt12 already?this. i like this one.This is quite literally some of the funniest shit I have encountered on Reddit.  That one portrait that is all yellow scribble with just two eyes.  I snorted so loud my dog woke up.

Does OP have any of the reactions from the unsuspecting models?What? What the fuck? Huh? Is it your sister who is married to him or some other complicated deal?  Its shitheads like this who deserve to have their kneecaps give out.

But that means he will just take up parking spaces we need.I'm really sorry for your mom.  I know nothing about withdrawal or recovery from alcoholism, but reading what you wrote I now realize it is in everything.  I remember the last time I got drunk at age 22 or so, I vomited so badly that for months after, just the scent of hair spray would nauseate me.  I had no idea that just the scent of alcohol can hit one going through recovery so damn hard.

As for my fucking useless doc:  he is an American doc, but this all happened in Mexico, where I currently live.  Options in recourse are very limited.  I could press criminal charges because he did break the law when he refused to call the ambulance I pleaded for and quite literally left me on the tile floor for eight hours.  Had it occurred in the US, I'd have legally ripped him to pieces them stomped on them.

It does suck to rely on opiates. There is this constant terror that supply will run out, your doc may drop dead and you won't be able to get a new doc in time, or your doc may suddenly decide you've been on opiates long enough.

That withdrawal I went through really traumatized me.  If a pharmacy is a day late filling my meds, I get an actual panic attack.  Its not just the agony of withdrawal but the fact that I have very real, severe pain that I simply could not tolerate without opiates.  I'm a prisoner to them, just like anyone else who needs opiates to function.  Its a necessary drug that I am very grateful for its existence, but damn, the addicts and abusers sure make it fucking difficult for me to not have problems getting my refills every month.

And its freakin' expensive.

How is your mom now?If they have a placard up, or a license plate with the insignia, just leave them alone. It could be a fake, or it could be someone who is disabled but who is smiling for the first time that day because they thought of a funny joke.  They may be walking straight because their meds just kicked in, and for 10 minutes they will feel wonderful, but, only for ten minutes.  They may look "fit" but are actually underweight and frail and fragile because they can't eat due to chronic pain.  They may be attractive or pretty, but take a closer look and you will see very large bags under their eyes and a deep sadness (or anger) in their eyes.  They may look perfectly normal, but that may be because they hate being disabled, are young, want to fit in, and are trying so hard to not look disabled.

It can also be a perfectly healthy parent or caretaker that is unloading a disabled child in a very heavy carseat that you just have not seen yet, or maybe the other parent/caretaker has them inside the store and it is much easier to assist the disabled passenger in a handicapped spot with more room and that is closer to the front door.

Many people do commit fraud and use placards that do not belong to them. It sucks. I want to punch them all.  If you don't see their placard (make sure to look at the license plate too) just very nicely say, "Hey, you forgot to hang your placard."  If they say something that makes it obvious they are not disabled, then feel free to go to town and rip them to shreds.yes, full pixie would be perfect. she has a beautiful face with the perfect shape for a pixie cut.  she doesn't even need to wait to grow the bangs.  

I had a pixie cut for years. its awesome, you can do many different things with it, and any style takes all of 2 minutes max.I felt so shitty when people who ignored me the prior year in college (even women who could not be bothered to give me the time of day) suddenly were so chirpy and friendly.  It felt like a huge betrayal and a farce.  How could I ever be friendly with them? What if I gained weight back? Would they just dump me because my value had dropped? (Likely, they would.)

The best thing that helps when I get sad is pushing myself to work out.  That is actually when you need it the most, because it gets the endorphins going.  The first 15 minutes will suck and you will hate it, but once you get warmed up, you'll start feeling a lot better.  And remember to never starve yourself!

I really hope you are able to start feeling better, inside and out.  You've been through a lot.  No, you  came off very kind. I really did word my first post badly!"Its a comparison".  Ok, you are comparing drug withdrawal, which is a violent, terrible ordeal that can kill you or cause you to commit suicide, to "food withdrawal."  

That right there is so stupid, and so rife with bullshit, that I cannot take you seriously.  

You really won't give up this fight, will you.  First, stop misquoting me.  I never said it is "easy" for fat people to lose weight.  I said that it takes self-responsibility and self-control, and equating food with drugs and that other nonsense with withdrawal is utterly ridiculous and disingenuous.

Second, are you really arguing over semantics regarding the word "comparison"?  You repeatedly opined that people can get addicted to food and suffer withdrawal when they go on a healthy diet.  

That right there is so stupid, and so trivializes what withdrawal really is, that it merits no response.  

I'm not trying to shut down anything.  It is rather you who cannot accept that we have differing opinions. I will not change my opinion. I have enough experience with actual withdrawal from a drug (due to a doctor's error with prescription medication) and losing weight myself (and hated myself for years and yo-yo'd up and down and never got fit until I faced reality).

The hardest part was me admitting that I was simply eating too much, and I was working out like a pussy.  I was ashamed.  I had let myself go and I didn't like myself.  But that was the truth.  

If someone wants it enough, they will work for it.  You and others may disagree, but I won't change my mind.  It is this constant coddling and bullshit excuses that allows people to convince themselves that being fat is "ok" (and then they get fatter) or come up with  a litany of excuses to not change their bad habits,  and blame it all on depression, PCOS, thyroid, you've heard it all.Well...he can do what feels right.  He can do it anonymously.  His mother is doing a terrible thing.  She deserves to pay the price.  If you can't to the time (or in this case, pay the fine), don't to the crime. She is actually causing human suffering.

Think about that.  Her laziness  and selfishness is causing direct human suffering.

Now, some kids would never be able to call the cops on their parent in that situation.  Others could.  If it were my parents, knowing what I know about them and their financial status, and if all my efforts to get them to see that their actions are wrong got me nowhere, then yes, I'd call the cops and get my parent fined.

Would a parent be wrong if they saw their kid dealing weed to the neighboring kids? Tried to talk their kid out of it, but kid always knew better, and parent felt the only way to get kid to see the light was to face real-life consequences?I am so, so sorry. I've had clients (former lawyer before I went on disability) that had the most heartbreaking fights with doctors, insurance and state/fed benefits approval who were in the same boat.  Because its not a clear cut case of disability with disc degeneration, the insurance whores or lazy docs will fight tooth and nail to not do their damn jobs.  

And if you happen to be young and look relatively good, you are further considered a fraud or drug seeker.

And, you are in constant chronic pain.  To suffer that much, and then see someone like your bro in law, who would be perfectly healthy if he just didn't STUFF HIS FACE WITH SO MUCH FOOD is a kick in the gut.  You see all these people who have no IDEA what they are missing in life.  They don't suffer chronic pain, because if they did, they sure would make an effort to improve it.

Then for him to take advantage of the system and not take care of himself, or make it worse, so he is guaranteed money to sit on his fat ass (and he has a special needs kid on top of it all  -  father of the year material) is infuriating.  

Is his wife a large woman?  Don't see how a healthy woman or man could tolerate staying with someone who did that to their own body.

I truly hope you get everything you need and I am sorry you have to have that fight when you are already so tired.  Disc degeneration is evil. My husband also went through it and lost about an inch of height.  No pain meds helped, and it took me 2 years to get his disability approved.  For him to see some gigantic fat person who was approved for disability because they created their own type 2 diabetes would just kill him.No, didn't come out that way at all.  Trust me, I also feel denied my justice boner (justice boob?)Not that there's anything wrong with it!This just makes me so happy! What a happy doggie!His name is perfect, first of all.  And look how he is improving,  already looks healthier, ears are perkier.  In no time he will be happily tearing up your home.I want a Rosie and a pet chicken.  Look how confident and happy she is.  This one nearly made me cry.  In the first pic you see the haunted eyes and fear, and sadness,  while the second pic is pure joy! So happy to be alive! Well done!Are we taking about that cringepic of the girl who had this guy "friend" who she used for all these favors, including one where he had to take the greyhound and she made him sleep on the floor?

Or is this a more specifically personal experience?Kid? He was an adult.  No, he didn't know he made a mistake and had he shown he knew he made a mistake when I took it to his manager and apologized, I actually wouldve been happy because I'd know he'd never do that to anyone else again.  You were not there to see him rolling his eyes and whining that I still "looked fine".   If he did applogize sincerely and had known what he did was wrong, he would not have pouted and refused to apologize the entire time. I am sorry.  I didn't have the time to read the entire thing and I scanned as quickly as possible.  I truly didn't mean to hurt you and genuinely apologize if I did.  My mom grew up in a household that tossed her around from country to country as a kid (job related but non military) and often they threw her in schools where she didn't speak the language.  I don't think she ever really recovered from a constant feeling of insecurity.

Can understand your lack of desire to travel after all that.  Who the hell lawyers up for a low level Target job? He probably expected an easy payout and then had no choice but to take the rehire.  Ive had clients that did stupid shit like that. Would rehire an employee who became a daily liability because they were scared of some bullshit lawsuit, then the employee would really fuck up and cost them a fortune in legal fees because now they have a known fuckup on payroll and do nothing to stop him from screwing up.In that case, how's it been?It's people like him that fuck up the disability system for people like you.  And to know he has kids in the mix is just so heartbreaking.  I truly hope you get the surgery you need and everything gets a lot better.You made me wake up my dog laughing so hard.  It was an old reddit post.  That poor guy, out in a tent.  Yes, pity sex was in order as long as you were up for it.You know, I often wished I grew up moving around.  I grew up in a really nice community but was so unhappy with my home life that I thought other places would make it better.  Now I know it would've been way worse. I think I'm going to replace my framed wedding photo with this one,  that dog is just so damn happy. I hope you can get out soon.  To be able to start a new chapter in your life in a new place and with people that have no connection to your past.   You are right. I've self diagnosed with anxiety, PCOS, mental retardation, self-entitlement and many other things that require a trigger warning for this response.  I should go sell my iphone so I can afford a therapist but that's a huge sacrifice.Yes, its such a shame.  I've had friends who got into bad motorcycle crashes and became paralyzed, and one of the ugly shocks is how expensive even a wheelchair is.  It needs to be made for the specifics of the person, but that still does not justify the price.  Those hospital  wheelchairs weight about a ton, and you can't take them into a car without needing a weight lifter to heft it in.

I learned a lot when I dated this guy in my 20s who was paralyzed from T4 down.  Except he was lucky - overall, he had excellent health and his mom let him live in a cottage on her property.  

Funny you mention Asian stores - when I filed bankruptcy after I got sick and couldn't work, I discovered Asian stores!  Their stuff is much cheaper, and I love Asian food, and they had some of the most interesting treats you can't find anywhere else.

Ohh, this reminds me of mochi. How I love mochi.

I hate the way ER rooms treat me as well.  They have access to all my records that show all my spine surgeries but roll their eyes, say "I am NOT giving you another injection" when I explain I've been on opiates for years and thus have created a high tolerance.   You end up having nowhere to go, literally, when you are pulling your hair out from a bad flareup.   Once I had a doc fuck up and forget to refill my meds and take off for vacation. The nightmare I had to try to get a refill from other docs that still knew me and were familiar with my case was soul crushing.  Well, that's a very good point.  I imagine if I had an 18 year old daughter who brought a guy home and we had zero idea if he would murder us in the night, a tent is a reasonable idea.  She (manager) was young and apologized and handled it the best she knew how.  I imagine at my age I would not  have done much better.  I sighed with frustration when she said, "but, you DO look good".  However, the entire time she was apologizing that cart wrangler was furious, pouting, refused to say one word much less an apology or explanation, glared, etc.  All like a brat 7 year old who was getting scolded for kicking  the neighbor's dog.

The manager was stupid, yes, but she was nice. The cart wrangler (love that term) was aggressive, fucking rude, and refused to acknowledge or admit he was wrong.  A genuinely apology truly goes a long way with me.  That is just heart breaking. So very sorry.I used to be like this.  Thought I owed "niceness" it to guys  saying creepy shit.  No. Fuck that.  You don't owe him SHIT.  He is manipulating you.  You must stand up for yourself, tell him to stop his shit, and block him. Don't even waste time trying to explain why his shit is wrong if you don't feel like it. You are not his therapist.Wow - what a great transformation. You look strong, fit, sexy and healthy.Ok, you have a lot going on, and for that I am very empathetic. I will only address one thing: you mention you've gained a lot of weight and are suffering through a disability and have quit work and its very hard to be active.

I've been there.  At 28 I got a catastrophic illness and it changed everything. I was married, no kids, had to go on disability and filed bankruptcy.  

You finally have your disability benefits, which is good.  The fight to get them can really destroy a person's soul.

About your weight: I promise you, your weight gain is not from not being active, but from eating too much of unhealthy things.  At 28, pre-spinal tumor, I was fit and in badass  shape. When I got sick, i was in so much pain that I spent a good five years on a couch, drugged up and suicidal from the pain.  I could barely walk or shower, much less be remotely "active".

I got both skeletal thin, and 15lbs overweight.  When the pain was tolerable and I could eat, I found that yummy food like chocolate (especially carbs) were truly the ONE thing that brought me a tiny bit of pleasure, a tiny bit of escape from the pain.  Those little breaks were truly the one thing keeping me hanging on.

But, I hated that I had gained 15lbs on my 5'2 frame.  

If you cannot be active, your only option is to have a very healthy diet and do not overeat.  Its all within your control. For people who are active, its still 90% diet that determines body composition and whether one is overweight or not.

I'm so sorry you are suffering.  A disability, especially when you are young, steals away everything. Your education, your marriage, your bank account, your life..  

As for your car - I nailed a pillar about three separate times in this one underground garage.  I dented the shit out of my car.  I was so exhausted, so sleep deprived, so stressed, in so much pain, had tried going back to work (didn't work out) and of course my focus was affected.

Its ok about the car.  Nobody got hurt and that is the most important thing.

Marriage: its hard on the healthy person in the marriage.  My marriage also fell apart.  My ex is a very good man who tried his absolute best, but we went from being an active, adventurous couple at 28 to me laying on the couch, multiple spine surgeries, a few near-death experiences, and he had to take over everything.  A job he hated, mortgage payments, all house cleaning, etc. Cannot imagine how much harder it would have been had we had kids.

Sex? Ha! For five years there was nothing. I was in so much pain and so drugged I was hardly attractive to me.  The few times a year I did want sex, it was only because I was high as a kite - and saying stupid stuff, likely drooling and really not appealing at all.  He was also severely depressed, and in survival mode to keep us afloat.  

That part really destroyed me.  I never knew I could be married yet feel so lonely.  His sense of loyalty made it impossible for him to leave me (and I made it clear I wanted him to have a happy life and I would never hold it against him if he moved on, as the doctors saw no hope for my condition to improve).  

I finally left him.  I knew it had to be done and only I could be the one to do it. I am not saying that is what you should do - just saying that I understand what its like to be there.

I suppose all I can say is take baby steps.  Little goals instead of huge goals. Maybe start with treating yourself with kindness, and give your body healthy, nutritious food in reasonable amounts so you can drop the extra weight.  That alone made me feel so much better about myself, and more in control. When you can control your diet and weight, you feel much more confident.

Second, talk to your SO if you haven't already.  A therapist is always an option.  I saw one for myself. My ex said a therapist for him would be useless, because he needed the circumstances to change, rather than learn how to handle the circumstances.  I had to respect that - it was how he felt.

No matter what, you deserve to be treated with respect.  My ex also started snapping at me, losing his temper over perceived slights and saying things that really were hurtful.  I knew it was coming from a place of frustration and exhaustion, but it was still not acceptable.  He also needs to do his fair share, and if he can't or won't, you will have to decide how much of that you are willing to handle.

I have no idea of your pain level.  If you are in chronic pain, that must be managed as best as possible for you to pull out of depression and not be miserable.

It sounds like you are doing a whole lot around the house and other stuff despite suffering from a significant disability.  You deserve to have an equal partner who does his fair share.  My ex was frustrated and snapped, yes, but he worked a full time job he hated and also took care of most household stuff.  It sounds like your guy is doing virtually the bare minimum.

Might be a good idea to talk to a therapist just for you so you can get an outside opinion.

Wishing you the best....and feel free to join us at the subreddit ChronicPain if that is an issue you are also fighting.I love going out by myself. At 22, I would've felt mortified and like the world would be staring like I was some loser.  

How wrong I was. I'm older, I don't give a shit about that anymore, and going out alone can be wonderful.  I bring a book t to a restaurant or a magazine if I want. r I go to a club and just watch people dance, enjoy the music or dance on my own.  People are actually more inclined to approach you.   You can do whatever you want, leave whenever you want, and there is no pressure to engage in conversation if you aren't up for it."You know, I can hear every word you two are saying."This is nothing but a marketing ploy.  There is nothing "spontaneous" at all about this.  She has on makeup, its just not obvious. Also perfect lighting, a team of stylists for her hair, and who knows how many post-productions filters, etc (which are not 'photoshop' so there is technically no misrepresntation to the public.)

This stunt was meticulously planned out, make no mistake.This glorified being unhealthy.  I am against fat shaming, but this badge thing is ridiculous.  This encourages girls and women to be unhealthy.Hmm. I see what you are saying. She should be allowed to talk about past events that don't involve boyfriends (directly, at least).  My husband when through  a similar phase.  He had much less experience than me, and during a hard time in his life, rather early into our relationship, he completely lost all confidence just knowing I had past boyfriends or flings.  I never, ever spoke about them.

Well, until he asked 'my number', and I was honest and told him.

He just hit rock bottom, and became difficult to be around (this was before we got married).  It hit a point where I almost left him.  I felt I couldn't breathe, and told him he had to find a way to accept I had a life before I met him - just as he had had a life, and women, before he had met me.

I think it was more that he was at the time jobless, in a somewhat new country, and his parents were sick.  It all compounded.  Thankfully he was able to work it out, because had he not, I would not have been able to handle his insecurity.  It was not attractive and I felt like I was walking on eggshells. 

Do whatever you have to do to accept that she is with you now.   She wants to be with you.  Those guys are her past and have no bearing on you.He is/was not a "celebrity" but still a world-class motorcycle roadracer and very famous in his home country. Now he's racing World Superbike.  At the time, he was racing MotoGP (like Formula 1 but motorcycle racing).  I had a paddock pass, knew some people, hung out with some mechanics, met the rider, he liked me and that was that.  Nice guy.That baby sheep has little knee pads.You know, you said that "its easy to love someone when their life is going perfectly well".  I once said something similar at a person's wedding when there was an open mic and guests were asked for advice.  I said something like, "its very easy to love someone when things are going well, but one True test of love is how well you work together during hrd times."

You are a very loving boyfriend, it sounds.

I would not ask her number.  It will just get your mind running even more.  And, what will it change? You can't undo it, and no "number" but 0 will be comfortable for you.  

My husband told me, when I asked why he cared about my past, especially when I was not friends with any of my exes sand did not have particularly fond memories of them, that men are "very visual" in a way women cannot understand.

He described it as something that made sense, and that, as a woman, I truly could not understand.  That men think of all sorts of things that women did with their ex, even if they have no reason to thing those things happened.

I think he also felt his experience was far less than mine.  This was True - he had been with about 4 women, I had been with about 24 men.  However, that didn't mean each guy I was with was this phenomenal experience.  In fact, it was quite the opposite.  Most of them were not particularly enjoyable, and only a few were special, and those special times were with the guys I truly cared for.  I was young, was curious, and was much more open to sex w/o love than he was.

It got to the point that he even brought it up to my mom.  Before you cringe from embarrassment, at the time they were pretty close, and he put it in a manner that he had wished he was my first.

She told him,"that's what you think! I was the first for my husband, we're still married, and when he hit a low point he went through this phase where he was convinced that because I had such little experience prior to him that I was curious and wanted to have experience with different men."  My dad gave my mom a really hard time about it for awhile. Not because he was trying to be mean, but he was going through an insecure phase.

There is never a good or bad number.  The only time a number was annoying or a turnoff to me, was when I the guy I was seeing exclusively bragged that he has slept with over 1,000 women.  I knew he was lying and bragging, and THAT was a turnoff!

I know what its like to feel insecure and compare yourself to your woman's past bfs.  I never spoke about it to him, but I remember going through his old photo albums (that his mom had put together years ago and had made available for me at her home since I loved looking at his pix when he was a kid) and just staring at the pix of his ex. She was taller than me, very pretty, blond (I am a short brunette) and seemed very sweet.  I imagined that the few vacation photos of them was of an idyllic, perfect relationship.  I completely forgot how he told me how hard it was for him to leave her, because she was a good person, but he simply fell out of love with her.  It didn't matter at the time that he was with me, gave up his job to be with me in a different country, and he hadn't seen her in years.  I simply honed in on what she physically was and what I was not.

I remember the sting in my stomach the very few times he told me a few stories that happened to involve her (when he beat the shit out of a serial rapist that had attacked her in broad daylight before anything bad could happen, for example).  I was actually envious and wished it had been me!

There isn't a magic way to just snap out of it.  I think it just takes time. Maybe talk to her. My husband did.  Told me he felt he was not experienced enough for me, or that he just felt insecure since I was with other men before him.  I think what helped him was both time, and his own personal work where he had to remind himself that that was my past - I was no longer hanging out with these guys or gushing about them.  And I also learned to have sensitivity and not bring up stories that involved them, but I also knew I didn't have to censor myself and never speak of my life prior to him.

It is human nature to compare ourselves to the exes of our SO's past.  Just don't let it become an obsession.  I think its harder now with Facebook and all that stuff (none of that existed when I met my husband, internet, yes, but no FB or social media.)  

Again, I do not think its a good idea to ask her number, and if you do, certainly not now.  It will only fuel your alread rampant imagination and insecurity and will serve no purpose.  Ask yourself, what would be her "perfect" number that would make you feel better? There isn't one.

It might open the door to her feeling judged.  She might feel that you hold it against her because her past experiences are numerically higher than yours.  Doesn't matter if none of those past experiences were with men that were not special, or did nothing spectacular for her - you will only end up focusing on the number.

Sorry for the babble.  I hope you can get through this. Once you can, it will be a huge load off your shoulders and you will be able to breathe, relax and spend quality time without it popping into your mind.Or...put down a few towels on the bed and go to town! As long as she is up for it, not cramping, etc.This is something to be incredibly proud of.  Training, facing fear, and all for a selfless cause.  Well done!Hey - let us know how it goes.  Even if you get your ass beat, you are still a badass.  Just a sore and bruised badass.Why don't you ask them? Tell them, nicely, "have I done, or not done something that has hurt or bothered you"? 

Just be prepared to face some uncomfortable answers to which you can respond to with maturity and dignity and not defensively.

If they say something you believe is completely unreasonable, sleep on it, really think about it, and decide whether they are justified or not by asking someone else you can trust who is outside that group.Oh man, this is a tough one.  You didn't do it on purpose, but as a driver you have a responsibility to be extra cautious not to make those kinds of mistakes.

Still, we are human, and they happen every single day.  

If this person has life-altering damage, I think you are going to really need some outside professional help.  Even if this person recovers, its still a huge and costly trauma.  I'd  still recommend outside therapy.

I once had a client who was an epileptic, but her doctor said it was safe for her to drive. So, she drove, had a seizure and killed three people.  She became a walking zombie and of course she was sued and had to face the horror every single day until it was settled.

You were not drunk. You weren't racing or driving recklessly.  You made a genuine mistake and you will need help forgiving yourself.  All of us who drive have near-misses when we are distracted for a moment. Only difference is the dumb luck of timing meant nothing bad happened.Now I want to beat the shit out of your roommate.  Does he just not give a shit when you bring all this up to him? Have you told him your food/beer/weed are fucking off limits?I was like that in college. I did not connect with anyone there aside from a handful of people.  My interests were very different.

I did what you do - stayed in, kept to myself, read, exercised, did activities that I enjoyed on my own.  Fuck yeah it was lonely, but it was a lot better than pretending to be someone else and hanging out with people I couldn't stand.

You will slowly, over time, meet like-minded people with whom you connect. It just takes time. Stay away from toxic people, places and environments.  Be True to yourself.I think dogs are the most pure, most loving of all creatures.  They don't care what you look like, if you are rich or poor, or drive a fancy car. All they want is to give love, receive some love, and have a warm bed. Your doggie had a wonderful last 3 years, all because you opened your heart and home.  

Thank you for giving an older dog a loving home and the chance to know what love and a good family was like.  My first dog is slowing down and is now 13.  I know her time will come, so I try to make every day special - no matter how annoying or naughty she may be.Hey, who gives a shit? If you are kicking ass at your job, you are fine.  Sure, people can argue you "took" that job away from someone else, but that someone else probably had legit credentials and simply didn't interview as well as you did.

If you are badass and busting ass at your job now, I highly doubt they would care if they found out the truth, unless its some huge corporation that has to maintain a positive public image.Its posts like this that make me so glad that social media and blogs did not exist when I was young and thought I was special, different and smarter than everyone else.  Ten years from now OP will read this shit, along with the dumbass title, and cringe so hard.I know this is nothing like what you are doing - but all I can say is this:  I used to race amateur motorcycles.  I was one girl out of 40 guys in the 600 class (the craziest, most out of control class.)  

I remember being on the grid, watching the countdown before the green flag dropped.  I was fucking terrified. The start is the most dangerous part of the race, especially with a bunch of amateurs. I could not believe I had spent hours and thousands of dollars in prepping my bike and paying entry fees to be a part of this - something in which riders get hurt badly quite often.

And, the green flag dropped, I was the last person to enter the first turn, I was scared shitless, came in dead last, and I was hooked.  A few months later I took a 3rd (also had a few high speed crashes and broken bones.)

I also did some low-level martial arts competing when I was younger.  Nothing like what you are doing with full contact and in a ring.  You are going to feel incredible adrenaline and will not even notice the crowd as you will be so focused on your opponent.  Keep your guard up, and kick ass, and let us know how it goes!I saw it at home, and actually laughed and found it amusing.  But, probably because I was on my comfy couch and could play on the internet during boring parts.Damn fine work.  Hook us up with another progress pic in 5 months.  Mochi is life. Mochi is magic. Mochi is so damn delicious. How can something that is made only of white rice and no seasonings be so tasty?This is really impressive.  How long did it take? How many pens did you go through?OP, please tell us you took the kitty to the vet.  Instead of just snapping a pic for reddit attention.I just had to post that I am so sorry. They made a non-janitor clean toilets? WHAT THE FUCK?Its heaven, especially with some salt.  Its made out of rice, and you heat it up, and it sort of blows up/expands. Its chewy, and yummy and FUCK I wish I could find mochi in Mexico.Ok, this is good, very good. I feared a broken neck meant he would suffer paralysis.  We still don't know if he will suffer lifelong chronic pain, or what his prognosis is.

But, you had insurance, which means you were responsible and like I said, none of this was intentional.  You are human.  We have all come close to hurting or killing someone in a near-miss in our cars, despite how good a driver we may believe we are.

If you can't afford to see anyone, even for just a few sessions, the best I can recommend is get some really good reading on self-help.  Its not a magic bullet, but its one way to help you accept that you are human and something shitty happened. 

Also, you are doing the right thing by way of the family and driver by taking responsibilty. I got nailed HARD when I was at a stop and a gigantic truck rear-ended me because he just wasn't paying attention.  This caused me 4 years of fucking hell. I mean, spine surgeries, injections and pain, chronic pain, like I never have known before.  I was/am never the same.  

He fucked up. But, he took responsibilty. He apologized.  I knew he felt bad. When his insurance started stonewalling me, I called him up and said, "get on the phone with your adjuster and tell them to get their shit together or I will sue both of you in a bad way".  He did. His insurance got cooperative right away.

I told the guy who hit me - never, ever not pay attention like that again.  

Of course, at the time I had no idea I'd have back pain for life.  Maybe I would not have been that understanding.   But, he immediately admitted he was at fault and made no excuses.  That helped me a lot.  I've fucked up plenty of times too. I was just lucky that nobody got hurt.Oh yeuurrghh.

In college, I had a summer job delivering auto parts.  I just hung around until an order came in then went on my way, so on slow days we had some down time, during which I would make the stock look nice and organized, etc.

Until the boss asked me to clean the bathroom. I was the one girl with 4 filthy, disgusting male slobs.  I said NO, we never discussed that in my interview, its not my duty.

But I guess for those other jobs, it is discussed during the interview process, and these people need the jobs.

What do you do with a dump that size that won't flush? Put on a hazmat suit and pick it up and put it in a trash bag? Holy god.That is just fucked.  I understand side jobs. I had plenty of those in the food service, auto parts delivery, etc, jobs I had while in college.

But cleaning a toilet and scrubbing a bathroom for a company like CVS which has a fortune to hire a janitor? Shit.  (Figuratively, not literally.)  I know, makes sense to not pay a janitor to beon payroll 24 hours a day, but goddamn. Who decides who picks up the giant turd?  If the giant turd is dropped off during a shift change, does the incoming shift get fucked?That is fucked. So damn fucked.  No crew. No help. And no protection so you don't get sick or die. And people can't just quit and their managers know it.Thanks! That's very nice, and I shall try it. Never tried butter mochi before.They truly fuck you over.  To have nothing but a wrist-length thin, cheap gloves and have to break up someone's large-ass shit. That would truly upset me. But what can you do? You need to pay the bills.I couldn't even find that.  If they did sell it, it would be a dusty, torn sack of flour and cost about $40. Well done!

Once I fucked up and was ordered to do some community service.  Quite a bit, in fact. I was assigned to City Parks, which was actually quite nice. Except the last day. We were sent to scrub rows and rows of toilets.  We did get long gloves and actually, since it was mid-February, it was low season and not that bad.

And, I had no right to complain considering I deserved that community service.It is shit like this that makes me so grateful that there was no internet or social media when I went to high school.  There was NONE of this fucking nonsense.  None of this bullshit thathappened. None of this constant self-diagnoses of every mental disorder on the planet.  

If you were ugly? Tough shit, deal with it. Fat? Too bad, lose weight or accept people will look at you or say things.  Be awkward (like me) and not get asked to the prom? Tough titties, life goes on.  Failed a class? Retake the class, little shit, except study this time and don''t blame the teacher.  Feel angry because girls don't send you nudie pix (well, nudie pix didn't really exist) tough fucking shit, fuckface, you don't get to shoot up a school.

I never thought I'd say what sounds like "old person stuff", but I sure am happy I grew up in the 80s.  There also wasn't that social pressure with social media and people with camera phones that could record and publish your every move, or internet bullying, which can get really fucking mean.

Now, all of you get off my lawn.When will one of these dumb motherfuckers actually look up the meaning of "appropriate"?  It means that you wrongfully take something away from someone else that doesn't belong to you, thereby depriving the victim of the use of the thing taken.

So if I, a white woman, dress up and have fun on day of the dead it somehow means I've stolen Mexican culture all for myself and Mexicans have lost their ability to also partake in the Day of the Dead?Stupid question:  uncooked rice? Just toss in blender? Or cooked rice that is dried?

And does sushi/short grain Asian rice work best, as opposed to long-grain rice (like for Middle Eastern dishes?)I hope it gave you a wee bit of relief.  The heartbreak over the loss of a pet can be harder than that of a human.  Pets don't understand life or death or the passage of time like we do.  

You gave your doggie an incredible life, and those are the memories your dog left this world with.Once i got my first office job, I never could leave my dirty coffee mugs behind.  Even when my boss told me it was ok, it just felt wrong.  I get that maybe they did hire another person to do that job, and I cleaned my mugs on my way out (thus not taking up company time to do things that weren't my job) but I couldn't bear to think I was allowed to be a slob and not clean up after myself at the office kitchen or lunch table.  "Everything happens for a reason" when they hear I have an inoperable spinal tumor.

FUCK YOU, no, it does not, if it did, then what's the reason for Boko Haram kidnapping and raping thousands of young girls, for example?Then what makes it taste so good? What magic seasoning does mochi have?Well, knowing me, I'd gain 50lbs.  Maybe I'd best stay away from it.this makes me wish my 50llb dog could fit into one of those shoulder carriers for babies so I could tote her around town.

If I were not 5'2 and 125lbs, I'd do it anyway.  I'd find away to keep her legs from dragging on the ground.  Or maybe a backpack version.  I needed this. Subscribed.  This helps with bad days.  Many thanks.wait till you see a newborn parrot or cockatoo.  scary.I want to gently stuff my face in his soft belly.And, once again the enormity of my mistake in creating my username is brought to my attention.

Remember those Jive-speaking dudes ordering food? I thought one was speaking gibberish and said "DragonToothGarden" when describing what he wanted with his meal.

I was advised, about a week ago by other Redditors, that Jive man was saying "drag it through the garden" (ie: I want the food spicey").

I always thought I had the coolest Reddit username as I was convinced he had said "dragon tooth garden" to describe some sort of delicacy.I like you. You know what to say.YAYYYY! I am literally smiling and happy and so happy to hear back! Wasn't it great? You didn't get knocked out, you stood your own, you kicked ass, for your FIRST damn fight at 40 years old and you feel GOOD and it was awesome.

Well done, my friend.  Well done.

So. You're hooked now and can't wait to train for your next fight, right?Ear plugs.  Wear them around the house.  I did that around noise I could not bear. TV all day is just stupid for any kid for any reason. Earplugs.  CVS. Now.Your dad is a fucking asshole, and your mom is weak and just as abusive to not protect you.

Get out of there as soon as you can.  The martial arts training controlled your temper, which is a great thing. You have far more control than your abusive dad.

I couldn't stand it when my parents offered to pay for something/buy someting/feed me/etc then throw it in my face when I didn't immediately bow down to their unreasonable demands.

Get out as soon as you can. Do whatever it takes.Yes, that is only fair.  When my man was racing bikes, I was sweating bullets even though I knew he was a great rider.  We just get scared for people we love.  

Even if she isn't ok with it, which is understandable, you can always continue to train and hone your craft.  What an amazing accomplishment.  Most guys our age (I am 41) do not try new things because they hate being a beginner and starting at the "bottom".  I truly admire what you've done, and you're wife's bravery to stand by your side.I've noticed that these days, whenever someone says the truth, and it happens to be something the other person doesn't want to hear, the "you're being a bully!" gets tossed out.

That term is now so overused and abused its become meaningless.  Being a bully means unfairly using your power to belittle, hurt, harm or take something from someone else that you have no right to take.

Telling someone a fact that is True is not bullying.  Its like a Spock pinch except in the nostril.  And why do capybaras look like focused, serious Rafael Nadal waiting to return a serve?He is clearly in love too.Are you sure he's not a canine-Dobby mix?Wonder what the commentary from the posts on TwoXPrayingMantis would be like.Nope, this is staying blue.And these people are clapping, why?HAHAHAHAHAHA oh, I'm sorry, I was truly not trying to be rude.Isn't that teacher missing a few little wars in there? Oh, what a cutie. The day I brought my dog home from adoption, it took us 20 minutes to go upstairs to my condo.  We did two steps at a time, then she sat, I sat, I assured her, took another two steps, etc.And this is why we chicks always have to do a situational awareness check before we bend down or bend over for any damn reason.  Wall around? Back up against wall.

Edit:  Oops.  I thought I was clicking on the link of a pic of a woman bending over to pick something up and five men are blatantly staring at her ass.  You're not ugly at all. Just unkept.  Clean up by shaving and getting a clean-cut haircut.  Wear clothes that compliment your body shape (you look sort of hidden in too-baggy clothing).

Also, working out does wonders for an overall fit and healthy look. I don't mean that only men with huge muscles are attractive, but fitness is appealing.

Do all that, and your handsomeness will come out!Go to a stylist.  Not Supercuts! No! Spend the money, go to a stylist/salon that understand's male facial shape and what haircuts work best.Its not just losing weight, but getting strong.  Anyone can lose weight, but what makes a man appealing is his level of fitness. I don't mean Ironman is required, but if you are simply skinny, well...big deal.  Pick up a sport you enjoy, and your body will love it, and so will your mind.Yep. If I were in his age group and saw him and he looked like that, I would think "smug, arrogant kid who thinks his shit doesn't stink."  Especially since you expect females should be giving you attention. Get off your ass and be friendly and make the effort.How about shower, clean up, put on some decent clothes and let's try this again.  Its hardly fair for you to ask our opinion if you haven't showered in 2 weeks. Looks way better without the hat.  It opens your face more.  The cut is perfect.  I'm not much a beard person, but you make it work. You are not ugly at all. 

I know its cliche, but what women really like is confidence.  Not arrogance, but confidence and a smile. Jesus, man, you want an honest opinion but either have a hoodie or shades on? Serious?You have a very handsome face that still looks quite childish underneath that extra bit of chub.  Whip yourself into shape and you will be a badass.  Your face will look more mature, more appealing, and the confidence will do wonders.Don't think you need braces at all.  You don't need perfect teeth to have a beautiful smile. Just keep doing what you are doing, get into great shape, and you will then see your lovely hair, skin and face and finally feel beautiful.You are not at all ugly, I think you just need a few more years to grow into your features.  You have very special eyes.  As for the hair: go to a stylist.  Not Supercuts, but a real salon who will study your facial shape, have you look through some magazines, and help pick out a style that will complement your features.

Also, if you want to lose the sort of child-like look, you gotta get into shape.  I don't mean IronMan Ripped, but get rid of the babyfat, get nice and lean, and that exercise alone will kick in the endorphins and make you feel really good about yourself.

Do that, give it 1 year, and you will be fighting women off with sticks.Your entire facial shape will change  once you lose weight and get into shape.  Trust me, I've been there.  I lost 30lbs and everything changed. I had a beautiful face shape I never knew existed as it was hidden under a layer of chub.

It will also inspire you to take a bit of extra time to style your hair nicely and wear flattering clothes.  I wear only eyeliner, nothing else, and will not spend more than 5 minutes on my hair, and buy most of my clothes at Forever 21 or Ross, but I manage to look very good for my job as a lawyer (and of course I could not buy business suits at Forever 21).

The best thing you can do is lose the weight. You have lovely features that will finally be visible.  Keep up the good work and don't rely on any excuses, cheat days, etc. and you can look completely different in six months. Imagine that - six months.No no no no no no no! 

You do NOT NEED a gym membership! In the mean time, work out at home. Millions of Youtube videos for FREE. Buy a yoga mat and do pilates/yoga.  Go for a run or brisk walk.

There is NO reason why you cannot be exercising without a gym membership. NONE!  Diet is the most important, but strength and exercise will speed up the entire process and help shape your body by creating muscle.  Muscle also burns fat, which means you will burn fat while you sleep.

Edit: And for god's sake, lose the HydroxyCrap whatever.  That is nothing but snake oil bullshit and a waste of money. Learn to change your lifestyle and eat whole, healthy foods, not bullshit pretend "health foods".Oops. This is embarrassing.  Clicked on the wrong link. This was meant for a pic of a woman bending over to retrieve something and five men staring at her ass.NOTHING wrong with your face. Its your weight that is making it appear distorted.  When you are that overweight, your facial structure completely disappears under the fat.

I lost 30lbs many years ago and it completely changed my face - well, it allowed my True bone structure to come out.

Until you get in shape and lose the weight, and get strong, fit and healthy, you will never like your face. You will be very surprised at what a healthy weight can do for your features.

Plus, you're only 16.  You will grow into your features. If you saw a pic of me at 16 compared to me at 23, you'd laugh your ass off at how awkward I looked in my younger years.I see a nice looking Paul Bettany in your future.  Just unclench that jaw a bit.Wow, night and day! I'd have crossed the street if I saw you on a dark night (not because you are "ugly" but because you look freakin angry and scary)

Now you look nice, handsome and approachable. This is such a miserable, awful, torturous way to die.  I went into opiate withdrawal due to a doctor fucking up royally, and you 100% are in terror of imminent death, and the suffering is so terrible I cannot adequately put it into words.  

All this guy needed was a hospital, an IV for fluids, some meds to sedate and calm him, and he would've live.  Instead he likely vomited violently, shit himself, lost all connection with reality, hallucinating demons and was in pain so horrible he wanted to plunge a knife in his heart.I went into precipitated methadone withdrawal when my dumbfuck pain management doctor injected me with an antagonist for breakthrough pain. 

Had I injected myself at home, I easily could've died from self harm or dehydration.  It is pure hell.  I lost all connection with reality, wanted to slash open my arm to show him my "blood was on fire", I could not stop banging my head against the wall, and you violently puke your guts out and want to rip off your clothes because you heat up so badly.This is my greatest fear.  I've been on prescription methadone for the past 12 years for severe spine pain. I carry my meds with me along with the script in case a cop searches me.  But they'd take away my meds if I got tossed in jail, and within 12 hours I'd start going into withdrawal hell. They would not give a shit, wouldn't call my doc, and would likely just let me die.  

I've been through methadone withdrawal due to a doctor's error, and I would not go through it again for $1 million.  That is how bad it was.Take him to an ER.  Sedate him.  IV with fluids.  Meds to counteract the withdrawal.  You have no idea what happens to the brain when you WD.  You lose all connection with reality and all control over bodily functions.  You sweat until you are soaked and shiver with chills that feel like your bones are snapping in two.  That doesn't even cover the physical pain.  That is pain like being set on fire both outside your body and inside your veins. Yes, that could be me.  I could get my prescription methadone taken away, my prescription that I carry with me taken away, my doctors not called, and I could easily die of dehydration or self harm. Happened to me once (not in jail, but in a doctor's office for 10 hours when he fucked up, sent me into withdrawal, got scared and refused to call the ambulance I begged for until I lost consciousness and all connection with reality.You sick, disgusting degenerate. Are you 14  years old?

I hope you realize you are getting the front page not because you are cool but because people are so stunned with how revoltingly nasty you are.OP thinks he's so damn bitchin' and all dudes can relate, because all men jerk it on their own fucking carpet and don't clean it up, right?

Look OP, you fucking degenerate neckbeard, its "TIFU", not, "For the past few years I've been a disgusting lazy fucking pig and jizzing on my own carpet because I am too fucking lazy to get a towel or clean it, HAR HAR HAR."

Fucking neckbeard.OP brought out the best in me by seeking karma points by making up some disgusting bullshit story pretending to beat the meat every night AND HE'S FUCKING FILTHY ok I shall calm down again.Shit, I'm a clean, fit, non-fat fuck slob of a woman and I know men like to jerk it, its all good and normal, but why is jerking it and being a degenerate slob something to BRAG ABOUT?Excuse me, you sound like you are similar to OP and see no problem with jizzing daily on your carpet for 2 goddamn years then advertising said behavior to the public because you think its...cool.I don't even want to picture that, but its too late. OP is a disgusting enough person to attempt just that thing then later write a "TIFU when I accidentally met my bitches on the corner with my own jizz in my neckbeard HAR HAR."It would be a terrible waste for you to need to go the ER because of OP's post and its responding comments.  Breathe nice and slow now...He prescribed me methadone every month for the past year.  I've been on the same dose (about 100mgs a day) for 12 years.  

I was having a horrible three week flareup and asked if he could give me anything so I could avoid a trip to the ER. He picks...NUBAIN! 

Which shut off my opiate receptors.  I dropped to the floor within 5 minutes of the injection.  Had I injected myself at home, I would've likely commit suicide or run into traffic (I do not say that to be dramatic, it was truly that horrific).  I was just too scared to inject myself.

Motherfucker hid me in his office until midnight, when I was able to stagger to my car and sleep in the back seat.  Refused to call and ambulance and until he realized he had given me an antagonist, kept accusing me of taking some other drugs and lying to him while I was fainting, screaming, having seizures, etc.I can only hope OP is 14. Then I would sort of understand.And there is no way to describe those shakes.  "Shakes" doesn't do it justice.   Its like  you have gigantic scorpions under your skin clawing at you, running up and down your body, yet connected to your spine.  I think those are actual demons.I am a good citizen, but I just get scared.  Right now I live in Mexico.  I bring my original script with me wherever I go.  But like in the US, you can get tossed in jail for even a less bullshit traffic infraction, they will steal your meds, not call your doctor, and you are fucked.

I had no idea methadone withdrawal was the worst as I've never experienced any other type of withdrawal.  I am dead serious when I say you could not pay me 500K to go through that again.  That was 8 hours of pure hell, and you are completely convinced you will die, which triggers all sort of primal fears and responses to survive.

Its so scary because people who have never been through it have no idea how terrifying and torturous it is.  And how can they? Its not anger, its just disgust.  And I think what's more disgusting is OP things the whole thing is funny.  Try and imagine me saying it calm, but serious, and with a sort of WTF smile on my face.  No anger. Just...yeuurggggg-feeling disgust.

And, disgust that OP sees this as a good way to get karma points.What about a box of tissues? Roll of toilet paper? Parents aren't dumb. They see, and smell, that growing crusty blob on the carpet that is a dick-level to the bed when OP is laying down.  And add a layer of mold growing on it?I just looked at your pic again.  You are really a nice looking man.  I am a 41 year old woman, for what its worth (and I've taken/take good care of myself).

I felt like a troll at your age.  What helped me was time, learning to love myself, and the biggest thing - be yourself.  I won't pretend to know you or your life situation, but I can just say, stay away from people that force you to pretend to be someone you're not.  Its better sometimes to be alone and lonely than to hang with people with whom you share no connection.

Also, exercise, and get involved in activities that you think you will like, especially if they are new you to.  It builds confidence, it distracts you from insecurities, it will help you meet people that share common interests, and exercise releases endorphins that we really need if we lead sedentary lives.

The hardest step is signing up for that first lesson for rock climbing, singing, guitar, swimming, lion taming, whatever the hell it is you decide to try.

The worst thing you can do for lack of confidence is to do nothing and hide.  I so wish I had done more when I was healthy (at 28 I woke up with a spinal tumor and that changed a lot of shit). 

I don't want to sound like a nag, but don't take your health for granted.  I sure did.  Go try all sort of new stuff.  Its ok to do that stuff alone until you meet people you can share it with.  Just do the stuff.  If you find you don't like some new thing after giving it a fair chance, then move on to something else.  The more stuff you do, the more confident you will become, and you will then realize you are a really handsome guy.SHIT YES!  And the yawning (although that doesn't hurt).  The RLS but at 90,000 rpms.  Your entire body wracked with spasms.  You squeeze your hands around your calf, for example, and try to "push" the spasm down and out of your body.  And it goes on for hours. You cannot sit still for longer than 4 seconds at a time.

Mine was so bad I was slamming my head and hangs against a tile floor without realizing (or caring, or feeling any pain from it) because it distracted my brain from the spasms.Methadone has a relatively long half-life, but if you are saturated with it, you can feel the beginning of withdrawal within 12 hours.  And in addition to the horrors you describe, there is this grim, horrible emotional feeling like your entire soul is being violated.  Like the world is coming to an end and you are being violated in every possible way.  Its hard to describe. You just feel the need to run, hide in a dark corner, and scream.  I think it because your opiate receptors are all shut off (in my case the doc injecting me with an antagonist blocked my receptors) so your body has none of your natural endorphins that make you feel decent and normal.

I have had those arguments before with some fuckers who argued that 'dieting and sugar withdrawal are just as bad as opiate withdrawal'.  

Yeah.  Because people going on a healthy diet vomit, hallucinate, scream uncontrollably, lose consciousness, rip off their clothes because they are both overheating then begging for a blanket because they are freezing, try to self harm, etc. when they cut out sugar.

Rough stuff to eat healthy. Its now a common thing for some people to referring to those headaches and mild irritability you get from cutting simple carbs as "withdrawal" or getting "triggered" because you have to eat, so eating essentially means "using". That's fair enough, tone often doesn't come through.  I was (still am) just so utterly revolted that OP is proud of his behavior and is happy to make it publicly available to the world.  Imagine his poor parents who know their kid is so gross he can't be bothered to clean up his own freakin' moldy jizz pile.

OP, if you are reading this, you are disgusting.  Do you waffle stomp too?Its only "strange" because its unusual. I assume you mean beachwear. Who cares what she wears under her clothes? If she likes it and is comfortable, why should it matter?  

For most women, it would be pretty tight (swim wear is made tight for a reason - so it doesn't fall off when we are in the water) but hey, if she likes it, who cares?I am sure she can decide for herself what's good for her vaginal health.  There is no hard and fast rule that bikinis are bad for vaginal health or will cause a yeast infection.  Those come from dampness, antibiotics, certain foods and other reasons. The amount of responses here that say its "strange" "weird" "bad for vaginal health" are completely fucked.

Who cares what this woman wears under her clothing?  She can decide if wearing bikinis is good for her vaginal health.  This sub is supposed to be open-minded but damn, when some woman does something to her own body that differs from the norm, or from what other women are accustomed to, people here lose their shit.

25 years ago thongs were seen as slutty or weird.  This woman OP is discussing is simply wearing a version of underwear that is tighter and thicker.  That's it. Under her clothes.  Where nobody can see.  She isn't complaining she MUST wear beachwear despite suffering from yeast infections.

What a judgmental crowd.  What a disappointment.You don't get it because its from a completely different culture that has part of it that has not progressed for hundreds of years.

Its not wasted to the parents.  They think the man will die off soon and leave the daughter a fortune and then she will have money, status and be free.

Of course to you and me is abhorrent and terrible and all that.  But we are looking at it from our western view.  Don't misunderstand.  I am not approving or justifying 9 year old girls getting raped and married off to disgusting old men.

But you forget its not our culture.You can't understand it because you are looking through it from the viewpoint of an advanced and western culture. You also don't understand the financial and other cultural benefits that the accrue to the family of the girl - if you studied that, it would make sense.  Still not fair and a repugnant practice to you and me, but from a non-emotional viewpoint, you could see why the family believes its worth it.

Also, they sell the girls and often their is an agreement that the girl does not move in with the man and no sex is had until she menstruates.that is the one thing the nurse kept telling me.  As long as I don't die of dehydration or from hurting myself, the withdrawal alone won't kill me. Although, you sure wish you were dead.Never do them.  For the first six months after my spinal tumor exploded, I played "tough girl" and refused all painkillers.  Which meant I spent 6 months crying my eyes out, puking and bent in half, planning my suicide.  How dumb was that? There are no trophies for being stupid and playing "strong" when you have severe, chronic pain.

If used correctly under guidance of a physician, it keeps people from committing suicide from pain and can drastically improve your qualify of life.  

If used for fun, you will fuck up your life one way or another.  Don't use opiates unless you absolutely must, and if you need them, always go through a doc you can count on.Unfortunately, while my doc was American, this occurred in Mexico. I spoke to a lawyer. There is no real medical board or oversight board.  And no such thing and pain and suffering in a civil suit (which would take years through a corrupt court anyway). My only real option was to file criminal charges, which would've likely worked, since he violated the law by refusing the ambulance and essentially hiding me, but as much as I want to kick him in the balls and smash his face in, I don't want to see him spent 2 years in a Mexican prison.Yep. Only do them if you are in severe pain.  And if so, take full advantage of them (responsibly, with a doctor, and without feeling guilty or "weak") to improve your quality of life and prevent committing suicide.  If you have an addictive type of personality, you need to be extra careful.  Even if you don't, you will still build a tolerance over time, which means you can't just stop all of a sudden.

And that is what makes it very scary.  If my doc gets sick or fucks up or decides to cancel my refill appointment and I run out (which can easily happen, as you can only get a refill script the day you run out), or if the pharmacy runs out of stock, you are fucked.  You then go to the ER because withdrawal has started, you bring all your medical records showing you are not a junkie and you use the opiates for pain management and your doc messed up, or pharmacy is out of stock, and beg for a morphine injection, just anyting to stop the withdrawal, and the fucking bastards roll their eyes, don't look at your records, see you sweating bullets because you are already in withdrawal, and say "you should've thought about that before you started taking drugs."

And that is the shit that makes you want to go home, pick up your shotgun, and blow everyone away who treats you like a junkie when you are just some poor sap who had the misfortune to get in a bad car crash, or get cancer or a tumor that exploded in your spine.  Every single day you are suffering and can barely move and are trying to just keep staying alive, and some asshole dismisses you like you are playing games.  That is the ultimate betrayal.

Edit: Thank you for the gold.  I hope whomever read this learns a few things:  first, legitimate pain patients who take prescription opiates are neither weak nor junkies, but people suffering from agonizing pain that you cannot see or perceive no matter how 'healthy' they look to you, so please do not for a  second assume they are faking their pain as we try very hard to look happy and normal in public; second, for those addicts or abusers that abuse prescription opiates, I know you have a problem, but fuck you.  Its abusers like you who raise the costs of my doc appointments, refills, make me drive to five separate pharmacies because they are all so scared of the DEA to fill legitimate scripts, make me take monthly blood tests to ensure the opiate is in my system and I'm not selling it (and I pay for those tests) and who make the laws so stringent that each monthly refill appointment turns into a 2-day nightmare of me running around town searching for a pharmacy that doesn't have some new draconian rules put into place because a non-pain patient has fucked it all up for me and the rest of us.What? Huh? Was she elderly? Disabled? Mentally disabled? I read this 27 years ago and it still haunts me.  I will never forget when he makes his decision regarding his dad and the forced march.  His last line in that chapter is burned in my mind forever, yet I only read it once.  That is how powerful a writer he is.I suppose to u/blinky64 the "Holucaust" is just too often talked about and we should be over it.I read it as an adult and was so enchanted.  It was such a different reading it compared to when I read it as a kid.Oh, now why'd you have to go and do that? I was just recovering.  Plus, I'm a woman so I can't really do what you are suggesting.Its there for life. He's likely wiping it with the same damp rag over and over again, gets bored and takes whack-off breaks into another corner of the carpet.Thanks for your kind words  -  it helps! Its all out of my system, but it was a very traumatizing event that I will never forget and now if there is the slightest delay in getting a refill, I go into a panic.  At least I lived, not like that poor guy in OP's post.  What a terrible way to go.He first checked out WebMd then drugs.com.  Not an actual pharmacology source (as in an on-line version of a Physician's Desk Reference.) He comes up with nubain. I'd never heard of it, and I didn't know a thing about agonists v antagonists.  He tells me, "we can try this, but nubain is an antagonist."  I say, "so what does that mean?" He says, "all it means is that at worst, the methadone already in your system may not work as well." I say, well, in that case its worth a try, I'll just take more methadone if that happens, right?"

He says right. He then asks when I last took methadone, I honestly tell him four hours ago. 

Then he injected me with 10mgs of nubain. That bastard left me screaming, sobbing, hallucinating, and losing consciousness on the floor while he literally shut the door and hid in his office, presumably doing research.  The first hour, he came out screaming that I lied and must've taken some other drugs.  Then he said I lied and never told him I didn't wait 12 hours in between methadone pills - which also proves he is an idiot.  Methadone half life is much longer than 12 hours, he prescribes me up to 4 pills a day (can he fucking count?) and he just obviously had no idea what he was doing.

He knew nubain was an opiate, he just slept through pharmacology 101 in med school and had no idea what would happen by mixing an agonist and antagonist.  OH fuck me.  I bet his mom could break his sheets in half if she was brave enoug to step in his room. Which probably stinks of sweat, mold and cum so badly that no female will ever set foot in there.that is because he was hallucinating and lost all connection with reality.  i've been in withdrawal from methadone (due to doctor error).  he later told me in between bashing my head and hands repeatedly on the floor, i kept telling him i was going to "kill you motherfucker, for doing this to me, you evil evil motherfucker".

you can't "refuse" treatment if you are in such medical distress that you've lost all ability to be coherent.Jesus, are you kidding? What could they have done? You take the patient who is obviously in distress to an ER.  You administer fluids from an IV. You give sedatives to calm him down. You give him whatever drug or opiate is needed so he can slowly taper off. Its not rocket science.  EMTs, nurses and first responders know this.There are plenty of LEGAL drugs you give to someone suffering withdrawal and who is in severe medical distress.  This is not some secret medical fact but well known among even EMTs, nurses and non MDs. Even a mild sedative and IV with fluids may have saved him.Its not a "dick" statement. Its a hopelessly stupid and ignorant statement.  I'm on prescription methadone and i do not abuse it. But if I go into precipitated withdrawal and get no help, I could easily die the same way.  Dehydration, self-harm, etc.  You do not need to die from withdrawal if you are tapered off slowly and carefully, under supervision of a doc.Yes. That is a moral choice we have made as a society. And its not like they get top  quality care.  They get bottom of the barrel care as it is.  So if a smoker gets lung cancer while locked up, do you let him rot and die, or do you treat him?  Or what about me? I take prescription methadone for legitimate chronic, severe pain. I don't abuse my meds.  If I suddenly got tossed in jail and my meds were taken away, you'd be cool with me dying of withdrawal?  Its not like I keep my medical records on my person.  The police don't give a fuck. You think they'd call my doctor to confirm I'm not a junkie but a legit pain patient?Hey, remember when Ramona inadvertently called Beezus "Pizza Face?"I am 41. I still feel guilty when in 5th grade we had a worker in the cafeteria we really connected with. So...one day one kid called her "pizza face" for obvious reasons. We all were shocked, quiet, stunned.  Then she laughed it off. Yay! That meant she liked it! So every single day, when she took our dollar bill, every single one of us said quite loudly, "Hi, Pizza Face!" with a huge smile!  

Until the day she wasn't smiling and said, "Don't call me that anymore."  

I still cringe.  Pretty much. I used to race motorcycles. This was before my spine got fucked and I needed pain killers.  When people would asked why I was so "stupid to do such a dangerous thing" I said, "I suppose its like a drug.  You feel so incredible when you are on the track.  But off the track you feel like shit. It costs a fortune to prep your bike and pay entry fees, and you go into a mild depression in between race weekends because life seems so boring with that adrenaline rush, and the rate of return is horrible - you can feel the most exhilarating feeling of your life, the happiest you've known, but in the back of your mind you know you are blowing thousands of dollars, and eventually you wll crash, your bike will be totaled and you've fucked up your body and everything hurts very badly."Depends. She's no longer a virgin. No longer a prize.I grew up in the 80s.  I kinda miss Picky-Picky.  Life was so much more simple then.Not me, but my husband. He was the only non-family employee of a thankless job involving international import and sales. He also handled their entire computer system. If it involved a computer, he did it. He also created and ran their web page. He got paid shit, and would often have to step over the owner's sleeping body to access the fax machine.  Or, wake up the owner's daughter who "worked" there but usually just napped under a table.

When he gave his 2 weeks' notice, the owner's wife gave him a tape recorder and asked him to record "how to run the business, all the computer stuff, and everything else he did."

He just burst out laughing.  After he left, he was told there was no more "wireless" anything, and the owner had a million cords running up and down the stairs.  Business went under in six months, but not before 4 separate customers sued the owner.What guy wouldn't love Easy A? You get to see the hot Emma Stone pretend to be a hooker. And sing in that sexy outfit.I would say that is my husband's favorite chick flick as well. It left a mark on my heart that will never go away.I count about four miracles.May I suggest leg warmers? Not the cheesy 80s version, but some you can buy online or at a dance store.  Especially the ones that have a hole for your heel so you can pull them over your feet (with your toes exposed) with or without socks.  So much body heat can be retained by a comfy pair of leg warmers, and if her legs swell, the legs warmers will be loose enough not to constrict or be uncomfortable.  

Also, I used to wear those finger-less gloves indoors, so I was free to type and handle stuff.  I had a pair that went nearl up to my elbows and that shit kept me nice and warm.I'll take the blue one on the left, thank you.I did not think it was possible to hate these motherfuckers more than I already do.

I am still fighting a $45 overcharge for when I canceled my service FOUR FUCKING YEARS LATER, despite having a letter from Comcast admitting they fucked up and it should be a credit.  Fucking collections still contact me.I assure you (and I looked at your pic again) your head is not disproportionate to your body.  I think you've become so focused and convinced that is is, that you can no longer think otherwise.  If some friend or dipshit at school has been teasing you about it, its not because its True, but because that person knows how to get a rise out of you.

Also, once you get in shape, your facial structure will change.  Obviously your bones won't change, but the leanness will allow your True structure to be seen.  As a 5'3 woman, when I lost 30lbs (most of it held in my ass) my face changed drastically.  Even just a 10lb weight loss can really change your look.  A small layer of extra chub around your face will disappear, and you will look more chiseled, more mature, and more masculine, especially since you are now at that transition from teenager into young man/adult. 

Once your body is fit and you look clearly fit from the outside (meaning if you don't wear baggy clothes your fitness will be noticeable) your body will appear larger.  You don't need crazy muscles for that.  Just a nice, strong leanness with nicely sculpted muscles can do wonders for making your body look more proportionate.

I assure you, in the next few years you will grow into your confidence and features.  I also recommend you visit a salon and get a good stylist that can give you a haircut that will complement your face.  I had some really bad haircuts (ie - no style at all) until I put in some effort. The right cut can make you look foolish (think George Clooney with a Caesar haircut) or very handsome and put together.  

Better fitting clothes.   I don't mean fancy clothes or tight tshirts, just clothes that match your body lines. If you wear a t-shirt that is too big, it will make your body look droopy. For example, look at the seam of your tshirt for the sleeve.  If that seam is lower than your shoulder and on your upper arm, that shirt is too big.  You will have to put in some time to find the right cut for you.  Certain brands of clothing will have cuts that will never work for you,while others will have the right cut.

Give us an update in 6 months! I promise your head is not large, and if someone is giving you shit about it, its only because they know its an easy and vulnerable way to hurt you. Which is a shitty thing to do.I think SI joint pain is one of the worst agonies out there.  Think of where all your weight goes when you sit and stand - your spine and pelvis.   I had it bad for about  3 months until a series of injections got it under control.  I felt like my pelvis had been crushed by a compactor.  It is fucking AGONY.Do you live in the Highlands? Aren't there some old pagan rituals that involve bones and teeth and little piles of stones and certain plants or twigs?I truly hope you are not just messing with me, giggling with your friends and laughing behind your computer screen...You are not ugly at all.  But you look like a "yo, dude, bro, let's smoke a bowl" and depending on your target audience, some women are not into that. They want a man. Not a boy.

Clean up, shave, trim your beard, get a haircut, get some nicer clothes, look well put-together.  No pix on Tinder in a tank and ski hat. I'm a woman, and if  I put a pic of me right when I step out of bed, you can bet nobody would match me. They'd run in the opposite direction.

Also, whip yourself into shape if you want more responses.  Its just natural for humans to be attracted to someone who is fit and strong and healthy.If you truly want that scruffy look, then don't change it just to get matches on Tinder.  Most of that stuff goes nowhere anyway.  If you like your look, be True to yourself and keep your look, and meet women in different ways.

Tinder is tough - like another poster said, women will spend a nanosecond on a single pic and we are usually bombarded with messages from guys every single day and we get bored, tired with the process, and tend to reply to the pic that jumps out.  That requires that pic to be pretty damn spectacular.That 10lb difference made a huge change - now your lovely facial structure is apparent.  You look wonderful.that is horrible...so either have a face that sags on one side or be in agony for life?This is fucking funny.  You picked the perfect face for the guy. I hope to use the cactus line myself one day.I assure you, you are completely proportional.  Is someone you know giving you a hard time? I am not saying any of this to be nice.  I am saying you are proportional and the size of your head is normal because, based on the pix you've posted, it looks normal.  

I suppose the only way I could give a better answer would be if I had a full-body pic without the baggy clothes.  As in shorts and a normal fitting tshirt. But even then, I already know I wouldn't notice anything out of proportion.

Devote six months to the gym, and do it right, with a trainer or educate yourself with a good book or off the web so you don't waste your time and effort.  Change up your diet. No cheating. I read your other post that you "like lost 20lbs in two weeks by drinking protein shakes" and you "don't need the My Fitness Pal app."

Ok, that 20lb loss is bullshit and you know it. Only people who are 500lbs and stop eating can lose 20lbs in one week, and you are not 500lbs.  Use the app or figure out a away to eat right.  But don't try and bullshit yourself because the only person that will pay the price is you.That just made me happy. Seeing the smile on her face when baby kitten snuggles is wonderful.Not sure how old you are, but one day, soon, you can move out, far away, and if you want you never have to speak to her again. But start planning now. You will need money, and you will want an education (unless you have a skilled trade which will support you). Study hard, do as well as you can, because if you are 18 and realize you can't support yourself because the cost of living is so high and you are only qualified to work as a grocery bagger, and thus still stuck at home, but as an adult, life will be fucking miserable.

I moved out at 17.  Earliest I could, and while it wasn't easy and I had to live in dumps, or with shitty roommates, or work two jobs, it was completely worth it.I remember clearly driving back after my 2nd ever visit with a therapist.  I was thinking how I was going to cancel my next appointment.  I had already told her everything there was to tell.  What more could we possibly have to talk about? We covered it all.  How else could it help? I already said everything there was to say.

Boy, was I so dead wrong! I needed another 18 months of getting shit out that I didn't even realize was there, because I was so accustomed to it being a part of my life.  After 18 months, hours of talking, and many more hours of thinking and soul searching on my own, I made life changes for the better.  I realized I was allowing toxic family to stay in my life, I had to take responsibility for allowing certain shit to happen and to take action to better myself.

Now I laugh when I look back and think that after a mere 2 visits, I was so convinced there was just nothing more to talk about.  And I'm a woman.  And women are usually not shy about talking about things that bother us.What happened? Did you blow your money on frivolous shit and now you can't afford basic life necessities? But....you "have no idea how to get out of it?" Yes, you know how to get out of it, as you just admitted you keep doing something you know you should not be doing (unless your problem is something else)

Please, do not ask people for money if the only reason you need money is your failure to act like a responsible adult.  You created this, don't burden other people who budget and make their own sacrifices to avoid asking their own friends for money.

If you are old enough to have a job, drive, have a car, etc., then you are too old for this shit.  Your attitude appears to be that you "can't get out of it" but you and I know that that is bullshit.  You can change, you just dont' care enough to change, and so far you haven't starved or gotten evicted or anything like that because your friends keep bailing you out.

Youth is no excuse.  If you can't figure the obvious out on your own (ie: you do not spend more than you make, and you do not spend money on shit you don't need when you have bills to pay) then take a freakin' class.  Stop asking your friends for money.  That is shameful.

Unless...I am completely wrong about why you have no money despite having a job?Eat Ramen.  Take the bus.  Stop blaming that you are "still young" (that is a heap of shit and you know it).  Get your shit together and stop finding excuses.This person is hopeless. Its "weird" to go to food banks? OP sounds terribly self-entitled and shameless.  If OP has no problem with falling back on excuses of youth or "I am still learning" then OP knows damn well what needs to be done if OP is posting here that there is a repeating problem.  

OP: being fiscally responsible is expected. Its what you do as a responsible person.  You don't get points for doing the required.  That is like a boyfriend saying he is a good boyfriend because he doesn't hit his girlfriend. I am so sorry.  If you wish, visit us at chronicpain.  I went 5 years without a diagnosis and it was pure hell.  I was on the couch, drugged up, had to quit work, lost so much, for so long.  When you do not have a diagnosis, you do not know what the problem is, and you cannot treat it.  You also therefore have no 'end date' in sight.  You have no idea if this will get worse, stay the same or improve. 

And in the meantime, you are suffering tremendously.

You need to keep fighting. I know you are so tired, do not have the energy to fight, to see 20 different doctor and have them judge you the minute you walk in the door or dismiss your suffering.  

But you are your only advocate.  It helps if you have a friend or family member that can come with you do Dr appts.  I had my husband come so the docs would stop with the bullshit that I was "exaggerating" my back pain.  Turned out I had a fucking spinal tumor that exploded in my back and I would've been paralyzed or died had I not fought for a diagnosis.

I know you miss your life.   The way you describe things it sounds like something is very, very wrong.  Have you seen different specialists? GPs will be useless at this point.

You have to keep fighting if you want to live.  Believe me, I have been there, and it is fucking horrible.  It is a nightmare that never, ever ends until you find out what is wrong and if there is a way to fix it.Actually, it can go off your record.  Depending on your jurisdiction, if you keep your nose clean and stay out of trouble for a certain amount of time, you can petition the court to wipe your record clean.

It is nowhere as bad as you believe it is. And I thought my parents were selfish for forgetting my birthdays when I was younger.  To fucking send you holiday or birthday cards and ask for money??? No wonder you need a drink.  I hope you don't give her a dime ever again under these circumstances.Or, people tell you how 'brave' and 'inspiring' you are.  Doesn't that make you feel great? And awesome, and brave and badass?

People say such stupid shit in some twisted effort to be kind when you never asked for them to say shit in the first place.  And yeah, why do people who get a catastrophic injury suddenly get hit with expectations to 'live life to the fullest' and try as hard as you can in every way possible and all that shit?

Why can't you continue to be you? The person you are? Changed, of course, with such an injury, but still you?

Most people have no clue what paralysis, much less quadriplegia, is like.  Its not simply an inability to walk.  Its a myriad of health problems and it costs a fucking fortune.  All the medical care, health aids, adaptive equipment, and time spent doing things that non-injured people can do in ten minutes without thinking twice.

I am sure you've already discovered these two forums (Apparalyzed and Care Cure Forum) but I am putting this out there just in case you have not.  

I cannot pretend to understand what you are going through, but you have my empathy in that people say such stupid shit and have these ridiculous expectations, and offer up empty platitudes that are supposed to inspire you to run off and create something to win a Nobel Prize.I have permanent, agonizing horrible miserable spine pain and nerve issues but I do not have any neurological or mobility issues, so I will not even pretend to understand your frustration.

You know how many times my doctors told me "you should write a book' when I'm in for another pain management appointment, sobbing my fucking eyes out because I am in so much pain I want to commit suicide?

Write a book? Fucking for real? Why? Who the fuck is going to want to read about some 1st world girl who got an ouchie and has access to powerful opiates and a comfy mattress? There is no fucking happy ending, no new medical discovery to which I contributed.  Write a book so maybe one person will read it and think "that god I'm not fucked up and I have my health".  

And it always comes from a doctor who is completely healthy and has never, ever experienced any type of chronic pain or catastrophic illness or injury.There's no way to say this without sounding condescending.  I am certainly not trying to be mean.  I remember myself at 15.

There is so, so much you don't know.  So much about life, the world, your own soul that you don't know.  You think you have it all figured out and that you know what will or can happen, or the greatest expectancy at each numerically-convenient age group.

Your knowledge barely scratches the surface.  This is one thing you will learn as you get older:  the more you learn and experience, the more you realize how little you know.

You sound like a typical 15 year old and I know you do not feel typical. You are far too inexperienced to pontificate your conclusive facts on what people can get out of life without sounding like a typical teenager going through some growing pains.

This is all normal. Its just sad that you are already limiting yourself and convincing yourself that life is destined to be miserable, particularly as it appears that you live in a first world country where you can do so, so much and live such a fun life if you just put in the effort.

Life will be boring, and you will spend your 20s getting drunk and wasting money gambling, but only if you choose to do that, and in that case, your misery will be entirely self-created and imposed.You don't even need to wait until you are 18 to have fun.  Sure, some things are not legal, but so what?  Millions of other things, activities, etc are still accessible.  And, once you turn 18, the repercussions for fucking up are a LOT worse than fucking up as a minor (I speak from personal experience.)

Why wait to really live until you are 18? What's holding you back? You don't need a heap of money, or a car, or your own place to still get something special out of life right now.  

Once you turn 18, you will look back and wish you had a better attitude and took the initiative to try new things and just get out there.

You never, ever know what tomorrow will bring.  I thought I'd be healthy forever, so I put off some things because I was busy with work.  Well, one day I woke up with a really bad spine disease, and I was only about 25, and that really fucked things up.  I'm not saying live every day like its your last (because that is bullshit) but to just...live.  Have fun. Do stuff.Yes.  I hated myself so much I refused to look at mirrors or at my reflection in store windows when walking down the street.  I felt I was a revolting troll that made people just sick to look at me when I passed by them. I felt socially unacceptable with nothing to contribute.  I felt everyone secretly disliked me and people just tolerated me to be nice.

The sadness ate at my soul until it reached my heart and started gnawing there as well.

That is depression.  You need help.  Don't try and go at this alone when there is so much help out there and medications that can assist in you feeling good.  

You deserve to love yourself, feel happy and confident and enjoy life.In your after pic, I see a fit, handsome young man. I see no evidence that you lost 100lbs. Now, I realize that skin will stretch and you may have stretch marks.

It seems like you made the physical change (which is impressive and really something to be proud of, as it took a lot of discipline and strength) but your mind is still stuck in the 300lbs region.  And, its a huge blow because when you were 300lbs, you probably felt that all your problems would be solved if you were just a healthy weight.

Then you worked hard, lost all that weight, but you don't really feel that much better. 

it sound cliche, but please get some outside help.  I lost 30lbs, got the body I wanted, but became even more depressed.  I had reached all the goals I had set out for (lost weight, got a great job in my career post-grad school, got marred to an incredible man) and I was fucking miserable as ever.

I got help, took about 18 months of weekly therapy and a lot of soul searching and realization, and hard work in facing painful memories, but I got past it. And now I have no regrets. I didn't have the great kid experience like some kids have, but so what? Its made me very strong, resilient, compassionate to others and part of who I am today.  And, most kids on the planet have fucked up childhoods in one way or another. We are just brainwashed by Miller Lite commercials and the media to believe that life is perfect for everyone but us.

Please get help.  You've worked so hard to get healthy, but are so depressed you are unable to appreciate or enjoy the fruits of your labor.Its very rational - for years you were overweight and stood out, and ou knew people were thinking things, if not outright saying it to your face.  They made you feel sub-human (at least that was how I felt when people said shit about my weight).

Now the weight is gone, but your mindset is the same.  You are not able to put your brain on a "diet".  The mental aspect of this drastic change/improvement to your body is not insignificant.  Its understandable your brain, self confidence and sense of who you are has not yet caught up to your physical self.  Its much deeper than that.Can I ask how old you are?  Because finding that special someone doesn't always come early in life.  Sometimes it comes later - and there is nothing wrong with that.

If you are tired of dating, then take a break.  I met my husband the day I hated all men (irrational, I know) and was jaded from shitty date after shitty date.  I was in a foulass mood that day and I was actually quite rude to him as I was convinced he was just another lying asshole, but I was so wrong.  He is a wonderful, incredible man.

It is ok to be single.  It may be lonely and boring at times, but you have to first be ok and be able to be happy single if you ever want to have a healthy relationship with an SO.  I know its cliche, but its True.  Try and keep occupied, try new activities, read, whatever it takes to stave off boredom and loneliness. Try new and challenging things (and you will meet a lot of people that way as well).  Take up a sport.

Having a boyfriend will not magically make you feel better. Once the honeymoon period is over you may wish you were single again, as any relationship will come with its own baggage and drama.I also think that you are not as "ugly" as you believe you are.  When we are so focused on a part of our body or face we do not like, we become mildly obsessed.  It is always on our minds. Last thought before we fall asleep, first thought upon waking.  

Now, I won't try to convince you that you are a certain level of attractiveness because its all subjective and you feel the way you do.  I can say that you can still find people, friends and love who care about you for you.  It weeds out the people that approach attractive people for the sole reason that the person is attractive.   It instead leads to relationships that are much deeper.

I'm not saying that beautiful people only have shallow relationships, and unattractive people always get deep relationships.   Life is rough, and people can be fucking assholes.   Best you can do for yourself is to keep active, keep busy doing things that make you happy, never change for anyone, and be around people that make you feel good.  I was alone (socially and romantically) for a long time and fuck, it sucked.  It was grad school in Los Angeles where it seemed like a requirement to be beautiful to have the right to exist in the city.  As much as it sucked, I found that it was better being alone with my pets on a Friday night than to pretend to be someone I was not just for the purpose of having social interaction.Are you in pain? If so, I again suggest you check out chronicpain. You can vent, ask questions, etc.

Have you seen specialists?  Not general practitioners, but actual specialists? I had to see over 35 separate motherfuckers who dismissed me as having "mental problems" for about 4 years until someone finally took me seriously.  Had I not fought, I would've died.  

Its so hard to fight when you are sick.  When you are chronically sick, that is when you are least able to fight!  Then you realize the doctors generally do not care if your case is not obvious. If it requires them to go out of their way, talk to colleagues, do some research after you leave their office, they are too fucking lazy to do it. They try to figure it out during your 15 minute appointment, and if they see nothing, then they say "nothing is wrong."  

NO, asshole, something IS very wrong, the problem is you just don't know so instead of admitting you don't know (which is perfectly ok, just means we need to order tests and see more specialists) your goddamn ego insists you blame the patient for overreacting or some shit.

(As you can see, I am still quite a bit bitter at the way I was treated).

Are you in the US? Europe? Some other place?  The way to advocate is to research your symptoms, to learn how to stand up for yourself and insist the doc does more than simply say "I don't know". They should either refer you to someone who does know or order tests that can help.  You must learn how to politely, but firmly, refuse to let them intimidate you. When the doc starts heading for the door as some signal that your appointment is over, yet you have no new answers, that is when you stop them and say hey, no, we are not done here, where do we go from here?

It also means you stop seeing a doc once you feel he is not helping you, taking you seriously or is wasting your time.  

Do you have anyone that can help? I did hours of research online, which actually helped docs agree with my diagnosis.  You will have to do the same.  It shouldn't be that way, but it is.  And I don't mean to scare you, but it sounds like your health is only getting worse.  You have some very alarming symptoms that are not fixing themselves.  There are numerous diagnostic tests available beyond simple MRIs and blood tests.  

I wont pretend to be a doc, but I do know that unless you educate yourself on the various possibilities and tests that can be done, and FIGHT for these tests, nobody will help.  It sucks, I know.  Please feel free to vent to me anytime you want.Ok, you had kids you didn't want, but you had them.  So stop whining about that, be a good dad, and man up.  You chose to have them, maybe they were not planned, but you always know kids are a possibility when having sex.  This "I caved" excuse is a bunch of bullshit.  You are putting all the blame on her for having kids.  It takes two to have kids, and I sure as shit hope you aren't dumping your resentment for your lifestyle on your kids.

As for your wife, I can understand why you are so unhappy.  You're in a shit relationship with a person who appears to emotionally manipulate you. It sounds like this relationship broke a long time ago, and for some time you've been living with a 'roommate' that you do not particularly like.

Get a divorce if you want out.  Do not dump your kids.  They are innocent.  Stop complaining that you were somehow pressured into it.  They are there, doesn't matter anymore how they got there.  

But you do not have to stay married.  Nobody is holding a gun to your head and forcing you to stay with her.  Divorces are sad, heartbreaking ugly and unpleasant, but if you want your life to improve, you have to be strong and take that step.

It sounds like this marriage is doomed. If you have that affair, it will only make the divorce that much worse, all for a few hours of feeling good.  It will be thrown in your face forever. You most likely WILL be caught.

Just man up and get a divorce.  I'm sorry you got hurt.  It will get better.  But please stop with the bullshit. Nobody "forced you into falling for him" (those are your words).  Nobody "made you put down your guard" (also your words).

You had a relationship that didn't work. Maybe he was dishonest or an asshole about it, maybe not, but that isn't the point. The point is that nobody put a gun to your head and forced you to 'drop your guard' or 'fall for him'.  

You chose to put down your guard and allowed yourself to fall for him, which can be a wonderful and lovely thing when it works.  This didn't work.  It hurts, yes. But, this will likely happen again in life.  You will get over it, as you say, and find someone you really can connect with, and will move on.

But you have to take responsibility that nobody forced you to fall for him.  It was just the natural progression once you made the choice to give him a chance and date him.  You are making it sound like he victimized you in some way, and if you keep up that mindset, you will always consider yourself the victim and will forever be unhappy, as you won't be able to accept that sometimes, shit just doesn't work out between people and there is nobody to blame.It was my husband.  I was in the ER for yet another episode of a major flareup for agonizing spine pain.  We had smoked quit a bit of weed beforehand.  I had smoked hoping to lower the pain, he had smoked because weed.  

I wasn't high and was actually crying, sobbing that I was again suicidal and couldn't live with this chronic agony anymore.  My husband burst into laughter.  The doctor stared at him.  Husband says, "I'm sorry, really" then snorts in this futile effort to restrain himself and again explodes and literally is giggling so damn hard he turns red, tears running down his face and he crawls down to the floor laughing.  

I was actually pretty happy to see him smile for a change, as my illness was taking a huge toll on him.  I'll never forget how red his face was.Damn, that just made me laugh out loud.  Wherre is god now, asshole?People get mad at you for being depressed? Serious? Tell them to go lay in bed for two days.  Just two days, and they aren't permitted to move.   They get a diaper and a catheter and maybe someone will come feed them, turn them and scratch an itch every few hours.  See how they respond.  They will be lucky and won't have AD, or pain, or need to take fifty  pills a day.  They also know it will end in just two days.

Who the fuck gets mad at someone who  suffered a catastrophic injury for being depressed?Jesus.  That is really sad that they are so oblivious, so clueless tht they cannot see your suffering.  Maybe they think they are helping you. But it's just the opposite.  They are not permitting you to feel or mourn your trauma and losses.  I imagine that makes you feel very alone.  I read the paragraph about him swimming six laps.  And how to overcome (huh?) paralysis with a positive mindset, and faith, and nonstop exercise,  along with the bragging of how badass he is in the pool.  

I'm not even paralyzed but I want to karate chop his ass.  Does he not comprehend that every injury, and every person, is different?  

Whoops.  Just realize I'm responding to your previous post about your obnoxious mentor but I'm on a first gen iPad and too lazy to cut and paste.  Do you have a live in carer?  I like being alone as well, so long as I have my dog.  I would lose my shit if there was always someone around.  And that doesn't even scratch the surface of why that person is around - namely, to do all these very personal tasks for you that until quite recently you were able to do on your own.  May I ask how old you are? To have to move back I'm with the parents after being independent would be an emotional trauma to an able bodied person.  Look how depressed certain people are because they graduated college, couldnt find work and had to move back home.  Their old room, with old memories and emotions they'd rather have forgotten.

But to be adjusting to this new life in your childhood home.  That is one tough deal.  Male? I figure you had a pretty independent life, especially since you like being alone, before all this?Maybe one reason everyone expects you to be grateful that you aren't dead is because they haven't yet adjusted to this new life.  I'm not at all justifying their behavior because their behavior is wrong and hurtful and selfish on every single level.

I've seen it happen - the family or friend of the injured person are so traumatized themselves, and have no clue how to handle it, and get so heartbroken seeing their once-independent and active loved one live a normal life, that they just have no ability to process reality. So in order to convince themselves their reality is not that horrifying, they force you to try and become this superhero. Some happy individual who says the usual SCI lines: "I can do everything an able-bodied person does, just differently.  And my life means more now because I nearly lost it.  Maybe I can't do as much, but things mean more and had this injury not happened I'd never truly be this deep."

Well, maybe that works for some people, but not for everyone.

Its not your job to convince your family you are truly unhappy and miss your old life and hate this shit.  It doesn't mean you will always feel this way, but this transition is huge.  Unless you were born disabled I don't think anyone can ever lose that feeling of a great loss. 

Even someone like Ron Kovic, who got hurt doing what he believed was a worthy cause at the time, took decades to find some sort of meaning, but I certainly don't think that all his problems were solved and he became a happy, grateful person who just accepted his loss with a smile after Born on the Fourth of July came out.

What is your family like? Do you live out in the middle of nowhere? I'm not gonna suggest you go sign up for murderball or whatever wheechair rugby is called, I am just curious.

I think your white dog has a shrinking problem.
Stupid joke aside, that is one of the cutest doggie-bro pics I've seen. What about all the other kids that drowned on the way over but weren't fortunate enough to have their picture taken?Was always curious how a quad-level injury could even permit for murderball.  Are you using some sort of speech-activated system to type?  I'm sorry I fired so many questions at you when typing for you is likely a laborious process.I'd be damn proud if I looked that ripped."Hmm, this smells goo- OUCH FUCK SHIT MOOMMM!"I KNEW IT.  As soon as I read that your principal thought it hilarious, I pictured Paly or Gunn.  Are you sure your rat isn't daydreaming about French cooking? He looks just like Remy.  Same gestures, too.On the Care Cure forum (I am not a member for obvious reasons; I was led there when researching treatments for spinal cord pain/damage and then got really caught up in the personal stories and physical issues that come with SCI) there is a poster named James McMurter (I think.)

This guy is now a high quad.  Think he got injured at 22, less than 3 years ago and very few people seem to comprehend that he truly HATES HIS LIFE.  Prior to his injury he was a lot into MMA, wanted to go to the military, had no education (but he's no fool) and his entire being was centered upon physical activity.

Now he lives with his dad who is an abusive asshole. 

What stuns me is what some of the paras tell him on the open board when he vents about how hard it is being a quad.  Go to school, be grateful to not need a breathing tube, etc.  I am not saying he should just curl up, give up and die, but this man is suffering and his injury is pretty new, and damn, he cannot move anything but his head, and maybe a tiny bit of arm movement.

A handful of paras keep telling him its not that bad.  How can someone with some trunk  function, and with full arm and hand function, have the audacity to tell that to a quad? 

What about pain?  What a cruel, ironic thing - for a person to be paralyzed, but still be able to feel pain.

Any siblings?So you're pretty much on your own. No close family member that will really listen to you and understand you don't want to hear any more of the "be happy you're still alive" crap.  Your family members are not allowing you to mourn, adapt and simply be you.But...I thought momma rabbits were caring and stuff.  Gave their bunnies little outfits like in Beatrix Potter stories.  Hello, Thor.  

9 months? In the before pix you look about 16, in the after pix you look mid 20s or higher, mature, sexy, a beast.  Handsome, chiseled face you likely never knew was hiding underneath all that.  I'd like to climb on you like a kitten (I'm just shy of 5'3.)

Really incredible job.  You look stunning, fit as hell and incredibly gorgeous.It certainly makes sense.  I wonder what naughtiness the baby bunnies do when mom isn't around.  Steal cabbages from evil neighbor's vegetable patches while wearing button-down shirts with a waistcoat.This just breaks my heart for you.  I was in a similar situation. After 4 years on the couch, drugged up on opiates, meticulously planning suicide in some manner that would minimize the suffering on my then-husband, I decided to check myself into a psych ward where they could also hook me up to a morphine drip.

The pain was so bad, always there, and I didn't even have a diagnosis.  I knew it wasn't my fault, but the reality was still destroying my husband's life.

At the last moment I didn't check into the hospital.  I wanted to so, so badly, more than anything.  Just to get help, a morphine drip, to be able to sleep, escape, have other people take care of me, take the load off my husband. Most of all, I wanted to be hospitalized because I was in such FUCKING PAIN and I knew only in a hospital could I get stronger meds.  

But, I knew if I did check in, he would be all alone, worried about me all day and would not be able to function.  Not sure if that was the right choice, but back then, it felt like the best choice. So I just continued living in agony, fainting from the pain, etc.  I could not leave him.  

I also saw a psychologist who specialized in chronic pain patients.  She couldn't take my pain away, but she did help us with handling it (my husband went to a few appointments, asking what to do when he knew I was suicidal from the pain, she explained to him that often a chronic pain patient just needs to know there is an 'emergency exit' in case the pain just gets too unbearable.  Having that knowledge that there is an escape route can give the pain patient the strength to not give up.)

I truly hope your wife finds some relief.  Please also take care of yourself.  I encouraged my husband to go do things for himself, but he just couldn't.  He would worry so much, or feel guilt that he was out on his motorcycle while I was spending 90% of my time either on the couch, or the other 10% on the bed, sobbing my eyes out, that he felt he needed to come home.  I wish he took better care of himself.  Watching him fade away and become even more depressed ripped my soul to pieces.  We are no longer together, but he will always be family to me.

If you wish, please update us and let her know how she is.  And please tell her I care about her, and I hope she gets some help and relief.Will you be able to ever regain your ability to walk?First time I touched my knee on the track, I was fucking elated.  I was finally a member of the BADASS club.  I had my KNEE ON THE GROUND.  I knew I scraped it so damn hard railing around Turn 2.  Figured the puck would need to be replaced after the race weekend if I kept this kneedragging business up.

Then, I pulled into the paddock, looked at my puck, and saw this barely visible smudge.  It was so anti-climactic.  You look great! Your lovely figure is coming through and you look strong and healthy. Nice work.Listen to me:  you MUST take care of yourself. You cannot let yourself go.  She must find a way to let you have time to yourself, not just for your physical health, but emotional health.

That lifestyle  - where you are the caretaker and get zero time for yourself - is not sustainable. You will get fatter, lose your health, become depressed and start to hate life more than you already do.  You may even start snapping at her.  Not because you resent her, but because, like my husband who was loving and caring, you resent the situation. You cannot change her pain.  

But you CAN change how you manage your life.

I bet that workout this morning did wonders for your endorphins. You need those endorphins and a healthy body and mind to make it through this very difficult time. She won't be feeling better anytime soon.  Can you imagine how much worse this will all be if you are 50lbs heavier, start developing your own health problems, lose confidence in your appearance, etc? 

If she insists you stay with her, you will eventually start resenting her, or will become an enabler and allow her to guilt you into not taking care of yourself.

I know she is suffering.  I know its agony. I have been there.  I know she is depressed and cannot think straight - who could under such agonizing pain and emotional stress?

But if you want this marriage to work, if you want to be able to care for her, and not resent her, and stave off your own depression, please, take care of yourself.  You deserve and need time to yourself every single day.  She will have to find a way to be alone for a bit each day.  

Therapy will help her.  It sounds like she really is where she needs to be and I hope she will get the help she needs.  You will have to stick to your guns when she comes back home.  Remember - you being away for a few hours a day to take care of yourself will not cause her more pain.  If she suffers anxiety by being alone, there are meds and relaxation exercise that can help.  They aren't a magic bullet, but to expect you to give up your life and your health is asking far too much.

I truly wish the best for both of you.  I saw my husband shrivel up and go from an active person who never napped to a skeleton who slept in the afternoons to escape.  It ripped me to pieces.  So at least there is some light at the end of the tunnel.  I hope it works for you, and in the meantime, they give you enough painkillers so you don't feel that daily desire to jump off a building.And, you are now hooked! Expect to spend thousands prepping your bike for track days, buying gear, after-market parts and paying for entry fees. And a set of rear sets.  No reason you should be dragging pegs.  You look pretty tall as well.  Try hanging your upper body off a bit more.  It takes some getting used to.  Who cares what he may think? This guy has zero respect for you as it is by stalking you at the gym.  Tell him it either stops, or you notify police. There is no need to be "nice".  He does't deserve it and the situation doesn't warrant it.  If you are nice, me may see it as you are either weak, or that maybe you kinda like him and he has a chance and can keep trying. 

If you're not comfortable approaching him, tell the condo staff about it. They can speak to him for you. If he's still bothering you, come down with a big guy, have the guy pretend to be a bf and tell that guy to get lost.  

41 year old female still wanting to go Thor-climbing.Ah, well that is sounding better.  I think they just don't know how to handle it, and who could blame them. When you see someone you love suffering and hurting and their world has been turned upside down, some people do certain mental things in order to survive until they adapt.  Maybe in their case, when they see the strain you are under trying to adapt, they see no other option but to try and change how you think.  Logically, they know that's impossible and not fair, but emotionally, maybe their minds can't think of any other way to handle it at all.

I had a look at a graph for your level of injury, and you're right.  That one level makes such a drastic difference.  Especially if you want to be alone.  

What kind of stuff do you do to keep busy or distracted?Does your town not have liability lawyers?I see.  That isn't surprising. People say really dumb shit.  I'm sure it becomes repetitive after awhile. Before meeting my old bf who was a para, I had zero experience with disabled people and the public, so I was stunned with the things people told me.  

Once I took him shopping because his wardrobe sucked.  A few girls were helping us since it was a slow day.  One girl took me aside and said, "Its so nice of you to go out with him."  I was thinking, huh? She said, "Its just such an act of kindness" not at all realizing that when I first met him I was the one who thought he was cute as hell and wouldn't look twice at me.

Or the others of, "nothing stops him! He's so brave! I'll pray for him."

Once he was with his friend, who also got paralyzed about 5 years after he got hurt. His mom was in a grocery store on her own, and a woman behind him was saying to her (small town, didn't realize it was his mom) "the other day I saw the SADDEST thing! Two young men, both in wheelchairs, side by side, going down the street."  His mom ripped that woman to shreds.

And it turned out my old bf wasn't that inspiring. He was a lazyass.  He was injured 15 years before I had met him, had overall great health, and with landing gear was still able to ride and race motorcycles, but refused to get a job.

You could probably write a book with all the stupid shit that comes out of peoples' mouths. For it to come out of your therapist's mouth would make me want to scream.  

I imagine when it comes from other disabled people then it really makes you feel alone. Do they really feel that inspired in life? Did they all feel that way one year since their injury?  Were they paras or quadriplegics? Because that makes one hell of a difference.

What kind of consulting do you do? Computer stuff? Baby wipes.

I once broke both hands, wrist and one foot.  I had long, very curly hair at the time (I'm a woman).  Just think of how hard it was to ass-wipe, wash my hair, and crutch.Now, now, you've missed my point and I am not surprised at all.
Nobody gave a shit about all the other faceless, nameless kids who died on the way over because it was easy to pretend it really didn't happen.  Then a fortuitous picture comes out of the same thing that happens on a regular basis for years now, and people like you lose their shit.

One week prior to that kid drowning, how many people died a horrible death (including children) because they were left locked in a refrigerated truck? Nobody gave a shit because it wasn't photographed.

I expected such a response from a moron like you. Don't worry, you aren't the only one.That was some pretty horrid shit to look at.  I suppose if you are that poor and know no better and have no chance to improve your lot, what else can you do?I am not British, so please don't run and get the pitchforks.  We have similar laws in my hometown and they are met with a favorable attitude.  Other towns are adopting similar policies.  Nobody complains and they either bring reusable (and washable) shopping bags or buy bags.

Is this truly such a bad thing in England?Toss a freakin' frisbee.  And I was so good at it as a kid.Look at those beautiful, big eyes.  New people, new home. Reminds me of my dog the first few days.  The first night I had no idea if she'd maul me in my sleep. She saw the bed, jumped right up, snuggled up to me and did not move an inch the entire night.  I kept waking up to make sure she was ok, not shitting on the bed, not about to rip my throat open, etc, and all I saw was this beautiful creature who was so at peace, so trusting and so happy to be in a soft, warm bed away from the shelter full of barking, lonely dogs.

Show us a pic in a week when Cotton has built up some confidence! Beautiful doggie!Rant anytime you want. I mean it.

I know what you mean about not having energy for the fight. And the intimidation. Doctors LOVE pointing out how much they know compared to how little you know. Of course I don't have their knowledge - I don't argue that fact with them.

And when they do the eye roll.  Or stand up to hint that the appointment is over.  It put me into a mild panic because I felt I was wasting their precious time.

Let me repeat that:  Me, who was paying $300 for 15 minutes of their time.  That doctor who gave me no useful information, tried to end the appointment before all my questions (not idle chitchat) were answered) made me feel like I was being difficult.  They often do that - you become the "problem patient" because you refuse to just accept whatever they tell you despite the fact that they are not helping. 

I can handle them saying "I don't know, let's see someone else." I cannot handle, "I think its xyz, go see a therapist, do some stretching" when I know they have no clue what they are talking about.

YOU are the patient. YOU are the customer.  You are entitled to have your questions answered as long as they are reasonable. You are entitled to have them explain shit to you in lay terms.  If they don't have an answer, you are entitled to know that.  

Some days you have to really pick your battles.  If you are having an appointment where you just break down from pain, frustration and exhaustion (I've had many of those) then the doctor stares at you like you're a mental patient.  On those days, if I just can't keep it together, I am honest.  I tell the doc I am losing hope, and there is still no diagnosis or pain reduction and I'm crying because I feel nobody cares enough to help figure out my problem and a treatmeent plan, and even though I am paying for your time, Mr. Doc, I feel you are dismissing me and this is like a job interview and if I do not play by your rules (and I don't even know what your rules are) I won't get help.

Sometimes that can get a doc to snap out of it and see you like a human again.  I can understand why they get desensitized and why they can only allot a limited amount of time for each patient.  But you are not each patient, and not every patient requires more than 15 minutes.  A few, like you, do require more time. And docs should know that and just deal with it.

It is good to know you are not alone.  Yet, so sad to know that the medical system in such a wealthy country can be so fucked up.

I cannot recommend your need for better pain management enough.  That should be your first priority, and a close second priority is getting a diagnosis (they really are one single priority).  You already know that chronic pain destroys your ability to function, think, sleep, live.  You end up just existing, not really living.  And if you lose the energy to insists your docs find what the hell is going on with you, you will not improve.

Trust your instincts.  You've done heaps of research that proved you right.  Yes, you and I don't know a heap of stuff, but we DO know something is wrong, and I also had to push my own research into my doc's face to convince him to order more tests to prove my theory was correct.  You know your body best, so if some doctor is dismissing your research, ask why? If he can explain why its impossible (your theory) then ok, that's good.  If he simply thinks its unlikely, then that's not good enough.

That is what I was told with my research. "It just is so improbable" etc etc etc.  Well, so what? I don't give a shit about statistics! If if can happen once, then it can happen to me.  Just because it is uncommon, it does not mean it is not possible.

Are you seeing a pain mangement doc?  I mean one specifically for pain? Maybe you already answered, I have a bad memory.  You need a good PM doc, and there are a lot of shitty ones out there, so it may take some time to find one who doesn't treat you like a junkie and who is compassionate.  

Its been 13 years for me, and I still get mild panic attacks each month when I go in for a refill because I fear the "I think we should lower your dose" despite me never abusing my meds and even with my current dosage I'm pretty much incapacitated by pain.

Nobody should get panic attacks because they fear their doc will not listen or will dismiss them.I want to also touch the toe beans on your dog and the kitty.  You should submit this to cuteoverload.com.  That is my homepage.  The best way to start the day.OP stole this???? WHAT? OP, SHAME ON YOU.  Why couldn't you just say "look at this cute pair?"  Why you gotta lie, man?In 1995 or so, I went to a friend's party.  It was small.  I noticed one group of about 12 people or so who were congregating outside and seemed pretty awkward and didn't really want to come and hang out with us.  I asked who they were.

"Oh, some friends of George (one of the guys that lived at the house). They are all from his new job.  Some place called Yahoo.  Some computer stuff."

Me:  (Scoffing) "Yeah, they sure are acting like a buncha yahoos." And I felt so socially superior that I was not some awkward nerd.

Fast forward to 2001, George is worth $10 million. And he married the #8 employee at Yahoo, and they retired at 32 years old.

Assholes.Look at you! That handsome, chiseled face is now coming out.  Great work, great discipline.   Great job.Its a stunning change.  I imagine the reaction of people you run into that have not seen you in a few years is one of shock.

You also learn the cold, hard truth that people are much nicer to you if you are attractive.  When I lost 30lbs (for a 5'3 woman, that makes a big difference) suddenly both men and women were much friendlier.  And, for the first time in my life, I had some really shitty experiences with female friends who were still overweight and became bitter and did some pretty malicious things, even though I did not discuss my weight change or try and shove my new lifestyle in their face.Is that what Predator babies look like? Nice mandibles.You think its WTF because...why?  They should fork out $200 at some fancy restaurant that serves 2 ounces of food instead?

I think they look happy, they have a reason to pick that spot and they don't give a rat's ass about impressing anyone.At least you were aware enough to catch your unhappiness regarding your manner of thinking.  I look back at stupid, judgmental shit I have said and done over the years and can only hope nobody overheard me.  A few times I did say such things and my mom was quick to put me back in my place.  

OP here took all the time to upload this pic and make a post in the "WTF" sub, instead of UpliftingPics or something nice like that.  Can't two people have fun without someone making a judgment that its too 'low class'?Why?  I got married in a courthouse and our "reception dinner" was at a little Mexican restaurant where we ordered tacos for about $10. Some nice lady was our impromptu "wedding photographer" and took some pix of us with the disposable camera we brought.

We were very happy with our decision. And those people in the pic hardly look sad.Why did these women ruin their faces? They appear to be quite attractive had they left their faces alone.  I admire your maturity in reading and listening to the constructive criticism with the replies.  Most kids your age would have all the answers, get pissed and tell everyone to fuck off.  But not you.  That shows you are open minded, know you have lots to learn and experience and are willing to really listen to what others have to say.

I wish I could say that about people my own age (41).

Ok, so, you admittedly have it a bit rough.  You live out in the middle of nowhere.  I grew up in an area where everything was available, I was just too lazy and unmotivated to do anything.

Here is what I suggest:  you need to incorporate excercise in your life.  Not because you need to look fit or ripped, but because you need the endorphins that exercise naturally produce.  This will make you happier and more positive. It will activate chemical processes in your system that will do wonders for feeling better about life.

Are you close to a YMCA?  I took martial arts and dance at your age, and while it took me awhile to actually enjoy it because I was fucking hard at first, each of these activities became passions.  It can be any activity, just something to get you away from video games. 

Video games are fun, but I have seen something very scary happen over the past 20 years:  20 years ago, issues like social anxiety certainly existed, but it wasn't really talked about because it (along with depression) was seen as something shameful that needed to be hidden.  I am glad that it is no longer seen as a shameful thing to have a mental condition, but I firmly believe that social anxiety has skyrocketed because so many kids spend hours upon hours behind a computer screen.

They don't develop social skills.  (I am not saying this is your problem at all, just another reason why its good to get away from the computer and video games) and these people suffer crippling anxiety and have trouble finding jobs, meeting an SO, or making new friends.

I highly recommend any activity that either gets your heart rate up, or gets you outside, or both. Another downside of having easy access to such awesome games and the internet is it makes it very easy to just stay at home.  I'm certainly guilty of it.  We have completely forgotten just how much we need nature in our lives to feel "right", so to speak. 

I'm not saying going out into nature every day will solve your problems, but it really can open your eyes to things you've blocked out without realizing it over the years. Our attention span has dropped significantly because we are now conditioned to always have something going on in the background or foreground, and we cannot sit still and do nothing.

If a YMCA is not accessible, or money is an issue, how about getting an inexpensive mountain bike, a helmet (yes, get the helmet, one bad crash and you'll be in slobbering and eating through a straw and shitting in a diaper). Save up some money, get the bike, and get pedaling. You can explore.  Even if you live in the most boring, flat place, you can at least get exercise, get out of the house, and breath in air, have some fun, find some hills, and feel like a little kid again when life was simple and innocent.

Another thing:  study! Stay in school, and do well.  Unless you have a great trade skill, you will not get far without an education unless you have connections or are very, very lucky.  If you do well in high school, you can escape your home town by going to college.  And then you can do these study abroad courses that can really change your life.

You can spent a year studying in Italy, or England or wherever you pick.  You will see new cultures, architecture, meet people with such different backgrounds (and never compare the place or people to Americans because you will only disappoint yourself). You will realize how huge the world is, and how many incredible things are out there.  

I remember myself at 15. I felt hopeless, bored, miserable and couldn't wait to be on my own.  And I grew up in the Bay Area, CA, where everyone is more or less pretty nice and there is always something to do.

I finally had to push myself to get off my ass.  I tried new things. Some I liked, other things I found boring, so after a fair shot, I did new things.  I got into motorcycle roadracing (which is very expensive, I'd recommend a dirt bike instead).  I studied hard in community college for two years, then transferred to a four year school.  I wasn't the party type and didn't really fit it, but I made the best of it.

I did a lot of traveling.  Europe, Asia, Middle East.  Then grad school then the grind starts.  You don't have to follow those "rules".  You make your own rules.  I don't want kids, don't have them and am quite happy that way.  You can have a life where you work for six months, save up, live frugally, and travel the other six months.  You can get your scuba certification at a YMCA (although you do need a large body of water for your open water cert), get heaps of hours under your belt, and go live in Thailand and teach scuba to tourists.  

I guess my point is, you are growing up in one of the most open minded countries on the planet that will provide assistance for study and growth that is just not available in many other places.  Take advantage of all this.  The better you do in school, the cheaper all your study abroad, tuition, etc, can be.  

Hedonism can be a lifestyle that works for some people, but for most, it isn't sustainable.  Unless you have a trust fund, you will run out of money and have nothing to show for your time.  Or you die of a drug overdose.  You can have a blast, travel the world, not have a 9 to 5 job, and still make enough money to live comfortably.

Most of my friends and colleagues followed "the rules".  They bought a house after college and getting a job. It was always a house they really could not afford without busting their asses.  Then they followed "the next logical step" (yes, one friend told me those exact words) and had kids.  Didn't matter that their marriage was already unhappy or they were deeply in debt for a house they couldn't afford and thus trapped in soul-sucking jobs they hated.  They simply added a kid because everyone else was having kids and they figured the kid would change things.

You don't have to do any of that.  Try and follow blogs of people who took the road less traveled and made their own rules.  You will have to make sacrifices, but that is ok.  I actually felt a whole lot better after I got rid of most of my material possessions. Life became very simple.  I didn't need a BMW when a Honda worked beautifully.  

You mentioned piano - do you have a piano at home? I used to play before my back got fucked up, and I cannot encourage it enough.  Any instrument is wonderful. Be patient, be willing to put in the practice if you want to improve, and enjoy it!  

There is so much to see and do.  Even if you can't skydive in Paris, just touching the walls of Notre Dame and envisioning the lives of the everyday people who touched those same walls hundreds of years ago can be enchanting.  

I hope you don't smoke.  Not because I believe weed is bad, just because if you are bored, it might end up becoming a thing you feel you need to do to escape.  It can really kill motivation.

Ok, I have babbled enough.  I just want you to feel there is hope.  Life can be wonderful if you put in the effort, and it sounds like you already are trying and study hard as it is.  15 is a tough age for anyone, but if you live out in the middle of nowhere, it is tougher.

In a few short years you will be a legal adult.  Start thinking and planning now.  Where would you like to be 3 years from now? Heading off to college?  Or spending a summer backpacking across Europe? A 2 month summer trip such as that can really change you. 

And keep up with the drawing.  It can turn from a hobby into a passion. You'll get better and better and may really surprise yourself with some talents you have hidden inside.

Thanks for listening.  I wish I had the maturity to listen like you do when I was 15.Um....I was just gonna say we should get the pitchforks, but hey, I get you.Mine was many moons ago.  Only regret is that I didn't do it earlier in life.  Would've saved me a lot of grief!  Your weight loss is really quite impressive.  You did it in a short but reasonable time, and are still so young but have likely learned so much during the process about yourself.  

As for people not recognizing you, just wait until your 10 year high school reunion.  This is fucking terrifying. I was an attorney for 15 years, and I always wondered about shit like this. Especially when I had a hearing or trial before a judge known to be a fucking asshole.If his parents have money, its no surprise at all that he got away with all this shit.No its not rewarded.  Its that they have money, which means power.  Money means you can buy your way out of any bad shit you've done.  His parents likely enabled him, bailed him out of each bad thing he did, so he never had to pay the consequences the rest of us would've faced.  OP says his dad made enough donations to keep this scumbag son of his out of trouble.  His dad deserves a kick in the ass.

I hope one day all his past shit comes out, or he pulls an Anthony Weiner and just becomes so used to getting away with doing illegal or fucked up shit, that he gets cocky, confident and sends some dick pic to the wrong person.When I met my then- husband, he was 6'4, a trainer, and in excellent shape.  I could not comprehend why a guy as handsome as he (he'd get asked to be a model but he had no interest in that and found himself quite average at best) would be interested in me.  I was 25, 5'3 and about 145lbs.  I was obviously overweight and I hated my body and my gargantuan ass.

I was so suspect that I thought maybe he was just putting on a ruse to get a green card.

A year into our marriage, I finally said ok, I'm ready, please train me and help me with nutrition.  And within one year I had this incredible, fit, strong, sexy body.

I asked him straight up:  why did you ever like me before I lost those 30lbs? How could you have found me remotely attractive?

He told me I was a flower that just had not bloomed yet.  That he didn't marry me expecting me to get fit.  That he loved me for me, that I was beautiful to him, and because we connected in a way that he never felt with any other woman.  

He was also very honest.  He said yes, you were bigger. You did have some extra weight to lose.  But you were beautiful. You were not that troll or monster you were convinced you looked like.  You were always my flower.

Before we got married, women warned me he only wanted the green card (he was European) because he was 'too good looking for me'.  At a work xmas party, after we were married and before i got into shape, one woman joked, "how did you get such a good looking guy?" (Real funny, yeah.)

We are no longer together, but we will always be family, and he will be my most trusted friend.  He never lied about my weight.  The few times I was brave enough to ask if I was 'fat' (I really don't know what response I was expecting as I WAS fat), he said, 'You could stand to lose weight, but that does not mean I do not find you beautiful.'

There is no reason to lie to her and pretend she is not overweight. Its not healthy, its disingenuous, and she and you will both know you are lying. You can tell her the truth (if she asks) in a very kind and loving way, and assure her that despite her being overweight, she is still beautiful.

There is one reality though - if she hates her body and is depressed and miserable with the way she looks (and I have been there) it is highly unlikely she will ever feel confident until she gets into shape.  You can only say so much, and its also not your responsibility to convince her she is beautiful.  That can only come from within her.  

There is a very small minority of overweight people who are genuinely happy and confident with their appearance, but that minority is small. Most of those overweight women who take selfies and insist they are hot babes despite being obese are not fooling themselves and deep down they hate the way they look.  Otherwise, why would they put so much effort into seeking validation?

The best thing for depression (along with seeing a doc and all that) is physical activity.  Its really hard the first few months. But if she can stick with it - whatever the activity is - she will build up stamina and notice that she is getting stronger.  That will motivate her to continue doing whatever it is.  Endorphins will do wonders for her sadness.  

You are a caring, loving man to her.  For her sake (and yours) I hope she can find it within herself to make a lifestyle change so she won't hate herself, won't feel ashamed and need to hide her body and not leave the house, and can get out and enjoy life and all it has to offer.Because people are assholes.  Or, people don't understand what depression truly feels like. "Snap out of it" they advise.  Really? If it were that easy, nobody would be depressed.

I don't understand how anyone could truly believe that yelling or putting down a suicidal person could possibly believe that such a reaction would be helpful.  We all did stupid shit when we were young. Please forgive yourself.  If you can find him, maybe send an apology if you feel its right.  I cringe at stuff I did when I was younger.  You are human.  What makes you a good person is that you remember this and know it was wrong and feel bad.  But continuing to feel bad about it will serve no useful purpose.  Forgive yourself, and now if you see some kid bullying some other poor kid, you know what to do.Hey, I did find someone, but in the end it didn't work out and we split up.  Its ok, shit happens, it was heartbreaking and hard, and I never thought I'd get divorced (what the hell made me so special?) but, shit happens.

It really sounds like you need a break.  A break from the okcupid sites and all that. You're understandably jaded.  I had hit a point where dates were so disappointing, or the few guys who I did like never followed up with me, that I began to expect the worst out of every date.  I am sure I gave off body language that made me appear unapproachable and not fun to be around.

Be by yourself for awhile.  If finances are an issue, then maybe take nice walks in nice areas, if there are any nice areas around you. I was so lonely in grad school that it physically hurt.  I got so tired of dating that I just ended up putting all my time into school and my job. And FUCK it was lonely. 

But, it was better than forcing myself to go on dates.  Those were even more depressing, because after each date where I met a guy that I couldn't connect with, or the one guy I did connect with never followed up, I beecame more convinced that something was wrong with me.

I became completely convinced I would be single forever.

Later I realized there was nothing wrong with me.  I just hadn't met the right guy where we both shared that chemistry and physical attraction along with an emotional one. There is no way to say when you will meet a person with whom you connect, but it can happen, and you are still so young, although I know you don't feel it.

Please don't compare yourself to other women your age who have boyfriends or who are married.  I did that.  And later i learned that the majority of these relationships were not as happy and stable as they appeared on the outside.  We all put our best faces on in public, and nobody likes to advertise that our relationships are going through a rough patch or generally suck wanker.  You never know what's truly going on behind the curtain.

During a rough time in my marriage, I remember wishing so badly I was single and free to do whatever I wanted, and had no responsibility to try and work it out, or be patient.  I wished I could be selfish and do whatever I wanted at any time.  I wished I didn't have to put in effort to be patient with a person I was ready to strangle (figuratively, of course).  And I was stunned by the irony, because only a few short years prior I felt so empty, so useless, so mis-wired, all because I was single.

I promise you, you are NOT old.  You feel old because you are comparing yourself to what the media pushes out and the fairy tale it creates along with those rules that you are supposed to meet that right person during college, then you graduate, get married, buy a house and all that shit.

I think the best you can do is stay off  OkCupid, do your own thing, live your life, and if you happen to stumble across a nice guy and want to meet him for coffee, go for something like that. That's wonderful that you both are adopting a healthy lifestyle.  I promise you, the first two months are the most difficult, but then it becomes a permanent lifestyle change.

You both will feel SO DAMN GOOD.  I don't mean just from looking better on the outside, which is a factor and is not necessarily shallow because being visibly healthy is appealing.   

You will feel good because you will feel in control again. When I had a shitty diet and didn't exercise, one of the things contributing to my depression (didn't realize it at the time) was I felt like I had no control over my life and it would continue to stay on that miserable path.  

When you take control of your health, something changes in your soul.  You feel much more confident.  You care a lot less about what other people may think or say.  When I was out of shape, I dreaded leaving the house and being in public.  When I got into shape, that was no longer an issue and so much anxiety and worry went away.

Your body will have energy you never knew existed. You'll develop a taste and craving for food that is wholesome and nutritious.  And the best part is that it can kick depression and anxiety right in the ass.

I wish all the best to you and your lovely lady.  You are going to really surprise yourselves as you will discover how strong you are and that underneath your fear, anxiety, depression and extra weight, there is a confident, happy person ready to live a full life.What kind of asshole takes a selfie in a movie theater? Just how narcissistic have people become? Are they gonna post that selfie on Facebook and hope for some social attention? 

I would've complained, or went out and told a manager to handle that shit.  Movies are freakin expensive and its common freakin courtesy to not be using your goddamn phone or be taking fucking SELFIES during a movie.Am I the only one that thinks that these issues are nothing new and have been around more or less since the dawn of civilization?  

Or this this sort of an in joke and I'm missing something?Damn, I'm sorry.  That was a really rude thing to say.   In my chubbier years my parents said shit like that so often I stopped visiting them.  Just the idea of visiting them started a mild panic attack.  If I lost weight, the first thing upon opening the door would be their face lighting up with relief and happiness. "Oh, you look SO MUCH BETTER!" My mom would want to take me shopping and spend time with me.

But if I came home and I was 10lbs heavier, oh, the disappointment was obvious when that door opened.  And they were very vocal about the size of my ass.  And when I told my mom it was very hurtful and for now on, please make no comments about my body, whether positive or negative, she turned it all on to me. "But, I only say it because I thought YOU wanted me to tell you.  You are the one who likes being in shape.  I don't need to say anything.  I was just  doing what I thought you wanted me to do."

Its pretty heartbreaking when you go visit your family that you have not seen in months, especially during a holiday, you are excited to spend some time with them and are looking forward (naively) to a good time, and the only thing they can focus on is if you have gained or lost weight.

No interest in your school, grades, social life, job. Nope.  Just your weight.

You don't need that shit.  When your precious free time comes up, don't visit them next time around.Please, eat! Not eating means no nutrition, weakness, inability to focus, messed up sleep.  You will not build any muscle or strength if you undereat.  You will feel like shit. 

Please stop feeling guilty over eating anything. You need food.  Your car will not run without gas, right? Your body won't run without food.  Shitty gas, your car will run like shit. Not enough food? Your body will stop functioning.   

Who cares if you ate an entire chocolate cake earlier today? Its over and done with.  Focus on the now.  You are in physical pain from hunger and that is never healthy or ok. 


I had eating disorders and really toxic relationships with food and eating until my mid 20s.  What helped was getting away from the toxic people in my life (family, in my case) who helped create those issues.

I also had to take responsibility and make those changes I knew nobody could do for me.  It took awhile to work through those eating issues.  I'd starve, get skinny, get accolades, feel mentally good yet physically feel weak, about to keel over, ready to cry at anything.

Get the professional help you need.  Be kind to yourself.  Be patient.   Be strong.  Go eat!  I promise you can have a healthy relationship with food again. It may take time and it will not be easy, but it can happen.

Eat.  Now!I am sure you are not as "unintelligent" as you think you are.  Can you honestly say you tried your best in college?

I've also known some very intelligent people that just were not cut out for certain thing.  One old boyfriend just could not get through an electrical engineering undergrad degree.  He switched to physics and became much happier.  

Another friend who studied his ass off took five times before he passed the bar exam.  FIVE TIMES.  They administer the bar only twice a year.  That means his student loans came due (he had dropped out of dental school and entered law school already owing 60k, graduating law school owing close to 200k) and he flunked the bar four times.

This guy was not dumb by any means.  He just had a hard time with the bar and lost confidence.  He kept it up, didn't give up, and now has a successful practice.  He's a very good lawyer.

If you gave me a basic math test, I'd fail miserably.  In other areas I do just fine.  Why not focus on your strong points?No, don't get me wrong, not belittling at all, just curious what the post meant by we are millennials and we aren't going to take it anymore. It sounded like some sort of revolutionary proclamation.  

Gay marriage and 9/11 are very important and life-changing issues.  My only point was that there are always social, economic and political issues.  Vietnam.  Race riots.  Men legally permitted to rape their wives. Public lynchings.  Separate but equal. Laws preventing interracial marriage.  The US carpet bombing countries or overthrowing governments for its own self-interests.

I was just curious as to what makes millennials any different that past advocates for change, but I am probably reading too deeply into the open post.How am I being a jerk? Because I asked what makes this era any worse or different than another era?  Why are you so aggressive and actually insulting when I am simply asking a question?

Do you really want to get into a debate over what was the "worst"? The Valdez spill was the "worst" until something worse came along.  Does one oil spill being worse than another make it more important? Do you even know why the BP oil spill happened? It was not because some drunk captain was fucking around with his ship.

Yes, I read the entirety of the post and it honestly sounded like a whiny high-school kid with no understanding of history is proclaiming this generation is stronger, or different, or more engaged ad aware of social issues because a small, fringe extreme religious church acts like assholes and protests funerals, or because the US finally got an understanding of the horror of terrorist attacks that have been happening for decades all over the world, but the US just didn't care all that much because an attack in an embassy in Kenya didn't affect us, etc.  That's why I responded with the question I had.  Do you genuinely think this current period is any worse than before?  

Good luck with your revolution because you millennials aren't gonna take it anymore! YEAH!"We've had our tools for self expression and personal freedom overtaken by corporations and big business."

Huh? And you just typed your self-expression and exhibited your right to express this personal freedom (doing this in China or Saudi could get you arrested or killed) on Reddit.  A private corporation.

Oh, the irony.Hey, its never too late to dedicate your time to something that is meaningful to you.  Its ok to feel envious and disappointed that you didn't take full advantage of your time in the past, but you have great awareness and a desire to accomplish things like your friend did.  There is no reason why you can't do the same thing and start right now.  You are not a worthless person.  You had a tough year for whatever reasons.  You don't need to be gung-ho and dedicate every ounce of energy in your being at all times for the greater good.Can I ask why you called a group of soldiers cowards? Did you just waltz right up to them and say that? I am sorry I made you feel like it was a joke.  I'm am old fart at 41, and the reason I asked if it was a joke was because another person responded with a reference I knew nothing about, and I thought maybe there was more to it than I was aware of.  I truly did not mean to offend you.

I think its great that you are passionate about injustices and want to do something about it.  It will be people like you who help make those changes.  Most people can see things that are wrong, but are not bothered enough by it and will expect and wait for other people to put in the effort to make those changes.Wait...a 40 year old did this to you?

I'd wait until you cool off and he sobers up, and rip him a new one.  Does he pull shit like this on a regular basis?GOOD!  See? It wasn't that bad.  Just as your finacee will need discipline in maintaining a healthy diet, you will need discipline in eating in sufficient quantities.   

How about you learn to treat yourself as kindly as you treat her?Ok, got it, you know it all.  Good luck with your call to arms and being mad as hell and all that.

And if I read correctly, you were once a dog breeder? Which means you raised and sold purebred puppies for exorbitant amounts of money, while millions of unwanted dogs are suffering in shelters and being put to sleep because there are not enough good homes out there?

It must be nice to be able to so easily dismiss your own behavior and condemn that of others.  You actually contributed to needless animal suffering and death by being a part of the purebred industry and thus perpetuating the problem. 

But hey, what do I know.I realize I'm starting to sound like an annoying gung-ho nag trainer, but I truly hope you and your fiancee give this new lifestyle a fair 2 month shot.  It changed my life in so many ways.  Wish I had done it earlier.I would have a hard time not beating his ass in.  Banging on anyone's door like that is not funny past the age of 17 or so.  You could break an ankle running to the door or whip out your gun and accidentally blow his head off if he did something like try and shove the door open.  If someone pulled that shit on me I'd be fucking scared shitless and furious.

Time to boot this useless ass out of your life.I will be waiting.Then how about leak a bit of that dirt you have on him?  He scared the shit out of you and it probably took a few hours at least to get your heart rate and anger back down to a normal level.  If he's incapable of taking responsibility for intentionally trying to scare the shit out of you, he deserves to face some consequences.  

And maybe that will get him to leave you the fuck alone.I am sorry to hear that they accused you of being dramatic.  You probably had to garner up the courage to expose your most vulnerable self to them, and you got kicked in the gut.

I think some people are just incapable of believing a suicidal person can actually, truly, for real, carry out their plans.  Or feel so miserable that they wish their house would cave in and crush them and kill them to make it all easier.

I hope you learned that for emotional help, your family is not a good source.  I once went to my dad at about age 19.  It took me a few weeks to get the courage to expose my deepest and most shameful insecurities that were becoming obsessions.  Sobbing, I told him I felt so ugly since I had gained 15lbs, and worthless as a human being and ashamed to leave the house.  I just wanted some sort of comfort that I was still valued and lovable and worthy as a person despite a 15lb weight gain.

His response? "You used to be pretty, and you wore makeup, and boys called you. Now, look at you. You don't do your hair, nobody calls and you're fat." 

He did say it really nicely, so all I could do was just drop my jaw and stare in shock.  I said nevermind, he kept saying 'what? what? do you feel better?" and I ran to my room and vowed to never, ever seek help from him again.

I hope you are feeling better now, and have a source you can go to during tough times.Why did he take back gifts? Those belonged to you.  Who the fuck does such an evil, malicious and pointless thing?Why would your wife (and I meant this with respect) want to preserve a friendship with a drunken shit?  He sounds like he has nothing positive to offer either of you.  What does he bring to the table that makes it worth it for her?so...if you aren't happy with that, what's stopping you from changing?So, he slapped you? (Assault and battery).  Then she slaps you (assault and battery) and you defend yourself and he beats the hell out of you and you get arrested? 

And nothing happens to them?

Was there a surveillance cam since this happened at a restaurant?


Did this occur in some pro-military redneck town?Oh jesus christ, I am so sorry.  That is pure fucking evil.  That motherfucker is just pure evil.  I would be so heartbroken.  I wish I could take away your pain.Hey man, you need outside help. You have a great education, no debt, a great job (that you are succeeding at, yet you feel like you are not qualified for it) and you are tossing it all away.  You're also dragging your wife down.

You have so many things that people state they wish they had on this subreddit every single day.  What a shame it would be to lose it all.

There is help out there, but only you can make it happen.  As your wife for help if you need to make some phone calls and get talking to a therapist.  You've lost control and are barely hanging on.  If you lose your job, you're gonna be fucked.  Get help so you can take control now.Does this guy's wife have any awareness that her husband is a shit and acts like a 15 year old?  I'm not saying go tell her every single detail, but if he won't listen, maybe telling her just about the police prank in a nice way, but firmly, and explain that you can't get through to him that the prank was a really shitty thing to do, yet still want to maintain a friendly relationship, and maybe she, as his wife, would have better success at communicating to him that that kind of shit is unacceptable?Please get a trainer.  At 24 I was where you are now.  I got a very good trainer who never shamed me, who taught me proper nutrition and who taught me that exercise needs to be done with proper form, in a certain order, and cardio done at specific intervals, to maximize the effectiveness of your workout.

I thought I was eating healthily, but turned out I was not getting any of the protein I needed and thus just gained weight and built no muscle.  I also thought losing weight required starvation.  

My trainer completely changed my life.  I was convinced I could never, ever have a beautiful, strong and sculpted physique and would have to starve, eat cottage cheese and work my ass off at the gym 12 hours a week.

No no no.  In one year I had a fucking badass body.  Beautiful, small sculpted muscles.   I never starved.  I learned proper nutrition and stopped eating empty calories and learned to slow down, put down the fork, and really wait to make sure if I was still hungry.  

It can work, and it WILL work if you genuinely put in the effort the right way and don't cheat.  I still enjoyed dessert and all that, just a lot less of it and all in moderation.

And I so enjoyed seeing my body transform.  My confidence shot up, I lost the anxiety of leaving the house, I actually started to enjoy (shock) going to the gym.  I was amazed that I could run a hard mile and not be tired, or hike up a very high mountain in Brazil (forgot which one) on vacation and actually run up it at times and feel great the entire time, while my friends were slogging away.

You can accomplish it, you just need guidance.  I saw so many people busting ass at the gym but their body never changed, most likely because their diet was wrong. 90% of it is truly diet.  Its not about deprivation and starving, but eating non processed, healthy whole foods and getting proper protein and nutrition intake.

You are not hideous. I promise.  Can you give it a six month effort? I mean a genuine effort, not cheating, not pretending to fool yourself, but really doing it right, with proper nutrition and training?  If you cannot afford a trainer, there are millions of resources to educate yourself.  There are great books with programs to follow. 

But if you don't follow it, you won't get the results you want.  So be True to yourself.  Just think:  if you start tomorrow, six months from now you can have a completely different physique, love your look, feel great, and love strutting down the street in public.Right now I live in Mexico.  I see some shit that makes me just shake my head in frustration. Little kids are plopped down in water to play.  This water stinks and is filled with sewage.  Dogs, cows and horses shit in this water.  And what do the parents do? Laugh and giggle while their kids splash and play in a cesspool of filth.

At least there are no corpses.No, you did not molest your sister. It was totally and completely innocent. When I was 6 and my brother was 8, he asked me to touch his penis because it 'felt good'. So I did.  I thought it looked funny, and sort of poked and flicked at it, and he just laid back.  Then I asked him, hey, what about me? And he said nope, I like this better when you play with me.  

Selfish ass.

I think my mom saw at one point. She didn't do anything.  She knew it was harmless kid stuff.In junior high I watched one too many ninja movies and decided I had to marry a Japanese ninja.  I told my mom this.  She reacted as well and said she was sure I would find a nice ninja one day.I had a really hard time when I switched schools.  I went into a much better school system. I was behind everyone, in every class.  I felt like such an idiot.  
Its not your fault.  Going to a new school that has a huge gap in standards is very difficult.  You can catch up, but its going to take a lot of time and effort on your part. Stay late after school and get help from the teachers.  You will also have to develop new study skills so you can study in a more efficient and meaningful manner.

You are not dumb.  You are simply thrown into a new situation where everyone else had a sort of "head start" compared to your background, and you just need to catch up.26? Let's say he went to law school straight out of undergrad like me and graduated at 25.  The judge position he has is absolute bullshit. He won't know a fucking thing about what he is doing.  Its also likely an administrative judge at best.  A brand new lawyer is typically walking malpractice.  I had a great job during law school and was drafting appellate briefs and law and motion, but because I was a law student, I had zero experience of actually being alone, on my own, of litigating in trial, speaking before a judge and jury or negotiating settlements.  You aren't allowed to do that stuff as a non-lawyer, and law students are not lawyers.

If this fool is 26, it means he will make a heap of wrong decisions, or will be relying on unpaid interns to do the work for him (and they will be fucking up too).    Nobody should be a judge at 26.Ok, so you really are out in the middle of nowhere with no options.  I was a dumbass and assumed you were American (you sounded American with the way you typed).  The best you can do is try and say outside.

And why can't you play the piano for an hour a day? What's the purpose of having a piano in the house if nobody is allowed to play it? I cannot imagine your siblings are truly studying every waking moment. I suppose if your parents refuse, what can you do? Maybe buy a small, portable instrument and take it somewhere out in nature where nobody will bother you.

You are in a tough spot with the lack of things to do, so best thing is to try and keep exercising, even if its home along in your room when too cold or too hot out  (I'm a fragile, pathetic Californian who things anything below 60 degrees F is unacceptably freezing.)  

Its very positive that you can see the good points about living in a rural area.  Just imagine how shitty it would be if in you lived in some high density ghetto full of garbage, noise and pollution.

Best you can do is just keep busy until you can get out. It may be boring, but this is the time to really cultivate your knowledge and continue your disciplined studying.  When you get old enough to move and do some new things, you will be better prepared.  If you spend your time now doing nothing to challenge yourself, you will become a child in an adult's body.  

I saw it happen to a lot of my friends. They never got their act together.  One joined the military, then soon got kicked out because she did not quite grasp that she was now the property of the government and she had to do whatever they told her to do, no matter how stupid or seemingly "unfair" it was.

I know its tough. You've made a good choice to keep studying.  University is very pricey, but I think in your country its much, much cheaper than the US, which is out of control.  You do not want to be an adult and stuck in a low-wage job for life. That just sucks the life out of your soul.

Good luck!Be kind to yourself. If you had a friend who went through what you went through the past year, would you expect them to be out conquering the world? What advice would you give to them? Use that same advice for you.This was beyond cringe. It was vomit.I made an 80K profit buying and selling my condo. You can make a profit with any piece of real estate if your timing is right, you choose well, you factor in all the costs and have a dash of good luck.Trainers are pricey.  There is so much free info available on-line. You do NOT need to do keto or paleo or any of that stuff.  Pick what is right for you, but make sure it is something sustainable.  If you try and cut out everything remotely tasty, you will hate every moment of it.  I love carbs and had to lower them, but I never went the keto route. I'm sure my weight loss would've gone faster had I done so, but I just wasn't willing to do it.  

So it took a few months longer, but I wasn't a raging, screaming angry person during that time.  If keto does work for you, by all means, do it.

One thing I didn't realize was how much I was eating.  I ate little things throughout the day and had no idea how much it was piling up. 

I promise you can do this.  Just be prepared to work hard, and sweat, and push yourself.  I don't mean torture, I don't mean pain, but intensity.  

Good luck!If the story is as accurate as OP says, I certainly hope the marine is prosecuted.  Imagine just getting your ass beat because a woman attacks you and as a man, you are not entitled to defend yourself.Didn't he act as the PTSD soldier with Tommy Lee Jones in that knife fighting movie? I loved that movie.I'm a 5'3 woman.  I know better than to attack anyone who can kick my face in.  Elections in the US do not affect other countries?

Are you that dumb?  

So if Bush and Cheney were not in office, would the Iraq invasion still have occurred?

You are hopelessly stupid.Can you change any of these variables? Not all, but maybe just one or two? Change won't come overnight, but sounds like you are stuck in a rut and bored, depressed, lonely and miserable.

Is there one new thing you can do? One new activity at the YMCA or something similar to where you live that you can sign up for? Some new exercise (swimming is very peaceful, quiet and relaxing) that can give your mind a break from it all?If you happen to still be fit and attractive, you still get stares.  I'm 41, and of course I am no goddess, but goddamn it still happens and I fucking hate it.  I think by the time I'm 50, I'll be invisible no matter how fit I am and I'll never have to worry about it again.My husband told me (after I complained that men still were asking me on dates despite me showing them my ring) that many scumbag men see the ring as a challenge.  They don't give a fuck.  One guy asked me out once while I was minding my own damn business at a cafe.  He was with his friend - no shame at all.  I told him, "no thanks, I'm married'. He says, "that's ok, I don't mind."  Some fucking cocky-ass firefighter.  Appreciating is ok.  Noticing an attractive person is normal and its in our genetics. But blatantly staring is NOT OK.  It does offend, it makes us nervous and uncomfortable. Why do you have to stare? Why can't you glance discreetly and move on with your business?

And I don't care what you are thinking or whether you do sunsets - how on earth are sunsets remotely relevant to the fact that you stare?

Its ok to have a quick, discreet glance. It is not ok to stare.  And we women should not have to drop hints to make the guy to stop staring.  For fuck's sake, this is common behavior. Why can't men be proactive and not do the offensive behavior to being with? Why must it fall on women to be responsive and "hint" (and men don't' get hints) and why are we forced to engage with a guy who stares?

Its like a little child misbehaving. The child tries to take candy that doesn't belong to him and the mom is expected to teach him right from wrong.  

You are a grown ass man.  Stop staring, and stop expecting women to drop hints.And sunsets and motorcycles do not feel nervousness or discomfort when being stared at.  We are human beings with emotions, feelings and for fuck's sake, is he really comparing women with inanimate things?Half a second is not "staring".  There is nothing wrong with any gender taking a glance and discreetly having a momentary glance.

Staring is something quite different.Oh for fuck's sake, really?If you are suffering from chronic pain, you need a pain management doctor.  A GP has no clue how to handle it safely.

You gotta stop being afraid to "rock the boat". Its not your fault you are sick. Select carefully whom you choose to share your health with, as not everyone will be supportive.  

Rock the boat as much as you need to in order to get the health care you need.You are depressed.  I was so devastated when I was still so sad despite hitting my major life goals.  Graduated post grad school, had a great job, making good money, lot weight and became a hot babe, married an incredible man, had everything I wanted.

And I was even more depressed than before because I was sure that once i had reached these goals, I'd no longer be unhappy.

Get some outside help.You are human.  You've been so used to being at the top level of things, you maybe have forgotten that there are always people who are smarter, better, stronger, no matter how incredible you may be at anything.

Why be so harsh on yourself?  I dropped classes when I was overwhelmed and it was the smart decision to make because it means my other grades did not suffer.  Being successful is more than just top grades and a high amount of class credits.  Is also about making smart decisions in tough situations.That IS a tough job.  I truly do not know how you guys stick it out. And its not necessarily inspiring because many of the people you are helping are on their way out.

I suppose you can take comfort in that you are giving them comfort as best you can in their last few months or years, but I am sure it takes a huge toll emotionally.  Why are you letting ONE professor destroy your passion?  You are giving him way too much power.

If you get a dream job, but you have a boss or colleague that is an asshole, do you start hating your passion or job, or find a different job in the same field?

Nobody can take away your passion unless you let them.  Nobody is forcing you to hate something.  You have a prof who is a dick.  It will be like that in life forever. There will always be assholes.  Now is a good time to learn how to deal with them and not let them have so much power over you.You think you're the only one that feels left out of society, or different? Most of us feel that way at some point.  We just figure out a way to deal with it and most of all, do not blame others or hate the world or dream of hurting people.

You need help to get past this "I am a beta  and I am forced to be a beta and I can never change it" along with your violent attitude.

Its all on you to change.  I don't believe for a second that you "tried" to be "normal" and failed.  There is no such thing as normal.  And trying isn't two months of good behavior. It involves going to therapy long term, getting help, making an effort, and being patient. You don't change overnight.

Take responsibility over your life and please don't hurt innocent people just because you hate the world.Jesus, would you guys stop with this 'friendzone' bullshit?

Its an imaginary place that does not exist.  All it mean is a certain woman is not attracted to you for whatever reason and does not want to date you.

And if you are texting this girl and she either does not respond or she logs off,that means she doesn't want to interact with you. So, leave her alone and move on.
Do you put all women you do not want to date in a "friendzone?" Of course not.  If I got that as a little kid I would've fainted with delight each day.  I would be awake at 5am to play with it.  I would force my parents to sit down to my "meal".  I would sleep in the cupboard.  When I read the title and noticed "son" I just knew there were going to be the dickwads that would just have to chime in with their stupidass opinions.  Fuck them indeed.  What the fuck are these parents doing for their sons? Giving them a stick and a pile of mud and telling them go make the best of it?That is incredible.  I love the color, the thought into the details and I bet now all the neighborhood kids are at your house every day.Are you that stupid? You know its pretend.  It doesn't mean his kid is going to fucking climb on the real stove and plant his hands on it.

Why can't anyone on DIY make something nice without people pointing out ridiculous shit? "OP, I like what you did, but if there is a tidal wave that swingset will likely not hold up. Just sayin'."YAY! You are a parent! That makes you what...smarter? More aware? A better parent than OP?  "AS A PARENT" (as you so proudly proclaim, as if you graduated some special post-grad doctorate parenting program by engaging in an act billions of others have done) does not automatically make you more aware of dangers, you nitwit.I cannot wait for the day when she runs out of ideas and has to either develop talent or start porn.I said "DAMN" as well. You look great.This is actually pretty damn funny. Thanks for the laugh, OP.Fuck, look at you! You look 1/3 your former size, and are quite the hunk.  What a hottie."Hey gorgeous. Love older women."
"U wanna talk on skype?"
"Sup".

I am 41. My profile says I am not interested in people under 36.  Why do 25 year olds keep fucking messaging me? Why do they think they are special?  Why is does a 21 year old tell me he deserves a chance because he "can rock my world!" 

Rock my world. Ha. Haahahahahahhahaha.She didn't respond? I'd definitely find that hilarious and would respond.I hope you didn't hurt your neck getting that pic.You have a great body. Beautifully sculpted.Age. Life experience. I am 41 and just started playing around on OKCupid.  I look back to the last time I did anything like this on-line, and I was 24-25.  It is SO damn nice to not give a fuck.

I'm polite to people who message me even if I am not interested as long as they are nice. I am straightforward.  I have zero expectations.  

I am aware that attraction is based on chemistry and you can't manufacture chemistry. 

The more life experience you have, the more soul searching you do and the more you learn about yourself, others and life in general (and the more you realize you don't know shit).   You figure out your own self over time, your likes and dislikes and you become ok with it.  People are doing this now? How fucking lazy can you get. Holy fuck, now I'm all turned on with that image of the hunk you described so well.I didn't even notice the fish until I read this comment because I was so entranced with the curve of its outer wings' feathers and started thinking of how humans observed birds taking off and landing and the early efforts of men trying to emulate flying with all those contraptions, and...yeah.  Poor little fishie, thinking, "welp, guess this is it, goodbye cruel world."No. Not okay.

"By the way, I jerked off to that photo on the fridge of you and your girlfriends lol hahah I'm sure you don't mind lol."But that poor little fishie is gonna get the pecking and shredding of a lifetime.  Its not right! (As I fry me up some yummy sunny-side up eggs and bacon.)Just think how good it smells...the bacon frying, the bagel toasting...mmmmm.OP, unless your sister has some mental condition, I would (if it were me) slam her against a wall and threaten severe repercussions.

But she doesn't seem normal.  She is outright malicious. Malice means intent to hurt, and extra malice because she takes pix to send you when she knows you are not at home and cannot stop it.

I would take whatever action you need to take to protect your dog.  Maybe threaten to bring in the cops for animal abuse because I fear if you "destroy" some of her things, she could really hurt your dog in retaliation.This is something I am sure OP already does.  In the meantime, her crazy sister is abusing the dog, her mother is enabling her and both sister/mother are manipulating everyone into thinking this is perfectly normal while the dog is suffering.

I would personally beat the hell out of her, but since most would recommend against that, I would try to move out, and if that is not an option, have a serious talk with your mom.  As owner of the house, your mom has the power to make rules for your sister (ie: kick her out).  Talking to your sister is likely useless because she sounds damn evil.I really don't think your reason for quitting meds is either a good idea or a reasonable idea.

And going cold turkey? I've been there.  It is pure hell. 

Nobody is "forcing you to quit", as you say. You are CHOOSING to quit because of the headaches we all suffer when refilling opiate meds.  Yes it sucks. I get anxiety attacks too.  But your reaction is extreme and hardly reasonable.

You will fall back into not sleeping and suffering, but hey! No anxiety once a month during refills!  You will suffer far, far more.  

How about instead of engaging in this pointless torture which could very well lead to a horrible quality of life and start getting you suicidal, you start researching or speaking with a pain therapist and learn that opiates and opiods are not inherently evil or bad.

Its the people who abuse them, or who have never suffered chronic pain, who think opiate users are stupid or weak.

Should we ban all cars because some people drive drunk or recklessly?

Opiates enabled me to not have to commit suicide and enable others to get back to work, sleep, take care of their families and improve their quality of life (and the quality of the lives of the people they live with).  
Who cares?  This is MMA, not relationships of MMA.  We have no idea what goes on behind in the scenes in any relationship. We may morally disagree, but its still a private matter and none of our business. And of  course to the public, any athlete will say what their PR team has them say, or what the athlete feels is right.

I'm not necessarily a fan of either of these two, but we watch them for their athletic abilities, and digging into their private lives - when we have no clue what all the facts are - is really like watching Real Housewives of MMA fighters on Jerry Springer.In that case, AWWW! I wanna see the little babies get fed!This is hysterical.This is beyond awww.  This needs a CuteAneurysm sub.Look at your legs! As a 5'2 midget, I'm drooling over how shapely and long they are (I'm a woman).  You look great and congratulations on reaching your goals!This is wonderful. I love the nest cams. Thank you!I get that from men as well.  I just do not photograph well, unless it at a specific angle and I get damn lucky.Now I must google it. Damn you all.

Edit: Oh dear god. That one pic of blood splattered all over the floor.  What a horrible disease.On our honeymoon we were in Northern France, in a town called Honfleur, I think.  Pictoresque coastal town, we are sitting on a wall overlooking the water and boats.

Me: What are you thinking of?

Him: How funny it would be if I pushed you into that cold and filthy water. HAAHAHAH!"

Me: ...Totes.

And for you fuckers - you know who you are - stop using "literally" when you mean "metaphorically" or "figuratively".  Very curious about ecstasy.  But I'm already on methadone for pain management and nearly died from a heat stroke in the past.  I'm afraid I'd cook to death.For the women of Reddit who have read the Outlander series: Brianna. She's such a fucking idiot. Always waltzing into rape situations, beating the shit out of her husband and just doing stupid shit in general. And we are supposed to like her.  Bitch never stops complaining.I hate her so much I can't even watch that movie again.  She also played the character as an "educator" in that movie Freedom Writers with Hillary Swank, and again, she did such a great job of being hateful.And this explains why you are still single.I looked up the interactions, and I had some friends at the time who could watch over me, but after that heatstroke incident, its just not worth it.  As it is, on 100mgs of methadone a day, I'm sweating bullets on a cold day. And I'm one of those tiny girls who used to be freezing when it was 85 out.Friends.  Yes, that stupid series that everyone found hilarious.I take prescription methadone for severe, chronic pain. Few months ago I was having a terrible, awful flare up and asked my doc if he could prescribe me anything that could help me avoid a trip to the ER.

That dumb motherfucker injected me with nubain.  Similar to narcan.  Within ten minutes I hit the floor for 8 hours of precipitated withdrawal.  Uncontrolled screaming (I mean FULL, drawn-out female screaming at the top of her lungs), pain as if I was dipped in acid and acid was injected in each vein, hallucinations of terror, convinced I was having a heart attack, did I mention the physical pain? Repeatedly losing consciousness.

I begged and begged for an ambulance.  He refused and hid me for 8 hours in his office.  He did not take my vitals once, even when I told him I was sure (more like screaming and yelled and sobbed and begged) that I was dying and my heart was racing. I was drenched in sweat, could not sit, was seizing and was unable to stop slamming my hands and head against the tile floor.

He simply left me alone in the lobby and hid in his office.OffMyChest!!

I got banned when I said that it was a scientific fact that you are unhealthy if you are 100lb overweight.

The mods told me I was using pretend science "to be a shitty person".  Now this is interesting. Was this through your employment or as a hobby/outside interest?I like how in those messages the perp makes sure to cover all contingencies. She mad? Check. She up for it? Check. She not sure? Check. She calls the cops? It was just a joke man, why is everyone overreacting!I actually squinted for a moment, "I can't see no damn - oh."Ok, not quite the same, but it was, like yours, the multitude of objects.  Went to the house of the bf of my close female friend. His mom's house, really. In Los Angeles.  Nobody was home, and she had been telling me "I have to show you this house."  I was not expecting at all what I saw.

Blackface dolls and figurines. Everywhere.  I mean hundreds.  Embroidered on pillows.  All with huge white teeth, doing manual labor, exaggerated features women wearing the hair wrapped up in cloth and cutting up watermelons, chicken, everything.  

They were all over the kitchen and it spilled into the living room. All prominently displayed as a obvious collection that must've take years to accumulate.  

I just stopped and stared at her.  "Does this not seem weird to you?"

Imagine being surrounded by literally hundreds of figurines, larger dolls, toys and embroidery of blackface in the most racist and insulting of manners.  All were slaves or "housekeepers", all were carrying heavy bags or tools, were doing heavy labor or laundry, all had huge lips.  Of course all were SO HAPPY to serve the white man.

And her bf was such a whiny douche on top of it.  She used to do his fucking law school homework (she and I were a year ahead of him and at a different school), while he'd cheat on her.This is magic. Before this my favorite was your piece about the frozen pee puck an affronted neighbor had slid under the front door of his nemesis ("whispered 'prick' and left"), but this is special.  "A flop on the floor!"   

Divine, truly divine.Kinda like those scenes at Jesse's house on Breaking Bad when he was using and inviting methheads over?We need a Cuddling Engineer to give us some models of how much cuddling these groups could engage in before some sort of structural failure or physical injury.

Can't these lonely people just get a dog and learn to go outside? Nevermind, hate to think what might happen to the dog.That's what I like to see. None of this drama Ronda Rousey screaming inanities or swinging her arm around Holm during the photo-op (how embarrassing to look back and see yourself screaming, "you fake nice-girl bitch! You aren't nice! You are a fake nice girl!" If THAT is all you can find to insult the person or get yourself motivated to beat their ass, you're in trouble.

Same with the dudes.  I much prefer to see level-headed nods of respect.I'm ready to call the animal abuse hotline right now.  Those smart dogs have their humans trained well."Vodka". My ex named his beautiful Shepard Vodka.  And since he (the dog, not my ex) always had one ear that flopped in half, even when he became an adult, he looked a bit tipsy so it fit perfectly.You are in a very, very tough situation given your age and that your mom is enabling.  Your only hope is to get your mother to remove her blinders. I wish you the best of luck.

I cannot imagine how heartbroken and the rage you must feel when your own sister hurts your innocent, sweet dog.  That would induce violence in me.

Best of luck, and do not back down if your mom tries to dismiss you.That's a good question. I remember back in 2007, it had been 5 years of agony and I was sobbing, telling my then-husband that I was nothing more than "a prisoner in my own body, with physical nonstop suffering to top it off."

Soothing? My pets helped a lot.  Accepting? Not sure if I have accepted it yet, even though my disease caused my job loss, divorce, and bankruptcy, just to name a few.

I try to remind myself I am lucky and have access to pain meds, a comfy mattress, and that I love my dog.  Giving my dog the best life  I can makes me feel better. Of course its not all-fulfilling, but it helps. I can't stand or sit for longer than a few minutes, so volunteering is not an option.  

Also, escapist reading. When I'm having a very hard day, I pick up a book (Outlander series, very girlie, easy reading) and escape.

As far as sad about my loss? I still internally rage at the "unfairness" of it all.  Of course someone always has it worse.  

But then again someone always has it better.What a relief you found him.  He very well may have saved your life.  Not True all the time.  My dad told me he figured out how to sleep in the army while standing at attention.  Just go to law school.   First year you are forced to do a moot court argument before three judges (real, seasoned lawyers pretending to be judges) who are eager to rip you to shreds.   I was considering dropping out of school. I ended up actually loving it and with that, you get over your fear pretty quickly.  Hey, you wouldn't happen to know former EMT named Dave Brooks?  (he's alive and well, or, at least he should be)I was so terrified I was shaking.  I thought fuck this, I'll faint,  no way can I do this.  I prepared as much as I could and to my surprise, being prepared made it so much easier.  Who woulda thunk.  I actually enjoyed it.   This progress is amazing! So much weight in such a short time.  Great discipline and work.  Has your mind caught up to the fact that you are now a slim person?A signed consent is absolutely useless.  Why? Because even if a person says yes, they can change their mind at any time.  If they change their mind, you'd better stop.It really comes down to that. Once you realize can answer the questions fired at you, you calm down.  And the arrogant 1L who I was up against and who brought his parents along to watch and film him (and who told me right before we started, "You're going DOWN, har har" in front of his parents) made a complete fool of himself. His dad was so nice and in front of his son (I think to teach him a lesson, even though the judges did eviscerate him quite well) congratulated me for doing so well.  His dad must've seen my terror before it all started.  We were told to prepare for both sides as we would not know which side we'd have to argue until 5 minutes beforehand.  Having to argue the side you are personally against is odd, but it teaches you how to be an advocate. And how to make ridiculous sounding bullshit appear reasonable.

Edit:  And prepares you for those clients you want to fucking strangle because they are so goddamn unreasonable and refuse to settle despite not having a good case for trial.  But as long as they are paying my fee and they understand my warning, its their decision.What if there's some innocent, child passenger in the car? Fuck them, I suppose? Or maybe the driver is having a heart attack or seizure? I suppose you know it all.Your kitty really loves you.So, those rescuers standing directly beneath that dangling caravan...AHHAHAAHHAHAA, ok, sorry, I know you mean well, but I used to litigate against insurers who found any reason to delay/not pay for their insureds' covered claims. Even when we won/settled, 2 years later, our clients were fucked.  One lost his business, another went crazy from the stress and ended up homeless.  That dog looks stunned. "How did I suddenly get so light? Is there something wrong with the gravitational field on my planet?"My husband went on a 4 hour off-road ride with some word-class dual-sport riders.  These guys were throwing around 900cc bikes like they were light as a feather, over goat  trails, 2 feet from 300ft cliff drop-offs, the most treacherous shit you can think of. Most of the riders were 5'5 or so, but had incredible skill on those very tall bikes.  (My ex is 6'4 and really struggled to keep up, and he is a very good rider.)

They make it back to the city, and the very best rider is slowing for a red light, sees a very minor fender-bender across the street, rubbernecks, and crashes into the car that had stopped in front of him.

Nobody was hurt, but oh, the irony.  And the embarrassment.  It was a huge KTM off-road gathering thing and word got out fast.I'm truly sorry to hear that.  A head injury is horrible and so incredibly frustrating. Its an invisible disability and your inability to do normal or difficult tasks that you easily could do prior to the injury is really hard to handle.  You can't find your words, or focus at all, and it all over sucks.Not a smart rule.  Friend of mine landed on his head and was knocked out for 5 minutes during a motorcycle track day. He flew about 8 feet in the air, and all 200lbs of him landed on his melon.

His dumbass friend said "ok, no problem" when my friend insisted he was fine, didn't need to  go to the ER, and was ok to drive his Chevy Tahoe and trailer with 3 1000cc motorcycles, the EZ-Up and all the extra tires and parts, the 200mile drive home.

Guy showed up at my house (did I mention he also broke his collarbone and was driving with a sling)?

I took him to the ER 5 hours later, by then he was babbling like a 5 year old and in and out of consciousness.  For one week he functioned like a 3 year old and could not be left alone for even a few minutes.  

The one time I did leave him alone in my bed, I returned from a shower and couldn't find him.  It was 2am and I thought he left.  I found him standing inside my kitchen closet. He had swallowed 1/2 his bottle of percocet (told me later he kept forgetting if he took one so 10 seconds later he'd take another).  I also saw two entirely empty Ben 'n Jerry' ice-cream containers neatly in the sink that were brand new.  He remembered to be neat and considerate despite his head injury and mass confusion and washed the spoon.

I had to approach him very carefully.  He was literally standing up, snoring, holding the door of the fridge. I'm 5'2.  

I also ripped his friend a new asshole for not only allowing him to drive that huge rig, but not insisting he as least stay at his fucking mansion which was on the way back and watch over him. "But, but I had to work the next day!"   So does everyone else, you fucking idiot.   What if my friend had crashed and killed an entire family? 

TLDR:  Go to the damn ER if you bonk your head.  Its a FUCKED system.  I had excellent health insurance but still had to file bankruptcy when I developed some spinal tumors.  

So many times I had flare ups that  had me suicidal but I couldn't afford the ER co-pay for 2 damn morphine injections, so I'd eat a handful of sleeping pills and try to sleep through the worst of it for a few days.

The US system is the most shameful in the world considering how wealthy a country it is.

To top it off, for 5 years the "best" doctors insisted I had to just live with the tumors and surgery wasn't an option.  I flew to France and on the spot they did an MRI and life-saving surgery.  Grand total for everything (w/o insurance or discounts - in other words, I paid full foreigner price)? About US $8,000 that I put on my credit cards.   And they saved my life.Ok, I'll say it.  You are absolutely disgusting to be saving them up like that jar is a freakin' popping piggy bank. My parents fled Iran before the Islamic revolution.  My mom was Israeli, dad Persian. I was also born there.  Family is Jewish, so my dad knew it was time to get the fuck out.

Had we not been let in the US, we'd likely be dead by now.  I'd be wearing a burka and certainly not have had all the wonderful opportunities to do the things I love to do.  I will forever be grateful for that.

This was also during the US hostage crisis in Iran.  When I later asked my dad why he didn't teach us Persian, as all my cousins who emigrated to NY were taught, he said he didn't want anything bad to happen to my brother and me in school and didn't want us advertising our background.  

And considering how damn obnoxious the Persian side of my family is, I am more than happy that I do not comprehend their endless drama.  There's usually enough gesticulating and random noises of varying levels of anger (ex:  scream a long, drawn-out "dehhhhhhh!" while slowly raising your hand higher with synched timing to the oral sounds) that reflect the subject matter anyway without need for translation.Yeah, possible but I would rather give this guy the benefit of the doubt.  Maybe losing weight so rapidly is not for everyone and is not  the best way about it, but the weight is lost, its over, and hopefully he'd being healthy and kind to his body.AHAHAHAHAHAHAHAHAHAHAHA.

That is all I can say.  Bitch had it coming and quite literally asked for it.   I'm a woman and I hold doors open for men. Its just the polite thing to do.  But that's exactly what he just said.  The steam came from the food/liquid source. Yeah, this is, at least to me, one of those empty platitudes that are absolutely meaningless.  A beautiful, sweet little girl gets raped and murdered? Oh, a silver lining! Now we know that beautiful, sweet little girls can exist!

No. We already comprehend that beautiful things can exist without evil things stealing them away and ruining lives forever.Sounds like my mom.  When I was 11, we moved to a new school and I was placed in a French class  that was too advanced for me. I was falling behind, so her method of "helping" was to wake me up at 5am and sit by my side on my little twin bed, and have me read aloud.  If I mispronounced even one word every so slightly, I'd get a full-forced backhand with her wristwatch slammin my nose.

She was so calm.  She didn't even turn her head. Her left hand would just swing out like a missile, smash my face and I'd go sprawling into the wall behind me.  

She broke my nose that day.  When my dad would show up from work, or people would call, she would instantly lower her voice and be cheerful and say how wonderful it was to be able to help her daughter learn French!

She smashed my face in over other ridiculously inane reasons as well and was a pro at manipulating the family.  I'm now the selfish black sheep who is "so mean because I refuse to have a relationship with my mom who suffered for so many years because poor her, she had two kids before the age of 22 (nevermind that my dad worked his ass off and supported her) and lost her own chance at having a life."  Because, you know, someone put a gun to her head and forced her to have kids.  

You'd think after her first abortion at 16, she would've wised up and started using protection, or stopped having sex.Do not send dick pics.  Really.  We do not want them, unless we very explicitly ask. No matter how special you may think your dick is, we do not want to see it.  This was in the Iranian army, so I really question to what degree standards were upheld.Oh, I'd believe it. Its happened to me too many damn times for me not to believe it.  One dude took my number off an apartment application I filled out. He showed me the place - some large complex.  

First two texts were friendly, asking if it was ok that he got my number that way. He was 10 years younger and was very nice and mature enough in person, so I said sure.

Then: dick pic.  

We "bonded" during the apartment showing when I explained how I was on disability due to a spinal injury and due to the pain was unable to work, however, I had a fat bank account and could get a co-signer if needed.  We both also raced motorcycles and he was also in chronic pain (nowhere as bad as mine).

After dick pic, a few weeks pass, I get a text from him. He's having an awful flare up, and believe me, I understand this level of pain. He begs for 2 of my percocets.  I tell him, go to the ER, just like I have to do, b/c its illegal for me to give you my opiate meds. Plus, I fucking need them myself and they cost a fortune.

The guy is in tears. Offers to pay for them. Finally, I relent.  Tell him, "Ok, I can compromise. Meet me at Gold's Gym and I'll give you something that I once took when I couldn't afford percocet."

"YEAHH!!" he says.

I offered him 2 extra-strength Tylenol.  Which are useless for severe pain.  Never got a dick pic, or any text, from him again.I have no doubt he was in agony (he had spine surgery and a destroyed back from a motocross crash) and not a regular user, but c'mon. Illegality aside, why the fuck would I give a virtual stranger, who send me a DICK PICTURE, my valuable meds?   I played by the rules, took them as prescribed, didn't give them away or sell them, paid for my overpriced insurance and meds, the hell if I would let some scum like him have them.  Girl! Thanks!  The stunned reaction when he realized I was offering him over the counter Tylenol still makes me smile.But why bother? Its highly unlikely they'll get a woman who says "YEAH LET'S FUCK NOW."  More likely they'll get an insult to their manhood.

But none of that deters them. Those men are like three-year old boys who find it hilarious and love the attention of showing their wee-wee to someone.

And that is never, ever sexy.Thanks for your kind words.  I was lucky.  My then-husband is a French national (I was not yet a French citizen, I am now, which means any health issue is covered in France no matter what).

He knew that if I didn't die first, I had made plans to kill myself.

All of this happened not in some backasswards town with 1 doctor, but in the Bay Area, Silicon Valley, where I had some of the best insurance around.

But no doctor wanted to deal with the 26 year old woman who looked healthy on the outside but had an unusual (but NOT unheard of, I did heaps of research on my own) condition.

That was when I learned:  most surgeons want a quick and easy patient. One they can diagnose on the spot, schedule for a surgery, make a quick buck with some disc replacement or spine stabilization surgery and move on.

God forbid should they get a desperate, suicidal patient (because of the severity of the pain) who requires that the doc confer with colleagues and do a bit of after hours research, or spend more than 15 goddamn minutes reviewing her records and actually examining her.

People who don't have that option to go to another country like I did either commit suicide, or if left untreated, become paralyzed or die a very painful death.
You literally just emailed the Chinese government.  The same government that regularly engages in such abuses and locked this guy up, locked up his wife and murdered his father.

I know your heart is in the right place, but you don't go to the police station to report that the police captain raped you.

The embassy also has zero power to exert any influence on the Chinese gov't, much less a low-level city-level type of authority.  Damn he looks great!   I'd be happy to have romantic sex with him. First time I ever thought I'd say that about a 75 year old man.  This is the first LPT I actually find useful. Many people mean well, but when I was dying (obviously I lived, but barely) of spinal tumors, and was in terrible pain and couldn't move, walk, sit, etc., people would say "call me if you need anything."

I had too much pride and didn't want to bother them to call them to buy me some groceries, or drive me to the hospital or yet another doc appointment, or come and just stay with me and let me sob on their shoulder.

One girl did just show up.  She massaged me, fed me, and let me cry.  She didn't force me to talk when I was too exhausted or in too much pain to talk.

I would just pass out in an opiate haze on the couch and she would read a book or quietly watch TV.  

That is what a person who is suffering or in need really could use.  Don't put the onus on them - they will likely not want to bother you.

And when you do show up, make it very clear that if they are not up to company, you understand, they merely just need to say the word and you will drop off whatever they brought (food, books, meds, stupid silly magazines to read) and they will leave without any offense taken.  Also offer to sit quietly, while the sick/sad person sleeps or stares into space, giving them no obligation to talk.  Your presence alone can be very comforting.  

And if they have a dog - its a big help if you can take the dog for a walk.That would make me sick to my stomach. To see all his tormentors, whose actions led to this very funeral, show up and act so dramatic, as if they actually cared for him when their actions contributed to his death - that is sickening.The OP isn't saying "show up and force your company on them and don't leave even when they ask you to leave."  OP is saying don't wait for the suffering person to ask for help.  Show up and offer help.  And if the say "I am not up for company" you drop off the food or card, and say, "I understand, know I am here for you if you do want company." And leave.  Better yet, don't even put the burden on them to ask you to leave as they may feel its rude.  Just right out tell them that you won't stay unless they are up for company, and you are simply dropping off a few things. And if they don't even want to open the door, you'll leave the items right outside the door.And please do not say, "I know just how you feel."  You don't. Not even if your mom died and their mom died.  You never know "just how someone feels".  I was once speaking to the girl my ex-husband was casually dating.  My ex is someone I will always love and respect and we will be close family for life. Our ending of our marriage was like a knife twisting in my heart for 4 years, but it was amicable, and it had to be done.

I tried to stay on good terms with his gf.  Our marriage ended because I got very, very ill with multiple tumors and with everything that comes with a long-term, very painful catastrophic disease and many close calls with death (plus bankruptcy and me barely able to walk) the romance died under the pressure of us trying to stay alive and with a roof over our heads.

Then my ex developed disc degeneration disease and a brain tumor.  And now he was suffering and in agony.

So one day I was over to check on my dog that remained at his place (he was out) and I broke down bawling that it was so shitty for my ex.  That he was such a good man who worked so hard, but got such a raw deal, that I had been so sick for those 6 years that he cared for me, and saved my life numerous times, and now he was sick and suffering.  We only had one year of me being healthy during our marriage and our world fell apart when we were both 26.  Our dreams turned to dust.

Her response?

"Don't feel bad. It all happened for a reason.  If you hadn't gotten sick, then he wouldn't be with me!"

As I was a bit stoned, I thought I heard wrong, so I said, huh?

With a big smile, she repeated in a kind voice that you use with small children, "Its ok. Don't cry.  It was meant to be.  If you didn't get so sick, you'd still be married, and he wouldn't be with me.  So see? It all worked out."

I was stunned.  I already knew he liked her as a person, but was hardly in love with her, and she was more company as he was so lonely (as he told me himself). She had said incredibly thoughtless things in the past (such as telling her friends my dog was "her" dog right in front of me), but this was something else.Not unless they could find a publisher outside of the US.Like 3-year-olds. Fascinating with some dangling banana that can go from soft to hard to soft.  Doesn't the novelty ever wear off? Has a woman EVER responded well to an unsolicited dick pic?  But they keep doing it.Never.  No amount of food is worth going out with a guy I don't want to go on a date with.  

OP: did this happen to you? I can see some women dating a guy for gifts or for him to pay her bills, but going on dates for food? I think the woman would have to be starving.A guy like that would still think he was owed something. Because he was nice! He smiled! He didn't hit her or anything. Plus, he bought it first without her asking.  Ergo, she OWES.Oh, I reacted.  I stood up and said, "You've had some stupid shit fly out of your mouth at times, but you've outdone yourself. For a 28 year old woman, you really have a childishly-wired brain.  So it's all about you? I got sick and my life turned upside down for you? Chris suffered for you? Everything is about you! Never realized how fucking special you are." 

And that was the end of me tolerating her.  She told me, "Don't leave" like an order as I headed out.  This fucking child was now telling me what to do? I rarely have to control myself Fromm feelings of violence, but oh how I wanted to smash her stupid face in.First, change username.   Second, make the offer, and if they refuse, do not insist on paying for anything.  Third, if they do accept, remember there are never, ever strings attached.  Would you owe it to spend an entire evening with some 10000lb woman who hasn't showered in a year and who can French-braid her armpit hair just because she offered to buy you a drink?  Nope. And here we have the first year law student thinking of Contracts.  It's not a damn contract when it comes to social interactions.  No.  Serious? What went through your mind when you thought of women you desired (I know, a million things, but I mean the nice guy things).  I truly commend you on maturing, though.  A lot of people would not be able to either mature or admit a character fault.Yeah, I wonder, how many guys would be truly turned on with a close up of a labia from a girl they just met?Dammit, don't make me start crying again.Persians in an argument can put Italians to shame. And they lead the world in self-arrogance and entitlement.  When I lived in LA (where there is a high population of Persians) if I heard the accent, or the language spoken while out in public, I'd run in the opposite direction.I used to eat dry cat food. I was not starving.  I was 12.  I thought it was cool.  I once munched away while still in the store and all the employees came out to watch and ask, and thinking I was the coolest thing on the planet, I answered all their questions like a pro.

I think I was missing at least half my brain at that age.I laughed far too much at that.  A miniature, genuine ermine rocking chair, perfect for that little girl who is the animal-lover in your family!Maybe the car's owner died and here we are making fun of his car.Hey, I decided I liked that song when I was a young teenager (I really didn't, but since MTV  played the video constantly I decided if I ever wanted to get out of my awkward stage I needed to like it.)
That is the type of trucker who kidnaps kids and uses those doll heads as a representation of his trophy count.  That alone should be grounds for a search and seizure.I would expect such stupidity and lack of foresight from some teenagers.  But grown men? Thanks, Steve-O.NO NO NO NO NO NO NO. Cannot be True. People do not do this. My dog, maybe (only it the horse shit is dried and properly marinated under the sun and thus horse-shit-jerky) but humans? No.Oh, jesus, I didn't know the meaning of te word and thought your skin around your fingers was so weak that a shower alone would tear it off.

Wear gloves. Or think of all the nasty germs and microscopic pubes and fecal matter that gets on your fingers throughout the day.   That looks so painful.I'm a bit confused here.  That bruise is a boo-boo, but not wtf. And what's up with the school marm?I read that book as a little girl.That was beautiful. She'd be badass as a ballerina. Especially doing Swan Lake with that sword.Why oh why did I have my high school years in the 80s.  I am just relieved there was no internet or digital cameras back then.

The 20s always seem to look the most elegant.That is some incredible flexibility, strength and control.That's just scatological.This is some of the funniest shit I've read in awhile.  It's also has the power of taking away some of the fear I had when I first watched the original Nightmare on Elm Street some thirty years ago.  Well done.This hit me much harder than I thought.  Figured it would just be another one of your highly entertaining stories, but now I'm wrapped up in the whole meaning of life thing.DAMN! You look so handsome.  I congratulate you on your hard work and dedication.  You are fit, athletic, energetic and radiating happiness.  I know weight loss doesn't solve all of life's problems, but you eliminated a good portion of them. Great job.Man. You truly and wholly fucked that up.  And you meant so well.  Your heart was in the right place. But damn, what a fuckup!Yes.  And there is a very good reason Israel gets that much money. It is the only friend of the US in that area, the only True democracy and let's go with the downvotes!Because as a tax payer, your individual preferences for which country gets what is irrelevant. You have your chance to elect leaders in various respects who will (hopefully)  rely upon educated, experienced and knowledgeable aides and assistants to assist them in making informed decisions on foreign and military aid, and who have access to heaps of information that you never even knew existed, much less can understand its significance.Please just let them help you and push away thoughts of being a burden.  You are lucky to have them.  And you would do the same for them.  It will be easier on them if you allow them to help you during this trying time.

Have you contacted the new clinic yet? It may take time to get in, and you are in a dangerous place not having a PM doc, so you need to get  that settled straight away

I hope the upcoming tests give you some answers. I've been waiting for my nerve conduction test for three months. My doctor always 
"forgets" or has something else (vacation) going on.  Oh, how I would love to punch him in the jaw.Brilliant advice. "Now, be a good student and don't stand up for yourself. Let the bad guys intimidate or push you into a corner, far away from other people or escape  routes. And only THEN, when you are cornered, have no escape, are surrounded and the bully knows you will let him beat your ass, take action!"Its all a matter of the US wanting to protect what it sees as "their interests".  A short example:  9/11 attackers came from the Middle East.  Oil comes from the Mid East.  Nothing "useful" to the US comes from, for example, certain area of Africa, so the US does nothing when one tribe starts slaughtering another.If you truly think those other countries are "friends" of the US, the only "joke" here is your own knowledge.Parents have a way of "forgetting" their bad deeds. My psycho mother broke my nose with a backhand when I was 9 (her watch connected with my nose).  All her beatings were neck-up (usually its the other way around.)

She told me once she "I don't remember a thing because I must've felt really bad about it."  Also, "some kids get beat much worse."

This is a mom that lived in a rich community, drove a BMW, didn't have to work, etc.  With a husband who took care of her like a princess.  And she wonders why I refuse to speak to her.As soon as you can, get out and cut ties.  That was the best thing I did.  Financially, it was tempting at times to accept their offers, but those offers always, always came with a string attached.  When I graduated to cutting off all contact, my life became much better, and that dark cloud that followed me around drifted away over time.  

Hang in there.This is one of the most horrible things I have read on this thread.  As a kid, you have no idea that your 'normal' is actually very abnormal. For years you suffer through each day, not knowing why you are hurting and feel so out of place.  So sorry this crime happened to you.That last pic of the dog snuggling with your dad nearly brought me to tears.  The night I adopted my dog, not knowing her past I didn't know if she'd maul me in my sleep.  

Nope.  She jumped on the bed, curled up right next to me and slept peacefully the entire night, in such a deep, trusting sleep that she did not move once.  I will never forget that night.  She must've been so relieved and happy to have been out of that scary doggie jail.That  story makes me want to commit violence on those people who locked her up.  Why do people who don't care to make time for dogs bother gettings dogs? This doggie is now saved and understands what its like to be loved, and can finally have a happy doggie life!That's adorable, but "friends" in the context of international diplomacy isn't the same as "friends" in the context of your social circle.  The US and Canada are friends.  Does the US ever say, "Hey Canada, we're sort of unable for various reasons to treat some of our sick citizens, so would you mind treating them for us for free for awhile? We'll hit you up next time around. Friends, right?"It truly touches the depths of your heart.  My dog was nearly 2 and had never been on a leash and on her first busy-street crossing, she looked, said "no", laid on the sidewalk and hid her head in her paws. It was both heartbreaking and adorable.Israel is the only country out of all on your list that is not an Islamic dictatorship.  That right there reflects the inherent limitations when working with these Islamic countries.  There is no "perfect" ally for the US, but the US will give the most money to the ally that assists the US to the greatest degree in whatever the US deems are in its national interests.

Like it or not, that's just a fact of national survival.Kuwait is a solid ally of the US, and you're right, without our help, they'd be fucked. Their only "problem" (in terms of foreign aid) is they don't have that much to offer to the US compared to some other countries.Everyone spies on everyone.  Does that make it morally right? Not saying so.  But that is simply the reality when you have a world of nations all trying to survive.   And if you think Israel is "singularly responsible" as to why so "many Muslims hate us" you need to brush up on your history and international relations.  Many Islamic ideals are fundamentally opposed with Western ideals, for one; you have poor to no education in many of these corrupt Islamic countries who steal foreign aid to line their own pockets while their citizens suffer in poverty.  The US is known for sticking its nose where it does not belong, but to pretend the US has no interest in the social, economic and political stability of the Middle East is hopelessly ignorant of reality.

Want five more North Koreas with nuclear power unchecked? How about some more megalomaniacs desiring regional domination? Maybe have some more groups like Isis?

The US has made many mistakes in going about its international affairs, but to say it should have no business at all in international affairs is just plain...unrealistic.Is this the one where the kid is grunting like a caveman while the mom is lovingly bragging about how her is is already a genius...while he is grunting like a caveman incapable of language at 4 years old?Wonder how your mom would feel if you said, "and lots of kids have parents who manage their anger and know how to parent without committing a crime and physically harming their child."

My dad did the same - his in his room while my mom was screaming so loud she could be heard two blocks away.  He just "didn't want to deal with it."  They both told me to 'get over it, the good we did as parents outweighs what little bad we did, and you always focus on the bad."

You cannot reason with unreasonable people.  Best thing you can do for yourself is cut them out of your life.  It may be hard at first, as people with non-abusive families have no idea the torment an adult child of abusive parents suffer through, and cannot picture cutting off family.  Cutting my family off was the healthiest and best decision I ever made. Wasn't easy, but once I made the firm decision to do it, it got easier over time and I wish I had done it sooner.

And the "oh, but we love you in our own way!" Oh fuck that shit. That's like the wife-beating husband who punches his wife in the face and says "I do this only because I love you/I still love you/no matter what I love you."

"Love" is not a free pass to absolve or allow abuse. Honey, you ain't foolin' nobody.Double jointed? You mean an xray revealed that your knuckles, for example, have an extra joint? Which joint does the bone attach to then since you have two joints in one location? Do you mean perhaps flexible joints?Thanks for this. I'm so tired of hearing this "I'm double jointed!" brag. NO, fuckwit, think about it if you had a extra joint, where would each bone attach to? You may have flexible joints.  That is very different from having an EXTRA, double joint where in fact only only joint exists.

I use to say I was 'double jointed' when I was 7 because I could do what OP does in his/her pic and bend some fingers all the way back.  Then an adult corrected me.  OP, you are no longer 7, Google exists, look it up and stop sounding like a schmuck.I stand by my comment (meaning no offense to you).  I assume OP is an adult (if OP is 14, I take back the 'fuckwit').  We don't have "double joints" unless a doc takes an xray and it reveals a second joint. I realize the term is often used, but its wrong, it sounds utterly stupid and if OP is an adult (as I assumed) it makes you sound like a fuckwit. He cannot "make it up" to you.  He made a terribly insulting comment when you were in a very vulnerable position. When a person does that, all they can do is apologize, explain why they said what they did, and if possible, you both move on.

But this 'I'll make it up to you' crap, what does that even mean? He will be extra nice and polite? Buy you something? Encourage you to masturabate in front of him?

I'd be pretty devastated if my guy reacted like that. I think you gotta figure out WHY he had that reaction.  Was he raised to think touching oneself is bad?

As for him complaining that you are ruining your Sunday and "moping", tough fucking shit for him. He said something that really hurt you, and you cannot just shut off your emotions like a light switch. Not sure why he said what he did, or why he thinks its no big deal, but you have every right to feel upset.  If you feel down and need your space, take it.Great answer here.  Whatever his reasons for saying it, he is not taking any responsibility for his comment or acting in a mature fashion. He is making himself out as the victim.To you, yes. The metaphoric meaning is known. To many adults I have meant, they truly believe they have an extra joint in their flexible digits.Someone once gave me some useful advice:

Do away with the things in life that cause you severe stress (people, jobs, places, etc.) Simply remove them from your life.

For those things and people you cannot simply remove from your life, you must find a way to deal with them so you do not allow the stress to ruin you.  Its not easy, but you have to find a way that works for you.

From a quick reading of your post, sounds like you need to take responsibility.  You already know the answer to your issue, but it seems you don't want to do it.  You need to stop fucking around.

That means, no more cramming for tests at the last minute, no more not studying and getting a bad grade. No more laying in bed and eating crap.  Nobody is forcing you to act in this manner; you are choosing to be like this.

You have this great chance to go to college and you can easily blow it.  Of course its not always motivating.  So what? College isn't just about learning the material, but learning discipline; what are you going to tell your boss if you don't do your project on time when you get a real job? "Sorry boss, I wasn't motivated?"  You'll be fired and that is not how responsible adults behave.

You need to pay your dues.  That means studying, living in a place you don't like and doing things that do not motivate you. Unless you are independently wealth, that is simply LIFE.

As for happiness? You do fun things in your spare time.  Maybe right now you have little spare time, so you use that to exercise.  It takes up little time, releases happy endorphins and keeps you healthy.  Do well in school so you can get a decent job.

I don't mean to sound hard, but why do you think college should be all fun and game and be a walk in the park? Part of this experience is teaching you that if you want to make it, you MUST do the work even if you don't like it.  Don't do the work? Expect to fail, and you will have only yourself to blame.

Good luck.  You can easily get it together, as once you are treating your body well and doing well in school, that alone will create motivation. Find a balance where you still do enjoyable stuff on the side.Yes, that is exactly what I intended by saying "fuckwit"! You are spot on!  Gosh I wish I had your intellect.
Edit: And what's with the violence? You could just maybe get over it, I dunno.If you have no interest...why bother responding to my post?  So, according to you, because one poster made what you deem a "sufficient" reply to "spread the word", that precludes me from making my own response?  You don't need to like what I say, but you don't get to dictate what I say.

Why, when there is a circlejerk and people are repeating left and right the same thing as if one is in an echo chamber, its perfectly acceptable to add to the circle jerk? But to you, if the opinion is deemed "sufficiently taken care of to spread the word" posters have no right to speak their mind.

Get over it, for fuck's sake.Why are so many people losing it over the term "fuckwit"? I won't (and realistically couldn't) take into account the sensitivities of every single person on Reddit when I post my remarks.  And, neither can you, or anyone else.The best thing I did was leave the town I was raised in.  Even when I cut off contact with my family, I still ran into them, or cousins, or their friends.  These events would inundate me with unpleasant memories I was trying so hard to get behind me, and of course if some family member saw me, new bullshits stories would be spread. (My dad once lied to the entire family and said I had relocated to Brazil, when he knew damn well I had simply taken a 3 week vacation there with my husband. So imagine the surprise when 2 years after the Brazil vacation, I run into a friendly aunt who says, "welcome back from Brazil" and all the truth came out.  My dad had lied because he was too ashamed to admit  that I didn't show up to family functions because we were not speaking. So, he made up a huge lie instead that he could never, ever maintain.)

I moved far away.  And, its WONDERFUL! I never fear running into them.  All the places where abuse happened, which triggered the horrible PTSD, I never had to drive by again.  I used to avoid driving in certain areas, cities or on certain streets that would bring me back to when I was a powerless child.

Certain songs, scents and chain stores could set off the PTSD or otherwise unbearable emotional memories.  I couldn't bear to step into a shoe store, for example, because once I got beat up over a pair of something stupid regarding tennis shoes.

When you move, it does not solve all your problems.  You still must face them, deal with them and move on.  Its not easy.  But its much easier (for me, at least) to have done that in a situation where I was far away from the memories which could not go away because there were reminders everywhere.

Do as well as you can in school and be frugal with money.  Make a compromise with college.  You don't want to bury yourself in loans, but pick a college that will allow you to not have to live with them.  I did what you are doing - but made a few mistakes along the way and ended up getting an email from them every few years. But it really wasn't bad as they never would care enough to actually show up and look for me.

It gets better. I promise.  One you can cut them out of your life, and get some help (and that part will require some tears and facing hard truths) you will slowly get past your anger.

Its very common for an adult who was abused to not be able to accept that their abuse was "that bad" or that even as an adult they are still being emotionally abused or manipulated.   I didn't really accept it fully until I was about 26 and got some help.  I think its that way because deep down, we cannot bear to believe that our own parents would STILL be fucking with our emotions, still be manipulative and still be emotionally abusive after everything that's already happened.

Do not make my mistake:  your family is very unlikely to ever, ever change.  They may be on their best behavior for 2 months, or say the words of apology you want to hear, but its highly unusual for them to really mean it or even understand it.  

You cannot reason with an unreasonable person.  It took me awhile to learn that.  They will not change, no matter how much you want it or how much they and you both try.  Sometimes, its just not meant to be.

You owe it to yourself to have a happy life.  I hope it can work out for you.  Look at that.  You got downvoted for expressing your opinion that OP is likely a strong enough character that OP will not be terribly upset (if OP gives a damn at all) over the comment of one Redditor who used the term "fuckwit".  How dare you express your opinion when said opinion goes against the tide of the popular mood of the moment!

Why does everyone assume I am not feeling fine, or I am angry, or upset, or according to one user, wish to call OP a "cunt, and murder OP's entire family" (which is pretty damn sick).  

I did not say OP is a fuckwit.  And even if I did, so what? I did say that if you are an adult and you claim to have extra JOINTS IN YOUR FINGERS (emphasized for a reason:  use some common sense and take a moment to think about how inane that is) then that "makes you sound like a fuckwit". (Ie: foolish/moron/idiot.  Not  bad person.  Not evil.  Not deserving of violence.) 

Is this a new version of TumberInAction? It sounds like it.  I suppose I am guilty of vocabularyablism?    Whatever it may be, I am done here.  Nothing "wrong" except that is literally (yes, literally) incorrect (ie: wrong).  So, you'll sound like a fuckwit.  But you have free will, so go ahead and use that wrong terminology - it is your inherent right to sound like a fool.  Peace be with you.Ok, I shall dictate this: first, I do not care if people do not like what I have to say in this context; and second, shut the fuck up with your incessant whining, ranting and complaining.  Jesus, you are sounding so butthurt it is making my butt hurt vicariously.  Goodnight, sweet prince.This is fantastic! I was enthralled by the artwork when Hermione read aloud the Death Hallows story in the movie.  Love this painting and would buy a copy if it were for sale.this is lovely and so thoughtful.  please update us with how it goes!
You are stunningly beautiful (this is coming from a woman).  You were beautiful already, but now your unique bone structure of your face is prominent, and damn, your body is smokin'!This is amazing! And to think you just started in April of this year! Your transformation is already so impressive. Can't wait to see your update in another six months.You are stunning. You look years younger compared to your before photo.  Great discipline and love how radiant you look.PM me any time. I had a friend who had helped me.  I remember how she got me to think rationally when my emotions would take over.  For instance, I had decided it would be easiest to send my parents a letter saying I appreciated they had done to support me, and that I wished nothing bad on them and loved them, but I needed my space for my own reasons and to please not contact me.  I figured a letter was much easier than saying it in person, as that would devolve into them accusing me of various shit and me falling apart.

So, I told my friend, "I suppose I should go buy a nice card to write the letter in."  "NO!:, she said.  "Use a regular piece of lined binder paper.  Put it in a regular envelope.  That is good enough."

And, she was right. If I can be there for you, PM me anytime.Has your dog been to the local exorcist lately? May I make a suggestion that its about that time?I didn't read everything, but having gone through a similar thing, I advise this:  Tell your mother that the subject of your physique is off-limits.  Whether its to compliment your body, make an observation of worry, or say you gained or lost weight, she is no longer allowed to say anything. Since you are not asking for her opinion or observations, she is not allowed to offer them as they hurt you.

I had to do this to my mom.  I was once 155 at 5'3 and it really showed.  When I'd come home for visits, I'd get endless comments about it, to the point where I stopped coming home. Then I got in shape, and my mother wouldn't shut up about it. She acted like losing weight made me more valuable, worthy of her time, and a better person.  The entire thing made me feel like shit.

What's terrible is in your case, you have lose weight because you are sick, and she is complimenting this like its a good thing. Its a terrible thing, and she clearly not only has no clue how sick you are or how its affecting you, but she only cares about how you look, not how you feel physically or emotionally.

Put your foot down, she is never to speak about your body or looks again.

After I got in shape, I also got very sick with a spinal tumor and turned into a skeleton.  I got the same "oh, you're so lucky to be so thin!" shit from friends. NO, BITCH, i am NOT lucky, I am dying, I am in severe chronic pain, I am bankrupt and I am on disability.  Want to switch positions?  I worked hard to lose weight and get ripped, that was NOT luck, and then soon after I got sick and lost all the muscle and turned into a stick.

Your mom sounds like just mine.  Cannot accept responsibility that she saying things that hurt.  "But, I thought you'd be happy to hear such a compliment!  But, I only say it because I thought you'd want me to say these things! Can't you take a compliment? I was just being nice, fine, I'll never say anything again."

She cannot be reasoned with.  She is the victim in her mind, and its all about her. So all you can do is tell her if she discusses your body in any way that is off limits, you are leaving her room/house/the convo/hanging up the phone.  No arguments, no drama, you will simply leave.

I am so sorry you are sick.  I remember looking in the mirror when I  had become skeletal and thought how stupid I had been to have always spent so much mental effort in thinking being skinny as a rail would make me more beautiful.  No. I lost all my muscle.  I lost my ass.  I was weak and could barely stand up or walk.  I was in severe physical pain and would often faint or puke from hurting so much.

You need to focus on getting healthy, and that means booting all toxic influences out of your life, including your mom if you must. Your top priority is you.

Best of luck.This isn't your fault.  I did a much more mild version.  Every month I see my pain management doc for opiate refills and she has me take my top off and examine my back and spine, twist left/right.  For some reason, one time she said "now do a little wiggle for me".  Wiggle? Ok. Being a woman, I gave a couple of left-to-right sexy hip-shakes like Nancy Sinatra in her Boots video.  Doctor burst out laughing, I felt stupid but what the hell did "do a little wiggle" mean?Huh? What I did? Or what the doc asked? She was a very nice doctor and just messed up her words.  She is human, after all. She had wanted me to turn my torso right and then left, but I guess it came out wrong.Thank you for asking - very kind.  Cutting my family out was the healthiest and best decision I could have made. As for my health, I was very lucky to avoid paralysis and death by a few hours (finally flew to France for life-saving surgery), but a lot of the damage was done. Severe, daily chronic pain which really limits my life.  Just found out I have a new tumor to add to the fun.

To all you healthy listeners: please, take advantage of being healthy.  I never knew that my body could literally change overnight.  Go try new stuff, old stuff, whatever you find fun.  These things that make you feel alive.  I wish I had gotten into shape sooner, as I would've had more time to enjoy what it feels like to be in shape and healthy (I don't mean "skinny"; I mean healthy and confident in whatever size/shape you are, and at a state where you can do FUN STUFF!)  

I never realized how much I took for granted until a disease took it all away.  

OP: I hope you are able to set that boundary with your mom.  It can be done, even if you live with her.  If she says, "but, but, I don't understand why you're so upset", you simply say "you don't have to understand.  This conversation is over because you did not respect my boundary."   

 I hope the docs find out soon what is going on with you.  You must be your own advocate, do your own research from respected medical sources and get as many opinions as you can until you get a proper diagnosis.

Had I not fought for myself, (it took four years just for me to convince the doctors that yes, the blob on my MRI on my spine WAS a bad thing and not 'an asymptomatic harmless tumor') I would have died.  You know your body best, and as tired as you must be, you must not give up in getting a diagnosis and treatment.Oh yeah, excellent advice.  When I was 15lbs underweight at just shy of 5'3 (and that made me look skeletal, with huge dark circles under my eyes) I just LOVED it when friends said how much "better" I looked.  Who cared that I was dying of a tumor in my spine? My friends knew that, but hey, I was lucky to have friends who cared more about telling me how "great" I looked as a staggering skeleton who could barely stand up and support my own body weight, rather than support me during a catastrophic illness.

OP doesn't need to "grow a thicker skin" to accommodate her mother's underhanded insults that are not compliments at all, but a passive-aggressive means of insulting OP.That is utterly depressing. What a fucked situation.  But if you come from a wealthy family and get shit-faced drunk and get behind the wheel and kill four people, you can get an all-expense paid vacation to a "rehab" center that would put the Ritz to shame because of affluenza.Stupidass first year.  Torts is the easiest subject.  She should've put Securities and then it would be a bit less cringeworthy.Yes and yes.  I was banned for "fat shaming".  I had typed, in response to a post about a husband who was frustrated because his wife had packed on 60lbs and was no longer her active former self, "I am against fat shaming, but being morbidly obese is not healthy in any manner, and fair or not, society may view you as lazy and unwilling to take care of your health."

They banned me. I didn't ask them to overturn it. I just said I disagree, but ok.  They continued to send me PMs telling me I was "a shitty person".  I wrote back ONCE, telling them to stop harassing me as I had not asked for a ban overturn.  Their response? A 3 day ban from me PMing them.Is this guy truly that retarded? LOL! (what the fuck is the LOL? A sign of that small bit of guilt he feels because he knows he's lying, so his "humor" is intended to minimize some of the sting of his evil underhanded method of trying to look hot and cool?)Makes me so sad thinking of Ken Lay's (Enron dude) wife, Linda, when she was blubbering on national TV, "We are fighting for liquidity!"  in response to the interviewer asking how she felt about heaps of people losing their life savings.

Translation:  "We are desperately trying to liquidate our assets into cash and move them surreptitiously to secret offshore accounts so none of the peasants we stole from can recover their losses! Boo hoo, its so hard to fuck peasants over!"This is magical and beautiful and I could stare at it for hours. How can I buy a print? Anyone?With how they reacted, I sort of had that feeling. The fact that I had to preface my statements with "I am against fat shaming" shows how Nazi-like they have become. I have been fat. I hated it. Shaming did not inspire me to work out, treating me like a human being of value, however, did.  I got a trainer, got control of my eating disorder (binge eating) and within a year I had a body I never dreamed I thought I could have, with beautifully sculpted muscles and the stretch marks to prove where I came from.  And I felt fucking amazing and strong and awesome.

But when I stated those things, I was accused of fat shaming. When I stated that glorifying obesity was setting up a future generation for terrible health and an early death? "Fat shaming". Nevermind that these are scientifically proven facts.
I say that cherry-picking things such as, "I have great cholesterol and don't have diabetes" doesn't render you healthy. A chronic smoker may not yet have cancer, but can that smoker run up a flight of stairs without gasping for breath and what do his lungs look like? Charcoal? How do those joints feel when you are carrying around an extra 50-100lbs. "Fat shaming."


The mods' extreme reaction can only lead me to one conclusion: they are morbidly obese, refuse to take responsibility for their condition, accuse ANYONE who has a different opinion on the health values and social effects of obesity than theirs of "fat shaming" et al.
They are doing themselves a huge disservice. By banning anyone who simply states "being obese is not healthy" (and then using that as an excuse to actually PM me and tell me I am "a shitty person") reflects their inability to be rational. If you can't be seen as rational, your end goal (to end fat shaming) becomes lost in the quagmire of your irrational anger and need to rush to accuse someone of anything as a means to exercise their power as mods.


And that "power" appears to be the only control these individuals have in their lives. By banning people who state medical facts in a nice, non-shameful manner, their cause becomes a laughingstock.
Would they accuse me of racism if I say "he is black?" Yes. One mod, YellowFlowerSomething or another, said that if someone has a taste whereby they would not date a black person (because of lack of attraction due to their tastes) that is "racist".
Do these mods date men that are 200lbs overweight? What about 300lbs? Are they allowed to have natural tastes and not want to date white men? NO, that is RACIST!


They fail to see their own hypocrisy. They demand the world (ie: all of us as individuals) change our personal tastes to conform with THEIR personal tastes in order to placate their own insecurities. Their desire for said change is to be more "inclusive" of all shapes, colors and sizes of people".


But, hell hath no fury if your tastes don't confirm to their tastes. Their "open-mindedness, effyourbeautystandards, everyoneisbeautiful" all goes right out the window as soon as an individual's tastes and preferences do not conform with theirs.


And this is coming from a woman who has battled weight issues, who was fat-shamed (I mean True fat-shaming, none of this "thin privilege" bullshit, but family and people just waltzing up to my face and telling me how fat my ass was), who got healthy and learned to love her body, got fit, got ripped at one point, got very sick so couldn't work out, but still learned that healthy eating habits are a lifelong lifestyle if you want to be healthy.


Hey: if you are obese, and love yourself, good for you! I'm serious. You are an adult, you know the dangers and you can make your own choices. But do not force your choices on me. Do not whine that clothes are neither made "cute" in your size, or that they shouldn't be more expensive (why not, considering larger clothes mean more materials; twin-size sheets cost less than king-sized sheets and I don't see anyone whining over that); do not whine that its "unfair" for them to buy two plane seats if they cannot fit into one seat. Do not whine that "2/3 of the US is obese so we should start manufacturing planes, buildings, clothing, beds, chairs, seats, TOILET SEATS, add more scooters at Walmart for fat people who are not disabled but are simply too fat to walk and carry their own body weight; do not demand that men "have sex with an overweight woman (how would you feel as a woman if overweight men whined that hot women owed THEM sex?).


Ok. Rant done.I think you're right.  I was so annoyed over his bullshit that I actually felt...anger at how douchey he was.  I need to conserve my anger for more worthwhile reasons.Who the fuck does that? Gets stopped committing a crime and offers to shake the person's hand? WTF is going on in their mind? If I were an aikido master, I'd take that extended hand and flip that fucker on his head then later claim he reached for me and I felt threatened.Oh for fuck's sake, do I need to put in an /s where it should be obvious?  Suppose so.Is there a technique for that for a woman? One that does not involve us revealing our bare ass for the world to see? Men can look so cool when they pee.  We women just squat, with our asses hanging out and look uncomfortable and nervous.I am in a lot of spine pain.  Every day. Every hour. Every minute.  Its severe enough that I had to quit work.  Even with heavy meds I am always in pain. Its become this living entity inside me that fucks with my body and with my head.  

I've forgotten what its like to not be in pain, to sleep well, to not have violent nightmares of people hurting me, to wake up feeling well-rested. 

I know many others have it much, much worse.  But oh, I so miss not being in pain.  I miss it so very much.  This is entirely possible! Been there myself.  It is doable and it doesn't need to be a miserable experience or involve you starving yourself. Tell your Mrs I wish she felt better too.  Chronic pain is a real bitch.  It also hurts the ones that love the person in pain because they feel so powerless.As funny as this is (and its really, really entertaining) does Red have his wires crossed up there? He doesn't sound all that mentally together. (And he's an Uber driver? Eeek.)Seeing something as adorable as that is the perfect way to start every day.  I love the look mama dog gives once her tail is caught.My dog isn't a lab (a pointer/dalmation mix) and it seemed like overnight she went from playful, naughty puppy to philosophical, uppity dog who refused to play with her onetime friend (a really sweet lassie dog).  That poor dog didn't know what she did wrong.  She would prance and jump and playfully growl at my dog who would deliberately ignore her.

While its much easier to take care of my dog now, I miss a lot of things, especially when she would root around in her toy box for the toy of the moment and come prancing out with it like she just won the lottery.That was both beautiful and hilarious and especially touching with the "leave your chips out".  Nice of him to leave his gf laying in the road. Yeah. I figured he was pretty stunned and got his bell rung hard, wasn't thinking quite straight.  But what an idiot, to pass on the left right before an intersection. You look incredible.  I'm also a short woman, and you're right. A few lbs gain can mean my ass no longer fits into my form-fitting clothes.  Great job and thanks for sharing.Excellent advice, except for those like this poor guy who lives in poverty and could never afford a helmet.If I may:  I'm barely 5'3, and when I was married to a 6'4 man, I used to crawl on top of him (I'd wait until he was lying down, not easy to do while he was standing up) and feel the most peaceful, secure relaxation ever. I'd fall into the deepest sleep, and his body heat kept me warm.  

So, I completely understand your three assholes waking you up and crawling on you.  You make them feel good.Kitty loves it! I want to be in that place.  I want to watch young deer grooming kittens.I love how the Corgi barely even notices.  Just wait until that cat is fully grown.I have a major spine injury and I can't handle any impact sports, and even swimming is not longer an option.  I am in constant, severe pain but yoga is the one thing I can do. So, I kind of understand where you are.

First: you must do extra work to strengthen your core.  http://www.amazon.com/Pilates-Anatomy-Rael-Isacowitz-ebook/dp/B0059DL0UC/ref=sr_1_10?s=books&amp;ie=UTF8&amp;qid=1446584839&amp;sr=1-10&amp;keywords=core+pilates

I have that book.  It is excellent.  I d/l it to my ipad and I do those exercises at home.  It has images of which muscles are being used and really discusses (make sure to read it!) the proper form (wrong form can worsen your back issues).  Pilates for core strength will help you tremendously.  This book I liked over others because it tells you what to do and in what order.  It has various programs from beginner to advanced.  All you need is a mat. 

Of course I know nothing about your injury, but avoid anything that hurts.  Differentiate between "pain" and "intensity".  Intensity is good, pain means stop.  I cannot arch back or twist right to left, so I need to modify a lot of yoga moves.  If you get one of those Nazi instructors that pressure you to do things even if it hurts you, that is the wrong teacher for you.

As someone else posted, there are many yoga teachers out there who really don't understand anatomy.  It is far too easy to get certified, in my humble opinion.  You know your body best, so trust your judgment.

Expect to be very challenged and very sore the first month! It gets better, I promise.  And if you do the pilates work at home 3x a week, for 30 minutes each time, you will progress much faster, because so much of yoga requires a strong core.  

When I started, I silently sobbed into a towel in the back of class and would pop extra pain pills to make it to the end, and had to sit out many moves. I couldn't do one down-facing dog (and I used to be a ballet dancer, but that's how weak I had become from a spine tumor, nerve damage, blah blah blah.)  Six months later, I was much stronger, felt better, was no longer crying and while I still had a ways to go, I made improvements I never thought possible.

If you can't find a good studio that is affordable (because the wrong teacher can really hurt you) there are some really well-known youtube videos with instructors who know their shit and will talk you through the movement.  Of course its always best to have an instructor work with you live, but its not always possible.

Good luck!  And, get that book! I'm not shilling for it, I don't know the author, but have spent way too much money on various core strength books and by far that one is the best.  While its a woman on the cover, it works just as well for men since our muscles are in the same place.That user's remark about even one session is great advice.  Even an experienced pilates instructor may even be better, because you must strengthen your core to stabilize and protect your spine. I did a few sessions with a pilates PT therapist, and she made tiny, yet significant changes in my posture while doing the moves that completely changed their efficacy.  If you do the moves but with the wrong form you not only waste time, but you do nothing to strengthen your core and run the risk of hurting yourself.  

Once I had those few sessions with her, I felt confident (along with that book I linked in another post here that I often consulted) to keep in mind the proper posture until over time it became second nature.With my injury, I had an unbearable pain with certain asanas (yoga postures).  It just may be that certain asanas are just not an option for you right now, as a beginner.  Maybe not ever, depending on your injury.  Can you try and observe what pain you feel during class? The yoga is also using muscles you likely have not used in awhile, or have underused your entire life if yoga is new to you.  

Remember - if you feel pain (different than intensity or fatigue) during a move, stop immediately.  I have an instructor that sings.  Yes, the bitch SINGS during Savasana.  Isn't that the time for quiet for us to reflect or not think? NOOOO.  It STILL has to be all about her.  She fires off a few songs in Hindi or Urdu or Yogi or whatever, and I end up getting so angry with her ego that the whole point of relaxation at the end of the class is gone.
My instructor sings.  The bitch SINGS. The entire savasana.  Why can't we have a moment of peace?This made me laugh.  Just the other day I was grinding my teeth when the instructor was saying how a certain move was "so good for massaging the kidneys to release the evil toxins". My teacher likes saying "whatever is happening to you in life, no matter how bad, is happening because it is MEANT to.  You are where you are MEANT to be. So, take peace in that."  She says this to people she knows are dying of cancer.  Really, "massage my liver"? Are you nuts? A certain pose releases "toxins"? How do you even define a toxin? Our kidneys and liver does most of our filtering and then we sweat a tiny amount of the so-called "toxins" out.  Some teachers I have just repeat shit they heard on the internet:  "this pose releases emotional tension in women rather than men because women store anger in their hips".  WTF?  

It is scary how easy it is to get certified.  I don't mind a teacher saying a sentence here or there during class or during the namaste-time, even if I think its nonsense, because they keep their chatter to a minimum. Its when they can't shut the fuck up and are afraid of silence, and make it worse by yammering incessantly about pseudo-science of organ-massaging and toxins that I want to throw shit.Yes. Similar thing happened to my man. Dumbass dentist misdiagnosed what was a badly infected upper molar.  Didn't clean or stop the infection, it calcified into his sinus cavities and his ENT had to take a circular saw to break it down during surgery as she said she'd never seen such a case.  He has a massive headache for six months, lost 30lbs from an already skinny frame, couldn't turn his head and I wanted to beat the hell out of his dentist who caused all this.  

Hope your mom recovered well from her surgery. Its an awful experience.I wish I could tell her that.  Why does she think we need a goddamn lullaby for savasana? She has a crap voice and its always the same freakin' song.That's just scatological.This is some of the funniest shit I've read in awhile.  It's also has the power of taking away some of the fear I had when I first watched the original Nightmare on Elm Street some thirty years ago.  Well done.This hit me much harder than I thought.  Figured it would just be another one of your highly entertaining stories, but now I'm wrapped up in the whole meaning of life thing.DAMN! You look so handsome.  I congratulate you on your hard work and dedication.  You are fit, athletic, energetic and radiating happiness.  I know weight loss doesn't solve all of life's problems, but you eliminated a good portion of them. Great job.Man. You truly and wholly fucked that up.  And you meant so well.  Your heart was in the right place. But damn, what a fuckup!Yes.  And there is a very good reason Israel gets that much money. It is the only friend of the US in that area, the only True democracy and let's go with the downvotes!Because as a tax payer, your individual preferences for which country gets what is irrelevant. You have your chance to elect leaders in various respects who will (hopefully)  rely upon educated, experienced and knowledgeable aides and assistants to assist them in making informed decisions on foreign and military aid, and who have access to heaps of information that you never even knew existed, much less can understand its significance.Please just let them help you and push away thoughts of being a burden.  You are lucky to have them.  And you would do the same for them.  It will be easier on them if you allow them to help you during this trying time.

Have you contacted the new clinic yet? It may take time to get in, and you are in a dangerous place not having a PM doc, so you need to get  that settled straight away

I hope the upcoming tests give you some answers. I've been waiting for my nerve conduction test for three months. My doctor always 
"forgets" or has something else (vacation) going on.  Oh, how I would love to punch him in the jaw.Brilliant advice. "Now, be a good student and don't stand up for yourself. Let the bad guys intimidate or push you into a corner, far away from other people or escape  routes. And only THEN, when you are cornered, have no escape, are surrounded and the bully knows you will let him beat your ass, take action!"Its all a matter of the US wanting to protect what it sees as "their interests".  A short example:  9/11 attackers came from the Middle East.  Oil comes from the Mid East.  Nothing "useful" to the US comes from, for example, certain area of Africa, so the US does nothing when one tribe starts slaughtering another.If you truly think those other countries are "friends" of the US, the only "joke" here is your own knowledge.Parents have a way of "forgetting" their bad deeds. My psycho mother broke my nose with a backhand when I was 9 (her watch connected with my nose).  All her beatings were neck-up (usually its the other way around.)

She told me once she "I don't remember a thing because I must've felt really bad about it."  Also, "some kids get beat much worse."

This is a mom that lived in a rich community, drove a BMW, didn't have to work, etc.  With a husband who took care of her like a princess.  And she wonders why I refuse to speak to her.As soon as you can, get out and cut ties.  That was the best thing I did.  Financially, it was tempting at times to accept their offers, but those offers always, always came with a string attached.  When I graduated to cutting off all contact, my life became much better, and that dark cloud that followed me around drifted away over time.  

Hang in there.This is one of the most horrible things I have read on this thread.  As a kid, you have no idea that your 'normal' is actually very abnormal. For years you suffer through each day, not knowing why you are hurting and feel so out of place.  So sorry this crime happened to you.That last pic of the dog snuggling with your dad nearly brought me to tears.  The night I adopted my dog, not knowing her past I didn't know if she'd maul me in my sleep.  

Nope.  She jumped on the bed, curled up right next to me and slept peacefully the entire night, in such a deep, trusting sleep that she did not move once.  I will never forget that night.  She must've been so relieved and happy to have been out of that scary doggie jail.That  story makes me want to commit violence on those people who locked her up.  Why do people who don't care to make time for dogs bother gettings dogs? This doggie is now saved and understands what its like to be loved, and can finally have a happy doggie life!That's adorable, but "friends" in the context of international diplomacy isn't the same as "friends" in the context of your social circle.  The US and Canada are friends.  Does the US ever say, "Hey Canada, we're sort of unable for various reasons to treat some of our sick citizens, so would you mind treating them for us for free for awhile? We'll hit you up next time around. Friends, right?"It truly touches the depths of your heart.  My dog was nearly 2 and had never been on a leash and on her first busy-street crossing, she looked, said "no", laid on the sidewalk and hid her head in her paws. It was both heartbreaking and adorable.Israel is the only country out of all on your list that is not an Islamic dictatorship.  That right there reflects the inherent limitations when working with these Islamic countries.  There is no "perfect" ally for the US, but the US will give the most money to the ally that assists the US to the greatest degree in whatever the US deems are in its national interests.

Like it or not, that's just a fact of national survival.Kuwait is a solid ally of the US, and you're right, without our help, they'd be fucked. Their only "problem" (in terms of foreign aid) is they don't have that much to offer to the US compared to some other countries.Everyone spies on everyone.  Does that make it morally right? Not saying so.  But that is simply the reality when you have a world of nations all trying to survive.   And if you think Israel is "singularly responsible" as to why so "many Muslims hate us" you need to brush up on your history and international relations.  Many Islamic ideals are fundamentally opposed with Western ideals, for one; you have poor to no education in many of these corrupt Islamic countries who steal foreign aid to line their own pockets while their citizens suffer in poverty.  The US is known for sticking its nose where it does not belong, but to pretend the US has no interest in the social, economic and political stability of the Middle East is hopelessly ignorant of reality.

Want five more North Koreas with nuclear power unchecked? How about some more megalomaniacs desiring regional domination? Maybe have some more groups like Isis?

The US has made many mistakes in going about its international affairs, but to say it should have no business at all in international affairs is just plain...unrealistic.Is this the one where the kid is grunting like a caveman while the mom is lovingly bragging about how her is is already a genius...while he is grunting like a caveman incapable of language at 4 years old?Wonder how your mom would feel if you said, "and lots of kids have parents who manage their anger and know how to parent without committing a crime and physically harming their child."

My dad did the same - his in his room while my mom was screaming so loud she could be heard two blocks away.  He just "didn't want to deal with it."  They both told me to 'get over it, the good we did as parents outweighs what little bad we did, and you always focus on the bad."

You cannot reason with unreasonable people.  Best thing you can do for yourself is cut them out of your life.  It may be hard at first, as people with non-abusive families have no idea the torment an adult child of abusive parents suffer through, and cannot picture cutting off family.  Cutting my family off was the healthiest and best decision I ever made. Wasn't easy, but once I made the firm decision to do it, it got easier over time and I wish I had done it sooner.

And the "oh, but we love you in our own way!" Oh fuck that shit. That's like the wife-beating husband who punches his wife in the face and says "I do this only because I love you/I still love you/no matter what I love you."

"Love" is not a free pass to absolve or allow abuse. Honey, you ain't foolin' nobody.Double jointed? You mean an xray revealed that your knuckles, for example, have an extra joint? Which joint does the bone attach to then since you have two joints in one location? Do you mean perhaps flexible joints?Thanks for this. I'm so tired of hearing this "I'm double jointed!" brag. NO, fuckwit, think about it if you had a extra joint, where would each bone attach to? You may have flexible joints.  That is very different from having an EXTRA, double joint where in fact only only joint exists.

I use to say I was 'double jointed' when I was 7 because I could do what OP does in his/her pic and bend some fingers all the way back.  Then an adult corrected me.  OP, you are no longer 7, Google exists, look it up and stop sounding like a schmuck.I stand by my comment (meaning no offense to you).  I assume OP is an adult (if OP is 14, I take back the 'fuckwit').  We don't have "double joints" unless a doc takes an xray and it reveals a second joint. I realize the term is often used, but its wrong, it sounds utterly stupid and if OP is an adult (as I assumed) it makes you sound like a fuckwit. He cannot "make it up" to you.  He made a terribly insulting comment when you were in a very vulnerable position. When a person does that, all they can do is apologize, explain why they said what they did, and if possible, you both move on.

But this 'I'll make it up to you' crap, what does that even mean? He will be extra nice and polite? Buy you something? Encourage you to masturabate in front of him?

I'd be pretty devastated if my guy reacted like that. I think you gotta figure out WHY he had that reaction.  Was he raised to think touching oneself is bad?

As for him complaining that you are ruining your Sunday and "moping", tough fucking shit for him. He said something that really hurt you, and you cannot just shut off your emotions like a light switch. Not sure why he said what he did, or why he thinks its no big deal, but you have every right to feel upset.  If you feel down and need your space, take it.Great answer here.  Whatever his reasons for saying it, he is not taking any responsibility for his comment or acting in a mature fashion. He is making himself out as the victim.To you, yes. The metaphoric meaning is known. To many adults I have meant, they truly believe they have an extra joint in their flexible digits.Someone once gave me some useful advice:

Do away with the things in life that cause you severe stress (people, jobs, places, etc.) Simply remove them from your life.

For those things and people you cannot simply remove from your life, you must find a way to deal with them so you do not allow the stress to ruin you.  Its not easy, but you have to find a way that works for you.

From a quick reading of your post, sounds like you need to take responsibility.  You already know the answer to your issue, but it seems you don't want to do it.  You need to stop fucking around.

That means, no more cramming for tests at the last minute, no more not studying and getting a bad grade. No more laying in bed and eating crap.  Nobody is forcing you to act in this manner; you are choosing to be like this.

You have this great chance to go to college and you can easily blow it.  Of course its not always motivating.  So what? College isn't just about learning the material, but learning discipline; what are you going to tell your boss if you don't do your project on time when you get a real job? "Sorry boss, I wasn't motivated?"  You'll be fired and that is not how responsible adults behave.

You need to pay your dues.  That means studying, living in a place you don't like and doing things that do not motivate you. Unless you are independently wealth, that is simply LIFE.

As for happiness? You do fun things in your spare time.  Maybe right now you have little spare time, so you use that to exercise.  It takes up little time, releases happy endorphins and keeps you healthy.  Do well in school so you can get a decent job.

I don't mean to sound hard, but why do you think college should be all fun and game and be a walk in the park? Part of this experience is teaching you that if you want to make it, you MUST do the work even if you don't like it.  Don't do the work? Expect to fail, and you will have only yourself to blame.

Good luck.  You can easily get it together, as once you are treating your body well and doing well in school, that alone will create motivation. Find a balance where you still do enjoyable stuff on the side.Yes, that is exactly what I intended by saying "fuckwit"! You are spot on!  Gosh I wish I had your intellect.
Edit: And what's with the violence? You could just maybe get over it, I dunno.If you have no interest...why bother responding to my post?  So, according to you, because one poster made what you deem a "sufficient" reply to "spread the word", that precludes me from making my own response?  You don't need to like what I say, but you don't get to dictate what I say.

Why, when there is a circlejerk and people are repeating left and right the same thing as if one is in an echo chamber, its perfectly acceptable to add to the circle jerk? But to you, if the opinion is deemed "sufficiently taken care of to spread the word" posters have no right to speak their mind.

Get over it, for fuck's sake.Why are so many people losing it over the term "fuckwit"? I won't (and realistically couldn't) take into account the sensitivities of every single person on Reddit when I post my remarks.  And, neither can you, or anyone else.The best thing I did was leave the town I was raised in.  Even when I cut off contact with my family, I still ran into them, or cousins, or their friends.  These events would inundate me with unpleasant memories I was trying so hard to get behind me, and of course if some family member saw me, new bullshits stories would be spread. (My dad once lied to the entire family and said I had relocated to Brazil, when he knew damn well I had simply taken a 3 week vacation there with my husband. So imagine the surprise when 2 years after the Brazil vacation, I run into a friendly aunt who says, "welcome back from Brazil" and all the truth came out.  My dad had lied because he was too ashamed to admit  that I didn't show up to family functions because we were not speaking. So, he made up a huge lie instead that he could never, ever maintain.)

I moved far away.  And, its WONDERFUL! I never fear running into them.  All the places where abuse happened, which triggered the horrible PTSD, I never had to drive by again.  I used to avoid driving in certain areas, cities or on certain streets that would bring me back to when I was a powerless child.

Certain songs, scents and chain stores could set off the PTSD or otherwise unbearable emotional memories.  I couldn't bear to step into a shoe store, for example, because once I got beat up over a pair of something stupid regarding tennis shoes.

When you move, it does not solve all your problems.  You still must face them, deal with them and move on.  Its not easy.  But its much easier (for me, at least) to have done that in a situation where I was far away from the memories which could not go away because there were reminders everywhere.

Do as well as you can in school and be frugal with money.  Make a compromise with college.  You don't want to bury yourself in loans, but pick a college that will allow you to not have to live with them.  I did what you are doing - but made a few mistakes along the way and ended up getting an email from them every few years. But it really wasn't bad as they never would care enough to actually show up and look for me.

It gets better. I promise.  One you can cut them out of your life, and get some help (and that part will require some tears and facing hard truths) you will slowly get past your anger.

Its very common for an adult who was abused to not be able to accept that their abuse was "that bad" or that even as an adult they are still being emotionally abused or manipulated.   I didn't really accept it fully until I was about 26 and got some help.  I think its that way because deep down, we cannot bear to believe that our own parents would STILL be fucking with our emotions, still be manipulative and still be emotionally abusive after everything that's already happened.

Do not make my mistake:  your family is very unlikely to ever, ever change.  They may be on their best behavior for 2 months, or say the words of apology you want to hear, but its highly unusual for them to really mean it or even understand it.  

You cannot reason with an unreasonable person.  It took me awhile to learn that.  They will not change, no matter how much you want it or how much they and you both try.  Sometimes, its just not meant to be.

You owe it to yourself to have a happy life.  I hope it can work out for you.  Look at that.  You got downvoted for expressing your opinion that OP is likely a strong enough character that OP will not be terribly upset (if OP gives a damn at all) over the comment of one Redditor who used the term "fuckwit".  How dare you express your opinion when said opinion goes against the tide of the popular mood of the moment!

Why does everyone assume I am not feeling fine, or I am angry, or upset, or according to one user, wish to call OP a "cunt, and murder OP's entire family" (which is pretty damn sick).  

I did not say OP is a fuckwit.  And even if I did, so what? I did say that if you are an adult and you claim to have extra JOINTS IN YOUR FINGERS (emphasized for a reason:  use some common sense and take a moment to think about how inane that is) then that "makes you sound like a fuckwit". (Ie: foolish/moron/idiot.  Not  bad person.  Not evil.  Not deserving of violence.) 

Is this a new version of TumberInAction? It sounds like it.  I suppose I am guilty of vocabularyablism?    Whatever it may be, I am done here.  Nothing "wrong" except that is literally (yes, literally) incorrect (ie: wrong).  So, you'll sound like a fuckwit.  But you have free will, so go ahead and use that wrong terminology - it is your inherent right to sound like a fool.  Peace be with you.Ok, I shall dictate this: first, I do not care if people do not like what I have to say in this context; and second, shut the fuck up with your incessant whining, ranting and complaining.  Jesus, you are sounding so butthurt it is making my butt hurt vicariously.  Goodnight, sweet prince.This is fantastic! I was enthralled by the artwork when Hermione read aloud the Death Hallows story in the movie.  Love this painting and would buy a copy if it were for sale.this is lovely and so thoughtful.  please update us with how it goes!
You are stunningly beautiful (this is coming from a woman).  You were beautiful already, but now your unique bone structure of your face is prominent, and damn, your body is smokin'!This is amazing! And to think you just started in April of this year! Your transformation is already so impressive. Can't wait to see your update in another six months.You are stunning. You look years younger compared to your before photo.  Great discipline and love how radiant you look.PM me any time. I had a friend who had helped me.  I remember how she got me to think rationally when my emotions would take over.  For instance, I had decided it would be easiest to send my parents a letter saying I appreciated they had done to support me, and that I wished nothing bad on them and loved them, but I needed my space for my own reasons and to please not contact me.  I figured a letter was much easier than saying it in person, as that would devolve into them accusing me of various shit and me falling apart.

So, I told my friend, "I suppose I should go buy a nice card to write the letter in."  "NO!:, she said.  "Use a regular piece of lined binder paper.  Put it in a regular envelope.  That is good enough."

And, she was right. If I can be there for you, PM me anytime.Has your dog been to the local exorcist lately? May I make a suggestion that its about that time?I didn't read everything, but having gone through a similar thing, I advise this:  Tell your mother that the subject of your physique is off-limits.  Whether its to compliment your body, make an observation of worry, or say you gained or lost weight, she is no longer allowed to say anything. Since you are not asking for her opinion or observations, she is not allowed to offer them as they hurt you.

I had to do this to my mom.  I was once 155 at 5'3 and it really showed.  When I'd come home for visits, I'd get endless comments about it, to the point where I stopped coming home. Then I got in shape, and my mother wouldn't shut up about it. She acted like losing weight made me more valuable, worthy of her time, and a better person.  The entire thing made me feel like shit.

What's terrible is in your case, you have lose weight because you are sick, and she is complimenting this like its a good thing. Its a terrible thing, and she clearly not only has no clue how sick you are or how its affecting you, but she only cares about how you look, not how you feel physically or emotionally.

Put your foot down, she is never to speak about your body or looks again.

After I got in shape, I also got very sick with a spinal tumor and turned into a skeleton.  I got the same "oh, you're so lucky to be so thin!" shit from friends. NO, BITCH, i am NOT lucky, I am dying, I am in severe chronic pain, I am bankrupt and I am on disability.  Want to switch positions?  I worked hard to lose weight and get ripped, that was NOT luck, and then soon after I got sick and lost all the muscle and turned into a stick.

Your mom sounds like just mine.  Cannot accept responsibility that she saying things that hurt.  "But, I thought you'd be happy to hear such a compliment!  But, I only say it because I thought you'd want me to say these things! Can't you take a compliment? I was just being nice, fine, I'll never say anything again."

She cannot be reasoned with.  She is the victim in her mind, and its all about her. So all you can do is tell her if she discusses your body in any way that is off limits, you are leaving her room/house/the convo/hanging up the phone.  No arguments, no drama, you will simply leave.

I am so sorry you are sick.  I remember looking in the mirror when I  had become skeletal and thought how stupid I had been to have always spent so much mental effort in thinking being skinny as a rail would make me more beautiful.  No. I lost all my muscle.  I lost my ass.  I was weak and could barely stand up or walk.  I was in severe physical pain and would often faint or puke from hurting so much.

You need to focus on getting healthy, and that means booting all toxic influences out of your life, including your mom if you must. Your top priority is you.

Best of luck.This isn't your fault.  I did a much more mild version.  Every month I see my pain management doc for opiate refills and she has me take my top off and examine my back and spine, twist left/right.  For some reason, one time she said "now do a little wiggle for me".  Wiggle? Ok. Being a woman, I gave a couple of left-to-right sexy hip-shakes like Nancy Sinatra in her Boots video.  Doctor burst out laughing, I felt stupid but what the hell did "do a little wiggle" mean?Huh? What I did? Or what the doc asked? She was a very nice doctor and just messed up her words.  She is human, after all. She had wanted me to turn my torso right and then left, but I guess it came out wrong.Thank you for asking - very kind.  Cutting my family out was the healthiest and best decision I could have made. As for my health, I was very lucky to avoid paralysis and death by a few hours (finally flew to France for life-saving surgery), but a lot of the damage was done. Severe, daily chronic pain which really limits my life.  Just found out I have a new tumor to add to the fun.

To all you healthy listeners: please, take advantage of being healthy.  I never knew that my body could literally change overnight.  Go try new stuff, old stuff, whatever you find fun.  These things that make you feel alive.  I wish I had gotten into shape sooner, as I would've had more time to enjoy what it feels like to be in shape and healthy (I don't mean "skinny"; I mean healthy and confident in whatever size/shape you are, and at a state where you can do FUN STUFF!)  

I never realized how much I took for granted until a disease took it all away.  

OP: I hope you are able to set that boundary with your mom.  It can be done, even if you live with her.  If she says, "but, but, I don't understand why you're so upset", you simply say "you don't have to understand.  This conversation is over because you did not respect my boundary."   

 I hope the docs find out soon what is going on with you.  You must be your own advocate, do your own research from respected medical sources and get as many opinions as you can until you get a proper diagnosis.

Had I not fought for myself, (it took four years just for me to convince the doctors that yes, the blob on my MRI on my spine WAS a bad thing and not 'an asymptomatic harmless tumor') I would have died.  You know your body best, and as tired as you must be, you must not give up in getting a diagnosis and treatment.Oh yeah, excellent advice.  When I was 15lbs underweight at just shy of 5'3 (and that made me look skeletal, with huge dark circles under my eyes) I just LOVED it when friends said how much "better" I looked.  Who cared that I was dying of a tumor in my spine? My friends knew that, but hey, I was lucky to have friends who cared more about telling me how "great" I looked as a staggering skeleton who could barely stand up and support my own body weight, rather than support me during a catastrophic illness.

OP doesn't need to "grow a thicker skin" to accommodate her mother's underhanded insults that are not compliments at all, but a passive-aggressive means of insulting OP.That is utterly depressing. What a fucked situation.  But if you come from a wealthy family and get shit-faced drunk and get behind the wheel and kill four people, you can get an all-expense paid vacation to a "rehab" center that would put the Ritz to shame because of affluenza.Stupidass first year.  Torts is the easiest subject.  She should've put Securities and then it would be a bit less cringeworthy.Yes and yes.  I was banned for "fat shaming".  I had typed, in response to a post about a husband who was frustrated because his wife had packed on 60lbs and was no longer her active former self, "I am against fat shaming, but being morbidly obese is not healthy in any manner, and fair or not, society may view you as lazy and unwilling to take care of your health."

They banned me. I didn't ask them to overturn it. I just said I disagree, but ok.  They continued to send me PMs telling me I was "a shitty person".  I wrote back ONCE, telling them to stop harassing me as I had not asked for a ban overturn.  Their response? A 3 day ban from me PMing them.Is this guy truly that retarded? LOL! (what the fuck is the LOL? A sign of that small bit of guilt he feels because he knows he's lying, so his "humor" is intended to minimize some of the sting of his evil underhanded method of trying to look hot and cool?)Makes me so sad thinking of Ken Lay's (Enron dude) wife, Linda, when she was blubbering on national TV, "We are fighting for liquidity!"  in response to the interviewer asking how she felt about heaps of people losing their life savings.

Translation:  "We are desperately trying to liquidate our assets into cash and move them surreptitiously to secret offshore accounts so none of the peasants we stole from can recover their losses! Boo hoo, its so hard to fuck peasants over!"This is magical and beautiful and I could stare at it for hours. How can I buy a print? Anyone?With how they reacted, I sort of had that feeling. The fact that I had to preface my statements with "I am against fat shaming" shows how Nazi-like they have become. I have been fat. I hated it. Shaming did not inspire me to work out, treating me like a human being of value, however, did.  I got a trainer, got control of my eating disorder (binge eating) and within a year I had a body I never dreamed I thought I could have, with beautifully sculpted muscles and the stretch marks to prove where I came from.  And I felt fucking amazing and strong and awesome.

But when I stated those things, I was accused of fat shaming. When I stated that glorifying obesity was setting up a future generation for terrible health and an early death? "Fat shaming". Nevermind that these are scientifically proven facts.
I say that cherry-picking things such as, "I have great cholesterol and don't have diabetes" doesn't render you healthy. A chronic smoker may not yet have cancer, but can that smoker run up a flight of stairs without gasping for breath and what do his lungs look like? Charcoal? How do those joints feel when you are carrying around an extra 50-100lbs. "Fat shaming."


The mods' extreme reaction can only lead me to one conclusion: they are morbidly obese, refuse to take responsibility for their condition, accuse ANYONE who has a different opinion on the health values and social effects of obesity than theirs of "fat shaming" et al.
They are doing themselves a huge disservice. By banning anyone who simply states "being obese is not healthy" (and then using that as an excuse to actually PM me and tell me I am "a shitty person") reflects their inability to be rational. If you can't be seen as rational, your end goal (to end fat shaming) becomes lost in the quagmire of your irrational anger and need to rush to accuse someone of anything as a means to exercise their power as mods.


And that "power" appears to be the only control these individuals have in their lives. By banning people who state medical facts in a nice, non-shameful manner, their cause becomes a laughingstock.
Would they accuse me of racism if I say "he is black?" Yes. One mod, YellowFlowerSomething or another, said that if someone has a taste whereby they would not date a black person (because of lack of attraction due to their tastes) that is "racist".
Do these mods date men that are 200lbs overweight? What about 300lbs? Are they allowed to have natural tastes and not want to date white men? NO, that is RACIST!


They fail to see their own hypocrisy. They demand the world (ie: all of us as individuals) change our personal tastes to conform with THEIR personal tastes in order to placate their own insecurities. Their desire for said change is to be more "inclusive" of all shapes, colors and sizes of people".


But, hell hath no fury if your tastes don't confirm to their tastes. Their "open-mindedness, effyourbeautystandards, everyoneisbeautiful" all goes right out the window as soon as an individual's tastes and preferences do not conform with theirs.


And this is coming from a woman who has battled weight issues, who was fat-shamed (I mean True fat-shaming, none of this "thin privilege" bullshit, but family and people just waltzing up to my face and telling me how fat my ass was), who got healthy and learned to love her body, got fit, got ripped at one point, got very sick so couldn't work out, but still learned that healthy eating habits are a lifelong lifestyle if you want to be healthy.


Hey: if you are obese, and love yourself, good for you! I'm serious. You are an adult, you know the dangers and you can make your own choices. But do not force your choices on me. Do not whine that clothes are neither made "cute" in your size, or that they shouldn't be more expensive (why not, considering larger clothes mean more materials; twin-size sheets cost less than king-sized sheets and I don't see anyone whining over that); do not whine that its "unfair" for them to buy two plane seats if they cannot fit into one seat. Do not whine that "2/3 of the US is obese so we should start manufacturing planes, buildings, clothing, beds, chairs, seats, TOILET SEATS, add more scooters at Walmart for fat people who are not disabled but are simply too fat to walk and carry their own body weight; do not demand that men "have sex with an overweight woman (how would you feel as a woman if overweight men whined that hot women owed THEM sex?).


Ok. Rant done.I think you're right.  I was so annoyed over his bullshit that I actually felt...anger at how douchey he was.  I need to conserve my anger for more worthwhile reasons.Who the fuck does that? Gets stopped committing a crime and offers to shake the person's hand? WTF is going on in their mind? If I were an aikido master, I'd take that extended hand and flip that fucker on his head then later claim he reached for me and I felt threatened.Oh for fuck's sake, do I need to put in an /s where it should be obvious?  Suppose so.Is there a technique for that for a woman? One that does not involve us revealing our bare ass for the world to see? Men can look so cool when they pee.  We women just squat, with our asses hanging out and look uncomfortable and nervous.I am in a lot of spine pain.  Every day. Every hour. Every minute.  Its severe enough that I had to quit work.  Even with heavy meds I am always in pain. Its become this living entity inside me that fucks with my body and with my head.  

I've forgotten what its like to not be in pain, to sleep well, to not have violent nightmares of people hurting me, to wake up feeling well-rested. 

I know many others have it much, much worse.  But oh, I so miss not being in pain.  I miss it so very much.  This is entirely possible! Been there myself.  It is doable and it doesn't need to be a miserable experience or involve you starving yourself. Tell your Mrs I wish she felt better too.  Chronic pain is a real bitch.  It also hurts the ones that love the person in pain because they feel so powerless.As funny as this is (and its really, really entertaining) does Red have his wires crossed up there? He doesn't sound all that mentally together. (And he's an Uber driver? Eeek.)Seeing something as adorable as that is the perfect way to start every day.  I love the look mama dog gives once her tail is caught.My dog isn't a lab (a pointer/dalmation mix) and it seemed like overnight she went from playful, naughty puppy to philosophical, uppity dog who refused to play with her onetime friend (a really sweet lassie dog).  That poor dog didn't know what she did wrong.  She would prance and jump and playfully growl at my dog who would deliberately ignore her.

While its much easier to take care of my dog now, I miss a lot of things, especially when she would root around in her toy box for the toy of the moment and come prancing out with it like she just won the lottery.That was both beautiful and hilarious and especially touching with the "leave your chips out".  Nice of him to leave his gf laying in the road. Yeah. I figured he was pretty stunned and got his bell rung hard, wasn't thinking quite straight.  But what an idiot, to pass on the left right before an intersection. You look incredible.  I'm also a short woman, and you're right. A few lbs gain can mean my ass no longer fits into my form-fitting clothes.  Great job and thanks for sharing.Excellent advice, except for those like this poor guy who lives in poverty and could never afford a helmet.If I may:  I'm barely 5'3, and when I was married to a 6'4 man, I used to crawl on top of him (I'd wait until he was lying down, not easy to do while he was standing up) and feel the most peaceful, secure relaxation ever. I'd fall into the deepest sleep, and his body heat kept me warm.  

So, I completely understand your three assholes waking you up and crawling on you.  You make them feel good.Kitty loves it! I want to be in that place.  I want to watch young deer grooming kittens.I love how the Corgi barely even notices.  Just wait until that cat is fully grown.I have a major spine injury and I can't handle any impact sports, and even swimming is not longer an option.  I am in constant, severe pain but yoga is the one thing I can do. So, I kind of understand where you are.

First: you must do extra work to strengthen your core.  http://www.amazon.com/Pilates-Anatomy-Rael-Isacowitz-ebook/dp/B0059DL0UC/ref=sr_1_10?s=books&amp;ie=UTF8&amp;qid=1446584839&amp;sr=1-10&amp;keywords=core+pilates

I have that book.  It is excellent.  I d/l it to my ipad and I do those exercises at home.  It has images of which muscles are being used and really discusses (make sure to read it!) the proper form (wrong form can worsen your back issues).  Pilates for core strength will help you tremendously.  This book I liked over others because it tells you what to do and in what order.  It has various programs from beginner to advanced.  All you need is a mat. 

Of course I know nothing about your injury, but avoid anything that hurts.  Differentiate between "pain" and "intensity".  Intensity is good, pain means stop.  I cannot arch back or twist right to left, so I need to modify a lot of yoga moves.  If you get one of those Nazi instructors that pressure you to do things even if it hurts you, that is the wrong teacher for you.

As someone else posted, there are many yoga teachers out there who really don't understand anatomy.  It is far too easy to get certified, in my humble opinion.  You know your body best, so trust your judgment.

Expect to be very challenged and very sore the first month! It gets better, I promise.  And if you do the pilates work at home 3x a week, for 30 minutes each time, you will progress much faster, because so much of yoga requires a strong core.  

When I started, I silently sobbed into a towel in the back of class and would pop extra pain pills to make it to the end, and had to sit out many moves. I couldn't do one down-facing dog (and I used to be a ballet dancer, but that's how weak I had become from a spine tumor, nerve damage, blah blah blah.)  Six months later, I was much stronger, felt better, was no longer crying and while I still had a ways to go, I made improvements I never thought possible.

If you can't find a good studio that is affordable (because the wrong teacher can really hurt you) there are some really well-known youtube videos with instructors who know their shit and will talk you through the movement.  Of course its always best to have an instructor work with you live, but its not always possible.

Good luck!  And, get that book! I'm not shilling for it, I don't know the author, but have spent way too much money on various core strength books and by far that one is the best.  While its a woman on the cover, it works just as well for men since our muscles are in the same place.That user's remark about even one session is great advice.  Even an experienced pilates instructor may even be better, because you must strengthen your core to stabilize and protect your spine. I did a few sessions with a pilates PT therapist, and she made tiny, yet significant changes in my posture while doing the moves that completely changed their efficacy.  If you do the moves but with the wrong form you not only waste time, but you do nothing to strengthen your core and run the risk of hurting yourself.  

Once I had those few sessions with her, I felt confident (along with that book I linked in another post here that I often consulted) to keep in mind the proper posture until over time it became second nature.With my injury, I had an unbearable pain with certain asanas (yoga postures).  It just may be that certain asanas are just not an option for you right now, as a beginner.  Maybe not ever, depending on your injury.  Can you try and observe what pain you feel during class? The yoga is also using muscles you likely have not used in awhile, or have underused your entire life if yoga is new to you.  

Remember - if you feel pain (different than intensity or fatigue) during a move, stop immediately.  I have an instructor that sings.  Yes, the bitch SINGS during Savasana.  Isn't that the time for quiet for us to reflect or not think? NOOOO.  It STILL has to be all about her.  She fires off a few songs in Hindi or Urdu or Yogi or whatever, and I end up getting so angry with her ego that the whole point of relaxation at the end of the class is gone.
My instructor sings.  The bitch SINGS. The entire savasana.  Why can't we have a moment of peace?This made me laugh.  Just the other day I was grinding my teeth when the instructor was saying how a certain move was "so good for massaging the kidneys to release the evil toxins". My teacher likes saying "whatever is happening to you in life, no matter how bad, is happening because it is MEANT to.  You are where you are MEANT to be. So, take peace in that."  She says this to people she knows are dying of cancer.  Really, "massage my liver"? Are you nuts? A certain pose releases "toxins"? How do you even define a toxin? Our kidneys and liver does most of our filtering and then we sweat a tiny amount of the so-called "toxins" out.  Some teachers I have just repeat shit they heard on the internet:  "this pose releases emotional tension in women rather than men because women store anger in their hips".  WTF?  

It is scary how easy it is to get certified.  I don't mind a teacher saying a sentence here or there during class or during the namaste-time, even if I think its nonsense, because they keep their chatter to a minimum. Its when they can't shut the fuck up and are afraid of silence, and make it worse by yammering incessantly about pseudo-science of organ-massaging and toxins that I want to throw shit.Yes. Similar thing happened to my man. Dumbass dentist misdiagnosed what was a badly infected upper molar.  Didn't clean or stop the infection, it calcified into his sinus cavities and his ENT had to take a circular saw to break it down during surgery as she said she'd never seen such a case.  He has a massive headache for six months, lost 30lbs from an already skinny frame, couldn't turn his head and I wanted to beat the hell out of his dentist who caused all this.  

Hope your mom recovered well from her surgery. Its an awful experience.I wish I could tell her that.  Why does she think we need a goddamn lullaby for savasana? She has a crap voice and its always the same freakin' song.She has lovely eyes.  Imagine what  some eyeliner and mascara would do to bring out her serene look.Would these Walmart photos all come from Florida locations?There is a family in Mexico that suffers from this condition.  Cousins are affected as well. They are seen as "cursed" and all must live in some shit village, most cannot get work.  What a shitty hand they were dealt.  One girl, about 13, shaves her face every day before school.The woman who wears this ring proudly stated, "I literally have my husband's wisdom on my finger!"  I think it was on her FB or something. But she did say it.

No.  Just, no.I sobbed at the end of Gladiator, all the way to the car.   And I knew a sequel should never be made because reincarnating Maximus would minimize all the emotional damage I suffered sitting through that movie.  

At least reincarnate his wife and kid.He's trying the Jaden Smith look.Stunning, elegant and beautiful. I wish so much that I asked my grandmother about what she actually felt about growing up, especially since she lived in an occupied country during WWII.  Your grandmother is a beautiful woman.The only time I saw my dad literally burst into tears was when they lowered the casket of his father into the ground.  He had kept his emotions tightly together during my grandfather's coma, death, funeral planning and the service.

But to see a man burst into tears when you're surrounded by 60 silent people and he is the head of the family now - that just ripped my heart into shreds. To hear a man cry from the physical agony of heartbreak is one of the worst sounds a woman can hear.  Men are forced to hold in their tears and learn to not cry, or many simply cannot.

Even thinking about it 20 years after the event, it still rips my heart to shreds.  And I don't even like my dad as a person. This is fantastic! Thank you! I had only noticed the obvious (the extra bits of armor he was getting for better protection) and never noticed the "characters".  And I must've watched that movie 30 times.  I watched some cuts regarding the making of the movie, which I recommend as there is a funny scene where Maximus is in his slave-fighting costume then breaks character and starts speaking with some American/Southern accent with a big smile.

Now I need to go watch the movie again (and cry again) and this time I'll look for the figures that were added after each battle.You look so healthy, fit, and sexy (I'm a woman so I hope that didn't sound creepy).  

Never would've imagined the crutches coming from a poker injury.

Keep up the great work.   You must feel a real difference in strength.Talented, is he.Now we get offensive garbage like Kanye West and Kim Kardashian on the kover of Vogue.Two weeks ago, I started up yoga again after taking four months off because each class was so painful and I'd hurt for days after.

I put my ego aside. I sit out poses that hurt.  I do not twist side to side or arch my back.  I stop when it gets too painful.  

I take a lot of breaks. 

But, I do it!  And at the end of the class,  I feel so good that I was able to get out of the house for that mere hour and get some mild exercise and get a wee bit stronger, and get some endorphins going.   Putting the ego aside and not doing things you once could do so easily is much harder than it should be.That sounds delicious.  Fax me some?I am so, so sorry for your loss.  I have never lost a loved one, so I cannot relate any stories. I just would like you to know that your description of your boyfriend made me visualize a kind and wonderful man, who truly was your soulmate, and was taken away far too soon.  My sincere condolences.Your post makes me want to cry.  To lose your beloved husband from something so rare.  Then to lose his mother as well.  I'm so, so sorry for your losses and the overwhelming suffering you must be feeling.That must feel like quite a difference. No more lightheadedness.  When I went through a period where I starved myself, I was always angry. Furious.  Ready to scream at a slow driver or other minor things.  Its great to see a post of a woman winning a different but very relevant battle in regards to getting healthy.I am curious how could someone commit an "unintentionally" hateful act?  An unintentional indifferent act, yes. But hateful? A "hateful" act cannot be unintentional.Hmm.....
"Saaaaaanshiiiiiiiii-laaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaa MEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEGO FUHhhhh.

(refrain)  (fifty times)

...ooooomaaaAAAATOOOOOSHEEEESANNNNSHHEEEeeeeeooooooo....."

Then we sit back up, and she grants us more wisdom:  "My beautiful (me: 'yours'? bitch, I ain't yours.) yogis, thank you for allowing me to impart my life and wisdom and everyone has shared their light and inner glow with one another and you are all so beautiful (me: shut the fuck up, I want to go home and walk my dog and eat, ho)" following by more incessant prattle until chanting and side nostril breathing and a namaste.I was sure by now with 3d printers and all we could efax food to people.  Your recipe sound very yummy and you did accomplish something you can enjoy again and again.
Because her life is comfortable and fun.  Her parents paid her to open her studio.  She is a very good instructor and knows her shit and I really like her classes when she is not babbling nonsense, but she doesn't comprehend that not everyone is comfortable or comforted by hearing things such as "I believe everything happens for a good reason"  (I responded once,"what about little children getting raped or murdered" after class and she smiled and said it didn't matter.  They would be reincarnated into a better life. We all have been reincarnated many times over already, we just don't know it.

So, uh...how does that help the poor child during his/her torture? I decided best to keep my opinion to myself.YES! I have had two separate teachers say the same thing! "Women keep their emotions and tension in their hips."  Does that explain the girth of my ass? Who the hell taught them this inanity?Ninja cat.  That's some of the funniest cat-ninja moves I've seen in some time. And, cute guy.Now the root canal I just had the other day is aching again.Is this how circle jerks start? (I'm a girl.  This is how I picture it.)Hey, thanks!  The ibuprofen they gave me is useless.  What kind of job do you have?This shall stay blue.  No need to see sad penguins.In my first year of law school, our criminal law teacher wrote a "Criminal Law Color Book" (that was the exact title).  We had to pay $60 for that thing.  I really don't know why in the hell he did that.  As if we didn't have more important things to do than color in the felon behind bars? (Yes, it was full of sloppily-drawn cartoon characters in various states of criminal litigation.)Damn, you say a harsh truth that isn't necesssarily fair but is a reality in the world and you get called a "hater" and get downvoted.  Are those people "hating" on you 14?I was hoping to forget I had ever read that.I must find this Tichenors business.  I get my second root canal (and why couldn't the 2nd one be on the same side of the upper jaw?) next week. I did get some spray-on lidocaine but it doesn't do much for that throb-up-to-eyeball pain.

You are very thoughtful.  I see you are also the mod of Kindness.  My tooth also thanks you.My dog must be a monster.  I bought her a plush "tree" with "baby squirrels" that she had to stuff her snout into the three holes in the tree to dig them out.  They all squeaked.  And oh did she love makin those babies squeak.That was actually quite adorable.  To see them having a fun time and laughing considering their situation.  Made me smile.What the fuck is that? It looks like the mouth of that giant Rock Creature thing from the beginning of the Neverending Story.Boo. What a horrible way to die.  Look at what a stunningly beautiful woman you have transformed into! With your hard work and dedication you can enjoy the fruits of your labor.  (Seriously, that is one gorgeous passport photo.)Amazing work so far! Great job! It may get more difficult to drop weight as you get closer to your goal weight, but given your obvious determination I am sure that won't get you down.  You are looking good!Great job! And I want a pair of those sexy snow pants.You have awesome legs! Awesome everything. Great work, great job, I love it!Watching fainting goats. Look it up.  They don't really "faint" but its adorable regardless.I want Justin Bieber to lose his damn voice.Yeah.  I would really want to strangle my friends who would text me during the day and say "you're SO LUCKY you get to stay at home all day and don't have to work!" 

No. I was at home in agonizing pain from a spinal tumor and hated every minute of it. I'd much rather be working, be a contributing member of society, not need radiation and various spine surgeries and be suicidal/bored out of my fucking skull/high on opiates.And you will have years of saved-up salt for her to use! She...had the vendors refund the money YOU paid to her?  Shit, should've sued her ass for theft in small claims.If you have flexible fingers you are "double jointed". Sounds like you have the right idea.  At this point, enough time has passed and you've moved on and are doing well.  Just...what a shitty, fucked and selfish thing to do.  I'm sorry to hear you had so much suffering.  It is good news that you are back to having a good life but it sucks knowing you will likely always have some level of pain.  I'd be in deep shit w/o opiate, but even with them, my pain level is so high I had to quit work and can barely stand up and move around.  Its a life I would only wish on a very bad and evil person. I hope you continue to improve and the pain lessens with time.I would just go for a teacher who is certified in instructing pilates and has at least several years experience.  Yelp might help.  Ballet studios may have excellent references since they need rock-strong cores.  Usually, finding someone certified both as  PT and in pilates is not an easy find, but in my humble opinion, insofar as core strength, you are far better off in getting help from someone certified in pilates instruction.  I would check out some pilates studios, ask about their experience, how many years, etc., (make sure they differentiate b/t experience in yoga v. experience in pilates).  Ask if they could offer you a few private lessons.

I won't resolve all your problems, but having a strong core will do wonders, and yoga on its own won't create that strong core.  There are just too many different kinds of yoga, teachers and styles, whereas a good pilates program is essentially the same thing wherever you go.  Longer it went on, the more grim and sick I felt.That's not the reason at all. Its because in an accident, imagine how difficult it would be for the operator (if uninjured) would have herding everyone out of the damaged bus if they were all buckled up.   It brings in too many variables that can make escaping the bus much harder.  You are no safer in a bus if you crash - in fact, you have more room to go flying around.  Its just not practical given time constraints and people cooperating and how to handle an emergency to have seatbelts on a bus.Hey man, how you doing these days?  I don't know who you are, but I hope you are alive and doing better with those new meds you mentioned. Life can actually get better and be fun.Kitty ain't no fool! He knows how to get adopted.  The head-climb-sit move is always the deal sealer.I had to click out after a minute.  I've never felt such emotion for an insect before. That futile attempt to fly away. What was the insect and what was attacking it?What makes you think ignorance and stupidity would be lowered by purging religion? Humans would simply find another justification to do whatever they want to do.Thank you for your service - now I know to never, ever watch this movie.Jesus, how great was that toddler who refused to play roll-the-ball with his mom with his acting?  I read the book a few years later.  It disturbed me more than the movie.  It is just all over awful.

And that little murderous stinking sack of shit got released after 7 years, is back in society, has a cell phone and a fucked up twitter account where he brags how he killed his sister, father and 7 students/1 school employee.

He was pure fucking evil.He better be as good as the Flash as he was as Kevin, because as Kevin I hated his stinking guts so much I couldn't break away and see him as an actor.That book horrified me so much I could not sleep with it in the same room. What happens when your progeny is pure evil and the world wants to blame his murderous, torturous actions on you being a "bad mom" for not "loving him enough" (which was horseshit).I also tried watching it as a 12 year old girl.  My brain said "no" after 20 minutes.I had to prepare myself for the Pianist.  I've done a lot of studying on the Holocaust, so none of it came as new, or as a surprise, but it was so well made, so visceral, and the manner of how fucking evil people were in an area considered to be the height of knowledge, science and civilization.  The scene of the main character walking and sobbing through the liquidated ghetto, seeing the remains of the slaughter that he managed to escape...that just broke my heart.

And when he played that piece for the German officer, oh did I cry.That backhand to her face, the blood seeping through her hands as she tries not to scream, and we all know she is utterly powerless to stop him.My mom backhanded me so hard when I mispronounced a phrase in French (she was "helping" me bring up my grade) that she broke my nose.  I think I was 11.That is the kind of pressure that would keep me awake at night, praying to a god I didn't believe in, to please let me get an A to avoid a beatdown at age 12.

Edit:  Some morons responding seem to think that I spent time "praying" and spent no time studying.  I didn't think I'd have to add this, but since some people think the worst:  I DID study. My parent switched schools mid-year and put us (brother and I) in much more advanced classes, so of course we fell behind.  I was woken up at 5am to "study" with my mother, stayed after school with teacher to try and learn 6 months of math or French in several days to get caught up, and then go home and study until 1am, then mom would let me sleep until 5am.

Are we clear now?She's an adult and all of this is new to her.  I would just ask her once if she feels overwhelmed, let her know you are there for her, then leave her alone.  She gets to make her own choices and it sounds like she is making good choices that are right for her.

And she is right:  getting into a good dental program requires stellar grades from the outset.  Let her be and she will find her rhythm. May not be the same as yours, but it doesn't mean she needs "help" or is on the wrong path.But...I thought ALL moms who really wanted their kids to learn did that! At least, that's what my parents told me when I conjured up the courage to say their methods of "teaching" me were scaring me so much that I couldn't think straight.Because by then it was 1am and my mother finally allowed me to go to sleep, and I was so scared to get a bad grade I'd just stay up and pray? What makes you think I wasn't studying or practicing?  I was typically also woken up at 5am the day of the test for "extra" practice.I dunno...my mom had some wicked backhand slaps.  Are those considered slaps? They were open-handed for the most part. As a junior in HS, I joined the gymnastics team with zero experience.  (Had ballet and martial arts training, but no tumbling training.)

The vault terrified me. They simply told me to run as fast as I could, jump off the spring board and do that "easy" legs-through-the-arms move.

They refused to spot me. I didn't even know how to time the jump to the springboard.  It was our first meet, and they said, " you CAN do this!"

I thought, fuck you, I CANNOT do it, I've never done it in practice, I don't have the timing down, I'm scared, which means I don't know what I am doing, so fuck you all.  For both vaults, I ran, and simply came to a complete stop and did a little bunnyhop on the board. And raised an arm and smiled, and after some stunned silence, the audience gave a polite clap.

The coaches called my parents to say I wasn't trying hard enough.  I asked my mom if she truly wanted me to face-plant into a vault and maybe break my neck at 16.

Edit:  Some asswipe says my story is nothing but "entitlement, excuses and whining" and I didn't have ability to handle "danger" attitude. FUCK YOU.  The school encouraged people who had NO experience to join. They promised us training.  You don't just tell a new student to vault. 

As for not being "brave"? I roadraced motorcycles for years, asswipe, being one female out of about 40 males in my class.  You want to know what is fucking scary? Being on the start in the novice 600 class, with nearly everyone a newbie and not knowing what they were doing and with out of control egos, as the numbers count down before the green flag drops.  Did I back out? No.  So, again, fuck you. Taking care of our own also requires participation in international affairs.  Remember that little incident called 9/11? Or the various US embassy bombings prior to that around the world? Or abduction of American hostages in Iran due to an unstable Persian gov't that fell apart?

Detroit needs help, but they also dug their own damn grave with their level of corruption and ineptitude.  For the needy that played by the rules yet lost so much, they got burned badly.  With proper management, Detroit could get the help it needs but it also needs people who are competent, not corrupt and willing to stick out the tough decade or so it would take to turn around what was a state essentially dependent upon an industry that could not keep up with foreign competitors.

TLDR: taking care of our own means we must be involved in international affairs if said affairs will affect us directly or indirectly.Conflating the individuals in Israel with the President/Prime Minister is very foolish.  Do you condemn all Chinese as abusers of human rights because of how their gov't behaves? Who ever claimed that all Israelis "expect" a $5 billion handout annually? Have you taken a poll? Oh, its possible, and very effective if you connect your wristwatch with the nose of the backhandee.Ok, that did make me laugh, but I can't be that bad.  Do you have heaps of women/men clinging to your back, sucking out your life blood and soul?Thanks for your thoughtful comment - when I was 14, I'd stare at maps.  Living in CA, I looked at FL as my best place to escape since it was the farthest away and warm (NY seemed way too cold).

Instead, I studied hard, did well in a two year community college, transferred to a 4 year and since I had no social life I put everything into grades, then grad school, then FREEDOM! (Except for that little student loan thing). 

But seriously, for any teens that may be reading this who are in the same boat, stick it out, study hard, choose your loans wisely and once you can self-support, get the fuck out of any family relationships that are toxic.Given that my mother's method of "teaching" was to beat the hell out of my head if I mispronounced something in French or made a mistake in math (while doing the equation right under her nose) I doubt her mental process went as far as to even consider sleep deprivation.

Bitch was crazy, that's all I can say.I always, always wished i had had the courage to stand up for myself.  I was gonna get punched anyway, why could I just once stand up for myself? I was so terrified I would just freeze and I think the internal survival method for children - who know they cannot leave the situation - is to convince themselves that their parents are to some degree "appropriate" in being abusive.

When I hit my teens, I started to think for myself and realized this behavior was not normal, it was fucked up, and i made sure to call the cops when I moved out at 17 and heard some awful mother next door beating the hell out of her poor 10 year old son, trying to teach him.

His screams and cries still haunt me. "No mommy, please no! I'm sorry!"  It was a word for word repeat of what happened to me.  If he got something right, she would literally scream, "VERY GOOD."

So I called the cops, got CPS involved, she was a fat, terrible monster, and I remember seeing the look of relief on that tiny boy's face through the peephole of my door when the cops showed up.

The cops later spoke to me, said he had no marks and no visible injuries but CPS would now be involved for a very long time.  The dad, who worked all day and had no idea, came home, found out what had been going on, and raged at his wife.  

I wanted to hug that little boy so, so much.  I hope that fucking bitch never laid a finger on him again.  He was so tiny.Can your weimereiner hug me too?I have a Dalmation/Pointer mix.  I highly recommend.  The pointer calms the "crazy" that people speak of in the dalmation, and she is just so damn cute and adorable and I need to go hug her.It doesn't have to be...why do you feel that hope for you is poisonous?I can tell just by reading your story that you are not a bland person at all.  And hardly a failure.  You are a smart person with deep emotions, who is going through a rough time. One of the hardest times is that transition from teen/child to adult (ie:  college).  

You are tossed into a new environment with a bunch of people of various ages and so many differing personalities in a much larger subculture than what you are used to.

It is normal to be overwhelmed.  

You are not a failure.  You are a human being who is suffering from depression, self esteem issues and other issues that you are entitled to feel miserable from.  You do not need to minimize your sadness and misery just because you weren't abused or impoverished.

Depression is a killer to motivation.  Please get some help.  It changed a lot for me.

I was also 30lbs overweight in undergrad and felt so ugly that I felt i had no right to show my face in public.  What I didn't realize was that endorphins would help my depression so much, and I needed to exercise to release those endorphins. I was too shy to go to a gym, so I either walked/ran at night or I worked out in my room when I was alone.  

Losing weight was great, but it didn't magically solve my problems.  I still needed to address my demons, and it sounds like you need to do the same. Its a lot to take on on your own, and hard without a trained professional who is unbiased and has much more life experience and training in these specific areas.

It can truly get a lot better. But you gotta get some help.  Please try and find someone to help you.This sounds like a good idea.  Give your first year a fair chance.  Study hard, get good grades, as bad grades can forever haunt your GPA.  You can always, always change majors, leave school, whatever.  But first you owe it to yourself it give it a fair chance.

My first two months, I wanted out more than anything.  I hated everything about college.  But I stuck it out (I liked the academics, hated the culture) and was terribly lonely so I put my time into studying.

Also, I know you have zero motivation, but try and eat well.  I don't say that in a manner to suggest you lose weight, but maybe one of the reasons you feel so down and unmotivated is you are not getting the nutrients you need.  I had no clue about protein and vitamins while in college and I was always tired.  

If you can, find an exercise activity that you like that gets you to sweat.  If you hate the gym, don't go to the gym.  But find someting that gets your heart rate going.  This can do wonders.  For me, doing yoga kicked my depression in the ass.  Martial arts was particularly good because I was able to release anger.  Even if its just going for a walk in a nice park - try and get moving.  

It can and it will get better - but you must try and find a therapist to guide you along this difficult transition.  Actually....I believe it would count. (That must've been exhausting.)No idea.  I'm 41, this happened when I was about 18.  I just couldn't believe I was hearing it at first.  Her window was open, 4 in the afternoon, high-density apartment complex and I KNOW many other people heard her raging, the slaps, him crying and begging for her to stop, and that it was all over his homework.  

She knew it was me who had called and our front doors were four feet away, facing one another.  The first time I left after the cops left, her door flew open and she stood there, breathing like an furious bull, 3x my size.  I just said, "what? surprised you aren't allowed to beat your tiny child without the cops showing up?"   

That was the last time she opened her door when I was around.: )No.  Funny thing was I eventually married a French guy and he told me later my French accent was ten times better than hers.   "Elles sont parisiennes".   I got whacked 5 times until I said it with the "correct" accent.  Only learned years later that she had fractured my nose.

Bitch was just crazy.  When my brother was 6 and I was four, she hit him so hard his nose gushed blood all over his shirt.  I was so young but I still remember it clearly.  She screamed at him to clean his shirt, so he tried running water through it (how was a 6 year old supposed to know how to clean fresh blood out of the same shirt she expected him to wear within 5 minutes?)   He came back down, shirt was now wet and still bloody, and she whacked him again for not cleaning his shirt.

He's now best friends with my mom and dad while I have cut them out of my life.  I think her abuse (and my dad's refusal to acknowledge any of it and his hiding in his room during her screaming rages) broke him.  He thinks they are both perfect, they all work together, and are convinced I am the evil, greedy selfish black sheep.  I can't stand him, but I also realize he's likely pretty broken inside.Well that is comforting.  Severe pain is a terrible thing.  Of course, the fear of impending death is also a primal fear that cannot be matched.  But knowing these little bugs were mostly just hitching a ride and (I hope) at most just annoyed the big dude, makes me feel better.

(I also like to pretend that chicken and burgers grow on trees and fool myself in other childish ways.)OH GOD, I had those too.  Did  you learn to just keep your mouth shut? Because the sermon would be repetitive and go on and on and fucking ON.  If you tried to say anything, it only made it worse.  And as a kid you are powerless to interject and say "shut the FUCK UP for god's sakes".  

So you were just stuck, sitting there, trying to look interested enough so they don't get mad and talk more to get their point across.  Those sermons from hell can be much worse than a not-very-hard slap.  Serious question: why are they driving w/o their lights at night?That's very kind of you.  I was really angry for a long time, especially when I was 25, they were millionaires, I got a spinal tumor and was dying, didn't ask for a dime, was filing bankruptcy and had to go on disability and was flying to France for a last-ditch effort at saving my life, and my parents generously offered to help with my insurance co-pays (chump change to them)....but.....only if I faked a receipt.

They wanted a tax write off.  They explained that they owed so much when they bought those extra homes in Hawaii (already owned homes in Palo Alto) that they "needed" it.  

I said, "So...you want me to commit tax fraud, a felony, and also pay taxes on the "income" since you will be deducting it on your own taxes illegally and fraudulently as a business expense, and if I get caught I lose my law license and go to jail, and this is to help your dying daughter?"

They said yes, and when I said "thanks, but I can't take money and commit fraud and engage in this" they slammed down the phone and told the family how they offer me money but I am selfish and greedy and refuse it. (Huh?)

That hurt a lot, but I was lucky my French inlaws helped me out and I used my credit cards to pay for the treatment I needed.

She's living in her own misery.  She convinces herself she is happy, but she knows deep inside she is a criminal (she's admitted this to me several times).  She does this mental gymnastics thing where she convinces herself she was "unwell" at the times she was abusive, but the truth is that she is simply a bad person.

It could've been much worse. I was lucky and got out.  Took a lot of work and therapy but I made it.  My brother is 45 and is so useless that he doesn't know how to buy car insurance b/c mommy and daddy babying him.  And, she often has to explain to her many friends/extended family, why her daughter is never around at family functions or lives in another country and doesn't keep in touch.

It could've been worse.  There was never any sexual abuse.  Could not imagine how that affects someone's life.Yeah.  That image of my brother with his hair all messed up and the wet shirt with the blood still on it (plaid; this was in the 70s) never went away.  I feel so bad for his little self.When can you graduate and leave? You gotta graduate or get your GED.  It sounds like you live in a shitty place and are in a shit situation.

If you can escape, once you are ready to support yourself, it will be hard, but it will be easier.  

For what its worth, I also found in my younger years that it was much better to be alone and lonely than to spend time with people that I found to be "beneath" me, or with whom I did not connect.  Because you are forced to act like you are having a good time, and that is exhausting. Plus, you feel worse about yourself, because you never have a good time with them.

You are better off reading a book or exploring a nice area if one is accessible.And you know how to shorten it and get to the point, and nobody goes hungry (damn, still can't believe she yapped so much that dinner would be held off until sermonizing was completed.)You have NOT failed! You are stuck in a shitty job with shit pay and are bored to tears and feel there is no way out.  I don't know your situation so I can't offer meaningful help, but I can say, please don't throw in the towel.

Even if your kitty is for some reason gone, there are many animals in need that need you and would love to be with you.  No matter what "mistakes" you think you made in choosing your major, you made the best decisions you could at the time.

You had no idea how the war would affect you, or that the economy would take a dump, or what PTSD feels like, or that the cost of living would skyrocket while salaries would remain unbearable low.

I don't know if are single or have a family or anything, but you can get out of this. It may not be easy.  But I think its possible.  

You do not need to suffer.You got lucky you got out when you did, even if it was them giving you the boot.  Getting out of your CHAIR? Did they have a single complaint about the quality of your work? No.  So they made up some bullshit.

Maybe they couldn't afford you. Maybe some nephew brat of the boss wanted the job instead.  Maybe they are fucking assholes who do have control issues about how often you can get out of a chair.

No matter what, you didn't fuck up.  Be glad you're out of there.What you do is learn from this.  You allowed a guy with obvious red flags to take advantage of you.   You were at a very fragile time in your life, and this ass took advantage of that.

You will only waste valuable energy on toxic thought if you focus on revenge.  Its ok to mourn and be angry that he took advantage of you, but you also must take responsibility that you did allow him in your life, your home and paid his bills.  Yes, you were in a fragile state, but now you know that people can be manipulative and use you, so you can ensure this never happens again.

But...why ruin him? He didn't steal from you.  He didn't hurt you (emotionally, yes).  He was selfish and took advantage of you, but it doesn't sound like he committed any crimes against you.

Why do you want to thus ruin his life by ruining his reputation? How will this make you feel better? 

It sounds like you are still recovering from a serious mental illness and I hope you are still getting help, because you need it ( I don't mean that in any offensive way, but only because of what you wrote).  

Wouldn't it be better to focus on your own mental and physical health? He is gone.  Even if you try to ruin him, you will fail (because according to you, he's not committed any crimes and being an ass or taking advantage of your fragile state for free rent and food is not a crime).  

Why not put your energy into healing and moving on?If you send those messages, I assure you, you will look like a nutcase, you will not be believed, and he will have further ammunition to show his friends, that "see? She was crazy and unreasonable; look how after all of this she is STILL harassing me!"

Focus on you. Not him.  His friends will always take his side, no matter what. What you learned is SOME people are deceptive.

Not everyone.  But you also learned a very valuable lesson about allowing strangers sweet-talk you into your home, heart and bank account.  This is a life lesson. With exerperience, you will see the red flags.

it would be a terrible shame for this experience to leave you convinced that every person is deceptive, because that just isn't the case.

You need time to focus on healing you, developing self confidence and the ability to spot those red flags, stand up for yourself and say NO.  You owe it to yourself to be healthy. You don't owe anyone anything, no matter how bad their situation is.  It is understandable you are so anxious given everything that is going on.

I would just stay away from dating or anything in that department for awhile and work on yourself and being able to be happy alone and increasing your self confidence.The fact that you are mature and aware enough to write what you did reflects that you are learning self confidence and how to stand up for yourself.  Good! It can get a lot better, and in a few years, the memory of this loser will be nothing more than a mildly unpleasant taste in your mouth that will quickly dissipate.  You will be far wiser, more experienced and more aware of red flags.  

And maybe, if you are able to open your heart, you will have met people you can trust and will learn that not everyone is deceptive.Fuck you, Ms Joyce, as well.  What the fuck do these "coaches" think they are doing when they order a newbie 'gymnast' to vault? Its not a freakin' cartwheel on a mat, but an equation that can lead to a busted nose or broken neck if some poor kid is just throw into it without proper training and confidence.Nope!  (I just read your title.)

Many think its some insidious, evil dictatorial form of government where all your income is swiped away and you live on a commune.

Many cannot differentiate between different types and levels of socialism.  Our public schools, our taxes, our medicaid/medicare, our repairs for public roads, our firestations:    these are all aspects of "socialism".   I have a "friend" who throws in fascism into that mix as well.  It makes me want to pull my hair out.

How does he think the public school his kids attend is paid for? How about public libraries and computer labs? Oh no, to him socialism and capitalism cannot coexist and all socialists (whatever that means to him) should rot in hell.

Which is why I had to stop speaking to him.Oh, stop with your "fucking feminists".  That right there took away any bit of credibility your argument had. You don't see how hypocritical you just were.

You ranted how women are unreasonably getting "triggered" because your personal tastes mean you are attracted to a woman with little or no sexual history.  Hence, you are defending your personal taste.

But then you say "fucking feminists". Now you sound like a tool, and that's without saying "like" as a preceding word to every sentence. Like, you totally sound like a 14 year old girl.  Like, what does "feminism" even mean to you? Like, don't you like get it that all women, just like all men, have different desires and different tastes?

Like, are you one of those Red Pill worshippers who is perhaps bitter that you are a Nice Guy but women don't want you, so you turn it around and make THEM look like the bad guy because they are all "whores" and like, women don't have the right to have sexual experience with men before you.

Like, fucking Red Pillers, I swear.Perhaps because they know they are dealing with an insecure, whiny male who will start complaining and crying that the woman "slept around too much", so in hopes of avoiding the childish drama, they try and minimize their past experience (which they shouldn't even have to do, but as they get older, they will hopefully learn they don't owe it to insecure men to pretend that they didn't enjoy sex as much as they actually did.)Its improved, but its still out there.  Men are seen as heros, women are still seen as something "slutty" or "loose" or negative.  Want proof? What, a study?  You don't need one.  Its out there.  I've had it said to my face, I've seen it said to other men and women, its everywhere.  You probably just don't notice it because you are so accustomed to it and these days, some people take better care to hide it.You don't need evidence for the obvious.They give a fuck if you are rude to them.  How do you speak to them? Are you as judgmental to them as you are in this post? Do you say "fuckin' feminists, I swear".  

You are likely obnoxious and judgmental and THAT is what is making them not want to give you the time of day or simply tell you to pound sand.How do you know "MOST women HATE male virgins"?
Did you take a poll? A scientific one with a control group? From all your posts you sound terribly judgmental with your "fuckin feminists" comment. There is NOTHING wrong with preferring a virgin.  But you sound so immature, so inexperienced and so BITTER about it all.  Listen to yourself.  You are judgmental and pulling "facts" out of your ass (MOST women HATE male virgins).

Sounds like most women simply dislike you, not because you are a virgin, but because you are a douchebag, and you are very, very bitter.He sounds like the typical asshole at the bar who sees a pretty girl, asks to buy her a drink, gets politely rejected, then comes back to his friends and whines, "fat whore, she was ugly anyway."yes, the idea that women should be treated the same as men as in "equal rights" is evil. a cancer. terrible.  we were fucked as soon as women got the right to vote, right man? you men know far better an should decide for us.  

dumbfuck.Ah, I love to eat too! I know its not easy but if the weight is bothering you that much, you will have to be disciplined.  And I promise, the first two months of portion control will be a bitch.  But then, if you don't cheat during those two months, you've developed a habit, and its much, much easier.  

Also, once you've reached your goal weight, you can start enjoying things again in moderation.That is even more fucked up!! You could've broken your neck, your jaw, or fucked your face up badly.  What the fuck were they thinking? A vault isn't something someone learns in an hour.  It involves timing, confidence, coordination, spatial awareness and shit, FUCK your "coaches".Yes, I answered the call for "all students, no matter if you have no experience" to join gymnastics; you will get all training!"  If the school expected only experienced gymnasts to join, they shouldn't have allowed inexperienced students to sign up.

Even in the best version of your story, I hear stupidity, whiny bitch and failure to see reality.I shall put words in your mouth if I choose.They had a few who were decent (meaning they had trained for years outside of school) but no we sucked.damn, that is harsh! Bad enough if your own parent hits you, but what an insult to have the bf of your mom slap you. you did well! although it sucks they forced you to see a shrink...unless it was a good one that really let you vent and helped you?Amazing work! You lost the weight of a fully grown man already! Keep it up, you are doing wonderfully!Oh, that made me sick to my stomach.  I've had some high-speed crashes at the track, but ...they are all on a track. Flat surface.  So you tumble and get the rag-doll effect and hopefully there are no haybales or hard objects to smash into and that still fucks you up.

But this poor guy? Did he um...live? I hope? 

It takes a special level of skill and bravery to race Isle of Man.  Thank you for posting that video.  I was captivated the entire time.He lived through that tumble? Damn. And good.Thanks, but its all ok now.  I just really feel for young kids currently caught in the situation and who can't just run away because they are too young to care for themselves.Lucky and nerves of steel, and incredible skill.  All those riders have incredible reaction times and focus.  Yes. And it depressed me so much I had to leave.  I had no clue that my parents were narcissists until I came across that sub. It sure did teach me a lot, though.I thought only I did that.  When I poured bleach (the only thing I could find on-hand) down the hole of these mean fucking biting ants, I was yelling, "DIE bitches. How does that feel? Gonna fuck with me and my dog? FUCK YOU."  I think my neighbors no longer are comfortable speaking to me.The 70s produced some really sick shit in their ads.  I remember flipping through a glamour magazine of my mom's as a six year old and seeing a picture of a little girl all made up with makeup and adult Ms. Universe-type tower-hair. The tag line (for a scented soap or something) was "Because innocence is sexier than you think."

And my little 6 year old brain thought, "Ohhh, I want to be like this girl in the ad."

Were all ad/marketing execs on coke in the 70s? Now they just get drunk and attack Uber drivers.Return of the King (budget version).He'd look cute with a little sweater. Then take him for a walk.  (Or a drag.)  Just lube him up first so he doesn't get roadrash.Were those insects cooked or raw? Cooked, I could manage.  Raw? No.He freaking flew!  I'm amazed he didn't smash his body into 400 pieces.   Good to know he's all good.When my French in-laws privately told me "your accent is much better than your mom's" that was all I needed for vindication. This is adorable! I love it when dogs splay their hind legs like that.  I learned the value of high quality racing after my first major crash in a $400 off the rack set.  I neglected to wear biker shorts under my leathers and I had no idea that the butt part tore open like those old-fashioned kid's pajamas with the flap to expose the butt. So I was staggering around in the paddock after the ambulance brought me back with my flowery panties totally exposed and nobody fucking told me!!!

I remember, right before the race, I realized I forgot to put on biker shorts and thought, "I got this, what are the chances that I'll crash and they'll need to cut off my leathers?"
No. I'm a woman. Without a beard. Yes, that's the one. I sort of got used to it after awhile (which means I was riding beyond my limits too many times).  The lowsides weren't too bad.  It was the highsides that were scary.  And quite painful.Ahhh....I still think its better to avoid it.  But I thank you for the tip.I tried to grow a beard, couldn't make it happen.  ; )Thanks for the link.  I am curious:  although its a bit morbid, does anyone living on the island every complain that their home is right in an impact zone if someone falls off and they don't want their house damaged?

Or do residents pretty much know what they are getting into by living there and love the TTs and other races so much that this is never an issue?Don't forget to shave your legs.  One time I didn't, had the leathers cut off and I was very embarrassed that the medics had to see and feel my hairy-ass legs.I can't imagine anyone complaining about the the noise/crowds/deaths/etc from the races would be treated very kindly by the locals.No. I was curious and googled his name after reading the book, and up came his twitter account.  I read a bit. Made me sick to my stomach.  That's why I won't even put his full name in any of these posts because he's a psychopath and loves the attention.

The fact that there was one unintended survivor when he committed his bow &amp; arrow attack in the gym (and locked all the doors from the outside with kryptonite locks purchased ahead of time so not only could nobody escape, but it would take forever for EMS to get access to stop him and help the wounded) is what made the end so horrifying.  The survivor was able to describe everything that happened.  The kids trying to hide in a huge, empty room (because the murderous bastard had pulled away the wrestling mats ahead of time so they couldn't be used as a barrier.)   The direct hits into the kids and custodian who just happened to be there.

And the filthy, dirty lie he created to get those seven selected kids in the gym by sending them letters of congratulation that they had won a special end of year "award" and they would collect their prize in the gym.

He had killed his father and little sister earlier that day.  Called into his dad's work saying his dad was sick, and made a similar call to his little sister's daycare.  (This was after he already gouged out her eye a few months back.)

He made sure to commit the crime before he turned 16 and then researched prozac before he committed his crimes and handed that info over to his lawyer, which helped in getting what was tantamount to a slap on the wrist for being a mass murderer.Yes, I am aware of that.  I was making an observation about what it takes to successfully run the Isle of Man.  I do realize that once he lost control of the bike, he was at the mercy of physics.  Did you actually think I thought he skillfully tumbled down that hill?The book is fiction based on actual events, told from the fictional "perspective" of the mother.  The movie is also based on actual events.  

It really did happen.  He used a bow and arrow and was quite adept with it.

The ironic thing was he was hoping for the world to know what he had done, but two weeks later Columbine happened and the kill count was not only higher, but we saw a lot of the action on TV (remember that awful scene of the very bloody young man crawling and dropping out of a window to escape?)  Columbine overshadowed what he had done.  

I wish I could say the entire thing was fiction, but no.  This bastard did murder his father, gouged out the eye of his little sister and them also murdered her by sending an arrow into her, then went to school and murdered another 7 or 8 people.  Served about 7 years and is out.  We ALL have our brain-dead moments.  I am sure your own anxiety is what's making you feel dumb.  You simply inadvertently took the wrong keys home. How many of us have locked ourselves out of our cars or homes or done other mindless things?

Be kind to yourself.  There is very, very little about him on the web, which always surprised me.  Maybe because he committed those crimes as juvenile and because it was overshadowed by Columbine.  I want to say it was somewhere on the more Eastern side of the US.  Parents made good money, he had a privileged life, he was just a little sack of evil.Make sure you wear your nicest, floweriest panties on race day.  You never know when your leathers will get cut off, and you want to look your best. As for your leg hair, as long as it hasn't turned into dreadlocks, I think you're good. The medics won't leave you out in the runoff once they see your legs.No, different guy, but same initials. Lemme see what I can find.What? No pumping laws? Does that mean humans are not allowed to pump their own gas?  (I am from CA so this is all new to me.)

Edit:  I've been advised I have a typo.  Typo shall remain.Was it always this way or did a few morons ruin it for everyone?

I live in MX now and I LOVE not having to pump gas. I just tip the dude a few pesos.  But never knew this was a thing in the US as well.When those assholes did this in a large group on the streets in NYC, they whined, "but we ain't go nowhere to take our ATVs and dirtbikes!" 

Yes, yes you do. You were just too stupid to realize you need to buy something with which to tow your fucking off-road and non-street-legal toy to a place where you pay an entry fee and are allow to play safely in the dirt, you dipshits.For motorsports, I'd have to say Valentino Rossi.Well shit, I don't want to get out of my car and put my hands on the gas handle that's likely covered in snot, smegma and pubes from the last guy who just scratched his nuts and I live in a really nice climate.No penis.  I don't understand all the "cis/pan/et al" distinctions we have these days (I'm somewhat new to Reddit and guess I live under a rock because I never heard of any of this nonsense until Reddit).  I am a woman. WOMAN. Boobs (small, but they exist), female reproductive organs and I like men. And, I now shave my legs and wear under armor during all track days. "See how good I am? See? I am sitting! See my gentle face? I will be kind! I will love you and protect you! I will always be there for you. Please love me as I will love you."That's pretty damn funny.  And sad.  The gas station attendant had to have enough working brain cells to know that some people are out of state.  And why come up screaming at someone, especially if they are substantially larger than you? Why not politely explain the situation instead of scaring someone into thinking they are gonna be attacked and they then fuck your ass up?

I have strong admiration for the self control your coach displayed.I felt really weird at first as well, like I was some spoiled, entitled brat.  Then I realized they prefer to pump because they can earn tips, so I can tip them 5 pesos (which is nothing to me, but a whole lot to them) and everyone is happy. I'm outside Guad in an expat town.  I was told its not required, but I would just feel wrong not doing it. These guys have shit lives and barely make enough to live a shit life.  I usually have them wipe my windows and check my tire pressure (wonder if they actually put air in.  I should drive around the corner the next time and see if there is a difference.)That's hilarious.  I can picture you sitting there fuming, thinking, "these assholes are lazy as FUCK."You never know what's on hand rail, gas pumps, etc.  Imagine some guy just picked his nose, scratched his balls and dug some itchy wormy eggs out of his ass.  Credit cards and actual cash are also some of the filthiest things out there.  I have to stop myself from biting my nails after handling money.Oops.  Typo. I meant "news" to me.I am so utterly jealous.  Jealous jealous jealous.  I want to hold a smiling baby goat.  How can I be that girl in the pic?Makes sense. But, why haven't those two hold-out states caught up with the times and updated their laws?All makes sense.   And I am more than happy to pay a bit more while I get to sit in my car while someone else pump the gas.  Are tips expected if they don't wash windows/do tires/check oil and simply pump gas?I really need to take these NSFW tags more seriously.Its not always so easy.  A lot of the adults (and the kids learn this from the adult) start developing an attitude of entitlement.  They ask for something, or try to open your car door as a "service" when you park at a grocery store (even when I am shaking my head and finger and yelling NO) and they get aggressive and pouty when they don't get what they want.

Some locals are good. But too many of them have been given breaks and favors by expats (ie: pay them up front before they do a small repair job or some garden work, then they don't show up, then get upset when word gets out and nobody else around town will hire them).

When I see 9 year old girls snarling at me and calling me puta because I politely refuse to buy their oddly-shaped ceramic "vase" for 100 pesos, its hard to want to help others out.  At least the guys pumping gas are always polite and are doing something.Your eyes look much more beautiful in the after pic.  Of course they are from different angles, but with the after look, the eyebrows are neat and tailored, so they do not distract or take away from your beautiful eye color.May I recommend that you stay away from motorcycle roadracing unless you have great health insurance and a lot of cash to burn.  It is the most amazing feeling in the world to be railing around a corner with your knee firmly planted on the deck.  Even if you are a slowass, it doesn't matter because its fast to you, and it releases all sorts of drugs of happiness into your brain.

But the mental crash after your race weekend or trackday is over is rough.  You go back to real life at your office job and all you can do is relieve the moments on your bike and look forward to spending another $600 for your next trackday, stress about the money, hope you don't crash and total your body and bike, and wish you were a talented badass who could get paid to ride at European (much better) tracks.we have a group of kids around the local store that mostly expats shop at (for the imported stuff) and some kids are so aggressive if you don't buy their little bags of limp beans they will spit on you.  and yes, like you say, it becomes their normal, and they grow into an adult acting in the same manner.Nope.  My dog does it to be extra cute and to get what she wants.If it is fictional, tell me, because I would feel a whole lot better. The book is definitely fiction, written from the perspective of the mother (I have no idea if the mom was interviewed or what).  It occurred about 2 weeks before Columbine (according to what I've read) so it was completely overshadowed.  

I'd be thrilled to hear it never happened in reality.Yes, the book is fictional, but from what I understand, is based on True events.Oh, I understand. I used to take my track bike (a sport bike) unregistered, unplated, no lights, no mirrors, completely not street legal, for a Sunday ride.  I was that obsessed. Only people who ride and feel that thrill can comprehend why we do such stupid things.

Then, I got a $600 ticket.  And I grew up, calmed down, realized I didn't have money to burn on fines, and just had to bite my tongue.

After you roadrace, street riding really loses its luster.  You realize the danger of street riding, and doing 90mph on a nice on-ramp can feel like a crawl.  Well I'm not going to spend hours of my time looking for verifiable proof.  Of course I could be wrong,  but from what I recall, it was based on True events.  If i am wrong, that is a good thing and you can still pitchfork me.That was one of the more adorable puns I've heard.  Have an up vote.Another disappointment.  Here I thought such cute computer fan mushrooms, but this asshole created this all on purpose?  Why do people take time to do these things? Isn't life busy enough?Looks like something out of Miley Cyrus' back yard.That username along with those photos are just not a pleasant thing, may I urge you to reconsider that username?Is...is there something wrong with that? It kills time when you happen to be catastrophically ill.

Edit: I will never comprehend Reddit. Two separate posters commended on my points and one mentioned I spend every day posting (True). I could care less about points and I daily respond  because yeah, I am sick, from a major illness and thus stuck at home, so Reddit helps me kill time.

And I get downvoted. For what? Using reddit while sick at home? For commenting on the fact? Whaddup, guys? Can't a girl comment on an innocuous matter without pissing SOMEONE off about something?Its ok, I also assume everyone on Reddit is a guy.Well, in that case, that's a good reason.No, this is just what happens when you get a very bad illness and have to stay home all day.Tell me about it. My work on Reddit is so important. What would other peons do without reading my incessant prattle of my unsolicited opinion? Kinda like Florida? Nice and flat and hot and not much going on?"Pest" control.  More like "fucking monster control".As a mycologist (cool term, never heard of it before) what do those cute mushrooms do when ingested?Damn, BOOM, snap, you tell him! Well done.  I suppose some people suffer from lack of reading comprehension abilities, even though you were pretty clear with that "amateur" distinction.Ah. Thank you.  Never tried mushrooms, (I guess "shrooms" is the cool way to say it?) And with a heap of prescription opiates in my system for painkiller purposes, I wouldn't want to try it, despite how curious I am.Thank yee kindly.  I just don't get why someone would downvote someone who has a serious illness and spends time on Reddit? I should stop now.  I am expecting far too much from strangers. Thanks for the vote, whatever the motivation is behind it.Its been so long since I saw the movie (saw it right when it came out in theaters....so....1993ish?) that I can't remember those details.  Just that image of the violent hit, her terrified eyes, her hand holdin her split-open mouth and the blood flowing through her fingers.

If he actually had feelings for her (can't remember the details) whatever it was, it wasn't "love" (at least how I define love...how often to you hear men who beat the shit out of their wives insist they love them? And I believe those wife-beaters truly believe they love their wives. But they don't understand what a twisted concept of love they have.)HAHAA I couldn't understand how he was able to hover for a few moments.  I was about to ask if I could come over and eat donuts, then saw the weapon casually on the couch, and decided better to wait until your wife has a bit more safety sense drilled into her. I mean no offense - but, isn't it not a good thing to casually leave your weapon on the couch like that? Could fall behind a cushion, get lost, and of course I assume there are no kids in the house?Now just imagine if a Democratic candidate was caught in a similar lie.Was this Fiennes breakout role? If so, he was just incredible.  I hated him with a passion.This is lovely!  Your grandmother must have been so, so happy to have this very special opportunity to meet her grandson during her final days.  I hope it brings her some serenity and peace.He is amazing.  He scared the shit out of me in ..Hannibal? Or whatever one where he had his back tattooed and set Phillip Seymore Hoffman ablaze.  Then I see him in the cheesy rom-com Maid in Manhattan and fall in lust with his character.Nah, you're right.  I just get extra sensitive when I feel someone thinks I am bullshitting an illness.  That's a touchy area.I always thought it was True, and for some reason I "remember" reading a newspaper article when the mom messed up and said something really stupid to a mother of a dead girl at her funeral.  For some reason, I am sure I read it in a newspaper.  But it was years and years ago (if it did happen) and who the hell knows what my brain is capable of creating.  

If its False, I'd be thrilled, because the entire thing was horrible.  Yet...even if its False, these school shootings happen all too often and that book was so effective at communicating parents who are either clueless to having a psycho kid (in Kevin's case, his father pretended his kid was find while the mom knew the kid was no good).

So many people are quick to blame the parents when kids shoot up a school and often it is the parents who share blame.  But if the kid is good at putting on a good act and staying out of trouble, keeps no evidence in their rooms, how is a parent to know? Read their diaries if they can even find them?  What if you are a parent, do your best and your kid is is truly an evil sack of shit?

And then take Adam Lanza's mom, Nancy, who he murdered.  WTF was she thinking in taking a severely autistic and socially disturbed child to a gun range? Then buying more firearms? And leaving him alone in his room and never searching it?  In that case, I put the blame squarely on her - she knew her son was a mess and she put the firearms right into his hands.

Ok, I shall step off my pedestal now.  All those little kids deads, all those lives ruined, because Nancy Lanza was so reckless and stupid to think she could trust her mentally disabled and unstable son with firearms.The obsession and anxiety of what other people thought of me, my personality or my looks.  Valley Girl. Does that count?OHHHH, makes sense, and I thank you once again.  I promise you, this is nothing.  The cops were nice because they wanted you to realize bad actions have consequences.  One of you could've gotten really hurt exploring an abandoned bldg.  The fact that you feel so guilty shows you are a really good kid who did something most of us did as kids, you were just unlucky and got caught.

It won't go on your record, and I assure you, a few years from now you'll be able to laugh at this.I'm so sorry she can't/won't see the reality of your situation. Not sure of your age or your living situation, but any way you can just make those subjects of discussion off-limits, or are you reliant on her through insurance for your meds and health care?One thing I shall never understand about men and how deep their passion for "their" team can go.Where's the one with hot Daniel Craig doing a similar thing to a board game? I could watch that for hours.Why does this ever surprise anyone? Everyone, friend or foe, spies on one another if its deemed to be in their self-interests.Thank you!  A realistic observation for a change.  I just shake my head each time I read, "But REAL FRIENDS do NOT spy on one another!"   To those people: do you not have the slightest clue on how international diplomacy and survival work in the real world?Hey, I take offense to that, I have a vagina and I don't throw a fit when allies or foes get caught spying.Liking it is not the point.  The point is that is is a reality for national survival. Whether you morally approve or not.That is really damn good!

I have a half dalmation/pointer.  She's white and looks like someone threw a can of black pain on her.  Big spots, small spots, various blobs of black.

I've always wanted to attach a fake set of horns and an udder and have her go as a cow for halloween.

Your dog really looks like a friendly lion.No matter how often its done, the hotdog bun for the dachshund is always so adorable to me.did you ever read those tweets from the staff? every single day they would put up another tweet with a cartoon lion stating "brush your teeth for a long life' and basically telling the world to fuck off about their dentist killing Cecil.

Public relations is not their strong suit.  ....and?Congratulations! You are looking good.  100lbs is something to be very proud of! Feel proud! It will take your mind awhile to catch up but it will happen. And you will see that people will treat you differently (ie:  be nicer) which is pretty fucked up. I mean people like a cashier or a random stranger, not someone you asked on a date.  And sadly, it might happen that some female friends (I don't see this happening often amongst males) will get catty, jealous and nasty.  Happened to me when I lost 20lbs, and I wasn't one who flaunted it or acted like i deserved any recognition.

Be proud! Keep up the great work!  The closer you are to your goal weight the slower it will come off, but by then you will have this new lifestyle as a built-in habit, so it will be enjoyable.  Also, in order not to hit plateaus, be sure to change up your exercise routines.This is useful:  it shows OP that he can keep exploring just be SMART about it.  One bad decision, one step on rotting wood, and next thing you are a 16 year old with a traumatic brain injury.  You don't want that.

Never explore alone, be smart, be safe.

And...since you've been caught once and were essentially given a break, be prepared to get the book thrown at you for felony trespass and what not if you get busted again.  Just something to keep in mind.  There are always consequences.

But please, do not worry about this affecting your future. Most of us did such stupid shit as teens and its amazing we are still alive.When I was 14 I climbed a school fence and chased a chicken into a tree. Cop showed up, and I felt so guilty (he just told us girls to go home.)  Plus, I never knew chickens could fly.   

I fucked up MUCH worst at 22, and at that age, when you know better, that shit does go on your record, costs a lot to get out of, and it can follow you around for the rest of your life.  So, I suppose just be happy you are so young, and I assure you, you will be laughing about this very soon.

Were your parents overall ok when they found out?Damn, that is a tough situation.  Some people who have not suffered depression (or they have, but refuse to call it what it truly is) simply think you can "snap out of it".  

If it were that easy, we'd all snap out of it!  You're in a tough spot.  Until you are handling your insurance on your own, you are stuck with their involvement, and it sounds like you can't even nicely ask them to please not speak about it to you.

What about them coming with you to one doc appointment where the doc could explain what mental illness is to them? Or would they just think the doc is full of shit?  

All I can offer is a whole lot of empathy and do your best to protect your medical records privacy. Not sure of your age but even if you are a minor, they have no rights to your records unless you allow it.

If you are able to pay your own co-pays, would that get them off your back? People do not realize that a mental illness is often no different than a conventional physical illness. If you had a blood clotting disorder and needed daily meds, nobody would say "be strong, you don't need those meds!" 

Why can't it be the same way with mental illness? Its all chemical and neurological reactions in the brain, and it is physical when it comes down to it.See? Its all good.   I don't mean to sound like a judgmental, nagging ass, but I hope you continue to walk your dog every night even after your punishment is over. Your dog loves walks, no matter how large his yard is and walks bring dogs so much happiness and excitement.Damn, girlfriend, nearly 100lbs in an year, amazing progress! Just wait another six months and you will be amazed at how much your bone structure will show.  

When I dropped 30lbs (which changes your body a lot when you are barely 5'3) my entire face changed. My 'round' face turned out to have an actually quite nice bone structure that I never knew existed.  

Keep up the wonderful work.  These posts always inspire me whether I have nothing to lose or 10lbs to lose.  Thanks for sharingYou didn't even look like a "skinnyfat" in your before pic. Just slim, but with very minimal subcutaneous fat.  Your after pic looks hot.  You have what my girlfriends and I like to call a "gropeable" body.  Great work.Oh, cool so doggie gets a walk every night no matter what.  I've heard border collies are very, very smart dogs.Look at what a hunk you've turned into!Holy shit, look at you!! Amazing and beautiful.Just two months?  That is an incredible change for such a short time. At this rate, you'll whip yourself into badass shape in no time.  Fuck anyone who gives you any shit for simply holding a towel.  There always has to be someone to rain on your parade. You look good and your progress in such a short time is really impressive.I'm a 41 year old woman - so I hope that didn't come off as creepy. The fact that I got downvoted 6 times for the comment you replied to reflects that I really hit a nerve with some men who fall right into that category of deep emotional attachment to their teams.  Why so upset, guys? I realize that not all men smash their TV to bits when things go awry, but the fact that I got downvotes for this just proves my point.

And some men say women are the "hysterical" and "emotional" ones.How do you people react who haven't seen you in a year? I once ran into an old friend who was about 70lbs overweight.  He was always cute, but obese.  The day he called out my name (I walked right by him on the street) it took a moment, and I smiled and said DAMN!

He looked like a model. It was incredible.  I was so happy for him, because he really suffered from low self esteem and let people walk all over him.  He had become all buffed up, and still was modest and humble because he knew what life was like on the other side.   It was great to see him so happy.As my French husband once explained, EVERYTHING in France can be turned into something sexual.  Even the most innocuous of words can, in the right context, be a sexual reference.Good fucking lord! Did the knife reach his vertebrae? I can't read those images worth a damn.  I wonder if that top cervical vertebrae got nicked.  That is one evil hit.That's just a strange building overall.See? You again proved my point. Look how angry and insulting you are simply because I said I didn't understand how men could find team sports THAT upsetting?

How about you not be a fucking idiot and explain to me in a non-insulting, reasonable fashion, why SOME men get so emotional over sports?

 I know some women do it too but not on the same level as men. Women lose their shit over other things that are (to me) ridiculous.

But why do I need to qualify my question with "women do it too"? You sound just like a female SJW crying for equality for all the inane reasons.See? There you go.  You explained what it meant to you without the "you're a fucking idiot".  Was that so hard not to be an asshole?

And it is an overwhelmingly male thing to get emotionally invested in sports to that degree.If you think I'm being condescending by being polite, maybe you should take it easy on the internet.  Not quite fair, an extra penis in his spine was one of them.You really deserve hazard and trauma pay for all that terror you had to tolerate.  Obese people demanding you HELP THEM have sex by holding obese person's legs up?  Pus and stinking ooze coming from wounds that some fat slob refuses to take care of and your HAIR falls into it? (I would've shaved my hair off).  

Fuck, why do you think people just let themselves go so beyond the point of not cleaning or caring for their own wounds and have no shame that a team of 5 people are dry-heaving while trying to change bandages seeping in blood and grey pus that stinks like a cesspool? 

How can they not care or be remotely embarrassed? I once pissed myself (try being a girl peeing in a urinal after an angiogram up the femoral artery, so you are NOT allowed to move the leg at all for 8 hours, and you don't have the upper body/core strength to hover over that cheap, bendable plastic placed under your ass).   I kept apologizing to the nurse and bitch had such an attitude.  Shit, I didn't do it on purpose.  That was right when I felt a punch to the gut and had to stop.  Sodomized to death at 2 years old.  I don't think it gets much worse than that.That is just....500lbs and without the legs? And he kept on eating? And he was so huge the penis disappeared? I'm going to be sick.  What the fuck is wrong with people? We hear so many of these stories it sounds like shit like this is a common thing (people allowing themselves to be 400lbs overweight, lose body part after body part, don't take care of their wounds, and keep on mowing down food.)I sincerely appreciate you taking the time to write out a thoughtful and meaningful explanation.  This is something I can relate to as you've explained it very well.  You also didn't resort to lowly insults or complaining that other people do unreasonable things as well.  

If you love something that much, even if you don't play the sport itself, it means something to you.  Reacting with violence, destroying things and beating the shit out of opposing team's fans I'll never find rational or relatable, but I can certainly appreciate the feeling of a personal loss or depression or a emptiness.

Especially if it's family tradition.  I grew up with my dad loving the SF49ers so for awhile they had to win and if they didn't I'd be bummed for a bit without understanding why.  

When I see Nadal not play well, I also grab at my hair and feel this crushing disappointment and sadness for him. 

And when I see a good guy or team that's worked so hard win, even if I could care less about the sport, sometimes I'm so happy for these complete strangers I want to cry.

I appreciate you taking the time to write, and also not being a presumptuous asshole like someone else was. No shit.  How can you be older than 14 and use the word "vagina" as a means to insult yet still be able to look at yourself in the mirror without cringing.I didn't think you helped them - if I did, I would nominate you for the Nobel Prize for doing Disgusting Things Beyond the Call of Duty and Job Pay.  Eh, my situation wasn't that bad, I just really have compassion for you nurses who have to deal with some of the worst of the worst.Have an upvote for the "Fraxafixin".Good. Fucking. God.   
That is a good advertisement for the benefits of full-face helmets.Any suggestions for those gigantic red ant motherfuckers with huge mandibles that swarm my dog's bowl (and I pick up the bowl at night and they are all over my arm before I'm aware of what just happened?)Does your coworker not give a shit about the interior of his car, or blood or guts or maggots or other nasty shit that could end up there?"Grass-fed beef".  When there is a goddamn scorpion on it, I really don't think "grass-fed" becomes a high selling point.What kind of crazy bitch taunts a guy who is clearly a badass when she has no more backup? Meth. It has to be meth.  With that closeup, she looked much older and that face just had that meth look.Ok.  As a cat lover, I am compelled to admit some cats are truly assholes.My husband had a punishment known as "The Sock".  Our beloved asshole cat would get bored at 4am and yowl in our faces on our bed.  We'd shove him off, so he smarted up and learned to yowl by standing about 10 feet away.  I'd tried tossing one of my nearby stuffed animals at him but my aim was shit.

But my husband, damn, his aim was deadly accurate even with his eyes close and while half asleep.  The cat tried that yowling "I'm booooored" shit one night, husband reached over to his night table where he found a freshly-washed pair of socks rolled into a tight ball and fired that missile right at that cat with a direct him.

After that, the cat tried the 4am yowl a few more times, but my man would just lift his arm holding a rolled up pair of socks and the cat would flee and leave us alone.

The Sock.  Give it a try.If I ever had kids, I'd hire you to train them.Yeah, just imagine if she refused to perform gay marriages because she was Muslim and it was against her religion.  Would those right-wing politicians still be supporting her "right to her religion"?Who the hell refers to information as "poignant"?Must be a tightly rolled pair.  Banzai never fucked with us a 4am again.  My man would say, "want The Sock?" and lift said Sock and the cat would run away.That 'YOOO" part made me jump back here on the couch.I feel for you.  I got a spinal tumor at a young age and have since been in agonizing, chronic pain.  Even when I show up to the ER during a bad flare up with all my medical records of spine surgery and radiation, more often than not, the doc rolls his eyes, says it can't hurt THAT much (FUCK you, you think I'd come in here and pay my co-pay of $1000 if it didn't hurt "that much") and treats me like a drug seeker.

Its the most betraying feeling in the world.I've also gotten the "you are too young to be in such pain". Oh, really? And do you tell the parents of toddlers with cancer, or newborns with heart defects that they are "too young" for these "adult" diseases?What was I thinking? I humbly apologize.The "grumble".  I love it when pets do that.  My dog MUST get the last word it.  We can go back and forth for up to 8 rounds where I shush her, and she grumbles, but each time her grumble becomes quieter and quieter. And just when I think I've gotten the final "shush" in, she waits a little longer...and I heard an irate, but veryyyyy quiet, "Mmmmmmmph" from her.I often tried to understand the actual anger from some of the people from FPH. I mean these people said they wished "fat" people would just die, or get raped, or other horrible things.

Then I remind myself that I grew up in LA and in the Bay Area, both areas of which are very health-oriented.  You don't see obese people on those scooters on a regular basis and it would be considered a shameful thing.

From that standpoint, I wonder how I would feel if I were literally surrounded by people destroying their bodies virtually everywhere I went. But, no matter what, I still hate when I hear the awful things that are said about obese people ("they are worthless, they should all just die") but I think I can understand why some people have such a high distaste for morbidly obese people.  

I just wish they could be treated with basic respect. Not coddling, not accommodating, but basic respect.That I can understand. The few times I saw gigantic parents and their clearly overfed young children, I felt anger at how unfair it was to the child.  Then you add in the excuses, the nastiness I received from women (never from men, whatever their size) when I got ripped and fit, and the character of whining "I hate being fat, you are so lucky to be skinny" (it has nothing to do with luck, I was overweight, so I got healthy and active and got in shape).

If I were surrounded by that every day, I would really lose my patience as well regarding that character you speak of.  Its a character of refusing to take responsibility.  I get what you're saying. And I happened to have a fucked spine which means walking can be very painful and difficult (but I don't use those scooters) and I get very upset when I see a heavy person who takes up a handicapped space when I need that space, and I have a legal handicapped parking permit (or more importantly, a wheelchair user really needs that space b/c they need the extra room to load/unload their chair and transfer).

Now, I know there are all sorts of invisible illnesses (I've been accused of faking my disability because I am slim and "look too good") and I don't mean to do the same thing when I see an obese person use a handicapped space.

I used to get furious when I'd have someone 300lbs overweight complain to me "oh, I know just how you feel, my knees and back hurt too!"  No, no no no NO. My disability came from a spinal tumor.  It was not self-inflicted.

As I mentioned in another post, I just was lucky enough to grow up in cities where obesity is seen as shameful and people of all ages value fitness.

Despite all that, it just makes me sad when some people say horrible things that I read on voat when an obese person posts a progress pic (PROGRESS PIC, meaning the person knows they are not at their goal weight) or they shame a person who is at the gym and really trying (not fucking around or taking selfies) or they scoff at someone at the track running the best they can.

What are those people supposed to do? They are working out, trying their best, but they still invoke the ire of some FPH.   If I were treated like that, I don't think I'd ever want to do any exercise outside the privacy of my house, and there is only so much you can do in your own room. 

I do hear what you are saying.  The most backstabbing, disloyal and vile "friends" I've ever had happened to be women who were overweight.  If I happened to dress nicely ("sexy") for whatever we were doing, the passive-aggressive hate would come out.  The snide comments about other fit women.  The need to try and cut down attrative, fit women ("I bet her tits are fake; she must be fucking dumb as a rock;  at least I don't spent all my time at the gym").  I've had vile rumors spread about me from women who I later admitted to me they were simply jealous and wanted me out of whatever "group" activity we were in.  

That shit hurts.  Its the reverse of FPH.  To have an obese "friend" do those horrible things to you just because they are jealous of how you look (and no, I never flaunted my physique to her or put her down or even mentioned it) is a really shitty feeling.I went to grad school in Malibu and lived in the Valley for about 5 years.  If you were 10lbs overweight, trust me, you stood out like a sore thumb.  Same in the Bay Area.  People were thankfully much less shallow and materialistic, but overall, they are more active, engage in outdoor stuff, and for those who aren't filthy rich, they work out at Gold's or the Y.   When people used to tell me how "lucky" I was (and they knew how sick I was) and how "great" it was that I could "stay home all day and not work" I'd tell them, how about we switch places? You go bankrupt, be in agony all day, spend what little money you have on meds, not eat because you are in so much pain the thought of food (and I fucking love food) makes you want to vomit.  You'll get my body and be skinny and in chronic, severe pain and unable to work out (much less stand up and pour a bowl of cold cereal) and I'll take your body, work out, eat right and have a kickin' physique after 7 months."

That usually shuts them up.It is an enormous difference if you drive around West Hollywood or Santa Monica, then head inland for just 20 minutes.  Night and day difference.  You can really see the connection (right or wrong) between poverty and obesity.I commend you for your patience.   Having a disease that people don't understand, or being strong and hiding your pain with a fake smile, saying, "Oh, I'm good" when people ask how you are because you know if you told them the truth they would not know how to react, and to not lose your shit when people tell you, "But you look just FINE!" is HARD.

And you realize you have to learn to pick your battles.  You already expend so much energy just trying to survive and doing basic life tasks.  You can't waste excess energy getting angry, and if you can educate someone, all the better.

But goddamn, I have had to stop myself from going into a rage when I've pulled up into handicapped places, with my placard displayed, and before I even step out of the car, some asshole gets in my face and yells at me for being a disgusting fraud.  Really? He has xray vision and can see my spine? He is a mind reader and knows what level of pain I am in?   Its those occurrences that make me want to throw things.I have no idea what you are trying to say - did you maybe respond to the incorrect comment?No worries : )Why would you think the TSA would "stick their fingers in your vagina?"  I never go through that screen and am always patted down.  They have to place their hands on my breasts and groin region (and if one ever poked a finger in said region, of course I'd lose my shit).

I get you are upset. I've had my ass groped too, and no, a woman is never guilty of "bringing it upon herself" no matter how she dresses. 

I'm just wondering why you feel this is the "worst violation you've ever felt."  

I am not minimizing your emotions - you feel the way you feel.  But from your comments it sounds like you are really taking this far beyond what it actually was. An unacceptable and unwanted touching, but you sound awfully close to making it sound like a rape.I am very sorry these things have happened to you.  I really do not know why some men thing women are like help-yourself salad bars.  I've had men waltz right up to me and grab my ass like they are shaking my hand.

I was into martial arts from a young age, so I often didn't have problems confronting people who did that.  But there were those times that I wasn't prepared, or just so stunned that the guy was doing whatever he was doing, or it was done around friends and I didnt' want to "make a scene" that would be forever talked about, so I kept quiet.

And later I realized as a victim of assault, no matter how 'mild', its not your responsibility to make the aggressor feel comfortable.  And so many men who do these kinds of things bank on the fact that the woman will not want to make "a scene".  How often to men do things like this then once they get caught, they jump back and accuse the woman of overreacting?

Too often. The only thing I can say is stay angry as long as you need, and next time if something like this happens, don't hold back.  Nobody deserves a second chance or benefit of the doubt if there is clearly no doubt (such as this situation).  Never feel embarrassed to rip an assaulter a new asshole.  

Just imagine, how would a fucking asshole like him react if someone did that to his girlfriend, daughter or wife?  He'd probably start a fistfight because in his eyes, the woman is his property to protect.

If you have access to one, go spend some time beating the shit out of a punching bag.  And if you ever have the inclination, take up martial arts.  It shaped me in many ways that I was not even aware of until later in life.  Its not meant as an offensive thing, but defensive, and the longer you study it the more aware your mind is to impending danger and you could care less about "making that scene."

Wish you the best.  Next lingerie party, dress as sexy as you want, and go with friends, and enjoy yourself, as you have every right to do.  Did you not fully read what I wrote - I explicitly said that I hoped when I saw a fat person who appeared able-bodied, that that person truly had a disability NOT brought on by their own over-eating.  When did I (not the other posters, but me) say I 'hated' fat people? NEVER.  Go back, read the entire applicable portion of the thread where I stated I "wished people who were obese were still treated with basic respect."  Or did you read that but conveniently choose to ignore it in order to rack up your mental ammunition to hate me?

How am I being a judgmental "fuck"? And that is very rude and when you go off attacking people like that, it makes you look very unreasonable and detracts from your argument.

You are cherry-picking things.  I was pretty clear in my posts that I wanted all people to be treated with basic respect (but maybe you skipped that one).  I was also clear in that I have NO SYMPATHY for healthy people who bring on their own disabilities via eating too much and not moving, then having the gall to complain to ME about being in pain.

And if that makes me a "judgmental fuck" looking for an "excuses to be hateful", then all I can do is made a judgment about you:  you are lazy, overweight, won't take responsibility for it, and consider yourself to be in the same category as me:  someone who is disabled due to nothing of my own doing and who suffers daily.  You have the option to change and improve your life, whereas I do not.

The only person sounding hateful is you.  Re-read your post. Look at how you lash out.  It makes you look bad, not me.When I was 25lbs overweight (I'm a woman), I remember the envy I had towards attractive women.  I never acted on it, or spread rumors, or was mean or rude, but I would just feel it was unfair, because I was 100% convinced that no matter how hard I worked out and ate right, I could never, ever be attractive.  At its worst, my envy manifested itself at its worst with a "glare" after a pretty girl walked by me.  

Obviously, I was dead wrong in so many ways.  And because society does treat attractive people better than unattractive people, I felt the injustice. But then I got a trainer, followed his instructions (even though I was firmly of the belief my body could not change) and lo and behold a year later I had this really ripped body and I could actually see my facial bone structure.

I can see why some (not all) obese women are angry.  I look back at the "glares" I gave in my youth and I feel nothing but shame, because I was obviously very wrong to act that way.  The saddest, most wasteful thing is that nearly all people who are unhappy with their physique can change it.  They just have to really want it.No, fuck you - you call me all that shit and tell me "calm down keep your shirt on jesus christ?"

Fuck off. No, its your bullshit "sorrynotsorry".  You want someone to accept an apology for you calling them a "fucking judgmental this and that?" Make an effort at being genuine instead of trying to flip your stupidity around and blame me.I'm hardly "being awesome", its just troubling how groups like that get more and more comfortable with harassing people in public, online, etc. who are trying to better themselves.  I couldn't care less about the women who have 100lbs of extra weight and post selfies in their undies proclaiming their 'curves' must be honored.

I am talking about how much more comfortable each devotee of FPH becomes with being hateful as the group grows.  I read suggestions about the best way to shame a person in public, simply because that person is overweight and especially if the person is working out.  This is how hate groups get out of control.  A small fringe pushes the boundaries and at first, the others are mildly surprised, but nobody says anything, then they get desensitized to it, and soon enough, everyone in that group actively celebrates when a fat teen dies in a housefire because she was too large to be rescued (yes, this happened, the girl was 15 and she died, and FPH celebrated.)

That's what scares me about this group.She dunked her head in water, said a few sentences, so all her sins were forgiven. Duh. She's perfect now.What area (state) do you live in? For me, its uncommon. But I can see the lack of patience with obese people if you are quite literally surrounded by it (especially if its your parents and you worry about them dying or a leg rotting off).Completely agree with you there.  They might as well say smoking is great and EffYourCancerandLungStandards.  I don't like FPH at all, but I equally don't like any sort of HAES or FA nonsense.

Neither do I.  IF they are happy with their size, good for them.
But if they whine to me, or complain that their knees hurt, or whine that the world should be remodeled to accommodate their size (larger clothing for the same prices as smaller clothing, larger airplane seats, men are "supposed" to sleep with fat women, insulting slim women or crying "thin privilege") then that is what irritates me.  Or, if they perpetuate lies that "diets don't work" (lifestyle changes DO work), or that you can be healthy just because your BP and cholesterol checked out, yet you are 80lbs overweight, that is not something I can accept.  It is never healthy to put so much weight on your joints, not to mention the myriad of other diseases, so please do not promote that obesity is "healthy", because you are influencing young children or teens who may end up getting diabetes with that attitude.


I've met people who are overweight and are kind, nice, have great character and are wonderful to be around. Why the fuck should I care what they look like? They don't "stink", they have good hygiene and they work hard.

How does the value of a person suddenly drop just because they put on 30lbs?  Yes, I can see the distaste of seeing a person put on an extra 200lbs, but if they are still a good person and are not complaining about it or making excuses, or interfering with anyone else, who cares? I don't.  If once in awhile I get squished on a bus or plane, I can handle it. (If I live in the south and this was a daily occurrence, maybe I couldn't handle it.)

Yes, I know there is the whole "but they cost the health care industry so much" argument. Yes, they increase costs.  I've met people who've had that stomach reducing whatever surgery, lost 80lbs, did great, but said fuck it, I still want to eat, and now their legs are rotting off.  That part sucks, but the entire health care system in the US is generally a mess insofar as costs mismanagement and the overcharges of everything. Obesity is just one cog of the mess, and to use that as an excuses to treat kind, hardworking people like dirt just because they happen to be fat is something that I can never agree with or support.Yep, absolutely True.  I used to roadrace motorcycles, and I made sure to buy extra insurance, such as lifeflight helicopter transport and disability.   I did bonk my head a few times, but ironically, what bankrupted me was a spinal tumor.  Here I crashed over 8 times at anywhere from 50mph to 130mph and at most I had broken hands and feet and some sprained thing and many bumps and bruises (I once broke my ass cheek - did not think that was possible).  

Shit happens. At least enjoy your passions while you can, just be responsible and buy extra insurance because you know very well bad things happen in such activities.I am curious, do you hold the same level of hate for someone who is, say, 20-30lbs overweight and has been at that weight for years and is stable? Clearly they have weight to lose, but they don't stink, or take over your chair or space, or grope your arms or abs at concerts (nobody should do that).  Or do you look at them more with a general distaste, but not at the level of hatred you hold for those gigantic, smelly slobs who take scooters away from disabled people?Who in their right mind would be jealous of someone who has Crohns? I've had a few friends with that disease, all were very skinny and each of them suffered so, so much.  You can't stray far from a toilet, you never know when you will get a Krakatoa attack, the abdominal pain, the asshole burning, the fear of eating - I cannot imagine wanting  such a horrible disease just to be skinny when those people have the ability to simply eat reasonably and be normal-sized.  

If I could swap my tumor-riddled spine with a 200lb person and my back pain would go away, I'd do it in an instant, so long as I could immediately start working out and get on a healthy diet.  It would be a dream come True.Yep.  And I assure you:  the people who shamed me (family, acquaintances, people who gave me their unsolicited opinion, and no, I did not post selfies of myself and say "aren't I hot as fuck" because this was in the 90s) only made me feel worse, worthless, and that I had zero value because I was 25lbs overweight that even if I did change (which I was convinced was impossible due to lack of knowledge on my part) my value was a human being was not worth it.

Then I met someone special who loved me for me.  He also happened to be in excellent shape and I was highly suspicious as to why a very handsome, 6'4 guy in great shape would be attracted to a 5'3 woman who had 25lbs to lose (and who was constantly reminded of it nearly every time I went in public - Los Angeles area).

Once I realized he was for real, I allowed him to train me.  He gave me support.  He didn't shame me.  He also was honest.  If I wasn't working hard enough at the gym and whined, "its taking so slow, but I work so hard" he'd stop me right there and call me on my bullshit.  Same with food.  He's say, "go ahead and eat those carbs if you want, but you've eaten plenty for tonight and it will slow down your goals".  

I followed his plan, began to love in, and in  5 months had a totally different body. In 1 year I looked fucking ripped and some women in the gym actually came to me for advice, thinking I was a lightweight competitor (nicest compliment I  ever could've received.)

My point:  When FPH cite to some Daily Mail story where 'this person was shamed and they lost weight, ergo, let's continue shaming because it works!' they are so wrong.  Shaming works only on a tiny fraction of people, and it hurts so many others.  It was the love and support and respectful treatment that encouraged me to work hard, change my lifestyle and value myself enough to do what needed to be done to get the hardbody I wanted.I was enjoying it, but damn, that ending really upgraded the entire already enjoyable and creative story to a new level.  Badass.I just realize I do not like the Missile Shark.  But if they set that up with bait and poor sharkey was chasing the bait, they are fucking meanies.Very impressive, but nobody can outdo Phillip Petit.  See "Man on Wire" if you haven't.  Its beautiful and incredible.Can anyone put this in slo-mo? This is fascinating how she took down that larger man with the right moves.  Only Sir Alpaca could come up with such amazing shit.   

Edit:  Duh.  Shame in me.  Maybe it's Dame Alpaca. I'm a woman yet I always assume everyone on reddi this a male.  No, a judge cannot simply ignore requests to cooperate and apologize because if they do not, they are deemed not in compliance with the rules of the job and they get in deep shit.

This judge is doing damage control to save his job, nothing more, and if you truly believe he is apologetic about what he said and cares about the victim and is the right person to be a judge, you are hopelessly naive.I would say in this day and age, unless he hides under a rock and has no exposure to the outside world, for him to ask those questions, especially as a judge, shows he is hopelessly behind the times and doesn't understand our current standards.

I've been a lawyer for 15 years and seen judges do all sorts of ridiculous things.  They are human and make mistake. But sometimes, the mistake is so egregious you really have to wonder if this person just had brain fart or is truly that stupid.

A judge questioning a victim for testimony that goes on the record is not having a casual conversation.  There are many rules of evidence of what is and is not permitted, and not being in the Canadian system, I have no idea what those rules are in Canada.

This guy fucked up royally.You've been through a trauma most of us cannot comprehend.  When I read about how your hands were shaking and that affected your EMT job, and how you feared IEDs driving down the roads back here at home, it hit me hard of how we still do not treat our vets adequately upon their return home.

I do hope you can find a way to deal with the PTSD which doesn't affect your career path, and will get you back into a challenging position that pays you what you deserve.

You have done so much in your young life.  You likely feel "old" because most people your age are very immature in experience and levels of emotional range compared to you.  Your soul may be "older" but you are still very, very young.

You can still rebuild.  It may take some time, but you have your education, your smarts, and your military experience.  And, no matter how you may feel, you are a determined man - its pretty clear from your writing that you are willing to do what it takes.That has got to break your hearts.  She could feel better but refuses care due to mental issues, and so she continues to worsen, while you and your mom are required to be caregivers and have your hearts broken because someone you love is suffering and no matter how hard you try, you can't help her.In the 90s, nobody dared admit they were diagnosed as depressed.  Now its like a badge of honor. "I am bipolar, depressed, suffer from PTSD, OCD, ADD, ADHD, LMNOP.  Yes, I am all self-diagnosed.  Feel sorry for me."OP, did you accidentally post this in WTF as opposed to Uplifting News? Get it together, OP!What's WTF about having your last wish granted when you are nearly dead? Please explain.She's making friends, I see, who will never, ever forget her behavior.Its the walls.  The dogs like the support an feel safer in a box-like bed.  You dog abuser, you.I know, unfuckingbelievable that his loved ones took the time to wheel him, comfortably while in his bed, and nice and warm, into his beloved forest, so his last memories would be in the nature that brought him so much happiness throughout life.You really need to reevaluate (if you give a damn, that is) your ideas regarding kindness for the sick and dying.Hmmm....they didn't mention anything about their control group either.Hard to tell since you aren't facing the camera, but I will say when I was 23, I came face-to-face with the cutest guy who was sitting on my friend's couch as I walked in the door.  I was instantly attracted and he had this great smile. He was also paralyzed as a complete T6. We dated for a year. Wheelchair and all that came with it was not an issue for me.Yes!! First, your grooming needs to improve. Shave. Get those eyebrows cleaned up at a salon and get a shorter haircut that flatters your face better.  I see you as someone with huge potential. Not sure of your build or age, but bulking up can also help.  Not huge, just a good, fit and athletic shape.You have a lot of potential but I recommend cleaning up the scruff. Either go clean shaven, or have a full, healthy beard. The wispy stuff is not attractive to most women.This is coming from an almost-42 year old woman. You look youthful for your age and nice and clean-cut.  If you really want to go in for the kill, I would whip yourself into shape. Just getting fit would increase your attractiveness (which is already there) quite a bit.Coming from a woman, I think you're stunning. Hard to really say because the one close-up is very blurry, but you have really special features.  Full lips, large eyes, lovely face shape and really nice physique. Beautiful woman.No no no no! You look sad, bored and either depressed or that you are too cool for everything else.  And lose the headphones.

Women want to see a happy guy. So get a pic of you smiling!Oh this made me bust out laughing.I was going to suggest Eastern European.Congratulations on the weight loss! That is something to be really proud of. Your facial shape/bone structure is coming through, and I see a very handsome man who will blossom as you continue to get fit. I like your feature and your hair/eye/skin color and contrast.  Keep up the good work and you will be a hunk in no time.Very good looking guy, love the suit pic.  I would just recommend shaving the neck for a nice, tailored look.You know the actor Jonathon Rhys Meyers? He's a freakin' hunk (unfortunately, now a raging alcoholic).  You have very unique eyes and your haircut along with your facial shape is rendering the feminine look. You have full lips - which are a superb thing. 

You simply need to put it all together.  Better clothes, a masculine haircut and working out to bulk up. I cannot tell in the pic, but you look small.  You are only 18, and your body can still continue to grow.

Go to a high-end salon for a good haircut. Be proud of those facial features because you can easily have model-features if you put it all together.  

People say you look feminine because your haircut is not doing your features any justice and pulling you more towards a feminine side.Love your smile, I would definitely recommend teeth whitening.  You have a happy face, nice hair and losing 20lbs can really change your entire appearance.  When I did that in my 20s, my entire body changed and my facial structure came out and suddenly I had cheekbones. You'll also feel better, be more confident and have more energy.

May I also suggest updated your wardrobe? That dress does you no favors and it belongs back in the 80s or 90s.  Dress more as a young woman rather than as a teen.  You have a whole lot of potential to be a beautiful woman - just a bit of work on staying healthy and fit, and a style/haircut update.Hard to judge with just one pic, and nothing to reflect size/height, but from this pic, you look very handsome, nicely dressed and like an approachable, nice man. You'd be the type of guy I would find very attractive (still do) if I were still your age.  You are handsome, and more importantly, look nice and approachable.  You carry yourself with confidence in the pix and don't have that "tough guy/asshole" aura that some guys put off in some attempt to look tough or cool.

Yeah, I'd wanna climb on you.You are a really nice looking guy. Very hard to tell, but i think your haircut is not doing you any favors.  Maybe a shorter style or something more complementary to your facial shape. I think you also might look better with a goatee than the current facial hair situation.

Either way, nice looking guy.  Use the puppy pic if you need an on-line dating pic. We women love that.Hard to say, pic isn't best quality. Smile, please! We women are attracted to men who look happy and approachable, not scrunched up, angry looking dudes.

My personal taste? Shave the wisps. If your facial hair isn't thick enough to sport a thick goatee or beard, then its kind of a Justin Bieber looking thing and that can lower a man's appeal.

Edit:  You have a nice haircut, but I don't think its a good cut for your facial shape.  A high-end salon could give you a better cut, which can really do wonders and show off your facial structure.  I'm no stylist, but I'm thinking a shorter cut where it stands up more on the top.

Either way, consider yourself lucky because you are a nice looking guy.This is coming from a woman - you really have beautiful eyes and nice hair, but unless you lose those 20lbs (and I've been there, so I know what its like) you cannot see bone structure on your face. And bone structure really can make your beauty shine.  A healthy body isn't just about weighing less or looking "skinny". When I lost 30lbs in my 20s, everything changed on my body and face.  My skin also looked better (your skin doesn't have any issues) and I looked like I had more energy - you look a bit tired.

You have tremendous potential if you are willing to put in the effort.  And if weight loss is something you are not interested in, then fuck it all, love yourself and live for you, as you still have very pretty features and face. (Can't speak to body as you only have face pics.)I love the haircut for some reason. Reminds me of Jeremy Renner.   I would recommend you shave fully. The half-beard thing doesn't look clean-cut or tailored and detracts from your appearance.

Cute guy.Goddamn!! Coming from a woman - you look HOT! Fit, strong, slim, just freakin' great!! Such an incredible change 31lbs can make.  That weightlifting can do wonders.

I congratulate you - you look so sexy and so good!C'mon man, don't be a perv. This is progress pics, not GirlsGoneWild. She was brave enough to post them, don't be a douche.This is amazing. 100lbs is something to be very proud of! You are looking good and looking forward when you post your own progress pix.Your change is phenomenal. You worked hard, and you look incredible.  Petite and fit and strong.  Great work!Look at you - sexy, fit mama! You look wonderful. Great job.Hey, that was really nice and mature of you! Thanks for that! Its not often that you get a mature and level-headed response like that on Reddit.  : )I am a woman, and maybe someone thought it came from a guy and it was some perv comment.  You really did a great job.I put my foot in my mouth so often I have a podiatrist on call to extricate it from my throat.  Suddenly I don't feel so guilty about eating bacon.  If I can convince myself that bacon comes from porcine-monsters like this and not some poor, cute baby pig in a factory, with no room to run and play and I will stop now.Better than all your friends calling you Numb Nuts. (The guy was on a motorcycle, UPS truck pulled out in front of him and he somehow broke his balls in the crash.)That's really nice! We had an empty, shallow closet space in our old condo so we bought a taller version from Ikea.  The squares look so good when filled up with books. You guys did a nice job.MUCH better than that Simpson chick (Ashley?) who got caught lip-syncing  on SLN and her little hoe-down dance.Just imagine the flying shoes.As long as you are cool with getting someone's nutsack hair or smegma particles on you or in your food, good on you.  (I've seen guys scratch their balls/ass before pumping gas, opening door handles, etc. I don't like the idea of having human feces on my fingernails, especially if I absentmindedly rub my eyes or something.)Damn, you look great!! You worked hard for that and you truly made a huge difference in such a short time.You are a very handsome guy. Keep up the great work and soon enough you will be loving how you look and feel. Great job!I am so envious! That must've bee such an incredible experience. Is that mama in the back there?Look at you - what a tremendous change in only 9 months. Not sure how traditional your parents and family are, but were they worried you were starving to death?Didn't even see the body of water. Thought, "well of COURSE you can't see shit, its a cloudy day overlooking a cliff."Juan Bondito.You didn't have to join a gym and proved that the "I can't afford to work out" is bullshit.  You look great.  Now, get into yoga and you will learn some pretty exciting stuff and show off your cool poses.Do you always yammer like this? I had to stop reading after the second sentence. Psst...nobody cares when they see a wall of text.Look at that smile, "Please don't climb any higher, I do not want a herniated disc."Good job! Keep it up!I know my words will likely sound meaningless, but is there any way you can get a second therapist with whom you do feel comfortable sharing these horrible memories that still haunt you today? You are able to put on a great show to the outside world, but inside you are suffering and understandably so.

I never suffered sexual abuse, just awful physical abuse and it took a long, long time for me to let go of the rage.  I needed help.  And I also was told during one appointment, "why all the drama?" 

Its because it was all I knew. But I don't pretend to speak for you.

You are such a strong woman and deserve to recover, to learn how to live with this, and to be happy being single or be happy with a man who treats you well.

Please, continue to be strong, do not give up and get yourself an additional therapist that can break this pattern of chaos.  If you always live in chaos (which I understand was necessary for your survival when you were a child and could not escape your "father's" clutches, you no longer need to do this.

Please get some help.  It can get better.  It doesn't have to be this bad.Ok, this is totally normal and expected.  I know it sucks. The system is unfair and broken, and I assure you, even if you had not been working they would've found another ridiculous reason to deny you.  I represented several disability clients and each only won by the time we appeared before a judge.

It sucks and its fucked and its not fair.  But please don't give up, because when you do get approved you will get a back-payment check and life will suddenly get much easier.Are you single? Kids? Because I sold or gave away all my shit and moved to sunny Mexico, where I can afford to rent a very nice house with a garden and enjoy warm weather.  

Not what I wanted in life, but beats being on the brink of homelessness each month and having to rent rooms out of houses with crazy, drunken psycho bitches.I still don't know and I think its better that it stay that way.Friends. Never found it funny.  The women were generally written to be self-centered and overly dramatic whereas the men were more funny and level-headed.

And it just was not remotely amusing or funny to me in any way. But in college, all the kids (mostly girls) would congregrate in the TV room on the floor (this is pre-internet for you young 'uns) and squeal with delight over Friends and 90210 and Melrose Place.What about her male counterpart? Dude with the red hair? Something Sheehan?  Ed? Seem like a nice guy, find his music torturous and dullI like how you think.  My husband used to insist that I'd eventually LOVE running and reach the runner's high.  I was in great shape, and of course there was always room to improve.

Never got runner's high, ever. Just runner's misery. Shall never do again.See, I love swimming.  I could swim forever (at a pretty slow speed) and not hurt, and feel so peaceful.

Running? No matter how long I tried, no matter how good my trainer was, it was always miserable.  Burning chest, painful joints and I just hated it.  The pounding. 

I wonder if some bodies are just not meant for running.  Not for a short, moderately-muscular woman.  They are hardly flattering to us, even if we are in shape. I loved it, but the violence and depressing nature of it made it hard to watch. Incredible script and acting, but underlying material broke my heart each time.Only God Forgives.I'm in constant, chronic pain, but aside from looking tired, I look pretty decent and (I've been told) attractive.

I know I can't go on dates with men because it would be so unfair to them to suddenly realized that I have a hidden disability and can barely leave the house.I once applied to a law firm called "Bermin, Bermin &amp; Bermin."   I had hoped it was just a name handed down over the years.  Nope. Daddy was in charge, hired his daughter as another partner, and then her husband as third partner.

I did not bother showing up to the 2nd interview.  You already are working against a small cult who will eviscerate you as you are an outsider and any disagreement or dissent will automatically make you the bad guy, unless you are very lucky and one family member is an independent and reasonable person.Benghazi would be a nice start.  What are we on now, our 8th independent GOP investigation?I had the best shoes - the type where actual, experienced runners fit you and let you jog up and down the block to get a feel for them.  I just hated every second of it.

Maybe if I kept it up another six months something would've happened but I just couldn't bear the boredom and pain. I'm built more like a gymnast. My ex husband is 6'4 and slim, and he would run so elegantly, I looked and felt like a drunk crab.you never, ever know what's going on inside their private life, behind closed doors. i am not justifying it. but you'd be shocked at some stuff I have seen.

Husband refuses to have sex with still-hot wife for 5 years straight, refuses to speak about it or seek counseling.

Husband is so desperately lonely b/c wife says she is s imply not longer interested in sex.  One day, the person breaks. From lack of human touch (which we sometimes really underestimate how important that is.) To be married yet feel so utterly lonely is a terrible position to be in.

One partner may get severely ill, for a very long time.  The other partner has the world crashing down on them. They have no help and must do everything, from working 50 hours a week to pay the bills and then be the nurse/caretaker to their disabled or severely ill partner. The healthy person is often forgotten as all friends/family focus on the sick person.

The healthy person is slowly losing the will to live, is exhausted, and again, is desperate for the human touch and just one night of feeling good or feeling desired.  The sick person is meanwhile faking a smile around the devoted husband, and secretly planning suicide because they are in so much unrelenting agony.  Plus they feel like a terrible burden since they are stuck in bed all day and contribute nothing. 

I'm not saying at all cheating ok is. But until you've been faced with extreme circumstances, its really easy to judge.  

Of course I do not include people who are simply selfish shits, have overall good lives and really see no problem cheating on their SO without first trying everything in their power to talk about it and work it out.Yeah, that's a double level of betrayal. If my exes had ever cheated, I'd look deeply into the reasons why.  If he cheated with my female friend, I'd want to strangle them both.Why doubt her story? Shit like this happens all the time.And that movie is how I fucked up my username. Remember the Jive dudes on the plane ordering dinner and speaking in Jive? I was sure one of them described his dinner as "dragontoothgarden".

Some kind redditor pointed out to me that Jive man was saying, "drag it through the garden" (make it spicy) and I learned the awful truth.Oh man, I cannot imagine what a blow like this must be to a man, especially if he raises the child like his son.  And worse yet, if biological father, who was also lied to by the woman, comes into the picture demanding his child.I wondered that as well.  But even if she id take his name, or he didn't take her last name, the fact that all three of them were "senior partners" (the father, ok, he was 60 years old, but the kids? They were 4 years out of law school and were senior partners?) Fuck that.Serious? Your aunt spent $300 (and likely hundreds of hours) on a cellphone game?I once spent $400 on some "magnetized ion balancing mattress pad" for agonizing back pain.

That topper was so uncomfortable on its own it went straight to the Goodwill (after one night).  I could actually feel the metal rods through the padding. And ship that heavy-ass thing for a full-refund? Fuck it.  

When you are in severe, chronic pain, you will often try all sorts of stupid shit when you really know better deep down inside, but are suffering so much you just hope for a miracle.This is one aspect of the Jewish religion I respected (and I state outright that I am not religious and do not know the rules.)  As far as I understand, all caskets are meant to be as plain as possible, partly as a means for poor to not feel guilty that they cannot afford a 20k casket, and also because of another reason of which I have no idea.When I bought a lot of material shit I didn't need, it was at a time when I was lonely, bored and miserable.  I learned to never, ever try to combat boredom or loneliness or stress with material items you do not need.

I've seen educated colleagues rack up 30k in debt on nothing but materialistic, consumer spending.  It was like a drug to this one girl I knew. Instead of losing weight she put on, getting back into martial arts (she was once really good) she simply went to the mall every weekend. 

And now life is worse because she's drowning in debt.  So she had two kids to make it all better.If you are a fragile little lamb like Affluenza Kid (who murdered four or six innocent people) those rehab Club Med centers are a godsend for escaping consequences for your crimes.I am no qualified PT or trainer, but I do think certain bodies are just not meant for high impact sports.  I loved ballet, martial arts, mountain biking and swimming.  I fucking hated running with a passion. How can you get into a sport when its painful?

I don't mean intensity - which is different and means you are pushing yourself. I mean pain, a signal to your brain to stop what you are doing because you are heading towards an injury.

And if I may, 6'5 rugby players sound nice.  ; )I never got into that book and don't understand why its so special. Just sounded like a negative, whiny guy who bitched nonstop.  I didn't get any big meaning out of it.I tried, got my card (CA) but I am so unaware of the proper strains.  The ones I did try either just got me stupid (but still in pain) or worsened the pain.  

Any suggestions for nerve pain coming straight from the spinal column?serious? they rent caskets? or am i really that stupid?Funny how those mean or ridiculous comments always came (at least in my experience) from a person who was not happy with their weight.  

"You already look great!"  (No, I did not. Compared to a 200lb 5'2 woman, sure I looked great.)

"You are starving yourself."  (FUCK YOU.)

Family or the older generation is of course different. Its often a cultural thing where being skinny is seen as being poor, or that your parents do not adequately provide for you.Thank you - very much appreciate this.  Had a few bad experiences and bad advice so the whole thing has made me wary.  On the other hand, I'm fucking desperate and opiate barely put a dent in things. If I could only need MJ and no opiates, that would be a dream come True.Stubborn man! At least it did work.  I have extensive nerve damage (so they say, I'm not sure its nerve damage) from tumors that exploded in my vertebral canal and repeated trauma.

Like an idiot, for three years I continued sleeping on a non-pillowtop mattress.  One night I slept at a friend's house who had this incredible pillow top dream. Next week I went out and bought the exact same bed.  It didn't resolve my underlying problem, of course, but it did wonder in reducing pain (or preventing more pain) when I was sleeping.  I was such a stubborn fool myself to not want to spend the money on a better mattress, convinced it wouldn't help.

Your wife must have quite some power if she was able to accidentally do so much damage with a kick!Ok, this I cannot comprehend. Trying to out-do the Jones' of the graveyard? Spend the same amount of money that could buy a nice car or put a down payment on a house, all for an item that will rot underground?

I suppose things like that are for the rich. Buying a luxurious item to literally bury underground, hopefully never to see it again.That's like a Nadal backspin on the ball.

Edit: Ok, read more comments, there was no spin on the ball. Still both look so cool.Funny you mention it.  I got into pilates and yoga 18 months ago out of sheer desperation.  Used to be a ballet dancer, martial artists, blahblahblah, and now I cannot even gentle swim without causing severe pain. 

Pilates for core strength and stabilization has done wonders, but so much of yoga I cannot do.  I have excellent flexibility but the lightest of tension on my back will cause instant pain and a flare up.

They now want to implant a spinal cord stimulator which I am not convinced will work, but after 15 years of this shit, I'm open to the trial.

Thank you for the kind words, and I wish the best for your as well. Oh, Rafael Eduardo Cruz, you big silly. Don't you realize you look like an idiot when you rush to judgment w/o knowing the facts?Never thought I'd say this, but I hope he got ass-raped at least once and is getting his face beaten in. But since he's in a luxurious resort that mommy and daddy are paying for (and his parents also suck and have used their money to sweep their bad acts under the rug) that's unlikely.

This stinking shit killed 4 people and severely injured more, who will likely never recover to what they once were.

But he likely thinks its no big deal.  

Did he have a jury trial? Or did mommy and daddy bribe the judge?Oh, but those incidents, along with 9/11 don't count! Its DIFFERENT! Not quite sure how its different, it just IS! You liberal communist muslim sharia-law loving treasonist liberal.I'm not a religious person, but traditions like those make sense to me. I think in the Jewish culture, the thought is at death, we are all the same, so nobody deserves a fancy casket just because they have the means to buy one.I used to pontificate how anyone who cheats instead of first divorcing is a cowardly scumbag.  Then I learned its not black and white.  I got catastrophically sick, for many years my kind and loving husband was my caretaker, and I would only wish that hell on a bad person.  Airplane!  It's from the 80s and hilarious and very much a classic.  I'd watch it just for the jive dude scene.  June Cleaver (the perfect homemaker from Leave It To Beaver) is in the scene.That pretty hilarious, especially given that I'm barely 5'3. Maybe I should've tried the same mental process.  Chase after a little kid, tackle their ass, and enjoy the moment.  Or, a cute guy, but I couldn't keep up.  Yes!! First, even if you know how to swim, take intro lessons.  I did it at the YMCA.   Stroke technique is critical.   Both for not exhausting yourself, not injuring yourself and whatnot.

Second, slow down.  Way down.  Learning to pace my breathing took a few weeks and a lot of patience.  Most newbies start out way too fast .  You are using nearly every muscle in your body, plus you have the water restriction in every movement and all that hits your musculature and stamina fast.  Be ok with swimming for twenty minutes a session, twice a week (3x is better) at first.  

Third, take a break if you have too.  If you are gasping and swallowing half the pool, you'll poop out in no time.

The learning curve, if you keep going, it's high.  First two weeks I had to stop after every lap, panting and gasping.   Within two months I could swim a mile, slowly, and without needing a break.

And after getting ripped in the gym and hating the cardio machines with a passion, and struggling with toning the last bits of chub off my legs, swimming was magic.  It got me the fastest results in the shortest times period.

I did freestyle, breaststroke and backstroke, never learned butterfly (that takes a back with no injuries and a strong core) but its the best exercise I can thnk of.  Relaxing, peaceful, you can go slow and still get a workout, and some theorize you can burn fat a higher rate if you swim in a heated pool but I'm not expert on that.

I thought we owned Hollywood, the banking industry, and a few other industries but I can't remember that right now.Never thought of that.  Makes sense.  He's a very good man.  Our marriage didn't make it, he developed disc degeneration disease and a massive brain tumor.  I'm still disabled from years of spinal tumors.   Life can be a real bitch.   But seriously thanks for the kind words. Luna, when I am up late at night from a nasty illness that won't go away, you make me forget all the physical pain and sweep me away into your worlds.  I love your writing and I know once day we will see your best sellers in bookstores.  If they still have bookstores. He still killed all those people.  I never knew that until this thread.  That's an excellent way to mourn, say your good byes, and also not waste money on an luxurious item to be buried.  And I can see why someone would want something nicere than a plain pine box to say their goodbyes.  These were vascular, non cancerous tumors that typically don't cause problems unless they press on a nerve or smush your spinal cord.  If they explode or bleed out (like one of mind did) you're in some deep shit.   One of mine grew aggressively and exploded and those fuckers at Stanford said it was impossible for it to cause pain.


Oh, did I learn what pain really was!

I was lucky to be able to fly to France where they saved my life.  A few days later and I'd not have made it. 

Edit: I was lucky that the vertebral body supposedly was not damaged and no blood seeped out through the bone, but given that ten years post surgery I'm still in fucking agony, I think there maybe a a hairline fracture in there that just won't show on an MRI. 
I could run and jump on your back and cling like a monkey.  You'd probably notice a bit of extra weight and just keep running.Ex.  He's likely find it funny since I'd cling on him and try to climb him.  He is 6'4.It depends.  There's quite a spectrum.  Many liberal women in Israel dress quite provocatively and only the more conservative types have a problem with it.  It's really only the conservative Jews that worry about modesty.  The majority could care less.Yes - in fact,  he was the only one to take me seriously in that he believed my contention that I had a spinal tumor.  He referred me to another neurosurgeon, but they all refused to operate so I flew to France where they did believe me and saved my life.  The chiro continued to work on me (and he is one special, talented chiro) but he just was not able to provide help.I knew I was forgetting something.For me, it is. I have no problem wishing prison rape on a mentally-capable (ie: not retarded or having some other major mental issue) child-rapist, for example.  We just have different morals and values. Thank you. My ex husband is 6'4, and he also had some "tall" back problems.  And yes, if you take a look at some other cultures, they don't use pillows at all but we are raised into thinking the fluffier, the better.  I'm glad it got better for you and you found a system that works.That saying is a Christian thing, but I'm far from being an expert on the former about the departed returning to earth.Where is the Wifi for the dead?  Its kind of like the ancient Egyptians burying all the deceased possessions for the afterlife.  Just a bit more modest in this case.I used to punch walls and mirrors as hard as I could, hoping to break my hand, to get my mind to focus off my spine pain.  I was so weak I never managed to make even a dent in the cheap sheetrock and do nothing more than get a little scrape on knuckles.

Another time I went barefoot into a raging storm (not tropical, think Northern California) and curled up in the mud in a bush, hoping to die.

Just got fucking cold, went home and showered before my husband came home and hid my own stupidity.Eh, he got disc degeneration disease so its more like 6'3. 

I'm so short that anyone over 5'9 is 6'3 to me. It all looks the same when you are a certain shortness. And 6'1 is pretty freakin' tall to begin with.Slow it way down.  Once you are able to pace your breathing, your learning curve will shoot up and you will be able to swim for a longer and longer period without needing a rest and without feeling exhausted.  Remember that with every stroke or kick, you are also doing a bit of "weightlifting" given the water resistance.  Once I slowed it way down, it became way more enjoyable, peaceful, and effective.

Edit:  If a lesson is not an option, there are lots of youtube videos that will show you correct stroke technique. If you are off by just a bit, you can end up expending a heap of energy just trying to stay afloat.That is so damn adorable and hilarious I had to set my coffee cup down as I was laughing (and nearly crying) so hard.  I mean, he was really dramatic about it.Mine likes to stare at me when I take a dump. I feel guilty if I shut the door (I live alone) but oddly embarrassed when its not pleasant-smelling. I suppose its a girl thing. I apologize to my dog when I accidentally let a fart rip and we're both on the couch.This was adorable.  You described it beautifully. When you see the eyes dilating, you know kitty is entering crazy mode.Poor doggie. Probably thought some evil interloper stole your body and house. Doggie wasn't gonna be no fool until he knew for sure.Huh. When I have to leave for a few days (and they have someone come to take care of them) there is a solid 3% more amount of cat shit.  Except all over my bed and couch.Now I'm crying.That is beautiful. I'm ready to cry. Imaging nearly drowning or dying of dehydration on your rooftop, and having to leave behind your loyal, loving dog.  That would destroy my heart.  I heard so many heartbreaking stories just like that.

And thank you for volunteering to make those pets' lives better until they could get forever homes again. That experience of seeing them all reunited must've had everyone so happy and in tears.I...I can't.  I feel like someone secretly, somehow, will know.  Like some fuckers at 4chan activated my webcam or the NSA is looking in on me, laughing at the gross girl for ripping nasty farts.Now, I never thought of that.  I also encourage my dog when she's having trouble and gives me the "halp" look. "Push, push, you can do it! And you're getting more vegetables with your dinner for now on."What a shitty way to die. "Welp, that wasn't too bright, and people are going to laugh at me forever, and fuck, why did I not think of the frame?"I'd vomit just looking at that staircase and never make it up.Hahahaha, justice served.Just give it another day. If mama cat is anything like my mama cat was, she'll get so sick of their shit she'll punt them both out onto the slide.And yet another reason why Turkey will never, ever become an EU member.My law firm fell apart and the four partners were divorcing. Two were going one way, with their junior lawyers and support staff, and two were going the other way.

Problem was they hated each other so much, that they were no longer speaking but still had 3 months left on the lease.  The reception area was a neutral zone.  Otherwise they hid on their respective side of the floor.   Everyone was walking on eggshells and it was really like being in a household where the parents were fucking ready to kill each other as the divorce was not yet final.

They were also fighting over client lists.  So one side convinced the stupid junior, ass-kissing idiot lawyer to do a little "favor" for them and during the night, break into the computer and steal a copy of the client list.

He "broke into" the computer alright. He wasn't able to get past the password, so he fucking took a claw hammer and beat the shit out of the computer.

Everyone knew he did it, but we couldn't figure out why? Why draw attention to his failed attempt? Did he think that beating up the computer would make it submit and it would print out a list? Nobody would've known he even tried to access it.  So the good guys filed a police report.  The bad guys got even more obnoxious and tipped over all the shelves of law books in our law library.Why do grown men still find shit like this funny?You look stunning!  I love the red hair, the happy smile, and you must feel great. Incredible job.  (I'm a woman, not a perv trying to hit on you.)I had no idea until it all came out about a month ago on Reddit. I think that is a pretty damn hilarious way to say "add veggies".  Another Redditor told me it meant "make it spicy".  I guess a Jive linguistics expert (and we all know Reddit has one) can clear that up for us.There is "tolerable" and "fuck this, what died inside me."That's a very sweet thing. And who the hell am I to judge how a person mourns?  In the end its their money and their choice.   Of course, if they have other members of the family who really could use the financial help or are on the verge of starvation, then I'd think it was a pretty stupid thing to blow money on.I'm about to eat two fetuses right now (eggs).Maybe that Redditor has a lisp? You lisp-oppressor, you.You sure that's not a burn victim?My dog is just accustomed to cars as loud, noisy things that will not hurt her because I've always had her on a leash around cars.  Now she has it in her head that she can run in front of them and she won't get hurt.  Shhh......Well, in THAT case, it was a BLOODY GOOD MEAL.You truly look beautiful - a bit like Emma Stone, but with less of that pale palor. You look wonderful!!! Enjoy it! You worked hard for it.Thanks for your kind words. They're gonna implant a spinal cord stimulator next month. I don't think it'll work. Been 15 years of this shit and I'm really getting sick of it.HA. You must've made quite an impression. Wish I could do the same for my dog.I shall never again eat the slop I usually consider "tasty".  Now I will have to try this method of making eggs with vegetables.I figured you did and hoped I wasn't gonna annoy you by saying it.  But  your skin color gives you a much healthier-looking appearance and you still look like your own individual self!Friend of mine just went through that.  He was in agony, and had they not operated when they did (he's a stubborn dude and took forever see a doc) he would not have made it.

Now, just drill a little hole in that stone and wear it around your neck like a good-luck charm.Ah yes, my aunt told me once she was at a funeral in Israel, and they were passing a shroud-covered body of a stranger and the wind blew the shroud off.  No embalming (Jews don't have open-casket anything) and it right scared the shit out of her.I literally laughed out loud. That was adorable.  And...I also realized I do the same thing (minus the back-patting). I encourage my dog mid-poop to "push!" and congratulate her like she just solved some linear equations problems.  I am 41.Thanks for this - I didn't know that. Makes sense. Once my sorry ass is dead, I don't want to be taking up space.  Cremate me and dump me into the sea.The smell of Persian spices."Trail."  Bwaahahaha.  Goat trail, at most.That is adorable.  Also reminds me of the "Knock knock, motherfucker" gif that was up a few days ago.  But this is much cuter and makes me feel warm and fuzzy.I cannot believe this is real. This has to be a troll.  Or, a literal female troll who is so overweight and hideous and unpleasant in person that nobody, NOBODY will sleep with her.Ok, now I don't feel so bad when my motorcycle died and a friend came over and said the spark plug gasket needed replacing, the "timer" (he jiggled the helmet lock I had never noticed or used) was jammed, and that the electro-diode headlight simply needed a new carburetor.

Me:  Can you fix those things???She likely feels like shit. If she doesn't, she is still gonna pay a heavy price by getting just fined and a heap of community service.

But 2 years? Life ruined. 

What do cops get when they let their K9 dogs die in their cars? K9s are considered "officers" and their handlers are trained and thus there is a much higher expectation of care.The real question is, OP, how do you know this fool?Do you have access to a heated pool? When I had a spinal tumor, I could not walk unless I was supported by water.  I put one of those flotation-belts around me and simply walked slowly for two years in the pool, or did other floating exercises (with my flotation belt) until the pain had dropped enough for me to be able to swim again.  

I remained 120lbs throughout, at 5'3.   I was bedbound for about 5 years (yes, 5 years and in agonizing pain and heavily medicated) when I was not in that pool (which was designed for disabled people or people recovering from injuries).  

Not sure what your injury is, but with the pool and those flotation belts, there could be a lot of exercises you can safely do.

Follow the food advice the others have posted and look around for a pool.  Until you change your lifestyle (food and exercise) your body won't change.  And even if you cannot do any exercise, just really be strict about your diet and you can lose weight.  Good luck!My dog pooping comfortably is very important to me. I comfort her when she has the runs.  I congratulate her after she's had a tough poop (especially after she's eaten an entire hunk of bone.)  Her asshole's comfort is important to me.What a tough guy. Making threats on...fucking Facebook?I'd like to think that. I think she just gets lonely really easily.  She follows me into the kitchen or closet or wherever no matter how comfy she is on the couch.  

Unless its nighttime sleep.  And when I am checking noises for suspected prowlers.  Then her attitude is, "bitch, I'm sleeping, you're on your own, nite."You are...special? And your dog is perhaps, lucky? I need to think on this more.I would have to say no, sadly.You're the second person to ask. I need to word my gentle sarcasm more carefully in the future when I describe my bowel movement odor.I used to have a cat that would slide his paws under the door.  If the bathroom was small enough, we'd play. Me using the bathrobe belt, while trying to do my business, my cat thrilled with the game. 

Made crapping much more enjoyable, and no fears of bringing in your ipad and contaminating it with poop particles.Speaking of which, you ever have a dump post-general anesthetic surgery for an abdominal issue?  That smell nearly had ME faint.Thor-ette.  I would love to see you with a sword and shield. I'm actually watching that right now. Gimli just fell off his mount and the blonde chick can't stop gazing at Aragorn with those dreamy eyes.If I were in 8th grade, I'd likely think you were pretty cool to not pick yet another easy poem, such as Fire and Ice. (Unless...Robert Frost wrote that? I'm assuming its from LOTR?)I LOVE seeing a large, strong grown man acting like a happy, little kid!  And we know he was trying his best to contain his excitement.  Best part was his hands to his mouth.  Same reaction when Holly Holm knocked Ronda Rousey's ass out.That tap was adorable. "Calm down, camera present, calm down, PUPPY SO CUTE!"Remember the brazen bank robbery, ending up in a 45-minute shootout in the Hollywood streets by two dudes in LA? Something like 40 cops could not take them down with their regular weapons and a local gun store literally handed out more powerful weapons to the desperate cops.She's a perfect Thorette.  Red Hair, Viking braids, all we need is a horned helmet and the body armor.  If my red hair was still long, I'd be trying that same style right now.  Don't we all make self-serving decisions?  Even if we think its for the greater good, its for the greater good that WE think its best for everyone (ie: GOP's desire to shut down all Planned Parenthoods.)That's exactly how that guy/girl thinks. "They vote, there are a lot of them, I don't like what they vote for even though its their right to make that vote, so let's take their vote away."  

How about instead that idiot focuses their time on getting those who can vote, but don't due to apathy, to get off their asses and vote?Can I please see a source for "oldies voting for slow internet?"Not fair.  God's chosen asshole.That headline is a crock of SHIT and the editor and journalist know it. It was written to sensationalize the bullshit.I wish a fucker like that could spent two weeks in my body. Just two weeks.  Then we will see how tough he is.  Oh yeah, he won't ask for any meds because he is so damn tough.

And nevermind all of us who do NOT abuse our meds, and how appropriate opiate use prevent us from suicide, allow some of us to work, not need to have in-home care (costly to the state) or be hospitalized.

FUCK that guy.Oh man, I am sorry.  And since he's likely to rant and rage and is a legend in his own mind, you just have to bite your tongue.

Was his new gf impressed by his display of proprietorship over her? Or his tough-guy act of "I'll maybe spent 30 years in jail but I'll get out and even if she is in love with you by then I will still get her back."  She not realize he's a raging psychopath?Let's devise a product where women's shit smells like lavender.  We'd make a fortune.  Yeah!!! I always wonder if people listen to advice or dismiss it (and its of course a personal choice; maybe the advice makes no sense to them) and I'm thrilled for you!  It'll take a few tries to find the right pace where you go slow, but not so slow that you sink.

Also, keep your core (tummy) tight when you swim if you aren't already.  

And if you aren't already doing so, you MUST learn to breath on each side when you do freestyle.  It was really clumsy and hard for me the first few weeks trying to learn to breathe on the left side (I am right handed) but it proved how much weaker my left arm/left-side back muscles/left side-core muscles were in comparison to the right.

this is a must. If not, your back will be lopsided.

In fact, once I got it down, finding a comfortable pace became easier.  Breathing every two strokes was too soon, but every four strokes (at my slow level) was too long.  Three strokes, alternating on each side, was perfect. 

I promise you it'll just take about two weeks and you'll have it down no problem. Great job!I don't think men would care enough to spend money on it.  Whereas men are often proud that their shit stinks so much it can knock down trees and wilt flowers, we women want to run and hide.He's lucky he has some people that can see the good in him. A person who is comfortable with publicly posting threats like that would really scare me.  To me, they are unpredictable and see no social problem or inappropriateness with advertising your desire to beat the shit out of any guy that looks at "your" girl the wrong way.  

Maybe he's just a kid talking tough. You would know a lot better than me.At 18, terrified of my parents, I went to PP for a bladder infection and yeast infection.  I also had no health insurance at one point, was living on my own, paying my own bills and PP helped me through an ovarian cyst and birth control. Same with my female friends.  They made me feel welcome and I could afford the sliding scale prices.

The GOP has really gone out of their way with their bullshit religious propaganda to demonize what is essentially a health organization to assist in women's reproductive health and family planning.There you go - I was exhausted partly because breathing every 2 strokes was too often, and every 4 strokes was not enough and I'd tire out quickly.  It will feel really weird when you start breathing on your non-dominant side. You'll feel clumsy.  But within 5 swim sessions it became normal as you get accustomed to the movement and start building strength.

And since you haven't taken lessons, please check out youtube videos. Even the slightest change in stroke technique can do wonders for your speed, stamina and injury prevention.  

You may not feel pain now, but for me, the more stamina and strength I developed the longer and faster I could swim, which meant I developed shoulder pain (freestyle) and knee pain (breast stroke) both of which are very common if the stroke is not done perfectly.  Best to start now so you don't end up like me and have to work on breaking bad habits, which isn't easy to do.As funny as that comparison is, every time I see that moron and his "Ima not gonna smile because people in castles in the Middle Ages didn't smile cause they were serious and shit" (ok, Mr. Historian Kanye) I just want to bury my fist in his face.  And I'm a nonviolent woman.No freedom of the press...and this is news? I mean no disrespect to OP's story as its an important story but anyone who thought Turkey was heading in the direction of becoming more liberal, while it may be secular in nature, it is far, far away from being remotely close to any full EU member-state.Glad to know Israel keeps its borders secure. It needs to."The whole point of modern civilization is to ensure that states act proportionately."

First, not even sure where you got that from or if that's your own idea.

Second, your idea of "modern civilization" is a WESTERN, liberal (added "liberal" to avoid confusion as in this context "liberal v. conservative" means completely different than in say, the context of domestic US politics) modern civilization. You are putting your own Western, democratic and liberal values, expectations and demands upon countries who do not or may not value the same thing.  

Third, you've only read one side of the story - his side.  Until the facts come out - and the True facts of both sides likely never will - its not a smart idea to rush to judgment that he was "100% in the right."People don't like defending a country's sovereignty to make their own laws if those laws to not reflect that person's own values.

Why do Western liberals not realize this? Not every single country in the world wishes to be just like us.  Go back and re-read the comment you are responding to as I believe you've misread it or missed the point entirely.Finally, a non-18 year old response from a person demanding every country in the world act like like the USA and have "freedom of the press" as a constitutionally guaranteed right.No and no.  Americans are not worried that some Mexican "Isis" member is using the US-Mexican border as a means to slip into Mexico in order to cause trouble against US interests.Sometimes, yes. A press card is not a guarantee that the person is who they say they are or a guarantee into any country. And other times, we have to learn that other cultures do not have the same values and morals and we do. And if you think that the US doesn't beat up its own border-crossing violators or other suspected criminals, please, think a bit more deeply.You've only read his side. You have no idea of what really happened. Also, the US govt and police force beat up innocent people on a regular basis. So let's not respect the US if we follow your reasoning.EwwwIn the context of international geopolitics, 'liberal' means something completely different than 'liberal v. conservative' as found in, for example, US politics.   "This man", meaning the guy that was not in the US, and was beaten by Turks, who are not expected to comply with US law, was "beaten for things specifically protected by the US constitution?"   Ok, then.I agree with you there.  But the reality is that the world is full of people who do not agree with you and me, and have different values, and will never, ever see eye-to-eye on not harming other people if its not necessary.&gt; Except that the reasons this man was beaten for are things that are specifically protected by the U.S. constitution.

And if you think that the US constitution guarantees unfettered border crossing with nothing but a press pass, or that all beatings by authorities don't happen or are eventually brought to justice because the are 'specifically protected' (no, the constitution does not 'specifically protect' against a beating during what is deemed an illegal border crossing) you are hopelessly deluded.That's probably the one time he would smile. After all, look at the size of the gargantuan ass of the woman he married.My god, you are so stupid its actually a bit physically painful.I highly doubt most Turks would want to cause trouble.  They have an unstable and aggressive leader and a culture where the concept of "human rights" is simply not a concept that can comfortable coexist with its religious, cultural and historical background.Then perhaps don't say it? And once you start aggressively name-calling, you've proved not just your immaturity and inability to engage in a meaningful debate but that you know your own argument has completely collapsed upon its own stupidity.  Your only perceived resort is to throw out expletives instead of a meaningful response.Gosh, I'm sorry. Let me try again:
FUCK TURKEY! They should have human rights just like the US (because in the US we NEVER beat up innocent people) and we KNOW this journalist's side of the story is COMPLETELY True and why the fuck can't the rest of the world just be like us who CONSTITUTIONALLY GUARANTEE that innocent people don't get beat up?

And if anyone disagrees, instead of writing a meaningful response, I will say FUCK YOU ALL, WHORES.

Is that better? /sTurkey is never, ever going to become a full EU member.  It can "consider" itself as "part of Europe" all it wants. The rest of Europe would be thrilled to never have Turkey as a full member EU state. That alone is plenty to respond to all of your issues.  

And who gives a rat's ass about the fucking Byzantine empire? How is that relevant to modern Turkey?  Iraq was once considered the center of advanced civilization and Arabia was far advanced in math and science in the Middle Ages.  So?

This is a joke, right? You're a hack.

And however "secular" Turkey may be, it is hardly a "country that is just as much western as not."  That contention is laughable.Of course to you and to me they are a billion times better.  Half my family fled Iran in order to survive.   But again, we are making judgments about values based upon our own judgments of values.  Its inherently biased.  Of course I wish the entire world was kind to one another and extremism in any religion would evaporate.  But again, that is based upon my values, my upbringing and my view of the world.I received a reply that (to me) made it sound like the person did not see the distinction, hence why I explained it in a non-sarcastic way.  I figured it was a given that there is a difference of what "liberal" means in domestic US politics v. international relations and geopolitics.Me too.  Of course, I'm a white person from the US, so its easy for me to say.  Even if I were not, I still believe I'd much prefer the US over anywhere in the Middle East, particularly as my family escaped from the Middle East.Oh, motherfucker.  I was hoping the name would be Sam Jones or something.Anxiety issues? They prevented him from automatically returning the money when he knew a customer lost it?  Oh jeez.Can't say I disagree with you there.  It's like someone saying all Chinese are against human rights.  No, it's their government who makes those choices.  

But often the people who do like the current values are the ones that benefit from them.  My Persian dad loves his status as chief of everything and everyone as the oldest son/brother of all his siblings.  He loves the power and would never change it.

Which explains why I, a female, had to break away from my family because anything "untraditional" that I did, such as riding a motorcycle, made me a whore in their eyes.  

As in any culture, where cultural mores grant power or some convenience to one group, that group is brainwashed into thnking that those values are a good thing.  I'm sorry you don't have basic reading comprehension skills.  Can't help you there.Yea, that anxiety excuse is utter bullshit. You find a heap of cash on the job, you know it's likely from a customer, and you know it's your job to turn it in.  This was especially powerful.YEs and yes.  This was 22 years ago and I still remember the agony.  I also had a horrible, awful flu.  I will never forget those sleepless nights of pure agony, convinced I had some evil STD and my life was over.  Not everyone has access to the real Jesus Juice.I wager they don't understand basic physics is how.I'm a straight woman and I was mesmerized.Who needs those silly axle bolts.Because when you spend $12 on a bar of soap, it had better be interesting.Considering my dad went apeshit crazy when I cut my curly hair and relaxed it, I'd say yes.Ah, can I buy a set? I'd just like to have these guys perform this stunt in my living room for my viewing pleasure.Ow, my 10 new herniated discs.I'm waiting for the Nat Geo where it shows Orca teens doing their quantum physics homework.Is a zodiac a tiny inflatable motor boat? I would've done the same. "Oh, look! Must get closer OH HOLY GOD MOTHERFUCKER GET ME AWAY."Yeah! Who hasn't fucked up in the past and forcibly raped a woman! Damn right.I never liked King's later works. His pre-90s stuff just swept me away and terrorized me.  Was that about when he cleaned up his drugs and drinking problems?I loved Eyes of the Dragon. Re-read it 20x.  He also said he wrote it for his daughter who really wasn't into the heavy horror-violence of his typical writing.Can you still cradle him on his back like a baby and rock him to sleep? If you post a pic of that, expect about 5,000 PMs from single women.This is adorable. Now, write a nice story about how these two became best friends.great, here I thought they were best friends and now I am sobbing.  He's a convicted rapist.  They are not "allegations" anymore. The trial is over. 

Edit: Downvoting because I simply stated facts. If I said, "Tyson is a boxer and won many titles" I suppose you'd also have to downvote me.  They did get such unfortunate facial shapes and features.  And imagine growing up looking like that when your mom is seeing as the hottest babe in town.  The entire Western world is laughing at how your face looks.  And I thought my awkward phase in high school was bad.i did! I remember Booger celebrating.You sick fuck, what's wrong with you?Oh, the way you describe that is so funny that I wish someone filmed the entire encounter.I am curious, did you actually watch the entire trial?this is one reason why I just bought a dash cam. although I suppose I should take it out of the box its been sitting in for the last month and actually install it in my car.Someone rear-ended my Honda Accord LX and turned it into a Honda CRX.  And fucked up my back in a bad way.

The guy admitted it was his fault, but his insurance co was being the typical dick and not returning calls.

So, I called him one day, calmly said I was sorry, but since his insurance company was not cooperating, my lawyer was going to sue him tomorrow then he'd have to hand the case over to his insurance company.

He got off his ass, called his insurance agent and said "do your fucking job or I'm suing you for breach of contract" and whaddya know, his insurance co suddenly became very  cooperative.

Edit: Insurance adjustors ARE idiots. They at most need a high school diploma, are not trained adequately and know the less they pay out the better. They are truly  that stupid.  One agent told me she was taking months to pay out on my stolen motorcycle (that was recovered two days later, completed parted out) that "I have SO MUCH WORK. What do you expect me to do?"

Me: "Your job? Work longer? Or should I call your regional manager and tell them that you are violating my policy because 'you have so much work and are unable to handle your case load'.  Maybe I'll report your words to the CA Dept of Insurance as well."

That got her ass moving.What an entitled, spoiled bitch.All two of them?Before we all rush to condemn, does anyone actually know the True facts of what happened? I am aware of some (at least the some that were released) but you don't go to jail over a reasonable fuck up.  You do go to jail when you have disregarded all safety measures, or drink on the job, and that leads to death.

So before people rush to judgment, first review the facts and see if any criminal conduct occurred that resulted in the deaths and injuries, or if that conduct at most only rose to negligent behavior.As you should. Don't litter. 

Edit:  And in case you were not aware, BP did get quite a hefty "citation" and "fine" for their littering.Finally, a reasonable answer. Everyone who is out screaming for jail and blood have no idea of what actually happened, if there was negligence, misconduct, recklessness or actual intentional misconduct.

You aren't supposed to go to jail for things that are either out of your control, or actions that are at most, negligent.  You get hit with a big civil and administrative fine and penalties, but jail is meat for intentional acts, or acts of such recklessness that they go far beyond mere negligence.It was such a unique departure from his regular material, and for 15 year old me (female) it was magical and exciting and didn't scare the shit out of me at night.I love uggs and tights. They are comfy as hell. Why can't women wear uggs anymore? Someone pass a law?Oh, thank you for your wisdom, I had no idea I was not allowed to remark on the fact that I was being downvoted for repeating simple facts.  

I thank you for your concern, but really, don't worry yourself about Reddit posts, even though the thought of downvotes may be a "scary reality" for you.  Gah, go away. I am not crying. Not everyone is as dramatic as you.Actually, I am an attorney and people who review biased sources or "summaries" are reading (from either side) already biased opinions.

If you understand the substantive and procedural laws (which I do) and understand the rules of evidence, you need only to read the judge's ruling, review the appellate briefs and rulings upon them and then decide for yourself if the trial was fair or not. In the eyes of the law, he factually raped that woman. In your opinion, he did not.

You seem to be confusing those two points.I tried, but could't get into the Tommyknockers.  11/22/63 was entertaining and emotional, but it didn't have the same effect as his older works.  

I've still yet to try the the Colorado Kid or the Gunslinger series (which I've heard is worth it.)

I read one of his recent short stores (the woman jogger who gets attacked on a lonely island-area) and that swept me right in and scared the shit out of me.Give the heap of administrative, civil and criminal statutes and how every level of gov't (local/state/fed) prosecutes differently, my first answer is no. "Negligence" is a description of conduct that does not rise to either recklessness or intentional conduct.

But some statutes can be interpreted - fairly or not - to have a penalty so severe that it amounts to a "criminal" penalty for conduct that is only found to be negligent.I have the cheap version too. Nice and warm, especially with tights or yoga pants, or with shorts.  Something about "loving those pre-teen nipples!"  

Edit:  I felt dirty just typing that.Because it was somewhat apparent that the other guy was not a lawyer, and that would render meaningless (to him) the written findings of the court and any appellate briefs and any findings of an appellate court. It would be gibberish.  

If that person actually did see the trial, then they would have an informed opinion as to the reliability of witnesses.  They still would likely not understand the rules of evidence or pre-trial procedure (which dictates ahead of time what evidence can or cannot be raised at trial.)

What's so "convenient" about me being a lawyer? Lawyers do exist, believe it or not.  I'm not a criminal lawyer  but I still understand criminal law.  

I never said the case was flawed, or was not flawed. I did say that the case is over, he was convicted, and in the eyes of the law, he factually raped that woman.

I also said that unless you either watched the entire trial and could observe whether a witness seemed reliable, or if you didn't, but had the option to review the judge's findings, that making an opinion as to the fairness of a trial based upon biased summaries doesn't help your argument. 

At least read a neutral discussion of the case (which a non-lawyer will still not understand a lot of, given the obvious). Read "biased" (or better, neutral) summaries from both sides, then come to a  conclusion.That just made me laugh out loud. I'm a "terrible attorney" (says someone who doesn't know me or my work) because I stated that in the eyes of the law, Tyson was found guilty of raping a woman.See, this is why idiots shouldn't argue. Once you cannot come back with a meaningful argument or debate, you resort to expletives and name calling.  Like what kids do when they are 10.I'll have to look that up. That title, knowing it was written by King, is enough to scare me.Nope. In a court you have "findings of fact". Of course I am aware that many people felt the rape allegations were bullshit. Why are people saying otherwise? This entire time I have limited my comments to the fact that in the eyes of the law, he raped that woman. Period. This is going on the iamverysmart sub.  Holy shit, you are a hunk! Great job, and post your pics with pride, as you've worked hard and you look great.  You have such nice eyes and your bone structure is coming out. And damn, you a  hottie.And this is why I am against inbreeding.  Look at this gibberish.Incredible job - you look healthy and fit and you must be enjoying your newly found energy and confidence.And you were inside, nice and warm.  That's a perfect way to read that book. I read it in the late 80s and even the little bit of artwork was enchanting to me.IT scared the hell out of me. I'm still scared and its been a few decades.Holy shit, the 2nd and 3rd pics reminded me of Toby McGuire waking up all buffed and ripped in the very first Spiderman. You look really, really good!Looking good! I hope we see another progress pic in 6 months. It may even start coming off faster if you keep everything up, then slow down as you hit the last 10lbs or so.

Really, you should be very proud of yourself and your discipline.This is incredible work. My own back hurts just looking at the belly size in the before pic.  You are buffed up and ripped and fit and strong and look great.  For a 40 year old, you put many 20 year old guys to shame.

Your spine is very thankful, I am sure.  Its really incredibly how much more approachable you look (coming from a female).  You look more put-together, neater, cleaner and that you respect your appearance.  Nice work!Some people will not accept that there are those that will work out incredibly hard and will get faster results than others.  I had a friend that maintained huge, defined, cut muscle-mass and the guy likely ate 1,500 to 2,000 calories a day (I lived with him for awhile). At 46, he looked like a Greek god.  He maybe worked out a few times a week for a few months, nothing crazy hard, and would stop due to all sorts of injuries.

He was about 5'10 and 200lbs.  He claims being from Wisconsin has something to do with it, and I am inclined to believe it.Did you ever read The Closet? An old short story, I think either in The Night Shift or Skeleton Crew (short story collections).

I was 13 when I read it and it messed with my brain so much I refused to be alone in any room with closest, even in broad daylight.  I was staying with my grandmother over the summer and even had to sleep in her bed at night because I was so scared.

One night she waited until I was drifting off to sleep, then made her hands into claws, and quietly hissed, "RAHHHHHHH" and reached out towards me and pretended to grab my neck.

I ran out screaming, she dissolved into giggles.  Not funny at the time, but now I can finally laugh at it.That was the same with my friend. He trained into his early 30s until injuries made him stop.   Even if you put on weight, muscle can have amazing memory and you can rebound much faster than if you had always been fat and were never in shape.  I'm sorry you have all these people accusing you of lies.  If you don't lose 1-2lbs a week, they insist you are automatically a liar.  There are always exceptions to the general "rules".I want to hear your comments.  They don't have to necessarily be funny. The only ones I always don't like are the mean-spirited ones from raging assholes.Usually once the person with whom you are having a difference of opinion with can't find any support for their position, they start slinging expletives, call your mom a whore (that they fucked in your basement) etc etc etc.  Its so sad that they don't realize how infantile and ridiculous they sound.People actually do that? Ask for something and expect it for free? Don't they realize the work involved, not to mention your materials cost?   Its freakin' handmade - that's what makes it special!I get downvotes all the time (going on right now).  Just remember your audience.  One person is still on a roll, screaming in caps how I should kill myself, stop playing with my train set in my mother's basement, that he also fucked my mother, etc. He simply cannot stop.  His rage is out of control. 

He is THAT ANGRY because he didn't like that I stated that Mike Tyson was convicted of rape.   I didn't say whether the conviction was fair or not.  Just that he was convicted and it was upheld on appeal.

Then you get the group mentality.  Someone reads the negative comment numbers before they read your comment, so they read your comment already biased against it and likely read it out of context, and add another downvote.  If a different audience had given a comment a bunch of upvotes, other people would likely react the same way. "Oh, this comment is rated very high! It must be good. Lemme read this here...yep, fucking brilliant."

Fuck whatever anyone else says.  Its just numbers on a screen. People say all sorts of ridiculous, nonsensical shit when they can safely hide behind a screen.  You comment however you like. 

And I truly hope your username is just a joke and not how you really feel. : (I think they have no idea just how many hours of work goes into a piece.  I would cherish a hand-made gift, and since I cannot crochet a straight line, now I know that gift certificates to places that sell yarn and those materials would be a great gift idea for someone who is into that.He received (likely) stolen property.  He didn't bargain for that.Me too.  That could happen to anyone.   Like those fuckers who filmed him. He must've been in stomach-cramp agony trying to hold it in. 

If you drop your pants and have already shit yourself and do it all in open public, you are in so much misery you no longer can afford to care what others think.I had an idiot doctor inject me with nubain for "break through pain" knowing full well I was on methadone for pain management.  Nubain operates to block the opiate receptors that are affected by methadone, so that fucking idiot put me into a very violent precipitated withdrawal within about ten minutes.

It was 10 hours of fucking hell. And had my bowels been full, I would've shit all over myself and thought nothing of it. You are in agony, convinced you are going to die, feel like you've been dipped in and injected with pure acid, and the shakes, god, the shakes.I long to live on a little farm with animals (as long as I don't have to wake up at 5am to shovel tons of horse shit).  It sounds so peaceful to be away from the city, noise, the overload on all your senses (just driving in traffic and seeing hundreds of billboards stresses me out).You're right about that.  He can't use those jackets for their intended use. Makes far more sense to take it up with his cc company and the vendor first.I hope it continues to get better. Emptiness is a very strange feeling - as if you are an outsider looking in on a world where people are happy and normal (which is not True at all, we all hide our shit pretty well) and for some reason, we don't fit in or belong.

I know its such a cliche, but what helped me was staying distracted with doing something I liked.  You maybe don't have any activity that you even "love" or enjoy right now, but at least keep busy with something you at least like or don't hate.  Gives you less time to brood.With features that are small, and placed very close together.  No amount of plastic surgery can fix that.I'm sorry to hear that.  Swimming is also something I've found to be very peaceful and relaxing, and a great exercise for endorphins. I had to stop due to a major spine injury.

The only exercise I can do right now is mat pilates. I can't do anything that is weight-bearing (even my own body weight) or simply standing up.  

I thus do a lot of mat work at home, with some nice music and a lot of core/pilates work.  I focus a lot on my legs and am still working on mentally accepting that any upper-body "workouts" must be minimal and very gentle unless I want a bad flareup.

I am usually not motivated when I start, but once the blood gets going, and I start stretching and loosening up, I get into it.  My breathing gets deeper, and knowing that I am getting my core and legs stronger helps mentally.

If you have any interest (body weight exercises are great, you don't need to spend much - just need a mat, free youtube videos, and you can do them at home)  I can suggest a great Pilates book I found to be way above the typical pilates books. Its meant for both men and women, and reallly discusses the fundamentals and actual muscles engaged in each move.PIC PIC PIC PIC PIC.  (nervously tapping fingers.) C'mon man, we women await.well hey, you are already busting ass and have plenty to keep you busy!  I have no doubt that you will at least try the channel swim one day.  Even if you don't make it, it takes great training and courage to even try it.

Thanks for the kind words.  I hate this shit so much (chronic pain).  I wish I could somehow convince all young, healthy people to get active and take advantage of their health and find something they love, because what human bodies can do (with work and dedication) is not only amazing, but can make you feel really good.

I always thought I'd be healthy forever, and thought things such as "oh, I can go back into ballet or martial arts next month, when I'm not working so hard" and instead I just stayed at the gym. I looked great, but was bored out of my mind.

Keep up the physical stuff.  It can do wonders for feeling down. And if you ever get a chance to move (not sure if you have kids or what not) take it. Me moving to a new country did wonders in helping me leave bad memories behind. Soon I'll be moving again, this time to Europe, and I cannot wait.You are a very handsome man.

"Sexy" is based more on your attitude, personality and charisma.  Good luck with the jaw surgery - hope it goes well and you get good pain meds.Ok, that comment right there just obliterated any remote sexiness you may have had. Being sexy is not just about looks or a ripped body, but also about charisma, personality, kindness and whatnot. 

A douche is not sexy.How about you show us a picture with no makeup.  That is what real models do. They show up at auditions and have a polaroid taken in shitty light, with NO MAKEUP.

We also need a full body shot.

Then, a fair decision can be made. Your height alone will preclude you from catalog and runway. You might be able to do smaller-end modeling (car shows, things like that).  

I would also recommend you ditch the heavy makeup and work with a good makeup artist for a more natural look.Why are you unable to take criticism when you are specifically asking for people to rate you?  Plus, with an attitude like that (the "I know better" and pretending like you aren't insulted when we all know you are) makes you look like an unprofessional, whiny 16 year old.  That attitude will get you nowhere in the industry where you already have your lack of height stacked against you.And that is also my point, Turkey does not belong in the EU and will never become a full-fledged member.

It pretends to be secular, but it has an entire deparment of Religious Affairs, and spends a good portion of its collected taxes (taken from all religions at the same rate) on places or services only for Sunni Muslims.  Many other religions are not even "recognized" by Turkey.

So for those who claim Turkey is "secular", yes, its much more secular compared to virtually every other Arab country, but its in no way secular as most people think it is.I would ask, "so, does the sweater fit well?" $100 in materials alone? I'd not be happy unless that friend really showed that they appreciated the gift in some other meaningful way.Jesus, your nonstop complaining likely explains why men don't want to see you again after the first date. (Remember that other thread you put up in relationships or something?)   You bitch and moan and whine like a damn 14 year old.Listen - woman to woman - STOP BITCHING. Nobody cares about who said what in your walls of text.  I don't even bother reading them, and the longer you go on, the more pathetic you sound.  An adult knows how to just ignore people they consider immature.

You are also setting yourself up for insults by acting (your Reddit persona) the way you do. The constant typing of "lol haha" alone is a waving red flag of insecurity and a fake laugh that you emotionally have your shit together.   You ain't fooling anyone.

Every single response that wasn't what you liked? You had nothing  but sarcasm and superiority in return. Why ask for True criticism if you can't handle it?

You strike me as a very immature 19 year old, mentally going on 14, desperate for validation via strangers on Reddit.

If you have True confidence, ignore, report or block the people who insult you, because guess what? Not only will life include people who will be insulting whether its deserved or not, but your attitude is really unpleasant and you set yourself up for much of this.

I'm no modeling/casting expert, but there is simply no way to tell if you have any chance to do low-end modeling (forget high end, you are too short, it WILL NOT HAPPEN, live with it) until you post a pic with a clean face, no makeup, and a full body shot, with normal lighting.

I don't mean this as an insult but your makeup does you no favors.  You are pretty girl - but nothing special.  I imagine the heavy makeup is actually bringing you down.  

Beauty has a lot to do with how a woman carries herself.  Verbally/on-line, the way you carry yourself is an unmitigated disaster.

As for photos, ditch the makeup, and try to show your True self. Your natural beauty.

And no matter what, whatever modeling do you end up doing will be stuff like demo product intros, car shows, umbrella girls at motorcycle races, etc.

In other word, not a real model.  I was an umbrella girl for a pro racer and any halfway decent looking woman with a nice body can do that.
That must be hard to take. I once tried to make a simple quilt. Tried.  It looked like a vomitous mass of retard-quilt.

A hand-made quilt can be a work of art. It takes so much effort, time and thought but people can be so dense and not realize that a hand-made quilt is nothing the same as some factory-churned out quilt that has 10,000 copies.

And a hand-made quilt is hardly "crap from Walmart".  I would've wanted to hit the bitch as well.France puts nuclear power to great use.  If only people could realize its not always a disaster waiting to happen.Sexy includes attitude.  Something you utterly fail to perceive.  And your face does make you look out of shape and a bit chubby, in fact. I'm not saying that to be mean, but I also thought you had an extra 30lbs of chub on you.

And I'm very happy for you that you care for your family, but what the hell does that have to do with anything? I am giving up on seeing OP holding that huge doggie like a baby on its back and rocking it.   Such high hopes I had.  Sniff...What a disappointment this gif was. And what a disappointment I am to myself that I actually clicked on this.That is beautiful, and all the more impressive that you made your own patterns. I've never been into cross-stitch, but this is something that I'd actually hand on my walls and enjoy looking at, especially right before bedtime.  They look magical.OP, you're killin' me.  I must have chicken and waffles but I currently live in a country where these items do not exist and I cannot cook worth a damn, and real maple syrup costs more than its weight in gold.

You mean, OP! Mean!Damn. That really sucks, and it seems like you didn't fuck up at all.  On the bright side, you didn't have to worry about accidentally turning on to one of India's designating "shitting streets" where people drop their pants and shit right off the sidewalk.

Unless you're into that kinda thing.Hey, you are NOT a failure.  

The mistake you did make? You bit off more than you could chew. A full load at college and working that many hours would destroy most people. You chose to do that knowing you also have a heap of medical/psychological conditions that greatly affect you.

See this as a good learning experience. No matter how hard you try, you cannot beat reality.  You simply took on far too much, and made a poor decision by thinking that you could handle all that. 

We all make poor decisions in life.  You are simply human.

Give yourself a break, either take a lighter load, lower the work hours or take out a small loan. Because this current amount of work/school/emotional issues is simply not sustainable and is only going to drag you down and make you feel worse.This is very helpful advice.  When I got very sick at work, I didn't want to advertise it or use it as an excuse, but it was also reality that my meds made me unable to focus as well as I once could, and being a litigator, that mattered a lot.

I took my boss aside, explained my situation, and he told me, "hey, I have so many senior moments I won't even notice if you have a slow moment."

I know not everyone will respond like that, but you might be surprised.  I was dealing with an aggressively-growing spinal tumor that put me in agony, the meds made me stupid as hell, I rarely got to work before 11am, and often passed out at my desk.  I still got my work done on time, and it was good quality, but they let me work from home when I needed to.

Explain to your prof what went on, and that its not an "excuse" but an explanation.

Prof might react well, or he may not.  But worth a shot.Is this that chick from the divergent movies? I still fail to see what is so special about her.God, how I love orange or lemon chicken.  And Moses said I should eat two servings, even if I am full, because fuck it, its delicious.We can agree to disagree.  I have no doubt there are some beautiful things and places to see in India, along with some wonderful people.

But I do not want to visit a country where a large part of the culture encourages bathing in a feces-laden cesspool of human corpses, garbage, and shit.  Nor do I want to spend my tourist money in a country where a good part of the culture and government see no problem with raping or murdering women.

Just as Saudi Arabia has many interesting historical places and people that I am sure are welcoming and could share unique life experience with me, I would never go, for fear of my own safety and as I would not want to contribute to their economy or tourist sector given so many aspects of their culture that I do not agree with.

People shitting on the streets or in designated fields in India is a DAILY OCCURRENCE because there are simply not enough facilities.  I never said people shit on ever single street.

Mass shootings in the US are not a daily occurrence (not yet, at least) so that comparison fails.Ganges River.  I've seen the photos of corpses, its commonly pooped and peed in, people bathe in it (and I realize they often have no choice and believe its a spiritual and cleansing thing).  Ganges is full of potential diseases.

I never said all of Indian culture supports rape and murder of women, but its a alarmingly high number where too many men get away with it, the gov't just doesn't care, and certain men of a certain mindset believe women are simply trash and its their right to use women as they see fit.

India IS very populated and unless you have a willing, reasonable and noncorrupt government (and no gov't is immune from any of those things) it is a very large task to raise the standard of living in your country. Particularly when you have a huge proportion of uneducated who still believe that rolling their kids in cow manure will protect them from disease or other evil.

Nearly every Indian person I have met (except from the crazy  housemate I had) was a kind, considerate, smart, humble and nice person.  They knew they were fortunate enough to have a chance at an education, and maybe it wasn't easy and their parents had to sacrifice a lot.

Every single one who was studying in the US seemed to have a great appreciation for that opportunity and didn't squander it.  They valued their education.

I'm also very sensitive.  When I see poverty in my face, it breaks my heart.  I know it exists (right now I live in Mexico, and poverty is always right around the corner) and even when its not in front of my face I am able to "pretend" its not there.  

But when its boom, right there, and I see  child prostitutes, or severely disabled adults begging for money (as I did in Thailand and Brazil) it completely destroys me inside.  I have my comfortable (not rich at all, but comfortable) due to the dumb luck of being born into a family that fled a dangerous country and ended up in the US, which gave me many life opportunities I never would've had had my parents remained in my birth country.

I am sorry you are so hurt.

Please never forget:  if you want 'friendship' with someone, you never sleep with them. It will completely change the dynamics into too many possibilities to even go into here.  Oh that was freakin' hilarious! I was truly expecting him to make an incredibly leap and hang on by his claws, but no.  Splat.that is adorable yet tragic.  he was trying so hard. i wonder if they just lose energy in the work-up and psych-up  before they jump. after all that effort, they just have no more energy to make a meaningful launch.Ok, since everyone has covered the other areas, I'm gonna give you some tough love.

NOBODY likes boring classes. This is called paying your dues. You are being lazy.  You are blaming your laziness on everything but you. 

Get off your ass and do what needs to be done. This attitude will ruin you. What happens when you get a job? "Sorry bossy I didn't do the project because you know, I couldn't get motivated and I really don't find the subject matter interesting."

Want to fail? Keep the laziness up.

Want to have a chance at succeeding? Stop feeling sorry for yourself.  Most of us do not "love" our classes or studying. We do it anyway. This is your one shot.  You can't redo it if you fuck it all up.

You have no discipline and that is something that needs to be learned.  There are all sorts of methods to help you along, but until you try, nobody is gonna help you or do it for you.

I had to teach myself how to study after a horrible 1st quarter in college.  I got my shit together, studied my ass off, and ended up Phi Beta Kappa (no, its not some Greek club shit, and I didn't even know what it was when I got the notice in the mail, which shows how clueless I was.)

You're an adult. Get your shit together or you will pay a very heavy price.Che Guevara.  

All because someone took an unexpected handsome photo of him.The (original, not that little puke Jaden Smith) Karate Kid.  He starts a fight over nothing, gets his ass beat, then continues to harass the bad guys (remember the hosing down in the bathroom scene at the dance?) and is surprised that they chase him down and beat his ass?Petster. Clapclapclap ---- CLAP.  Then he'd purr.Fucking at least look up and verify the memes you post of Obama being a Muslim fascist Nazi literally Hitler communist and that the American diplomat in Benghazi was violently raped and sodomized before being tortured and burned alive BEFORE posting them, you fucking idiot.Are you a troll? Or are you that fucking stupid? Do you know a damn thing about the current state of SCI research? Or about this guy's injury? Because you do realize that every injury is different, right?

For the last 40 years they have been saying a cure is 10 years out.  Go educate yourself.

"This guys is one of the lucky ones".  Yeah! First ensure you have the right suspect (key word: SUSPECT) THEN beat the shit out of him that leads to paralysis. read up on his parents - exactly the same scumbags. they've gotten into so much illegal shit but bought their way out each time.yes, his parents ARE super wealthy and have used their money, power and influence to bail themselves out of illegal shit they've gotten into repeatedly over the years.  and some more bribes or "donations" paid by wealthy parents to the cops and judges.Its called being paid off by the parents.I'd actually be happy to spend $5 a month as my contribution to keep his ass in jail for the rest of his sorry ass life. A real jail, not this country-club rehab bullshit.How did he honestly think he would not get caught?Incredible work!  Please don't get discouraged if the scale doesn't move - the last 10lbs can be the hardest, and if you are lifting and putting on muscle, the scale might not move at all. What's important is how you feel.  You've made an amazing life change and I hope you are developing the confidence to go along with your wonderful new look!You look so good! Trim, athletic and slim. Nice work!I have educated myself. The fact that you don't even know what this guy's injury is aside from 'paralysis' (unless you are his neurosurgeon?) demonstrates you have no clue how spinal cord injuries differ and how there is not a one-size-fits-all cure.Who the fuck does shit like this? Is this some passive-aggressive statement against management, even though its some poor janitor and not top management that has to clean that up?Someone was shitting on the FLOOR? Every day? I'd want to murder the bastard.This reminds me of the dancing in the evil room scene in the The Shining. Jack dancing with the woman from the tub.  Ronald even has that shit-eating grin Jack had.was it just the one hand? that must've been miserable.Did you give co-worker a tongue-lashing?Ah, that's good to hear that she is a generous person.Gross negligence and willful misconduct, depending on the statute's interpretation, rarely amount to a criminal act.   I don't know the law being used in this case, or if the acts and omissions found to be grossly negligent and willful misconduct are the same acts/omissions for which authorities were contemplating criminal penalties.

"Negligent" does not mean criminal.  You also have to factor in to what degree did the willful misconduct directly lead to the deaths, injuries and suffering of the victims (causation).

I am not on BP's side. I'm merely giving an aspect as to how the legal side can be interpreted.

Edit: Remember the peanut butter salmonella guy? Now those were actions that rose beyond gross negligence or willful misconduct.  He intentionally refused to act and hid the danger, knowing his product could cause illness or death.  A fundamental requirement of any criminal act is intent, in that you know your act or omission is going to really fuck shit up in a very bad way.  I obviously have zero proof.  But take a look at the shit his parents got away with. I really hope there comes a time where I have a good enough feeling to travel to India.  Obviously, you need to be a smart traveler and avoid dangerous places.   Every person I've spoken to that has been there has told me nothing but good things.  A few did have a few weeks of serious diarrhea, but that can happen in any country.   I learned the hard way that I could not handle the dairy in Israel.  
Probably because I'm used to pasteurized everything. 

Edit: and you're right, because as a foreigner to India, I only hear of the bad stuff that happens as rarely does the media publish the good stuff.  If I could arrange a trip where I stayed far away from areas that to me would be unbearably unhygienic, and stick to relatively safe areas, I am sure I'd have a good time.Well.  At 28 I got a catastrophic illness.  Had to quit my job and was quite close to dying from a spinal tumor.  Medical bills were piling up and i had to file bankruptcy.  I had not asked my millionaire parents for a dime.  I filed and was approved for disability.  my immediate family (parents and brother) treated me as if I had pulled a back muscle.

My brother, who "works" for my parents in a pretend job, called me with a magnanimous offer.  The three of them (all running the same small family business)would  help out with my medical bills by giving me some relatively small amount of cash every month. Recall, I did not ask or make up sob stories.  

All he wanted, along with my parents, in return, was for me to fake a tax receipt so they could pretend they were buying something from me and get a tax write off that they "really needed because now they had two extra homes in Hawaii in addition to their two homes in Palo Alto" (my dad bought my bro his 800k home).

I said, "so, you will help your dying sister with a small portion of her med bills but only if I commit felony tax fraud, which you will be committing as well?  Thanks, but no thanks.  If for some reason I get better, and I get caught, I'll not only lose my law license which is my only means to make a living, but have a criminal case to deal with.  Oh, that will also mean even if I don't get caught, I will have to pay taxes on your "help" money, and it will disqualify me from my bankruptcy case since you insist on paying me directly into my checking account."

I was called a selfish bitch by my brother and he hung up on me.  This was during my radiation treatments and when I was flying to France for a last-ditch effort to save my life.

So yes, siblings can be mean assholes.  

I also suppose it didn't help when I told him that I'd suck dick (I'm a woman) on the street corner for five dollars a pop before taking a dirty dime from him.  What areas would you recommend me to visit, and what areas to stay away? Just the short version as I know India is huge.   I don't want to see the Ganges and it breaks my heart to see poverty. I do love history and architecture, not much for the touristy stuff or shopping.  Their net worth is private since they are not a public company, and I have no idea,  but I remember reading quite the list of shit the parents got into - and out of - rather quickly, all based on court records.I'm genuinely sorry. I've bee there.  Long distance, he pretended to care at first and I was young, naive and believed him.  He forgot me after two weeks.  And it hurt like a punch to the gut.Look at that! Xmas came early! That is so nice and I can actually feel your smile through Reddit!

So, you uh, gonna knit me a sweater? As  gift, yo'.You could, but what would my opinion do for you? I am not in the industry at all. I have zero connections. Also, if you truly want to see if you have a chance in modeling, don't post your pix on Reddit.  Reddit is just a bunch of people behind a screen, mostly males, none of whom can help you but many of whom can say hurtful things.

Why not go talk to an agent about lower-level modeling?  They can give you a much better response.It was supposed to be a gift for my husband.  I found fabrics of Star Wars, undersea turtles (he loved scuba diving) and every other thing he liked.  

It eventually ended up in a dumpster.I would have you know I was up all night refreshing this page, hoping for a pic of cute OP holding his adorable gigantic "lapdog" like a baby.  I need coffee, but I shall endeavor and not give up.

(Do I need to wait a few months while you work up the heaps of muscle mass at the gym you'll need to carry that 1000000lb dog like a baby?  Just curious, because that IS  a rather large dog.)I am truly sorry you had these motherfuckers as neighbors.  What a surprise - the kid was a vomitous mass of undisciplined shit, just like his parents.

Funny, had he been black, the cops/judge/everyone would've ripped the poor parenting to bits and said "throw the kid in jail for life".  I guess this is a True example of white privilege.  And I am no SJW.That sounds horrible. You don't realize how much you use your hands until you can't use them. I once broke both hands and badly sprained each wrist.  I learned the art of wiping with baby wipes and whatnot. Babywipes very useful things.  I hope you are all better now.

Did your colleague have any idea he/she was infected as well, yet still came in to work?

Edit: just read your other response. At least he was apologetic but he was still pretty damn stupid to still come in having some of the symptoms. He could've infected the entire office and I'm not sure, but can't people with fragile health (elderly) die from that?Thanks for the link. I would pay heaps of money if that drug became available.  I can see the potential downside of not feeling pain (when I first was prescribed percocet for the spine pain, I started running and literally jumping and was too stubborn to listen to people telling me to quit that shit, as I'd sure be feeling it later and was only making my situation worse.)
You are too kind of a person.  You keep that nice yarn for yourself, and carefully select the people that deserve those beautiful, handmade gifts.  You never realize how much crap you have until you move.  I hate moving.  Hope your move goes well for you and your adorable ball of fluff, and look forward to that special pic.I never said I was a "promo model girl". I said I was an umbrella girl for a professional motorcycle racer. I got it because I also happened to be one of thew few women that roadraced motorcycles so I already knew a lot of the racers and others in the industry. And I emphasized that any girl with a nice body who is halfway attractive can land that. 

The lower-level races will also pick up all sorts of skanky-looking girls. The higher-end (think national level or international level motorsports) will have a higher quality looking model.  

As far as finding an agent, I have no idea.  I would research it online. Educate yourself on how the process works. And you absolutely need a portfolio and that's going to cost some money.  You need a pro photographer who understands lighting, how to help you pose, and what the pics are for.  A friend with a nice camera may have good intentions, but their pics will be so awful that any agency will immediately dump your portfolio (or card-thing; I forgot what ou call them, but usually models have a foldable card that has a variety photos of them in a variety of clothes, beachwear, natural v. made up, etc.).

If you are ok with working the lower-level jobs, accept that you will have to spend some cash up-front to have a really nice portfolio done.  A bad portfolio (because I believe most agents will typically request a portfolio before they even consider meeting you in person) will ruin you.  Make sure you hire a photographer after reviewing their work and know that they have done modeling portfolios in the past.

Figure out how the process works.  With the internet at your fingertips, that should be a piece of cake.  Find out the protocol of how to get an agent.  They may not want anyone mailing in their portfolio without an invite. Other agencies may welcome anyone sending in their portfolio.

Also, you'll have to have your measurements taken, and list your clothing size, shoe size, height, etc.

Good luck, and remember, you will likely not be able to make a living doing low-level modeling because the pay is shit. But it could be a fun thing to do on the side.  Don't think that this can be something that you can rely on to support you, because that will just not happen.If you don't care, why did you bother clicking on the link? Silly.Incredible change! You must feel so different, so light, so energetic. Great work - you've completely changed your life for the better!I'm pretty new to MMA.  If I didn't already know those two pix were of the same person, I would not believe anyone telling me that those pix are of the same person, taken just at what...a few weeks apart? (Not sure how soon before a match the weigh-in is done.)  She looks gaunt and very trim in the first one, and on fight day her physique is much thicker. Even her face is thicker.  

And to me, at weigh-in she did sound like she was on the verge of crying. I wonder if her blood sugar was so low from days of starvation. Freeway cleanup crews.Gonna look them up right now.

Edit:  Ok. I see a meth addict in the before pics, and a healthy-looking tough guy in the after pics.Wow. Mine will be finalized any day. He is still my best friend and most trusted person in the world and I'd do anything to help him. Cannot imagine how awful it is when things go south and someone you once loved turns into a raging, selfish asshole.I was a business litigator for 15 years. Decided to take a few family law cases.

Never, ever again.  Its like dealing with screaming children who cannot see reason.Because they are both their attorney and their witness.  They can make up all sorts of bullshit lies that you agreed to such-and-such, or verbally abused them or engaged in some other horseshit.It drives me nuts when my non-lawyer friends say, "everyone always said I'd be a great lawyer because I love to argue!"

No, you idiot.  A good lawyer knows how to reason well, not simply prattle endlessly, and can negotiate a settlement that makes both parties happy and end the fighting.The few divorce cases I took on depressed me so much and I immediately stopped taking them.  It was depressing to see how evil one (or both) people could get.  I'd see such manipulative behavior, and ask a client, "do you not realize you are spending your entire worth on lawyer's fees? Is this what your emotions and pride are worth?"

I'm glad its over for you.That is one of the funniest dog-in-car pics I have ever seen. What a story it tells.I just spent so much time enjoying your incredible photos and bookmarked the page.  The derpy-looking boxers in some of the pix had me laughing aloud.  That's really nice of you to do that.  So uh, can you come take pix of my dog?That duck's face at the end, with his wings out.  It just can't get any cuter.If he backs out at the last minute, I'd be happy (well, not really) to tell him how my colleague had horrible low back pain, refused to see a doc for two months, finally did and was give 6 months to live.

He kept coming into work until the end.  He smelled of death.  His poor wife, who lost her first husband to brain cancer would drive him and wait in the lobby for the 3-4 hours he could work, staring ahead, motionless, with wet eyes.  His 10 and 12 year old stepsons had finally accepted him as their "new" dad and built up trust that some scary illness wouldn't take him away.

This is heartbreaking.  I am  so sorry for everything you and your family have lost, all due to stupidity, laziness and malpractice.  

Only reason I lived through my spinal tumor was my husband,  a French national, took me to France where they did emergency surgery that saved my life.  Had I booked the trip for a week later, they told me I'd have been paralyzed or dead. 

And I had gone to some of the best-rated hospitals in the US.  I was also dismissed as a "stressed, depressed 27 year old who was working too hard."

I'm truly very sorry.I'm sorry to hear that.  Are you getting decent treatment?  Feeling miserable? I hope you have someone to lean on, and a hopeful prognosis.My brother (with whom I no longer speak) was a cult follower from the 80s.  My non-computer-type parents even talked to me about it once. "He's really emotionally into it. He actually gets ANGRY about non-Apple computers. Its like a religion to him."No no no no no. The correct way to pronounce the food hummus is "hoomooose". Even better if you can get the Middle Easter 'ch' (ex; similar to the Israeli name "Chaim") from the back of your throat.  It is never, ever pronounced like "hummingbird" or "humming" a tune.  Pretend you are speaking Hebrew.I don't get questions. I get people stepping back one step with a scared look on their face.  I was born in Iran.Why didn't they just take those damn eagles to get there in the first place? Is there something in the book that explains this?

And how the hell did Gandalf recover his staff after Saruman kicked his ass and Gandalf escaped by jumping onto an eagle's back off Saruman's tower?  Did the elves make him a copy in Rivendell?That would be rough on someone with ten or twenty years on you. But at 24? To have no more family would feel like your one True safety net is gone.That was the most painful and difficult thing I had to do as well. To tell my husband that I wanted a divorce. It was no surprise to him, but it was still the worst emotion I have ever known.  We had been struggling through so much shit (both of us got really sick with various catastrophic diseases) and we tried so hard, but we just couldn't do it anymore. He will always be my best friend, but the fact that the romance fell apart still rips me to shreds.  And that was 7 years ago.  That was terrifying just reading it.  So sorry you had to live through that, but at least there was no raping or murdering. My ex husband worked a 2 month stint in J'berg and refused to let me come visit. All he said is "I've seen some things on the streets and I don't think its a good idea if you come here."I once commented something along those lines. I received a flurry of "FUCK YOU ASSHOLE THIS SHIT IS REAL" replies.It reads as if a bunch of 12 year olds are partaking in some creative writing project for the year. "OMG, you should call the police!"And if your opinion differs with someone else, they will say how they fucked your mother, you are a proven idiot, you are full of "disprofessionalism" (I was called that today) and you should go kill yourself.

Sometimes I try to visualize these people and wonder if these reactions are the product of extensive inbreeding.Thank you for this.  Having not read the books, I figured I must be missing something.You'll never offend anyone who is reasonable. It would be like me trying to pronounce some Asian food. I'd butcher it horribly.Yeah, he was a good person, father and husband.  Rare to find a really smart and friendly lawyer.  In December he was dancing with his wife and the Xmas party and they were so happy.  Seemed like she had finally moved on from losing her first husband.  By July, he was staggering around the office with an ice pack stuffed in the back of his pants for his lower back pain.  


He got his diagnosis and he was so damn brave and never once complained to any of us.  His choice was to keep working as if life was normal.  How do you say good morning, how are you, to a colleague you know is gonna die in a few months and is suffering?

By March, he was dead and buried.  

His wife and step kids moved across country,  and to make it worse, his health insurance refused to pay, so after his death his friend lawyers were still suing on behalf of his estate for the wife and kids who now had nothing.  When my college bf said, "Ohhhh, Leticia" during an intense sexual moment, he called his mom for advice during the aftermath.

My name is not Leticia.  Yep.   Same in France.  At four in the afternoon you'll have shows and movies that have sex scenes that show full frontal. Dick, balls,everything.  My ex husband, who is French, said oh yeah, it's always on tv and its no big deal.

They are not repressed over sex and nipples like Americans.  Women can go topless at a beach and it's no big deal.She told him to go back to my dorm room wearing a sign that said "I am an idiot." 

Yeah buddy, I didn't need a sign to figure it out.  

In all honesty, he was not in love with her, and shit happens, so a few days later I got over it.  Well, not that cool.  When we first started dating I wasn't too happy that he still had pix of her on his wall.  I do believe him when he said he kept them up as respect for her when she came to visit, but she had stopped visiting.  I was younger and less mature, and now I know how to handle shit like that better.The Rock Store or further south?Can you hang off more and position the bike so you have a greater contact patch?It was our first three dates and my first time in his room.  We hadn't even had our first kiss yes. He took them down after our first "real kiss". 

He ended up being a nightmare.  He had "so much respect for me" he wanted me to take a dump with him in the bathroom with me (because it didn't bother him, nevermind that it did bother me),  remove and replace tampons right fucking in front of him ("I hope one day you feel courageous around me to do that, because that means you truly love me and nothing is hidden" that sick fuck) made speeches in the damn dining hall about me and our relationship after we split up that I was the best thing ever to him, and once fished out old, old photobooth pics of my ex, who I hadn't spoken to in years.  I had found them in an old purse I was about to use and he was there as se were just about to leave for dinner.  I said something like "ew" (pix were of us kissing harmlessly) as i had completely forgot they existed.  For months he held on to them, me none the wiser until the day he slipped a piece of paper under my dorm room with those pix taped in the center of a piece of paper (after I told him for the fifth time our relationship was over) and used multiple-colored pens to write a diatribe because  I told him it seems like I was dealing with different personalities form him.

His crowning achievement was when he brought down my Sega and Roadrash game (this was mid 90s, laugh away) along with my huge snake tank containing my ball python that I was hiding in his dorm closet, slammed them on the table at which our mutual friends sat in stunned  silence, and yelled "TAKE YOUR SHIIT! BITCH" because I refused to see him anymore.I'm sorry, I don't understand what you mean when you say you're 'already shifted' into your turns. Can you describe it for me?

Better yet, in a right turn at speed, how would you describe the location of your right and left shoulder and the position of your buttocks vis-a-vis the seat?Disclaimer: I cannot draw a stick figure, just stumbled across this sub, not sure if its only for artists.

I think this is really adorable. I love her boots, the sweetness of her, and to me, it looks really nice.Sounds good so far.  And how would you describe where your chest is vis-a-vis the tank? Its tough because I don't know your height, and really tall people can hang off only so much, whereas a rider like Toni Elias has a very funky way of hanging off where he looks like he's clinging to his bike sideways like a monkey.  

You might want to experiment with hanging off even more and see how it feels. Really lean and dip your right shoulder (we are still in a right turn here) into the turn and drop your head. Your torso midline should be on the right side of the midline tank (I know that's vague, but your torso shouldn't be centered with the center line/gas cap of the tank).  You can really experiment with slowing your entry speed down, giving yourself time to set up your positioning, and really experiment with trying even deeper shoulder "dipping".

I used to think I was hanging off so much during track day, and I'm pretty short.  My knee would be firml down, with rearsets raised pretty high, and I thought my short arms would leave just no more room.

Then I'd see a photo by the track photographer and realize my outside arm was still bent and I still had more room to go.  I had to learn to really tighten my core so I didn't feel like I was sliding off the bike, and bring my knee in.

Do you have rearsets? 

If you're hanging off as comfortably as you can, time to take the bike to the track! If I say get a bigger bike, that's just asking for scary situations on public roads.  You will have a blast at the track.  I warn you, its highly addictive.  

And could be that you are at the limits of your bike. I imagined you are on a sport bike and just realized I have no idea what your bike looks like.   

With that dirt experience, you could be really, really good on the track.  The fastest racers, back when I did club racing, were the guys who had a lot of dirt experience.  Little wobbles didn't scare them, they loved sliding the rear and had excellent throttle control.Maybe the bottom dog had a really stubborn muscle spasm and the top dog was just trying to help massage it out.That sounds adorable. Probably didn't feel adorable when you wanted to stay in your warm bed and continue sleeping, however.And why are people upvoting this nonsensical prattle?"Human! Slave! Yes, you! I've decided to acknowledge your meager existence and give you an early xmas present.  I'm also making an effort to look cute, because I suppose you slaves deserve that once in awhile."

This pic makes me proud of that kitty. Bien hecho.Ah, i see.  That kind of bike is not conducive to aggressively hanging off. But at least you will not have any low back pain (I'm an old fart now - in my 20s I said I would NEVER EVER get a touring bike) after a long ride.Remember how you could steal the baton from the motorcycle cop and hit him with it?  Yeah, his behavior was pretty mortifying, but the Sega and RoadRash survived.Looks like he was participating in Grumpy Cat Impersonation contest.I think that is so cute. I would've had all 50 of my stuffed animals if we were allowed to do that at my age.Its gonna be up to your gf in the end to stand up to her.  You can give your gf some support, but this is something she will have to do on her own. If you do anything, no matter how reasonable you are, the older sister will just get worse.Imagine you put your heart and soul and years of work into a play that is successful.  You later find out that schools across the US are also doing the play and selling tickets and making money off your work with no credit to you.  I wouldn't be happy if it were me and nobody even asked me permission.

Of course it also sucks that schools w/o resources are stuck with old stuff like Shakespeare, but that's just how it is.I wonder if this (and the South) are areas that create some of the meanest people I've seen on FPH (the ones wishing fat people death, rape, burning to death etc).  Being around humongous people all the time.  I always grew up in fit cities so it was not common for me to see people on those scooter thingies or huge people on a regular basis, or even smell them.  You might like Wild Swans.  Its very emotional but incredible.  Covers the lives of three Chinese women, part of which occurs during the Cultural Revolution. Had to read it for a History of China class, thought it would be boring, and it completely swept me away into what the Chinese had to endure.Respect. As a litigator who sued insurance companies for things just like this, please read every single line of your policy.  Read the exclusions.  Slowly.  They are fuckers and many companies will find any reason not to pay, fair or not.You are bringing back horrible memories of a $180 AC unit they "warrantied".  Instead of just replacing it due to the fan only working at one speed, they disassembled and reassembled it three fucking times, never fixing it, and the last idiot left a screw out. It leaked all over my new hardwood flooring.   I want to kill them all.Why the hell did you name someone's full name and accuse them of various shit, then give the location?I'm not going to pray with you, and you should remove all personal identifying info along with the named of the church, you nitwit.  

That has no place on a sub like this.  Some people do not like to hear the truth. You allow over a million people who are uneducated, poor and have no skills, with belief in Islam, into a Western liberal democracy, you have an inevitable culture clash.  Its not a Trump thing. Its just a fact.Is a mother still required to love a face like that?That they had extinguishers on-hand is truly WTF about this post.I think if someone truly offered you a million dollars for a pair of old shoes, you would take it. 

I think what you are feeling is violated, which you were. You are attaching huge value to those vans, which makes sense, because that's the one object they took from you.

Keep in mind, you were the victim of a felony. A crime.  You may not feel it, but that is a trauma.  You are putting all your emotions into a material objects.  And not even an expensive object or a family heirloom.

Be grateful that is all they took. I'm not saying be happy. Just keep a healthy perspective.  You were violated in a bad way, just try to keep in mind what was taken away from you that meant so much.  A pair of old shoes? Or, your relative feeling of safety that some motherfucker with a weapon is not going to again accost you in the future while you are minding your own business and rob you?Hey, without help, you will not get better.

Really think about that.   Do you want to live like this, or do you want a better life, where you can work, can go to school, or learn a skill, or do things you enjoy and feel good about it? And not have an eating disorder?

Only you can get yourself the help you need, and this post sounds like a cry for help.

Please get some help. You deserve it and you need it.I was just thinking of your story. I'm a woman who lost 30lbs and got banned when a guy posted a long post about how his wife put on 60lbs and he was no longer attracted to her, etc.

One thing I said, very carefully, was that being "100lbs overweight was not healthy" and that it could affect her future career prospects because fair or not, employers like to see people who value their health."

I got banned for "using bullshit science as an excuse to be a shitty person."Die? I know its tough. More than inconvenient.  Are you starving? Do you have a roof over your head?  If the answer is yes, there are places that can help.

At 27 I got a catastrophic illness.  I lost everything once I couldn't work anymore.  5 years on the couch, drugged up in agonizing pain.

I had to file bankruptcy (which while I was deeply ashamed at first, turned out to be the best financial decision I've ever made).  I sold all my shit I could sell, downgraded as much as I could, and moved to a much cheaper area.

I don't know if those are options for you or if you even have debt.

Just please don't think death is a good option just because you are dirt poor.  I'm not sure what country you in live in, but I'm assuming there are resources for people stuck in your position.

It can get better. Don't give up hope.

PS: Get a coat. You need one. Goodwill, Salvation Army.  Do what needs to be done.  Don't freeze.Tell me about it. A spinal disease ruined my ability to do what I wanted (dance, martial arts, play, walk, not be in pain).  

Then i listen to someone who is depressed because they have no motivation and it drives me fucking nuts.  I believe them completely but want to shake them and say get off your ass and do the shit you CAN do, but simply lack the motivation to do. Its not that hard.  Nobody is holding a gun to your head and stopping you.

Tough love to OP: stop whining and MOVE YOUR ASS. See, I just can't think that way.  I cannot wish death on someone like that, no matter how distasteful they look.  I am a fit woman and take pride in looking hot and sexy, but to wish death on people because of that? Or to say their lives have no worth? 

It just sounds like the Nazis talking about the Jews. (Yes, yes I know you can lose weight whereas you can't lose being Jewish).  Its such an extreme response to someone who is admittedly unpleasant to look at and be around.How about get some trusted friends or counselors at your school and practice?

I was terrified of interviews at first as I was close to graduating.  The more I did, the easier it got.  Its a skill.  

I also learned the fine line between "playing the game" (telling them what they want to hear) and being honest.  

By being honest (such as when asked what are my outside hobbies, I honestly told them that I raced motorcycles at an amateur level (I'm female), most firms didn't know how to handle it, while one firm loved it.  I stayed with them for ten years and the partner who hired me will be a friend for life.

While all my other colleagues said "take that off your resume! It sound irresponsible or crazy!" I refused.  

My hiring partners (four of them) all told me later they had a meeting about who to hire, and they wanted someone who had outside interests, and the racing part didn't make me seem reckless to them, but that I was daring enough to handle shit that scared me (I was honest and told them yes, at times is very, very scary, especially the start of the race.)

You don't necessarily need to create a separate "you" to get a job.  Had I lied and not been "me", I would've gotten hired at firms with bullshit, asskissing policies and unwritten rules and I would've likely quit or been fired within the first week.

I'm also very introverted.  Practice those faux interviews so you get more and more comfortable so you can eventually ditch those beers.  Its very likely people can smell it on you or tell by your eyes or behavior that you either just drank, or something is off.  

Practice is the only way to get better.  I blundered my way through interviews at first and did not get hired.  Its ok - its a skill, but you must practice if you want to improve at it.I will say the one time someone that I had treated as a friend for years really when out of her way to burn me (spread lies about me in a small industry, the usual shit) I knew 100% she did it because she was grossly overweight, a slob, and unattractive (and all her own fault.)

She even told me, "I was trying to do everything I could to get people to dislike you and so you wouldn't show up at events anymore." (I forced her to admit why she did what she did.)

People who are deeply insecure and weak can be dangerous people if they are also jealous.  Of course, fit people burn their friends all the time.

Eating around her was horrible - she'd belch loudly while the rest of us were trying to eat, fold her pizza in half and scoop up ranch, and shit you not, drink an entire 2- liter of Dr Pepper and inhale nearly an entire large pizza.

I could not stand her or her excuses.

I suppose I just haven't met too many people like her.  I have met other women who were 40lbs overweight, and they were kind, lovely, caring, did their jobs well, could walk without any issues and had no insecurity or jealousy issue.  They are very valuable to me.  Yeah, he's full of shit. And has way too much time on his hands.Everyone has been told to 'write a book'.  I've been told to write a book based upon a certain experience I've been through.  You are not the special snowflake, most interesting man in the world, wannabe badass hero who fucks 8 hot models a day.  Live with it.And here is yet another cases of a person who is mentally deluded and a legend in his own mind. Please don't stop taking your meds, although it looks like you've already done that.I am not a psychologist and I have very little info on you, but have you tried being around fuzzy, nice animals? If you feel you cannot connect with humans, for whatever reason, why not start being around animals? 

And yes, talk to them. Cats and dogs who hang out with you are very relaxing, you know they will not judge you, and maybe your core can eventually come out.I've learned to not be surprised to simply ask a reasonable question on Reddit and get downvote-rage in response.  The group-think is ridiculous.  If you have a reasonable but unpopular (although unpopular b/c most of those who comment do not bother to meaningfully read the actual article and comprehend its significance) you will automatically get a downvote for asking a question.

Its the exact same behavior my far-right friends on Facebook engage in. They post some ridiculous, factually-incorrect meme that Obama is Hitler, is instituting sharia law, is a muslim blahblahblah. When I ask for a reliable source, they screw back, "who cares? they are bad people and torturing us!"  When I ask why we are on our 111th Benghazi investigation, run by the GOP, who have yet to come up with anything that could prove Hillary "sent these men to their deaths knowing terrorists would come in that day" or some other nonsense, they scream back, "she has blood on her hands, it was on her watch!"  If I reply, "then GW Bush has the blood of 3,000 people on his hand because 9/11 was on HIS watch, and on our soil, they just scream back it was Clinton's fault for not figuring it out earlier.Look at that - people downvoting you for saying a reasonable thing! They don't disagree with your statement, now its just personal.Thanks!I'll check it out.Jesus, your disease sounds like one straight out of hell.  I've had a few bad bladder infections in my life, and the pain is something unbearable. Along with that constant feeling you need to pee. And that doesn't even come close to what you must deal with.

Chronic pain is an evil thing which slowly but surely sucks your soul away and eats at your internal strength bit by bit, until you start mentally and physically falling apart.

Its often invisible, so you look "ok" on the outside. Most of us make an effort to look normal, act pleasant and not complain or keel over in pain in public.  We are thus seen as complainers or over-exaggerators.

Many docs do not believe our pain level.  Especially if we are young.

And if you have no diagnosis, its horrible, because you don't know what's wrong, cannot treat it and therefore have no end in sight.  If you do know what's wrong and your doc says it'll be like this for one year, you can mentally handle it.  

But when its been going on for years, and there is no end date, your brain begins to unlock dark, secret doors to your psyche that were never meant to be opened.

I was once a ballerina.  I did martial arts, and raced motorcyles.  I got myself into shape after a few years of being chubby and hating my body at about 26 and I looked and felt great.  I was doing well in my new career as an attorney that required 7 years of school.

Then once day I woke up with spine pain so bad I spent the next 5 years curled in a ball, heavily medicated, on the couch. Had to quit work, go on disability and file bankruptcy.  None of the radiation or surgeries helped (spinal tumors).

And then I hear about these whining people who are perfectly fucking healthy but alas, "I have no motivation.  I just don't want to do anything.  I was abused (yeah, so was I, but you are now an adult, so go get some help and stop using past abuse as an excuse to be lazy); I just can't seem to want to eat well, or study.  Why is it so hard?"

FUCK YOU GUYS. You have NO IDEA how lucky you are to not be in pain and to have your health.  And I am lucky to not have paralysis, only crippling chronic pain that never goes away.  Get OFF your lazy asses and DO SOMETHING.  Anxiety or can't afford a gym? Youtube is free, do your workouts at home.

You 'can't seem to study'? Fuck you. Its called paying your dues.  Not motivated in your classes? Tough shit. This is life. You think your're going to love your job and always be motivated?

These "lack of motivation" stories sound truly pathetic at times.  These are fully-grown adults who act like 14 year olds.  They refuse to pay their dues, do work they don't like or start out at the bottom.

Depression? Yeah, i also had it.  I was miserable as shit.  I got my face beat in by my mother on a regular basis and when that stopped at 14, she transferred to emotional abuse.

But I still did my college work.

Not popular? Don't fit in? Tough shit. Neither did I, and I know it hurts.  I dove into my studies instead and graduated with honors (something I never though I could achieve).

This is life. Not everything will go your way or be motivating. If you are that depressed or anxious, get some fucking help, you know its out there, even if you don't have money there are methods to get help.

Ok, rant done.

I'm so sorry for your pain. One year of pain is enough to drive you nuts beccause you never ever get a break.  I'm going on year 15.  Come visit us at ChronicPain if you ever need to rant or have questions.  You'll find an understanding audience.

My spine is a fucking disaster, and when people say, "I know JUST how you feel now! I pulled a muscle and for two entire weeks I couldn't play basketball" I want to wring their fucking necks. If they spent 2 days in my body they would be crying like little babies for the heaviest drugs they could get.

I truly hope they find out what is wrong with you and can fix it.  I had to fly to France to get my damn life saved, and I had been seen by some of the "best" docs in the US.Hive mentality, and they all think they are immune to such a thing."Battery, Aziz!"  Ok, I am going to hell for that.  At least it wasn't one of those horrible saw-off-head with blunt, small knife things.  It does help to know that.

Remember Carey Staynor? That sick fuck who murdered four women in that national forest? He admitted under questioning that he killed the final 12 year old girl he had hostage (after he raped her at gunpoint) by slashing her throat.  As she slowly bled out, naked and covered with just a blanket, she used the last of her strength to motion and to his gun and indicated for him to just mercy-shoot her.  Staynor told her the gun was never loaded.

That I read over 14 years ago and I will never forget it.It is not "literally wired to forget" any that.  The brain is designed to release certain endorphins and whatnot, but that doesn't mean it works for every single woman. Every body is different, any many women suffer such physical and emotional trauma from childbirth that they develop PTSD and never want children again.yes, she could walk; the idea of her even larger, oh holy god.

and she had the nonstop excuses. "I can't work out because I need someone to come with me."   (huh?)  "my boobs are too big for this shirt."  (no, my boobs are the same size and i'm petite; you have small boobs but you are just freaking huge". 

and her overall hatred for me when i would dress "sexy" and how dare men stare at me. 

i don't even want to imagine that as a larger thing, unable to walk.I am lucky I have zero neurological damage. I can walk, it just hurts like holy goddamn hell and unless I chew a heap of methadone first, I will have to sit down on the ground within a minute or two.

Yes, I get very angry at morbidly obese people who fucking complain to ME that their back or knees hurt.  Well, fucking lose weight!  "Oh, but you are SO LUCKY! Look how skinny you are!"

Bitch, I am no longer fit.  I am a skeleton and I have lost all my muscle mass because I am in so much pain I cannot eat (and I love to eat).

If you try for disability, you will most likely get rejected until you get your hearing before a judge. Its unfair, its a broke system and its sucks.  But if go that route, just be patient and when you do get it granted, you will get a very large backpayment dated from the date your disability started.

I know how you feel about your life being over. You feel as if you are a prisoner in your own body. You worked so hard to get to where you are in school, but now you are in so much pain you can barely focus at work, probably sleep like shit, and every little thing that was so normal before is now a huge, exhausting task.

Oh, the fucking hippy shit. "Here, this is a special healing crystal. Have you tried acupuncture? (Yes, I have tried everything in existence, and acupuncture does not make spinal tumors disappear you idiot).  But you look so good! If you were in real pain you'd look a lot worse."

For pain docs to take you seriously, you have to figure out really quickly when you walk in what they want to see.  A crying person, or a stable person who is in control? I can control my tears sometimes, and its not easy, and then they say, "well, you seem to be handling it pretty well, I don't see why you need a painkiller."

Next time i go in and make no effort to control what I am feeling inside and I'm bawling my eyes out, saying I am in agony and cannot live like this anymore. "Hmmm...clearly, you are depressed (no shit, fucker, you'd be depressed too) so how about before a painkiller you see a therapist?"

I'm so sorry your doc was such a dick.  I went through so fucking many of these assholes who treated me like a junkie.  

Glad you have your bf for support.  Shit like this is something nobody can understand unless they've been through it, so having someone who is loving and compassionate can really save you from jumping off the deep end.

Don't give up yet.  I had to fucking fly to another continent to get my life saved and now I'm still seeing new docs.  Keep seeing different docs, both for a diagnosis and pain management (insofar as that is possible) until you get docs that take you  your condition and your pain management seriously.First you have to apply for state disability, if its available in your state. If it is, you must exhaust that first. If it doesn't, or if you've already exhausted your state disability, then you apply for fed social security disability.

The amount you will get depends on a points system. Basically, how many years you've been paying into the system.  I get the max amount of 1850 a month, an amount which I could not live on in CA without renting a room and hoping my car didn't break. My meds alone are $300 a month.

Its a shit system for students or other people such as stay at home moms, who for whatever reason, could not work or have only been working for a short time.

After barely squeaking by and living with one crazyass housemate after another, I finally said fuck this shit, sold all my shit and took my dog and moved to Mexico.  Now I have a much better climate that works better for my pain, I can afford to rent a nice, comfortable place, I still have access to good docs (and its WAY cheaper here) and cost of living is cheaper.  Medicare doesn't cover anything out of the US, so I bought a special foreigner's policy that is pretty good.

I just hate this shit. I miss being healthy.  I miss not being in pain.  I miss sleeping well. I hate needing so many meds (but I sure am grateful I have access to them as I'd have commit suicide years ago without them.)

And I am REALLY sick of the nonstop whining over nothing we all see so often on Reddit.

"Wahhhh! I'm bored! I'm not motivated! Wahhh! I have OCD and I'm bipolar and ADHD/ADD and suffer from PTSD and my parents never told me they loved me (ok, maybe its all self-diagnosed but I read it on WebMD) and PCOS caused me to gain 100lbs and even if I eat 2 calories a day I gain weight so I can't lose weight and improve my back/knee pain! Wahhh!"

Fuck.Call your state Department of Insurance and file a complaint, and cc your isurance co.  

they are playing hardball. You never received the bill, so you have a reasonable explanation as to why you didn't hand it over on time. Its also not your fault but the provider's fault.

I would also recommend you contact the provider and the collection company and have them both write a full letter explaining the nonpayment was THEIR clerical (they like the word 'clerical') error because they never sent you a bill, and that it should not have gone to collections.  Say nicely if they do not, you will sue them, and the collection company for slander of your credit rating.

There are many things you can do, fear not. Just takes patience and perseverance.

you can also write to all the credit reporting agencies and explain this all (include photocopies of everything to support your story.)

Same thing happened to me. Ambulance co. never sent my bill even though I called and asked where it was (they said they simply didnt have me on file and could send me nothing.) Six months later I get a nasty collections letter notice, a threat to sue, and my student loan gets denied because now my once-stellar credit has an unpaid $600 bill.

I called up the same person at the ambulance co and ripped her a new asshole and said she better make it right because this is all HER MISTAKE.

She contacted the collection company, wrote a letter about "losing my file" and a clerical error that I had as proof (and save this letter for life) and I had to write nad forward that letter to all credit reporting agencies.

As for your insurance co, speak to someone higher up, say you handed them the bill upon YOUR receipt of the bill which was reasonable. Not your fault the provider sent out the bill late.  The collection company stands in the shoes of the provider once they buy the debt.

That means if the provider never sent you the bill (sending it to the wrong address means they did not send you the bill), and collector buys the debt and miraculously finds you, and then within 90 days of receipt of said bill you hand it to the insurance co, you DID hand it over to them on time.

Good luck.Yes.  Kidnapped, escaped when the kidnapper kidnapped a "new boy" as a replacement and rescued the new boy in doing so. Back then the laws were shit, so the asshole rapist/kidnapper got a whopping 7 years.  Few years after Steven Staynor had escaped, he was killed by a hit and run driver who never turned himself/herself in.

The a few years after that, their uncle (brother of their dad) was shot and murdered.

Then we all know about the Carey Staynor crimes.It truly swept me away and didn't feel like a reading assignment at all.  At the time I knew nothing about China. Its an easy read, but not easy on the emotions.Good luck! Never take "their word" as an answer. Demand a full copy of the policy itself if you lost yours. Those people who are denying you are fools they hire off the street who likely don't understand their own damn policy.  They will never work towards your interest, so you have to....motivate them.I had the 1980 version of it and I was 7 and filming my bro's birthday. It weight about 500lbs but dammit, I was going to keep the camera straight.You hurted his feelingses.My cat hated the dog we adopted.  He would torment her in horrible ways, such as casually walking by her food bowl (even though the cat hated the dried dog food) while my dog was trying to nap.  So my anxious dog could never sleep as she always had to get up and protect he bowl.

While she would protect her bowl, the cat would take a horrendous-smelling dump square in the middle of my dog's bed.Well, MY boyfriend can make symmetrical bowls of cold cereal.  Looking really fit and trim and strong. Great job and hope we get to see the next progress pix.  This is a great start. To see results in such a short time is motivating, and if you keep it up the results will start coming even faster.   Looking forward to a 6-month pic. It'll be a night and day difference.  This is lovely.  I wonder if any Americans, especially those in the South, will still be able to fit in their wedding clothes even 40 years later.This sculpture is what I would use to describe my spine pain (from tumors) to someone. Its an evil bastard that lives along my spine for the past 12 years and when he gets bored, he decides to torture me from the inside by squeezing my spine, ripped my muscles apart and crushing my throat.

I'm gonna use this as an example of my chronic pain, if you don't mind.  I'll just bookmark this page so you have all credit.  In all seriousness, its a pretty powerful representation of what it feels like physically and mentally.I just wrote how this represents my chronic pain, and then read your comment.  r/chronicpain would appreciate this art.  That happens.  When I lost 25lbs back in my mid-20s, I had all sorts of off days.  Even a short workout is better than no workout.  Within one year I went from chubby to really ripped and slim. I was fortunate that my husband also knew how to train me and change up my diet, but these days, there is so much free info available on the web. Cats are such conniving revenge artists! Who would think the cat would care since it dismissed that peasant food?  And then plot such deeply-thought out revenge to not just ruin the dog's day, but also try to get the dog in trouble.

Friend of mine had a cat that refused to eat dry food that wasn't "fresh".  She would yowl over a full bowl of kibble, refusing to eat it.  So my friend would dump the cat's bowl of food back into the bin, mix it up, and scoop out "fresh" dry food. The cat would then be all happy and eat it up.

Every single morning my friend had to go through that same act to get the cat to eat.Hubba hubba, you turned into a absolute hunk. Nice work!I would be so embarrassed for her.  "Shifts unexplainable (inexplicable?) by man." 

And then she cites herself as the author.  More cringe.

Is that her in the pic?Who could forget him? I shall never forget him. And I bet he is still hiding in his cave from unbearable shame.Bowls? HAHAHAH. My cat would only drink from cups. Human cups.  If we were sitting on the couch holding a cup, he'd crawl up to us, shove us out of the way and shove her head in. Unattended cups were always unsafe.

Bowls are for peasants, not good enough at all for His Highness.Congratulations on your adorable family member! I have a dalmation/pointer mix so it looks like someone threw a bucket of black paint on a white dog. She's now 13 and I love her so damn much.

Take pics and videos.  I wish I had taken more when she was younger.  Mine also has a heart on her "sleeve".  (Front leg).Great job! This is such a good start! It is truly amazing how its built into our genetic code to be attracted to a person who is fit, and for women, a man who looks like they can protect them.

The first pic I see a nice-looking guy. The last pic, I think DAMN COME HOME WITH ME AND LET ME MASSAGE YOU AND FEED YOU GRAPES.Amazing work! 80lbs is no little feat.  You look fitter, healthier and dare I say, happier!Oh. Oh that even hurt me. Damn. We need a scale diagram of the toilet size and shape and your height and length of your legs. Because on nearly any toilet, I can do my business with the soles of my feet on (yes, on as in my knees are pretty high) the same lid I am sitting on.   I'm short, and very flexible and never have I had shit go anywhere but in the toilet.

What went wrong here? You sure you didn't accidentally lift your buttocks off the toilet during that Krakatoa moment?There is nothing you can do except stay professional, and when you are calm, ask the people who made the hiring choice why you did not get the job.

It can be that they owed that girl or her family a favor. Or a connection is there. Or she has something over you that they preferred. Or that the hiring people are just dumbfucks.

This is a lesson in life that no job is guaranteed even if you are 10x more qualified than the other person.

But do ask.  They might have some insight to something that you weren't aware of about your own record. They might also just make up some vague, bullshit response such as "she was a better fit" and not want to go further.

And as much as that will hurt, don't push it. Be professional, be thankful you had the opportunity to apply and never burn a bridge no matter how unfair it may be.

That is the best you can do.Someone else already gave great advise, but its time to stop expecting someone else to lead you around and teach you how to be an adult.

You are legally an adult. Act like it. You have so many free resources at your fingertips. Like the internet.  

You NEED a job.  And there is the community college option when you are ready. You need to save, be frugal and move out.  

Don't expect anyone to do this for you "LOL" (that is not funny, btw). Figure it out.  

Many of us had to make the choice to live in an abusive or controlling household or take on debt.  I moved out at 17, went to community college and worked part time as a waitress and bank teller.  I lived with roommates.  That's called paying your dues.

Its your choice but you do HAVE a choice to take student loans if you want to go to school.  You've had I imagine at least one year since you've graduated high school. What have you been doing with your time and money?

Start educating yourself and stop playing teenager.I think he'd dump my ass if I made that demand.That sounds adorable.  A brave, confident cat can scare the shit out of a dog twice its size.  I'd be told to hire an attorney (I could represent him myself), get ripped blahblahblah FB, because he's a member of the evil patriarchy oppressing me and btw I should self-diagnose with PTSD, ADD, et al?A very nice girl from Sweden moved to Mexico for a few years. I met her here (I'm still in Mexico.)  I don't know how she adjusted.

Plus she would often comment how Mexicans in large cities would stare at her like she was some exotic creature.  As a beautiful blonde at 6'1, I told her yes, you are!Dammit, you two! Stop this talking and camaraderie immediately.  Such nonsense.Thank you for this. Everyone has different hair.  I have thick curly hair that is a monster 'fro if I don't chemically relax it. If I do not shampoo daily, it gets dry and flaky and my scalp gets itchy.My ex husband tried that shit on me. "I don't want you using deodorant anymore that has aluminum in it."  

Well, I sweat a lot and the fuck if I was going to give up my nice-smelling, feminine soft deodorant.   That "rock" thing didn't help.   I told him it was worth dying over.In other words, a dictator.
"Obama didn't shut down that prison! He forced Obamacare on us! Et al."The scent. The knowledge that another human has also been swept away into this world and you are about to make the same journey.

I love spending hours in used book stores.  You can find all sorts of treasures if you are patient.What a life.  I am jealous of that cat.That is so adorable! I used to do the same with my dog - lead her around and she'd always select a soft toy that she could shred, better yet if it made squeaks.

I then had a "toy box". A basket with a lightweight lid she could pop open with her snout.  Watching her snorfle through her toys then select one from the very bottom and then play with it  -- some of the fondest memories I have of her.  

Now she's not into toys. Just bones with marrow, walkies and sleeping.So cute! Amazing that they are born with all that strength and dexterity to stand up so soon.  I just want to hold this one and snuggle my face in him forever.These are incredible!  The one with the baby swans and mama checking to make sure everyone is buckled up...sigh. So much cuteness.I am so jealous! I want one of these cute fluff ball with huge eyes!I'd be hauling ass to that spot immediately. Fuck my job, there's a baby kangaroo in a diaper, for fuck's sake.He looks so content. Finally out of doggie jail. Nice, warm and soft bed, no nonstop barking. Nothing scary.  

He knows he is safe and loved.  The first night I adopted my dog, she hopped right on the bed, snuggled up to me and didn't move the entire night. I stayed awake in case she had to pee/poop or had intentions of mauling me in my sleep.Ok, shutting down the internet. This pic of sleeping baby bunnies in their warm nest is the last thought I want on my mind as I crawl into bed.You've obviously never seen her doing linear equations with her glasses and bowl of nice, warm chicken broth.Yes.  Not the Brazilian thing, another method that made it silky smooth for the first time in my life without needing a blowout or iron every morning.  And it's stayed this way for months.  It's so, so easy to deal with now.  Although I sort of miss the poof. I hope when it's my time, nobody treats my corpse indignantly either.  Few days ago I was explaining that in the US, once a person is convicted of an alleged crime, there are no more "allegations" and in the eyes of the law, you have, as a matter of fact, committed that crime. 


"You are a terrible attorney" someone responded.  "Why?" I said, "because I stated a fact of how the law works?"


"No, you are an idiot and a terrible attorney because of your total disprofessionalism."

He is studying to be a school teacher.They have no idea what toy the human wants them to pick unless the human trains or guides them.  We dog owners just love to pretend our dogs think human.This is absolutely, 100% bullshit.Exactly! Except my dog would drop the stick and give me the look of, "Yo', gonna help or just stand there filming me with your stupid phone?"Some humans love to anthropomorphize their dog.  I had a crazyass housemate who paid a "dog mind reader psychologist" to give her a phone interview explaining all the reasons why her dog was such an aggressive asshole.

I tried explaining to my housemate she simply needed to train her dog. Even bought her some training books.  

But it was easier for her to just pay some dog psychic a hundred bucks to do a phone analysis.  Did that dog-psychologist even meet the dog? My crazy housemate paid a woman she found online, who lived thousands of miles away.

It was really hard to keep a straight face while she told me the story. "And, the psychic DID ask me my address to ensure that she didn't hone in on another black lab on the same street and get the wrong dog! So I know I can trust her."

My housemate was 42 and batshit crazy, as I later discovered.Now that is adorable.  A playbox for kitties!  My cat never cared for toys.  Just cups of water.  And I always thought it would be cute for me to train my dog to put her toys away each night, but that never happened.

Its just so cute to see your beloved pet digging away with their snout or paw to find a specific toy they MUST have. My dog loved stuffed animals and would rip them to shred and gut the stuffing, and I'd re-stuff and sew them back up.

But somehow my dog knew not to dare do that with my stuffed animals that I kept on my bed.  When she wanted to play, she would poke her head around the wall, a little nervous and very shyly, with one of my teddy bears hanging gently from her mouth, and stare at me with the puppy eyes.

Or, she would take each of my stuffed animals and scatter them all throughout the hallway.  Never slobbered on them, always was respectful, whereas she'd happily decapitate her own and rip off the eyeballs and noses.I wanted straight, soft hair, and I am still so happy with the results.  I don't need to blowdry or iron it at all, and you only need to touch up new growth if you like.  They did a great job and its so much easier to work with. With this system, you don't re-do hair that was already treated.Border collie probably wanted to herd those toys but damn toys wouldn't move!Poor baby! But now he has a loving home and will get spoiled rotten!Fuck this shit! In first grade, my friend and I would chase our 'loverboys'.  If we caught them, we'd kiss them on the cheek.  The boys loved it! They always slowed down eventually so we could catch them. My 'loverboy' was this cute chubby kid named Daniel and I remember all four of us laughing and having such innocent fun.

I cannot imagine the emotional damage and terror I'd feel if the cop were brought in and my teacher and principal (who I loved and respected) told me I had done a bad thing.  I'd want to die from terror and shame.What a sick fuck of a parent. As a little girl in first grade, I chased boys I thought were cute and the boy I liked knew if he slowed down I could catch him and kiss him on the cheek. Which he did, and I did.   This was the early 80s, where nobody thought twice about this shit.

In 7th grade, I was stuck in ceramics at a table where one boy always called me a whore and a slut and said nearly every day that I fucked every boy in class.  I asked the teacher if I could change  tables because one boy was saying really horrible things that made me upset. The teacher yelled at me for exaggerating and told me to sit my ass back down.I wouldn't bite back that retort anymore.  Anyway, don't they take your guts out as it is? Can't you still be a donor then be embalmed if its so important to you that your corpse is seen?

I've only been to one open-casket funeral. Friend of mind hit a truck head-on while riding his motorcycle.  They had to use so much makeup on his face that it just did not look him him (or, like him in drag, with his head oddly-shaped.)  But if it gave his poor parents closure, then it was worth it.  Cannot imagine the hell of being a parent and burying your child.Think that's bad? My friend wanted a customized plate for his trailer that he used to haul his motorcycles to the track.

He wanted it to say: BIKEPLR (bike puller).

The DMV screwed up and delivered this plate:  BLKPLLR.

And this was in the south, right around the time of that awful James Byrd murder trial.  My friend sent the plate back.One older Chinese woman who was a "comfort woman" described in such poignant terms how nobody gave a damn of the hell she had gone through. 

"I am like a leaf on the ground, and everybody steps on me while nobody notices me."

I am paraphrasing but the 'left on the ground who get stepped on' were her words that I will never forget.I wish I had flouride in my water as a kid.  I could've avoided the 18 cavities I got. Didn't help that my mother (who had plenty of time and money) didn't take me to a dentist past the age of 8.Oh jesus.  Talking human ideas, in human language, to a DOG.  That dog psychologist is making heaps of money. At least your friend sees the "doctor" in person.  My ex-housemate did it all over the phone and internet.  I forgot how handsome French men are, especially in uniform. Time to move back to France.I can find out. It was definitely not the Brazilian thing.  It also took three times as long as it normally takes.  They didn't take my warnings seriously when I said my hair is strong as steel and it will take more than the regular amount of goop and time.

I am truly so happy.  I didn't want to have to blowdry or use an iron or any of that shit, or buy expensive shampoo or products.  I didn't believe them when they said I would only need to come in for new growth. Its been 6 months since my first round and only the new growth up top is curly (which makes me look pretty silly).  I just wash and condition my hair, let it dry naturally, use my fingers or a comb (if I'm really serious).

As for the "product" I've found that baby oil ( a little rubbed in on my palms) works best.  I'm sure I could make it look even better if I put in the time, but I really don't have the patience.  I'll find out what system it is and get back to you.Straight! Soft! Smooth!  I can run my fingers through it for the first time in my life.  I would've preferred a bit of a wave. You look fit and superb.  The bikini pics are the best (I'm a woman and I am not hitting on you) because we can really see the change in your physique and toning.   You even look taller. Great job!This guy is one bad motherfucker.  He just put that scene in T2 to shame. To ride a dual sport like that and have such shooting skill, and remain calm, DAMN.

Hey, anyone know if he's single?Its possible!!! Let me see if I can find it.  Believe me, I know the troubles of a 'fro.I love the 'fro! I have the same 'fro but recently relaxed it.  I kind of miss it now because you can do so many things with it.

As for your physique, fucking incredible.  You look stunning and fit. Show us another progress pic when you get ripped. Good job!You look so damn good. I love how you shaped your legs into athletic yet still feminine, strong legs. Everything looks incredible.  Great job.Why are you seeking validation from strangers on Reddit in such a manner? Your time would be better spent figuring out why you are so insistent on getting strangers to give you that validation.The Crow. The scene where they rape and kill the girl and the murder the guy. No. 

Any scene in Benji where animals are in danger.I did a very, very bad thing before that scene when watching the movie with my then-fiance.  I had read the book and knew what was coming.  My fiance had no idea.  I excused myself to the "bathroom" and came back 15 minutes later, figuring he could handle it fine.

I came back to see him - a 6'4 martial arts master - sobbing his eyes out. Asking me, "why didn't you warn me?"

I will never forgive myself for that.May I suggest a spinal tumor exploding in your spine if you every wish to cry from relentless physical pain?Now I am crying.That song can still bring me to tears.Ever take a motorcycle to a track? And rail around a curve with your knee perfectly planted on the ground, and the suspension is perfect, the weather is perfect, your bike is behaving perfectly and you feel confident and your timing is on and you keep whipping the bike left and right into each turn and it becomes like magic and you are one with your bike.

Then you pull back into the paddock when your session is over and you have the most glorious feel that stays with you for hours.  Its all adrenaline and endorphins.Damn, I didn't mean it in a mean way.  I had it happen to me, and given that it was the most painful thing ever - that ranked right up to my divorce - I was making a lighthearted joke.

I apologize for hurting your feelings, but how about you give someone the benefit of the doubt before saying such a thing?Ah well, life goes on.That is an excellent idea.  It hurts - oh, I've been there.  But you know in your heart you are qualified for that spot.  

There is so much that goes on behind the scenes that we don't see as employees.  I can already see noticeable changes you've made in just 2 months.  Great work!!One thing to keep in mind is all banks make it VERY clear that your receipt of them sending monthly statement is a "courtesy" and regardless of whether or not you get a statement in the mail (which seems to be your point - that since he changed the address that for months you were receiving no statements and therefore had no idea what he was doing) you are responsible to know your bill and pay it on time.

If he was an authorized user, sounds like you are SOL.  If your only defense is that had the bank not changed the address then you would've received monthly statements, and thus would've known about the charges - the bank will likely use that clause in your contract with them (the pamphlet that none of us read when we are issued the card) you will be SOL.

If he has money, you can sue him in small claims. But, sounds like he did all this because he has no money.

Still worth a shot at raising hell with the bank.  They might just reverse charges because they still fucked up by allowing him to change the address despite not having any permission to do so.

You were not expecting charges and thus didn't expect any bills so I would argue it would be reasonable for you not to call that cc every month asking if anything was due.  Their fuckup led to you being in the dark. Gonna be hard, but might as well try.I'm a woman, but thanks anyway.Share with us your wisdom or interesting life experiences, if you are up for it.   I'm serious.In other words, its the journey, not the destination.  Live in the present, not the future.That I can find a doctor that can find a way to fix my spine so I am not longer in daily, agonizing pain. I miss being healthy.You look great, and thank goodness you found a doctor who both diagnosed and treated you.  When I lost 25lbs and turned into a skeleton due to spinal tumors that were so painful I could not eat, I received similar treatment. "You starve yourself! You look like you just walked out of Birkenau!  You are SO LUCKY to be so skinny! Are you on a diet? You know, you really should eat more; you used to have the perfect ass and now you don't look good at all."

Every single comment came from another woman.  Most of these women were at least 40-100lbs overweight, and the ones who were just out of shape were very insecure of their body.  

My female housemates monitored my eating, knowing damn well I was just in pain and could barely move and it was not a eating disorder. They would push plates of food in my direction as a veiled attempt to "help" when I knew they were actually trying to make me gain weight to make themselves feel better.  

And I was nowhere as skinny as you.  Just very, very slim.  I hated those bitches interfering in my business. I was struggling to not die from those tumors or blow my brains out from the pain, but all they cared about were their own insecurities.

I am very happy to see you happy and healthy!  What a fucking bitch.  I had to tell some people (I replied to another one of your comments explaining how I wasn't able to eat due to being in severe pain from chronic spine tumors): "The issue of my weight or food intake is off limits.  Never mention it directly or indirectly again."

One girl pushed it. So I told her, "You know, you really could stand to lose that extra fat off your legs and you should get into weight lifting.  You'd look a lot better. Also, don't eat so much bread."

That shut her ass up.Still better than Yoko Ono and her screeching "art performance".  What was worse was all the applause and congratulations and accolades she received as if she just split a fucking atom or something.Reminds me of watching this old friend I'd occasional invite to my place. We'd all order pizza, and I was unable to not look away when she'd fold her pizza in half, scoop of a mound of ranch dressing, stuff it in her maw then guzzle from her 2 liter bottle of Dr Pepsi.

The catfish at least looks badass.I want a seal onesie.Nothing. But - a guy holding a kitten and being sweet to it - that'll make me wanna attack him.OH YES. I loved watching my husband fix shit.  Especially when he acted like it was no big deal. And the power tools? Or carrying something heavy for me without me asking, and he lifts those grocery bags from my arms as if they weight 10 ounces?

That's sexy as shit.very astute observation. when a man lsoes his temper over stupid shit, he becomes a child and unfuckable.Any guy - I don't care if he's 5 feet tall - if he can ride a dual sport like a pro, he becomes a SEXY BEAST.  A butt-ugly man with incredible motorcycle skill (example: Josh Hayes) becomes very sexy.  I mean actual skill not squidly shit.So snuggly!Wooot! Look at you! I'm also a midget (5'2) and we carry our weight in a very obviously manner when we gain/lose.  You look very healthy and fit! Great job on your discipline!Finally, a reasonable response. That is not a freakin' stripper pole, you nitwits.I LOVE this gif.  Her core and upper body strength and control is just amazing.&gt; People say these are supposed to be the best years of your life.

That's a heap of shit. I was told the same thing.  Those were the worst years of my life until I did some soul searching, and learned to be ok with who I was (and that is a learning process in myself) and to quit trying to mold myself into what society or my college though was cool, pretty or acceptable.

Once I stopped giving a fuck (but still was kind and considerate) things got way easier.  I worried less about what people thought and put more time into bettering myself.  I did much better in school, I got myself into shape, I got into hobbies that once scared me (motorcycle racing - not common for women) and during the lonely, painful times when I had no friends, instead of going out with people I did not connect with (which only made me feel more alone) I stayed at home with my cats, played online, or read some good books.

Your age is a tough one.  Very few people would say those years are the 'best' of their live.  Its a time of huge transition from kid who relies on adults to take care of them and tell them what to do ("go to this class at this hour") to suddenly you take care of yourself and you pick what you are gonna do, without having any idea if you're really gonna like it, and nobody is gonna force you to go. And if you don't do it, you either get fired from your job or kicked out of school.

Be kind to yourself.  You say you aren't living up to your potential. Do you even have standards that are reasonable? What do you evven mean by potential? A hardworking person can always work harder, but at what cost?

Or, are you not motivated and not accomplishing anything at all? If so, find out why. Getting off your ass and doing things you don't necessarily enjoy (borin job, boring classes) are all part of paying your dues. 

And try to have fun in the mean time. I assume you are healthy.  I WISH i took more advantage of that at your age.  I felt I could always start that ballet class that looked interesting "tomorrow".

Then one day at 26 I woke up with a spinal tumor and forget ballet, much less being able to walk w/o pain.

Do stuff now! Fun stuff! Even if at first you feel clumsy or lost! All beginners feel that way.  Go easy on yourself.  You do need to work hard and learn discipline and work ethic, whether its for school or a job. But take pride in that, even if your job is not what you thought it would be.

And don't just play vidoe games or fuck around during your free time.  Broaden yourself, do stuff you never thought you'd do, or even just talk a walk in a local park and marvel at nature that maybe for the past few years you haven't even been able to notice because you were so overwhelmed with other things going on.

It gets a lot better once you stop caring what others thing, develop a strong worth ethic that makes you proud, and start doing fun stuff that challenge you.  

Also, getting fit really helped me have more energy and the endorphins did wonders. Good luck!Is getting your own place a possibility in the future?

Is your mom the kind of person you can set boundaries with? (probably not, its seems).  Even so, its worth a try to have a calm, sit-down talk with her, where you respectfully tell her that while you appreciate being able to live with her, this is your child and she is not to speak about how you choose to bring up your child.

Not sure of your situation, but if your mom is the type to think "well, this is my house so I can berate you about your parenting if I want", then if you can, pay her rent.

If your goal is to save money to get the hell away from her, you might have to work very very very hard at learning to tune her yammering out. 

No matter what, congrats on getting custody!!That's very sweet.

And a hell of a lot better than the gift I gave my mom when I was 6. I really, really thought about something special and came up with a coupon book!

Example of coupons (written in child-like crayon):
"You can drink as much coffee as you want."

"You can take a nap today."

"You can sleep in late today."

"You can eat as much ice-cream as you want." (She always ate my ice-cream that I couldn't finish in one sitting.)

"You can get more fat if you want."

She put on a good show and acted like she really appreciated me giving her permission to be an adult.  Now I kind of understand why she hated my brother and me when we were little, although we really were good kids.HAHAHAHAHAHA oh, I'm sorry, I was truly not trying to be rude.Isn't that teacher missing a few little wars in there? Oh, what a cutie. The day I brought my dog home from adoption, it took us 20 minutes to go upstairs to my condo.  We did two steps at a time, then she sat, I sat, I assured her, took another two steps, etc.And this is why we chicks always have to do a situational awareness check before we bend down or bend over for any damn reason.  Wall around? Back up against wall.

Edit:  Oops.  I thought I was clicking on the link of a pic of a woman bending over to pick something up and five men are blatantly staring at her ass.  You're not ugly at all. Just unkept.  Clean up by shaving and getting a clean-cut haircut.  Wear clothes that compliment your body shape (you look sort of hidden in too-baggy clothing).

Also, working out does wonders for an overall fit and healthy look. I don't mean that only men with huge muscles are attractive, but fitness is appealing.

Do all that, and your handsomeness will come out!Go to a stylist.  Not Supercuts! No! Spend the money, go to a stylist/salon that understand's male facial shape and what haircuts work best.Its not just losing weight, but getting strong.  Anyone can lose weight, but what makes a man appealing is his level of fitness. I don't mean Ironman is required, but if you are simply skinny, well...big deal.  Pick up a sport you enjoy, and your body will love it, and so will your mind.Yep. If I were in his age group and saw him and he looked like that, I would think "smug, arrogant kid who thinks his shit doesn't stink."  Especially since you expect females should be giving you attention. Get off your ass and be friendly and make the effort.How about shower, clean up, put on some decent clothes and let's try this again.  Its hardly fair for you to ask our opinion if you haven't showered in 2 weeks. Looks way better without the hat.  It opens your face more.  The cut is perfect.  I'm not much a beard person, but you make it work. You are not ugly at all. 

I know its cliche, but what women really like is confidence.  Not arrogance, but confidence and a smile. Jesus, man, you want an honest opinion but either have a hoodie or shades on? Serious?You have a very handsome face that still looks quite childish underneath that extra bit of chub.  Whip yourself into shape and you will be a badass.  Your face will look more mature, more appealing, and the confidence will do wonders.Don't think you need braces at all.  You don't need perfect teeth to have a beautiful smile. Just keep doing what you are doing, get into great shape, and you will then see your lovely hair, skin and face and finally feel beautiful.You are not at all ugly, I think you just need a few more years to grow into your features.  You have very special eyes.  As for the hair: go to a stylist.  Not Supercuts, but a real salon who will study your facial shape, have you look through some magazines, and help pick out a style that will complement your features.

Also, if you want to lose the sort of child-like look, you gotta get into shape.  I don't mean IronMan Ripped, but get rid of the babyfat, get nice and lean, and that exercise alone will kick in the endorphins and make you feel really good about yourself.

Do that, give it 1 year, and you will be fighting women off with sticks.Your entire facial shape will change  once you lose weight and get into shape.  Trust me, I've been there.  I lost 30lbs and everything changed. I had a beautiful face shape I never knew existed as it was hidden under a layer of chub.

It will also inspire you to take a bit of extra time to style your hair nicely and wear flattering clothes.  I wear only eyeliner, nothing else, and will not spend more than 5 minutes on my hair, and buy most of my clothes at Forever 21 or Ross, but I manage to look very good for my job as a lawyer (and of course I could not buy business suits at Forever 21).

The best thing you can do is lose the weight. You have lovely features that will finally be visible.  Keep up the good work and don't rely on any excuses, cheat days, etc. and you can look completely different in six months. Imagine that - six months.No no no no no no no! 

You do NOT NEED a gym membership! In the mean time, work out at home. Millions of Youtube videos for FREE. Buy a yoga mat and do pilates/yoga.  Go for a run or brisk walk.

There is NO reason why you cannot be exercising without a gym membership. NONE!  Diet is the most important, but strength and exercise will speed up the entire process and help shape your body by creating muscle.  Muscle also burns fat, which means you will burn fat while you sleep.

Edit: And for god's sake, lose the HydroxyCrap whatever.  That is nothing but snake oil bullshit and a waste of money. Learn to change your lifestyle and eat whole, healthy foods, not bullshit pretend "health foods".Oops. This is embarrassing.  Clicked on the wrong link. This was meant for a pic of a woman bending over to retrieve something and five men staring at her ass.NOTHING wrong with your face. Its your weight that is making it appear distorted.  When you are that overweight, your facial structure completely disappears under the fat.

I lost 30lbs many years ago and it completely changed my face - well, it allowed my True bone structure to come out.

Until you get in shape and lose the weight, and get strong, fit and healthy, you will never like your face. You will be very surprised at what a healthy weight can do for your features.

Plus, you're only 16.  You will grow into your features. If you saw a pic of me at 16 compared to me at 23, you'd laugh your ass off at how awkward I looked in my younger years.I see a nice looking Paul Bettany in your future.  Just unclench that jaw a bit.Wow, night and day! I'd have crossed the street if I saw you on a dark night (not because you are "ugly" but because you look freakin angry and scary)

Now you look nice, handsome and approachable. This is such a miserable, awful, torturous way to die.  I went into opiate withdrawal due to a doctor fucking up royally, and you 100% are in terror of imminent death, and the suffering is so terrible I cannot adequately put it into words.  

All this guy needed was a hospital, an IV for fluids, some meds to sedate and calm him, and he would've live.  Instead he likely vomited violently, shit himself, lost all connection with reality, hallucinating demons and was in pain so horrible he wanted to plunge a knife in his heart.I went into precipitated methadone withdrawal when my dumbfuck pain management doctor injected me with an antagonist for breakthrough pain. 

Had I injected myself at home, I easily could've died from self harm or dehydration.  It is pure hell.  I lost all connection with reality, wanted to slash open my arm to show him my "blood was on fire", I could not stop banging my head against the wall, and you violently puke your guts out and want to rip off your clothes because you heat up so badly.This is my greatest fear.  I've been on prescription methadone for the past 12 years for severe spine pain. I carry my meds with me along with the script in case a cop searches me.  But they'd take away my meds if I got tossed in jail, and within 12 hours I'd start going into withdrawal hell. They would not give a shit, wouldn't call my doc, and would likely just let me die.  

I've been through methadone withdrawal due to a doctor's error, and I would not go through it again for $1 million.  That is how bad it was.Take him to an ER.  Sedate him.  IV with fluids.  Meds to counteract the withdrawal.  You have no idea what happens to the brain when you WD.  You lose all connection with reality and all control over bodily functions.  You sweat until you are soaked and shiver with chills that feel like your bones are snapping in two.  That doesn't even cover the physical pain.  That is pain like being set on fire both outside your body and inside your veins. Yes, that could be me.  I could get my prescription methadone taken away, my prescription that I carry with me taken away, my doctors not called, and I could easily die of dehydration or self harm. Happened to me once (not in jail, but in a doctor's office for 10 hours when he fucked up, sent me into withdrawal, got scared and refused to call the ambulance I begged for until I lost consciousness and all connection with reality.You sick, disgusting degenerate. Are you 14  years old?

I hope you realize you are getting the front page not because you are cool but because people are so stunned with how revoltingly nasty you are.OP thinks he's so damn bitchin' and all dudes can relate, because all men jerk it on their own fucking carpet and don't clean it up, right?

Look OP, you fucking degenerate neckbeard, its "TIFU", not, "For the past few years I've been a disgusting lazy fucking pig and jizzing on my own carpet because I am too fucking lazy to get a towel or clean it, HAR HAR HAR."

Fucking neckbeard.OP brought out the best in me by seeking karma points by making up some disgusting bullshit story pretending to beat the meat every night AND HE'S FUCKING FILTHY ok I shall calm down again.Shit, I'm a clean, fit, non-fat fuck slob of a woman and I know men like to jerk it, its all good and normal, but why is jerking it and being a degenerate slob something to BRAG ABOUT?Excuse me, you sound like you are similar to OP and see no problem with jizzing daily on your carpet for 2 goddamn years then advertising said behavior to the public because you think its...cool.I don't even want to picture that, but its too late. OP is a disgusting enough person to attempt just that thing then later write a "TIFU when I accidentally met my bitches on the corner with my own jizz in my neckbeard HAR HAR."It would be a terrible waste for you to need to go the ER because of OP's post and its responding comments.  Breathe nice and slow now...He prescribed me methadone every month for the past year.  I've been on the same dose (about 100mgs a day) for 12 years.  

I was having a horrible three week flareup and asked if he could give me anything so I could avoid a trip to the ER. He picks...NUBAIN! 

Which shut off my opiate receptors.  I dropped to the floor within 5 minutes of the injection.  Had I injected myself at home, I would've likely commit suicide or run into traffic (I do not say that to be dramatic, it was truly that horrific).  I was just too scared to inject myself.

Motherfucker hid me in his office until midnight, when I was able to stagger to my car and sleep in the back seat.  Refused to call and ambulance and until he realized he had given me an antagonist, kept accusing me of taking some other drugs and lying to him while I was fainting, screaming, having seizures, etc.I can only hope OP is 14. Then I would sort of understand.And there is no way to describe those shakes.  "Shakes" doesn't do it justice.   Its like  you have gigantic scorpions under your skin clawing at you, running up and down your body, yet connected to your spine.  I think those are actual demons.I am a good citizen, but I just get scared.  Right now I live in Mexico.  I bring my original script with me wherever I go.  But like in the US, you can get tossed in jail for even a less bullshit traffic infraction, they will steal your meds, not call your doctor, and you are fucked.

I had no idea methadone withdrawal was the worst as I've never experienced any other type of withdrawal.  I am dead serious when I say you could not pay me 500K to go through that again.  That was 8 hours of pure hell, and you are completely convinced you will die, which triggers all sort of primal fears and responses to survive.

Its so scary because people who have never been through it have no idea how terrifying and torturous it is.  And how can they? Its not anger, its just disgust.  And I think what's more disgusting is OP things the whole thing is funny.  Try and imagine me saying it calm, but serious, and with a sort of WTF smile on my face.  No anger. Just...yeuurggggg-feeling disgust.

And, disgust that OP sees this as a good way to get karma points.What about a box of tissues? Roll of toilet paper? Parents aren't dumb. They see, and smell, that growing crusty blob on the carpet that is a dick-level to the bed when OP is laying down.  And add a layer of mold growing on it?I just looked at your pic again.  You are really a nice looking man.  I am a 41 year old woman, for what its worth (and I've taken/take good care of myself).

I felt like a troll at your age.  What helped me was time, learning to love myself, and the biggest thing - be yourself.  I won't pretend to know you or your life situation, but I can just say, stay away from people that force you to pretend to be someone you're not.  Its better sometimes to be alone and lonely than to hang with people with whom you share no connection.

Also, exercise, and get involved in activities that you think you will like, especially if they are new you to.  It builds confidence, it distracts you from insecurities, it will help you meet people that share common interests, and exercise releases endorphins that we really need if we lead sedentary lives.

The hardest step is signing up for that first lesson for rock climbing, singing, guitar, swimming, lion taming, whatever the hell it is you decide to try.

The worst thing you can do for lack of confidence is to do nothing and hide.  I so wish I had done more when I was healthy (at 28 I woke up with a spinal tumor and that changed a lot of shit). 

I don't want to sound like a nag, but don't take your health for granted.  I sure did.  Go try all sort of new stuff.  Its ok to do that stuff alone until you meet people you can share it with.  Just do the stuff.  If you find you don't like some new thing after giving it a fair chance, then move on to something else.  The more stuff you do, the more confident you will become, and you will then realize you are a really handsome guy.SHIT YES!  And the yawning (although that doesn't hurt).  The RLS but at 90,000 rpms.  Your entire body wracked with spasms.  You squeeze your hands around your calf, for example, and try to "push" the spasm down and out of your body.  And it goes on for hours. You cannot sit still for longer than 4 seconds at a time.

Mine was so bad I was slamming my head and hangs against a tile floor without realizing (or caring, or feeling any pain from it) because it distracted my brain from the spasms.Methadone has a relatively long half-life, but if you are saturated with it, you can feel the beginning of withdrawal within 12 hours.  And in addition to the horrors you describe, there is this grim, horrible emotional feeling like your entire soul is being violated.  Like the world is coming to an end and you are being violated in every possible way.  Its hard to describe. You just feel the need to run, hide in a dark corner, and scream.  I think it because your opiate receptors are all shut off (in my case the doc injecting me with an antagonist blocked my receptors) so your body has none of your natural endorphins that make you feel decent and normal.

I have had those arguments before with some fuckers who argued that 'dieting and sugar withdrawal are just as bad as opiate withdrawal'.  

Yeah.  Because people going on a healthy diet vomit, hallucinate, scream uncontrollably, lose consciousness, rip off their clothes because they are both overheating then begging for a blanket because they are freezing, try to self harm, etc. when they cut out sugar.

Rough stuff to eat healthy. Its now a common thing for some people to referring to those headaches and mild irritability you get from cutting simple carbs as "withdrawal" or getting "triggered" because you have to eat, so eating essentially means "using". That's fair enough, tone often doesn't come through.  I was (still am) just so utterly revolted that OP is proud of his behavior and is happy to make it publicly available to the world.  Imagine his poor parents who know their kid is so gross he can't be bothered to clean up his own freakin' moldy jizz pile.

OP, if you are reading this, you are disgusting.  Do you waffle stomp too?Its only "strange" because its unusual. I assume you mean beachwear. Who cares what she wears under her clothes? If she likes it and is comfortable, why should it matter?  

For most women, it would be pretty tight (swim wear is made tight for a reason - so it doesn't fall off when we are in the water) but hey, if she likes it, who cares?I am sure she can decide for herself what's good for her vaginal health.  There is no hard and fast rule that bikinis are bad for vaginal health or will cause a yeast infection.  Those come from dampness, antibiotics, certain foods and other reasons. The amount of responses here that say its "strange" "weird" "bad for vaginal health" are completely fucked.

Who cares what this woman wears under her clothing?  She can decide if wearing bikinis is good for her vaginal health.  This sub is supposed to be open-minded but damn, when some woman does something to her own body that differs from the norm, or from what other women are accustomed to, people here lose their shit.

25 years ago thongs were seen as slutty or weird.  This woman OP is discussing is simply wearing a version of underwear that is tighter and thicker.  That's it. Under her clothes.  Where nobody can see.  She isn't complaining she MUST wear beachwear despite suffering from yeast infections.

What a judgmental crowd.  What a disappointment.You don't get it because its from a completely different culture that has part of it that has not progressed for hundreds of years.

Its not wasted to the parents.  They think the man will die off soon and leave the daughter a fortune and then she will have money, status and be free.

Of course to you and me is abhorrent and terrible and all that.  But we are looking at it from our western view.  Don't misunderstand.  I am not approving or justifying 9 year old girls getting raped and married off to disgusting old men.

But you forget its not our culture.You can't understand it because you are looking through it from the viewpoint of an advanced and western culture. You also don't understand the financial and other cultural benefits that the accrue to the family of the girl - if you studied that, it would make sense.  Still not fair and a repugnant practice to you and me, but from a non-emotional viewpoint, you could see why the family believes its worth it.

Also, they sell the girls and often their is an agreement that the girl does not move in with the man and no sex is had until she menstruates.that is the one thing the nurse kept telling me.  As long as I don't die of dehydration or from hurting myself, the withdrawal alone won't kill me. Although, you sure wish you were dead.Never do them.  For the first six months after my spinal tumor exploded, I played "tough girl" and refused all painkillers.  Which meant I spent 6 months crying my eyes out, puking and bent in half, planning my suicide.  How dumb was that? There are no trophies for being stupid and playing "strong" when you have severe, chronic pain.

If used correctly under guidance of a physician, it keeps people from committing suicide from pain and can drastically improve your qualify of life.  

If used for fun, you will fuck up your life one way or another.  Don't use opiates unless you absolutely must, and if you need them, always go through a doc you can count on.Unfortunately, while my doc was American, this occurred in Mexico. I spoke to a lawyer. There is no real medical board or oversight board.  And no such thing and pain and suffering in a civil suit (which would take years through a corrupt court anyway). My only real option was to file criminal charges, which would've likely worked, since he violated the law by refusing the ambulance and essentially hiding me, but as much as I want to kick him in the balls and smash his face in, I don't want to see him spent 2 years in a Mexican prison.Yep. Only do them if you are in severe pain.  And if so, take full advantage of them (responsibly, with a doctor, and without feeling guilty or "weak") to improve your quality of life and prevent committing suicide.  If you have an addictive type of personality, you need to be extra careful.  Even if you don't, you will still build a tolerance over time, which means you can't just stop all of a sudden.

And that is what makes it very scary.  If my doc gets sick or fucks up or decides to cancel my refill appointment and I run out (which can easily happen, as you can only get a refill script the day you run out), or if the pharmacy runs out of stock, you are fucked.  You then go to the ER because withdrawal has started, you bring all your medical records showing you are not a junkie and you use the opiates for pain management and your doc messed up, or pharmacy is out of stock, and beg for a morphine injection, just anyting to stop the withdrawal, and the fucking bastards roll their eyes, don't look at your records, see you sweating bullets because you are already in withdrawal, and say "you should've thought about that before you started taking drugs."

And that is the shit that makes you want to go home, pick up your shotgun, and blow everyone away who treats you like a junkie when you are just some poor sap who had the misfortune to get in a bad car crash, or get cancer or a tumor that exploded in your spine.  Every single day you are suffering and can barely move and are trying to just keep staying alive, and some asshole dismisses you like you are playing games.  That is the ultimate betrayal.

Edit: Thank you for the gold.  I hope whomever read this learns a few things:  first, legitimate pain patients who take prescription opiates are neither weak nor junkies, but people suffering from agonizing pain that you cannot see or perceive no matter how 'healthy' they look to you, so please do not for a  second assume they are faking their pain as we try very hard to look happy and normal in public; second, for those addicts or abusers that abuse prescription opiates, I know you have a problem, but fuck you.  Its abusers like you who raise the costs of my doc appointments, refills, make me drive to five separate pharmacies because they are all so scared of the DEA to fill legitimate scripts, make me take monthly blood tests to ensure the opiate is in my system and I'm not selling it (and I pay for those tests) and who make the laws so stringent that each monthly refill appointment turns into a 2-day nightmare of me running around town searching for a pharmacy that doesn't have some new draconian rules put into place because a non-pain patient has fucked it all up for me and the rest of us.What? Huh? Was she elderly? Disabled? Mentally disabled? I read this 27 years ago and it still haunts me.  I will never forget when he makes his decision regarding his dad and the forced march.  His last line in that chapter is burned in my mind forever, yet I only read it once.  That is how powerful a writer he is.I suppose to u/blinky64 the "Holucaust" is just too often talked about and we should be over it.I read it as an adult and was so enchanted.  It was such a different reading it compared to when I read it as a kid.Oh, now why'd you have to go and do that? I was just recovering.  Plus, I'm a woman so I can't really do what you are suggesting.Its there for life. He's likely wiping it with the same damp rag over and over again, gets bored and takes whack-off breaks into another corner of the carpet.Thanks for your kind words  -  it helps! Its all out of my system, but it was a very traumatizing event that I will never forget and now if there is the slightest delay in getting a refill, I go into a panic.  At least I lived, not like that poor guy in OP's post.  What a terrible way to go.He first checked out WebMd then drugs.com.  Not an actual pharmacology source (as in an on-line version of a Physician's Desk Reference.) He comes up with nubain. I'd never heard of it, and I didn't know a thing about agonists v antagonists.  He tells me, "we can try this, but nubain is an antagonist."  I say, "so what does that mean?" He says, "all it means is that at worst, the methadone already in your system may not work as well." I say, well, in that case its worth a try, I'll just take more methadone if that happens, right?"

He says right. He then asks when I last took methadone, I honestly tell him four hours ago. 

Then he injected me with 10mgs of nubain. That bastard left me screaming, sobbing, hallucinating, and losing consciousness on the floor while he literally shut the door and hid in his office, presumably doing research.  The first hour, he came out screaming that I lied and must've taken some other drugs.  Then he said I lied and never told him I didn't wait 12 hours in between methadone pills - which also proves he is an idiot.  Methadone half life is much longer than 12 hours, he prescribes me up to 4 pills a day (can he fucking count?) and he just obviously had no idea what he was doing.

He knew nubain was an opiate, he just slept through pharmacology 101 in med school and had no idea what would happen by mixing an agonist and antagonist.  OH fuck me.  I bet his mom could break his sheets in half if she was brave enoug to step in his room. Which probably stinks of sweat, mold and cum so badly that no female will ever set foot in there.that is because he was hallucinating and lost all connection with reality.  i've been in withdrawal from methadone (due to doctor error).  he later told me in between bashing my head and hands repeatedly on the floor, i kept telling him i was going to "kill you motherfucker, for doing this to me, you evil evil motherfucker".

you can't "refuse" treatment if you are in such medical distress that you've lost all ability to be coherent.Jesus, are you kidding? What could they have done? You take the patient who is obviously in distress to an ER.  You administer fluids from an IV. You give sedatives to calm him down. You give him whatever drug or opiate is needed so he can slowly taper off. Its not rocket science.  EMTs, nurses and first responders know this.There are plenty of LEGAL drugs you give to someone suffering withdrawal and who is in severe medical distress.  This is not some secret medical fact but well known among even EMTs, nurses and non MDs. Even a mild sedative and IV with fluids may have saved him.Its not a "dick" statement. Its a hopelessly stupid and ignorant statement.  I'm on prescription methadone and i do not abuse it. But if I go into precipitated withdrawal and get no help, I could easily die the same way.  Dehydration, self-harm, etc.  You do not need to die from withdrawal if you are tapered off slowly and carefully, under supervision of a doc.Yes. That is a moral choice we have made as a society. And its not like they get top  quality care.  They get bottom of the barrel care as it is.  So if a smoker gets lung cancer while locked up, do you let him rot and die, or do you treat him?  Or what about me? I take prescription methadone for legitimate chronic, severe pain. I don't abuse my meds.  If I suddenly got tossed in jail and my meds were taken away, you'd be cool with me dying of withdrawal?  Its not like I keep my medical records on my person.  The police don't give a fuck. You think they'd call my doctor to confirm I'm not a junkie but a legit pain patient?Hey, remember when Ramona inadvertently called Beezus "Pizza Face?"I am 41. I still feel guilty when in 5th grade we had a worker in the cafeteria we really connected with. So...one day one kid called her "pizza face" for obvious reasons. We all were shocked, quiet, stunned.  Then she laughed it off. Yay! That meant she liked it! So every single day, when she took our dollar bill, every single one of us said quite loudly, "Hi, Pizza Face!" with a huge smile!  

Until the day she wasn't smiling and said, "Don't call me that anymore."  

I still cringe.  Pretty much. I used to race motorcycles. This was before my spine got fucked and I needed pain killers.  When people would asked why I was so "stupid to do such a dangerous thing" I said, "I suppose its like a drug.  You feel so incredible when you are on the track.  But off the track you feel like shit. It costs a fortune to prep your bike and pay entry fees, and you go into a mild depression in between race weekends because life seems so boring with that adrenaline rush, and the rate of return is horrible - you can feel the most exhilarating feeling of your life, the happiest you've known, but in the back of your mind you know you are blowing thousands of dollars, and eventually you wll crash, your bike will be totaled and you've fucked up your body and everything hurts very badly."Depends. She's no longer a virgin. No longer a prize.I grew up in the 80s.  I kinda miss Picky-Picky.  Life was so much more simple then.Not me, but my husband. He was the only non-family employee of a thankless job involving international import and sales. He also handled their entire computer system. If it involved a computer, he did it. He also created and ran their web page. He got paid shit, and would often have to step over the owner's sleeping body to access the fax machine.  Or, wake up the owner's daughter who "worked" there but usually just napped under a table.

When he gave his 2 weeks' notice, the owner's wife gave him a tape recorder and asked him to record "how to run the business, all the computer stuff, and everything else he did."

He just burst out laughing.  After he left, he was told there was no more "wireless" anything, and the owner had a million cords running up and down the stairs.  Business went under in six months, but not before 4 separate customers sued the owner.What guy wouldn't love Easy A? You get to see the hot Emma Stone pretend to be a hooker. And sing in that sexy outfit.I would say that is my husband's favorite chick flick as well. It left a mark on my heart that will never go away.I count about four miracles.May I suggest leg warmers? Not the cheesy 80s version, but some you can buy online or at a dance store.  Especially the ones that have a hole for your heel so you can pull them over your feet (with your toes exposed) with or without socks.  So much body heat can be retained by a comfy pair of leg warmers, and if her legs swell, the legs warmers will be loose enough not to constrict or be uncomfortable.  

Also, I used to wear those finger-less gloves indoors, so I was free to type and handle stuff.  I had a pair that went nearl up to my elbows and that shit kept me nice and warm.I'll take the blue one on the left, thank you.I did not think it was possible to hate these motherfuckers more than I already do.

I am still fighting a $45 overcharge for when I canceled my service FOUR FUCKING YEARS LATER, despite having a letter from Comcast admitting they fucked up and it should be a credit.  Fucking collections still contact me.I assure you (and I looked at your pic again) your head is not disproportionate to your body.  I think you've become so focused and convinced that is is, that you can no longer think otherwise.  If some friend or dipshit at school has been teasing you about it, its not because its True, but because that person knows how to get a rise out of you.

Also, once you get in shape, your facial structure will change.  Obviously your bones won't change, but the leanness will allow your True structure to be seen.  As a 5'3 woman, when I lost 30lbs (most of it held in my ass) my face changed drastically.  Even just a 10lb weight loss can really change your look.  A small layer of extra chub around your face will disappear, and you will look more chiseled, more mature, and more masculine, especially since you are now at that transition from teenager into young man/adult. 

Once your body is fit and you look clearly fit from the outside (meaning if you don't wear baggy clothes your fitness will be noticeable) your body will appear larger.  You don't need crazy muscles for that.  Just a nice, strong leanness with nicely sculpted muscles can do wonders for making your body look more proportionate.

I assure you, in the next few years you will grow into your confidence and features.  I also recommend you visit a salon and get a good stylist that can give you a haircut that will complement your face.  I had some really bad haircuts (ie - no style at all) until I put in some effort. The right cut can make you look foolish (think George Clooney with a Caesar haircut) or very handsome and put together.  

Better fitting clothes.   I don't mean fancy clothes or tight tshirts, just clothes that match your body lines. If you wear a t-shirt that is too big, it will make your body look droopy. For example, look at the seam of your tshirt for the sleeve.  If that seam is lower than your shoulder and on your upper arm, that shirt is too big.  You will have to put in some time to find the right cut for you.  Certain brands of clothing will have cuts that will never work for you,while others will have the right cut.

Give us an update in 6 months! I promise your head is not large, and if someone is giving you shit about it, its only because they know its an easy and vulnerable way to hurt you. Which is a shitty thing to do.I think SI joint pain is one of the worst agonies out there.  Think of where all your weight goes when you sit and stand - your spine and pelvis.   I had it bad for about  3 months until a series of injections got it under control.  I felt like my pelvis had been crushed by a compactor.  It is fucking AGONY.Do you live in the Highlands? Aren't there some old pagan rituals that involve bones and teeth and little piles of stones and certain plants or twigs?I truly hope you are not just messing with me, giggling with your friends and laughing behind your computer screen...You are not ugly at all.  But you look like a "yo, dude, bro, let's smoke a bowl" and depending on your target audience, some women are not into that. They want a man. Not a boy.

Clean up, shave, trim your beard, get a haircut, get some nicer clothes, look well put-together.  No pix on Tinder in a tank and ski hat. I'm a woman, and if  I put a pic of me right when I step out of bed, you can bet nobody would match me. They'd run in the opposite direction.

Also, whip yourself into shape if you want more responses.  Its just natural for humans to be attracted to someone who is fit and strong and healthy.If you truly want that scruffy look, then don't change it just to get matches on Tinder.  Most of that stuff goes nowhere anyway.  If you like your look, be True to yourself and keep your look, and meet women in different ways.

Tinder is tough - like another poster said, women will spend a nanosecond on a single pic and we are usually bombarded with messages from guys every single day and we get bored, tired with the process, and tend to reply to the pic that jumps out.  That requires that pic to be pretty damn spectacular.That 10lb difference made a huge change - now your lovely facial structure is apparent.  You look wonderful.that is horrible...so either have a face that sags on one side or be in agony for life?This is fucking funny.  You picked the perfect face for the guy. I hope to use the cactus line myself one day.I assure you, you are completely proportional.  Is someone you know giving you a hard time? I am not saying any of this to be nice.  I am saying you are proportional and the size of your head is normal because, based on the pix you've posted, it looks normal.  

I suppose the only way I could give a better answer would be if I had a full-body pic without the baggy clothes.  As in shorts and a normal fitting tshirt. But even then, I already know I wouldn't notice anything out of proportion.

Devote six months to the gym, and do it right, with a trainer or educate yourself with a good book or off the web so you don't waste your time and effort.  Change up your diet. No cheating. I read your other post that you "like lost 20lbs in two weeks by drinking protein shakes" and you "don't need the My Fitness Pal app."

Ok, that 20lb loss is bullshit and you know it. Only people who are 500lbs and stop eating can lose 20lbs in one week, and you are not 500lbs.  Use the app or figure out a away to eat right.  But don't try and bullshit yourself because the only person that will pay the price is you.That just made me happy. Seeing the smile on her face when baby kitten snuggles is wonderful.Not sure how old you are, but one day, soon, you can move out, far away, and if you want you never have to speak to her again. But start planning now. You will need money, and you will want an education (unless you have a skilled trade which will support you). Study hard, do as well as you can, because if you are 18 and realize you can't support yourself because the cost of living is so high and you are only qualified to work as a grocery bagger, and thus still stuck at home, but as an adult, life will be fucking miserable.

I moved out at 17.  Earliest I could, and while it wasn't easy and I had to live in dumps, or with shitty roommates, or work two jobs, it was completely worth it.I remember clearly driving back after my 2nd ever visit with a therapist.  I was thinking how I was going to cancel my next appointment.  I had already told her everything there was to tell.  What more could we possibly have to talk about? We covered it all.  How else could it help? I already said everything there was to say.

Boy, was I so dead wrong! I needed another 18 months of getting shit out that I didn't even realize was there, because I was so accustomed to it being a part of my life.  After 18 months, hours of talking, and many more hours of thinking and soul searching on my own, I made life changes for the better.  I realized I was allowing toxic family to stay in my life, I had to take responsibility for allowing certain shit to happen and to take action to better myself.

Now I laugh when I look back and think that after a mere 2 visits, I was so convinced there was just nothing more to talk about.  And I'm a woman.  And women are usually not shy about talking about things that bother us.What happened? Did you blow your money on frivolous shit and now you can't afford basic life necessities? But....you "have no idea how to get out of it?" Yes, you know how to get out of it, as you just admitted you keep doing something you know you should not be doing (unless your problem is something else)

Please, do not ask people for money if the only reason you need money is your failure to act like a responsible adult.  You created this, don't burden other people who budget and make their own sacrifices to avoid asking their own friends for money.

If you are old enough to have a job, drive, have a car, etc., then you are too old for this shit.  Your attitude appears to be that you "can't get out of it" but you and I know that that is bullshit.  You can change, you just dont' care enough to change, and so far you haven't starved or gotten evicted or anything like that because your friends keep bailing you out.

Youth is no excuse.  If you can't figure the obvious out on your own (ie: you do not spend more than you make, and you do not spend money on shit you don't need when you have bills to pay) then take a freakin' class.  Stop asking your friends for money.  That is shameful.

Unless...I am completely wrong about why you have no money despite having a job?Eat Ramen.  Take the bus.  Stop blaming that you are "still young" (that is a heap of shit and you know it).  Get your shit together and stop finding excuses.This person is hopeless. Its "weird" to go to food banks? OP sounds terribly self-entitled and shameless.  If OP has no problem with falling back on excuses of youth or "I am still learning" then OP knows damn well what needs to be done if OP is posting here that there is a repeating problem.  

OP: being fiscally responsible is expected. Its what you do as a responsible person.  You don't get points for doing the required.  That is like a boyfriend saying he is a good boyfriend because he doesn't hit his girlfriend. I am so sorry.  If you wish, visit us at chronicpain.  I went 5 years without a diagnosis and it was pure hell.  I was on the couch, drugged up, had to quit work, lost so much, for so long.  When you do not have a diagnosis, you do not know what the problem is, and you cannot treat it.  You also therefore have no 'end date' in sight.  You have no idea if this will get worse, stay the same or improve. 

And in the meantime, you are suffering tremendously.

You need to keep fighting. I know you are so tired, do not have the energy to fight, to see 20 different doctor and have them judge you the minute you walk in the door or dismiss your suffering.  

But you are your only advocate.  It helps if you have a friend or family member that can come with you do Dr appts.  I had my husband come so the docs would stop with the bullshit that I was "exaggerating" my back pain.  Turned out I had a fucking spinal tumor that exploded in my back and I would've been paralyzed or died had I not fought for a diagnosis.

I know you miss your life.   The way you describe things it sounds like something is very, very wrong.  Have you seen different specialists? GPs will be useless at this point.

You have to keep fighting if you want to live.  Believe me, I have been there, and it is fucking horrible.  It is a nightmare that never, ever ends until you find out what is wrong and if there is a way to fix it.Actually, it can go off your record.  Depending on your jurisdiction, if you keep your nose clean and stay out of trouble for a certain amount of time, you can petition the court to wipe your record clean.

It is nowhere as bad as you believe it is. And I thought my parents were selfish for forgetting my birthdays when I was younger.  To fucking send you holiday or birthday cards and ask for money??? No wonder you need a drink.  I hope you don't give her a dime ever again under these circumstances.Or, people tell you how 'brave' and 'inspiring' you are.  Doesn't that make you feel great? And awesome, and brave and badass?

People say such stupid shit in some twisted effort to be kind when you never asked for them to say shit in the first place.  And yeah, why do people who get a catastrophic injury suddenly get hit with expectations to 'live life to the fullest' and try as hard as you can in every way possible and all that shit?

Why can't you continue to be you? The person you are? Changed, of course, with such an injury, but still you?

Most people have no clue what paralysis, much less quadriplegia, is like.  Its not simply an inability to walk.  Its a myriad of health problems and it costs a fucking fortune.  All the medical care, health aids, adaptive equipment, and time spent doing things that non-injured people can do in ten minutes without thinking twice.

I am sure you've already discovered these two forums (Apparalyzed and Care Cure Forum) but I am putting this out there just in case you have not.  

I cannot pretend to understand what you are going through, but you have my empathy in that people say such stupid shit and have these ridiculous expectations, and offer up empty platitudes that are supposed to inspire you to run off and create something to win a Nobel Prize.I have permanent, agonizing horrible miserable spine pain and nerve issues but I do not have any neurological or mobility issues, so I will not even pretend to understand your frustration.

You know how many times my doctors told me "you should write a book' when I'm in for another pain management appointment, sobbing my fucking eyes out because I am in so much pain I want to commit suicide?

Write a book? Fucking for real? Why? Who the fuck is going to want to read about some 1st world girl who got an ouchie and has access to powerful opiates and a comfy mattress? There is no fucking happy ending, no new medical discovery to which I contributed.  Write a book so maybe one person will read it and think "that god I'm not fucked up and I have my health".  

And it always comes from a doctor who is completely healthy and has never, ever experienced any type of chronic pain or catastrophic illness or injury.There's no way to say this without sounding condescending.  I am certainly not trying to be mean.  I remember myself at 15.

There is so, so much you don't know.  So much about life, the world, your own soul that you don't know.  You think you have it all figured out and that you know what will or can happen, or the greatest expectancy at each numerically-convenient age group.

Your knowledge barely scratches the surface.  This is one thing you will learn as you get older:  the more you learn and experience, the more you realize how little you know.

You sound like a typical 15 year old and I know you do not feel typical. You are far too inexperienced to pontificate your conclusive facts on what people can get out of life without sounding like a typical teenager going through some growing pains.

This is all normal. Its just sad that you are already limiting yourself and convincing yourself that life is destined to be miserable, particularly as it appears that you live in a first world country where you can do so, so much and live such a fun life if you just put in the effort.

Life will be boring, and you will spend your 20s getting drunk and wasting money gambling, but only if you choose to do that, and in that case, your misery will be entirely self-created and imposed.You don't even need to wait until you are 18 to have fun.  Sure, some things are not legal, but so what?  Millions of other things, activities, etc are still accessible.  And, once you turn 18, the repercussions for fucking up are a LOT worse than fucking up as a minor (I speak from personal experience.)

Why wait to really live until you are 18? What's holding you back? You don't need a heap of money, or a car, or your own place to still get something special out of life right now.  

Once you turn 18, you will look back and wish you had a better attitude and took the initiative to try new things and just get out there.

You never, ever know what tomorrow will bring.  I thought I'd be healthy forever, so I put off some things because I was busy with work.  Well, one day I woke up with a really bad spine disease, and I was only about 25, and that really fucked things up.  I'm not saying live every day like its your last (because that is bullshit) but to just...live.  Have fun. Do stuff.Yes.  I hated myself so much I refused to look at mirrors or at my reflection in store windows when walking down the street.  I felt I was a revolting troll that made people just sick to look at me when I passed by them. I felt socially unacceptable with nothing to contribute.  I felt everyone secretly disliked me and people just tolerated me to be nice.

The sadness ate at my soul until it reached my heart and started gnawing there as well.

That is depression.  You need help.  Don't try and go at this alone when there is so much help out there and medications that can assist in you feeling good.  

You deserve to love yourself, feel happy and confident and enjoy life.In your after pic, I see a fit, handsome young man. I see no evidence that you lost 100lbs. Now, I realize that skin will stretch and you may have stretch marks.

It seems like you made the physical change (which is impressive and really something to be proud of, as it took a lot of discipline and strength) but your mind is still stuck in the 300lbs region.  And, its a huge blow because when you were 300lbs, you probably felt that all your problems would be solved if you were just a healthy weight.

Then you worked hard, lost all that weight, but you don't really feel that much better. 

it sound cliche, but please get some outside help.  I lost 30lbs, got the body I wanted, but became even more depressed.  I had reached all the goals I had set out for (lost weight, got a great job in my career post-grad school, got marred to an incredible man) and I was fucking miserable as ever.

I got help, took about 18 months of weekly therapy and a lot of soul searching and realization, and hard work in facing painful memories, but I got past it. And now I have no regrets. I didn't have the great kid experience like some kids have, but so what? Its made me very strong, resilient, compassionate to others and part of who I am today.  And, most kids on the planet have fucked up childhoods in one way or another. We are just brainwashed by Miller Lite commercials and the media to believe that life is perfect for everyone but us.

Please get help.  You've worked so hard to get healthy, but are so depressed you are unable to appreciate or enjoy the fruits of your labor.Its very rational - for years you were overweight and stood out, and ou knew people were thinking things, if not outright saying it to your face.  They made you feel sub-human (at least that was how I felt when people said shit about my weight).

Now the weight is gone, but your mindset is the same.  You are not able to put your brain on a "diet".  The mental aspect of this drastic change/improvement to your body is not insignificant.  Its understandable your brain, self confidence and sense of who you are has not yet caught up to your physical self.  Its much deeper than that.Can I ask how old you are?  Because finding that special someone doesn't always come early in life.  Sometimes it comes later - and there is nothing wrong with that.

If you are tired of dating, then take a break.  I met my husband the day I hated all men (irrational, I know) and was jaded from shitty date after shitty date.  I was in a foulass mood that day and I was actually quite rude to him as I was convinced he was just another lying asshole, but I was so wrong.  He is a wonderful, incredible man.

It is ok to be single.  It may be lonely and boring at times, but you have to first be ok and be able to be happy single if you ever want to have a healthy relationship with an SO.  I know its cliche, but its True.  Try and keep occupied, try new activities, read, whatever it takes to stave off boredom and loneliness. Try new and challenging things (and you will meet a lot of people that way as well).  Take up a sport.

Having a boyfriend will not magically make you feel better. Once the honeymoon period is over you may wish you were single again, as any relationship will come with its own baggage and drama.I also think that you are not as "ugly" as you believe you are.  When we are so focused on a part of our body or face we do not like, we become mildly obsessed.  It is always on our minds. Last thought before we fall asleep, first thought upon waking.  

Now, I won't try to convince you that you are a certain level of attractiveness because its all subjective and you feel the way you do.  I can say that you can still find people, friends and love who care about you for you.  It weeds out the people that approach attractive people for the sole reason that the person is attractive.   It instead leads to relationships that are much deeper.

I'm not saying that beautiful people only have shallow relationships, and unattractive people always get deep relationships.   Life is rough, and people can be fucking assholes.   Best you can do for yourself is to keep active, keep busy doing things that make you happy, never change for anyone, and be around people that make you feel good.  I was alone (socially and romantically) for a long time and fuck, it sucked.  It was grad school in Los Angeles where it seemed like a requirement to be beautiful to have the right to exist in the city.  As much as it sucked, I found that it was better being alone with my pets on a Friday night than to pretend to be someone I was not just for the purpose of having social interaction.Are you in pain? If so, I again suggest you check out chronicpain. You can vent, ask questions, etc.

Have you seen specialists?  Not general practitioners, but actual specialists? I had to see over 35 separate motherfuckers who dismissed me as having "mental problems" for about 4 years until someone finally took me seriously.  Had I not fought, I would've died.  

Its so hard to fight when you are sick.  When you are chronically sick, that is when you are least able to fight!  Then you realize the doctors generally do not care if your case is not obvious. If it requires them to go out of their way, talk to colleagues, do some research after you leave their office, they are too fucking lazy to do it. They try to figure it out during your 15 minute appointment, and if they see nothing, then they say "nothing is wrong."  

NO, asshole, something IS very wrong, the problem is you just don't know so instead of admitting you don't know (which is perfectly ok, just means we need to order tests and see more specialists) your goddamn ego insists you blame the patient for overreacting or some shit.

(As you can see, I am still quite a bit bitter at the way I was treated).

Are you in the US? Europe? Some other place?  The way to advocate is to research your symptoms, to learn how to stand up for yourself and insist the doc does more than simply say "I don't know". They should either refer you to someone who does know or order tests that can help.  You must learn how to politely, but firmly, refuse to let them intimidate you. When the doc starts heading for the door as some signal that your appointment is over, yet you have no new answers, that is when you stop them and say hey, no, we are not done here, where do we go from here?

It also means you stop seeing a doc once you feel he is not helping you, taking you seriously or is wasting your time.  

Do you have anyone that can help? I did hours of research online, which actually helped docs agree with my diagnosis.  You will have to do the same.  It shouldn't be that way, but it is.  And I don't mean to scare you, but it sounds like your health is only getting worse.  You have some very alarming symptoms that are not fixing themselves.  There are numerous diagnostic tests available beyond simple MRIs and blood tests.  

I wont pretend to be a doc, but I do know that unless you educate yourself on the various possibilities and tests that can be done, and FIGHT for these tests, nobody will help.  It sucks, I know.  Please feel free to vent to me anytime you want.Ok, you had kids you didn't want, but you had them.  So stop whining about that, be a good dad, and man up.  You chose to have them, maybe they were not planned, but you always know kids are a possibility when having sex.  This "I caved" excuse is a bunch of bullshit.  You are putting all the blame on her for having kids.  It takes two to have kids, and I sure as shit hope you aren't dumping your resentment for your lifestyle on your kids.

As for your wife, I can understand why you are so unhappy.  You're in a shit relationship with a person who appears to emotionally manipulate you. It sounds like this relationship broke a long time ago, and for some time you've been living with a 'roommate' that you do not particularly like.

Get a divorce if you want out.  Do not dump your kids.  They are innocent.  Stop complaining that you were somehow pressured into it.  They are there, doesn't matter anymore how they got there.  

But you do not have to stay married.  Nobody is holding a gun to your head and forcing you to stay with her.  Divorces are sad, heartbreaking ugly and unpleasant, but if you want your life to improve, you have to be strong and take that step.

It sounds like this marriage is doomed. If you have that affair, it will only make the divorce that much worse, all for a few hours of feeling good.  It will be thrown in your face forever. You most likely WILL be caught.

Just man up and get a divorce.  I'm sorry you got hurt.  It will get better.  But please stop with the bullshit. Nobody "forced you into falling for him" (those are your words).  Nobody "made you put down your guard" (also your words).

You had a relationship that didn't work. Maybe he was dishonest or an asshole about it, maybe not, but that isn't the point. The point is that nobody put a gun to your head and forced you to 'drop your guard' or 'fall for him'.  

You chose to put down your guard and allowed yourself to fall for him, which can be a wonderful and lovely thing when it works.  This didn't work.  It hurts, yes. But, this will likely happen again in life.  You will get over it, as you say, and find someone you really can connect with, and will move on.

But you have to take responsibility that nobody forced you to fall for him.  It was just the natural progression once you made the choice to give him a chance and date him.  You are making it sound like he victimized you in some way, and if you keep up that mindset, you will always consider yourself the victim and will forever be unhappy, as you won't be able to accept that sometimes, shit just doesn't work out between people and there is nobody to blame.It was my husband.  I was in the ER for yet another episode of a major flareup for agonizing spine pain.  We had smoked quit a bit of weed beforehand.  I had smoked hoping to lower the pain, he had smoked because weed.  

I wasn't high and was actually crying, sobbing that I was again suicidal and couldn't live with this chronic agony anymore.  My husband burst into laughter.  The doctor stared at him.  Husband says, "I'm sorry, really" then snorts in this futile effort to restrain himself and again explodes and literally is giggling so damn hard he turns red, tears running down his face and he crawls down to the floor laughing.  

I was actually pretty happy to see him smile for a change, as my illness was taking a huge toll on him.  I'll never forget how red his face was.Damn, that just made me laugh out loud.  Wherre is god now, asshole?People get mad at you for being depressed? Serious? Tell them to go lay in bed for two days.  Just two days, and they aren't permitted to move.   They get a diaper and a catheter and maybe someone will come feed them, turn them and scratch an itch every few hours.  See how they respond.  They will be lucky and won't have AD, or pain, or need to take fifty  pills a day.  They also know it will end in just two days.

Who the fuck gets mad at someone who  suffered a catastrophic injury for being depressed?Jesus.  That is really sad that they are so oblivious, so clueless tht they cannot see your suffering.  Maybe they think they are helping you. But it's just the opposite.  They are not permitting you to feel or mourn your trauma and losses.  I imagine that makes you feel very alone.  I read the paragraph about him swimming six laps.  And how to overcome (huh?) paralysis with a positive mindset, and faith, and nonstop exercise,  along with the bragging of how badass he is in the pool.  

I'm not even paralyzed but I want to karate chop his ass.  Does he not comprehend that every injury, and every person, is different?  

Whoops.  Just realize I'm responding to your previous post about your obnoxious mentor but I'm on a first gen iPad and too lazy to cut and paste.  Do you have a live in carer?  I like being alone as well, so long as I have my dog.  I would lose my shit if there was always someone around.  And that doesn't even scratch the surface of why that person is around - namely, to do all these very personal tasks for you that until quite recently you were able to do on your own.  May I ask how old you are? To have to move back I'm with the parents after being independent would be an emotional trauma to an able bodied person.  Look how depressed certain people are because they graduated college, couldnt find work and had to move back home.  Their old room, with old memories and emotions they'd rather have forgotten.

But to be adjusting to this new life in your childhood home.  That is one tough deal.  Male? I figure you had a pretty independent life, especially since you like being alone, before all this?Maybe one reason everyone expects you to be grateful that you aren't dead is because they haven't yet adjusted to this new life.  I'm not at all justifying their behavior because their behavior is wrong and hurtful and selfish on every single level.

I've seen it happen - the family or friend of the injured person are so traumatized themselves, and have no clue how to handle it, and get so heartbroken seeing their once-independent and active loved one live a normal life, that they just have no ability to process reality. So in order to convince themselves their reality is not that horrifying, they force you to try and become this superhero. Some happy individual who says the usual SCI lines: "I can do everything an able-bodied person does, just differently.  And my life means more now because I nearly lost it.  Maybe I can't do as much, but things mean more and had this injury not happened I'd never truly be this deep."

Well, maybe that works for some people, but not for everyone.

Its not your job to convince your family you are truly unhappy and miss your old life and hate this shit.  It doesn't mean you will always feel this way, but this transition is huge.  Unless you were born disabled I don't think anyone can ever lose that feeling of a great loss. 

Even someone like Ron Kovic, who got hurt doing what he believed was a worthy cause at the time, took decades to find some sort of meaning, but I certainly don't think that all his problems were solved and he became a happy, grateful person who just accepted his loss with a smile after Born on the Fourth of July came out.

What is your family like? Do you live out in the middle of nowhere? I'm not gonna suggest you go sign up for murderball or whatever wheechair rugby is called, I am just curious.

I think your white dog has a shrinking problem.
Stupid joke aside, that is one of the cutest doggie-bro pics I've seen. What about all the other kids that drowned on the way over but weren't fortunate enough to have their picture taken?Was always curious how a quad-level injury could even permit for murderball.  Are you using some sort of speech-activated system to type?  I'm sorry I fired so many questions at you when typing for you is likely a laborious process.I'd be damn proud if I looked that ripped."Hmm, this smells goo- OUCH FUCK SHIT MOOMMM!"I KNEW IT.  As soon as I read that your principal thought it hilarious, I pictured Paly or Gunn.  Are you sure your rat isn't daydreaming about French cooking? He looks just like Remy.  Same gestures, too.On the Care Cure forum (I am not a member for obvious reasons; I was led there when researching treatments for spinal cord pain/damage and then got really caught up in the personal stories and physical issues that come with SCI) there is a poster named James McMurter (I think.)

This guy is now a high quad.  Think he got injured at 22, less than 3 years ago and very few people seem to comprehend that he truly HATES HIS LIFE.  Prior to his injury he was a lot into MMA, wanted to go to the military, had no education (but he's no fool) and his entire being was centered upon physical activity.

Now he lives with his dad who is an abusive asshole. 

What stuns me is what some of the paras tell him on the open board when he vents about how hard it is being a quad.  Go to school, be grateful to not need a breathing tube, etc.  I am not saying he should just curl up, give up and die, but this man is suffering and his injury is pretty new, and damn, he cannot move anything but his head, and maybe a tiny bit of arm movement.

A handful of paras keep telling him its not that bad.  How can someone with some trunk  function, and with full arm and hand function, have the audacity to tell that to a quad? 

What about pain?  What a cruel, ironic thing - for a person to be paralyzed, but still be able to feel pain.

Any siblings?So you're pretty much on your own. No close family member that will really listen to you and understand you don't want to hear any more of the "be happy you're still alive" crap.  Your family members are not allowing you to mourn, adapt and simply be you.But...I thought momma rabbits were caring and stuff.  Gave their bunnies little outfits like in Beatrix Potter stories.  Hello, Thor.  

9 months? In the before pix you look about 16, in the after pix you look mid 20s or higher, mature, sexy, a beast.  Handsome, chiseled face you likely never knew was hiding underneath all that.  I'd like to climb on you like a kitten (I'm just shy of 5'3.)

Really incredible job.  You look stunning, fit as hell and incredibly gorgeous.It certainly makes sense.  I wonder what naughtiness the baby bunnies do when mom isn't around.  Steal cabbages from evil neighbor's vegetable patches while wearing button-down shirts with a waistcoat.This just breaks my heart for you.  I was in a similar situation. After 4 years on the couch, drugged up on opiates, meticulously planning suicide in some manner that would minimize the suffering on my then-husband, I decided to check myself into a psych ward where they could also hook me up to a morphine drip.

The pain was so bad, always there, and I didn't even have a diagnosis.  I knew it wasn't my fault, but the reality was still destroying my husband's life.

At the last moment I didn't check into the hospital.  I wanted to so, so badly, more than anything.  Just to get help, a morphine drip, to be able to sleep, escape, have other people take care of me, take the load off my husband. Most of all, I wanted to be hospitalized because I was in such FUCKING PAIN and I knew only in a hospital could I get stronger meds.  

But, I knew if I did check in, he would be all alone, worried about me all day and would not be able to function.  Not sure if that was the right choice, but back then, it felt like the best choice. So I just continued living in agony, fainting from the pain, etc.  I could not leave him.  

I also saw a psychologist who specialized in chronic pain patients.  She couldn't take my pain away, but she did help us with handling it (my husband went to a few appointments, asking what to do when he knew I was suicidal from the pain, she explained to him that often a chronic pain patient just needs to know there is an 'emergency exit' in case the pain just gets too unbearable.  Having that knowledge that there is an escape route can give the pain patient the strength to not give up.)

I truly hope your wife finds some relief.  Please also take care of yourself.  I encouraged my husband to go do things for himself, but he just couldn't.  He would worry so much, or feel guilt that he was out on his motorcycle while I was spending 90% of my time either on the couch, or the other 10% on the bed, sobbing my eyes out, that he felt he needed to come home.  I wish he took better care of himself.  Watching him fade away and become even more depressed ripped my soul to pieces.  We are no longer together, but he will always be family to me.

If you wish, please update us and let her know how she is.  And please tell her I care about her, and I hope she gets some help and relief.Will you be able to ever regain your ability to walk?First time I touched my knee on the track, I was fucking elated.  I was finally a member of the BADASS club.  I had my KNEE ON THE GROUND.  I knew I scraped it so damn hard railing around Turn 2.  Figured the puck would need to be replaced after the race weekend if I kept this kneedragging business up.

Then, I pulled into the paddock, looked at my puck, and saw this barely visible smudge.  It was so anti-climactic.  You look great! Your lovely figure is coming through and you look strong and healthy. Nice work.Listen to me:  you MUST take care of yourself. You cannot let yourself go.  She must find a way to let you have time to yourself, not just for your physical health, but emotional health.

That lifestyle  - where you are the caretaker and get zero time for yourself - is not sustainable. You will get fatter, lose your health, become depressed and start to hate life more than you already do.  You may even start snapping at her.  Not because you resent her, but because, like my husband who was loving and caring, you resent the situation. You cannot change her pain.  

But you CAN change how you manage your life.

I bet that workout this morning did wonders for your endorphins. You need those endorphins and a healthy body and mind to make it through this very difficult time. She won't be feeling better anytime soon.  Can you imagine how much worse this will all be if you are 50lbs heavier, start developing your own health problems, lose confidence in your appearance, etc? 

If she insists you stay with her, you will eventually start resenting her, or will become an enabler and allow her to guilt you into not taking care of yourself.

I know she is suffering.  I know its agony. I have been there.  I know she is depressed and cannot think straight - who could under such agonizing pain and emotional stress?

But if you want this marriage to work, if you want to be able to care for her, and not resent her, and stave off your own depression, please, take care of yourself.  You deserve and need time to yourself every single day.  She will have to find a way to be alone for a bit each day.  

Therapy will help her.  It sounds like she really is where she needs to be and I hope she will get the help she needs.  You will have to stick to your guns when she comes back home.  Remember - you being away for a few hours a day to take care of yourself will not cause her more pain.  If she suffers anxiety by being alone, there are meds and relaxation exercise that can help.  They aren't a magic bullet, but to expect you to give up your life and your health is asking far too much.

I truly wish the best for both of you.  I saw my husband shrivel up and go from an active person who never napped to a skeleton who slept in the afternoons to escape.  It ripped me to pieces.  So at least there is some light at the end of the tunnel.  I hope it works for you, and in the meantime, they give you enough painkillers so you don't feel that daily desire to jump off a building.And, you are now hooked! Expect to spend thousands prepping your bike for track days, buying gear, after-market parts and paying for entry fees. And a set of rear sets.  No reason you should be dragging pegs.  You look pretty tall as well.  Try hanging your upper body off a bit more.  It takes some getting used to.  Who cares what he may think? This guy has zero respect for you as it is by stalking you at the gym.  Tell him it either stops, or you notify police. There is no need to be "nice".  He does't deserve it and the situation doesn't warrant it.  If you are nice, me may see it as you are either weak, or that maybe you kinda like him and he has a chance and can keep trying. 

If you're not comfortable approaching him, tell the condo staff about it. They can speak to him for you. If he's still bothering you, come down with a big guy, have the guy pretend to be a bf and tell that guy to get lost.  

41 year old female still wanting to go Thor-climbing.Ah, well that is sounding better.  I think they just don't know how to handle it, and who could blame them. When you see someone you love suffering and hurting and their world has been turned upside down, some people do certain mental things in order to survive until they adapt.  Maybe in their case, when they see the strain you are under trying to adapt, they see no other option but to try and change how you think.  Logically, they know that's impossible and not fair, but emotionally, maybe their minds can't think of any other way to handle it at all.

I had a look at a graph for your level of injury, and you're right.  That one level makes such a drastic difference.  Especially if you want to be alone.  

What kind of stuff do you do to keep busy or distracted?Does your town not have liability lawyers?I see.  That isn't surprising. People say really dumb shit.  I'm sure it becomes repetitive after awhile. Before meeting my old bf who was a para, I had zero experience with disabled people and the public, so I was stunned with the things people told me.  

Once I took him shopping because his wardrobe sucked.  A few girls were helping us since it was a slow day.  One girl took me aside and said, "Its so nice of you to go out with him."  I was thinking, huh? She said, "Its just such an act of kindness" not at all realizing that when I first met him I was the one who thought he was cute as hell and wouldn't look twice at me.

Or the others of, "nothing stops him! He's so brave! I'll pray for him."

Once he was with his friend, who also got paralyzed about 5 years after he got hurt. His mom was in a grocery store on her own, and a woman behind him was saying to her (small town, didn't realize it was his mom) "the other day I saw the SADDEST thing! Two young men, both in wheelchairs, side by side, going down the street."  His mom ripped that woman to shreds.

And it turned out my old bf wasn't that inspiring. He was a lazyass.  He was injured 15 years before I had met him, had overall great health, and with landing gear was still able to ride and race motorcycles, but refused to get a job.

You could probably write a book with all the stupid shit that comes out of peoples' mouths. For it to come out of your therapist's mouth would make me want to scream.  

I imagine when it comes from other disabled people then it really makes you feel alone. Do they really feel that inspired in life? Did they all feel that way one year since their injury?  Were they paras or quadriplegics? Because that makes one hell of a difference.

What kind of consulting do you do? Computer stuff? Baby wipes.

I once broke both hands, wrist and one foot.  I had long, very curly hair at the time (I'm a woman).  Just think of how hard it was to ass-wipe, wash my hair, and crutch.Now, now, you've missed my point and I am not surprised at all.
Nobody gave a shit about all the other faceless, nameless kids who died on the way over because it was easy to pretend it really didn't happen.  Then a fortuitous picture comes out of the same thing that happens on a regular basis for years now, and people like you lose their shit.

One week prior to that kid drowning, how many people died a horrible death (including children) because they were left locked in a refrigerated truck? Nobody gave a shit because it wasn't photographed.

I expected such a response from a moron like you. Don't worry, you aren't the only one.That was some pretty horrid shit to look at.  I suppose if you are that poor and know no better and have no chance to improve your lot, what else can you do?I am not British, so please don't run and get the pitchforks.  We have similar laws in my hometown and they are met with a favorable attitude.  Other towns are adopting similar policies.  Nobody complains and they either bring reusable (and washable) shopping bags or buy bags.

Is this truly such a bad thing in England?Toss a freakin' frisbee.  And I was so good at it as a kid.Look at those beautiful, big eyes.  New people, new home. Reminds me of my dog the first few days.  The first night I had no idea if she'd maul me in my sleep. She saw the bed, jumped right up, snuggled up to me and did not move an inch the entire night.  I kept waking up to make sure she was ok, not shitting on the bed, not about to rip my throat open, etc, and all I saw was this beautiful creature who was so at peace, so trusting and so happy to be in a soft, warm bed away from the shelter full of barking, lonely dogs.

Show us a pic in a week when Cotton has built up some confidence! Beautiful doggie!Rant anytime you want. I mean it.

I know what you mean about not having energy for the fight. And the intimidation. Doctors LOVE pointing out how much they know compared to how little you know. Of course I don't have their knowledge - I don't argue that fact with them.

And when they do the eye roll.  Or stand up to hint that the appointment is over.  It put me into a mild panic because I felt I was wasting their precious time.

Let me repeat that:  Me, who was paying $300 for 15 minutes of their time.  That doctor who gave me no useful information, tried to end the appointment before all my questions (not idle chitchat) were answered) made me feel like I was being difficult.  They often do that - you become the "problem patient" because you refuse to just accept whatever they tell you despite the fact that they are not helping. 

I can handle them saying "I don't know, let's see someone else." I cannot handle, "I think its xyz, go see a therapist, do some stretching" when I know they have no clue what they are talking about.

YOU are the patient. YOU are the customer.  You are entitled to have your questions answered as long as they are reasonable. You are entitled to have them explain shit to you in lay terms.  If they don't have an answer, you are entitled to know that.  

Some days you have to really pick your battles.  If you are having an appointment where you just break down from pain, frustration and exhaustion (I've had many of those) then the doctor stares at you like you're a mental patient.  On those days, if I just can't keep it together, I am honest.  I tell the doc I am losing hope, and there is still no diagnosis or pain reduction and I'm crying because I feel nobody cares enough to help figure out my problem and a treatmeent plan, and even though I am paying for your time, Mr. Doc, I feel you are dismissing me and this is like a job interview and if I do not play by your rules (and I don't even know what your rules are) I won't get help.

Sometimes that can get a doc to snap out of it and see you like a human again.  I can understand why they get desensitized and why they can only allot a limited amount of time for each patient.  But you are not each patient, and not every patient requires more than 15 minutes.  A few, like you, do require more time. And docs should know that and just deal with it.

It is good to know you are not alone.  Yet, so sad to know that the medical system in such a wealthy country can be so fucked up.

I cannot recommend your need for better pain management enough.  That should be your first priority, and a close second priority is getting a diagnosis (they really are one single priority).  You already know that chronic pain destroys your ability to function, think, sleep, live.  You end up just existing, not really living.  And if you lose the energy to insists your docs find what the hell is going on with you, you will not improve.

Trust your instincts.  You've done heaps of research that proved you right.  Yes, you and I don't know a heap of stuff, but we DO know something is wrong, and I also had to push my own research into my doc's face to convince him to order more tests to prove my theory was correct.  You know your body best, so if some doctor is dismissing your research, ask why? If he can explain why its impossible (your theory) then ok, that's good.  If he simply thinks its unlikely, then that's not good enough.

That is what I was told with my research. "It just is so improbable" etc etc etc.  Well, so what? I don't give a shit about statistics! If if can happen once, then it can happen to me.  Just because it is uncommon, it does not mean it is not possible.

Are you seeing a pain mangement doc?  I mean one specifically for pain? Maybe you already answered, I have a bad memory.  You need a good PM doc, and there are a lot of shitty ones out there, so it may take some time to find one who doesn't treat you like a junkie and who is compassionate.  

Its been 13 years for me, and I still get mild panic attacks each month when I go in for a refill because I fear the "I think we should lower your dose" despite me never abusing my meds and even with my current dosage I'm pretty much incapacitated by pain.

Nobody should get panic attacks because they fear their doc will not listen or will dismiss them.I want to also touch the toe beans on your dog and the kitty.  You should submit this to cuteoverload.com.  That is my homepage.  The best way to start the day.OP stole this???? WHAT? OP, SHAME ON YOU.  Why couldn't you just say "look at this cute pair?"  Why you gotta lie, man?In 1995 or so, I went to a friend's party.  It was small.  I noticed one group of about 12 people or so who were congregating outside and seemed pretty awkward and didn't really want to come and hang out with us.  I asked who they were.

"Oh, some friends of George (one of the guys that lived at the house). They are all from his new job.  Some place called Yahoo.  Some computer stuff."

Me:  (Scoffing) "Yeah, they sure are acting like a buncha yahoos." And I felt so socially superior that I was not some awkward nerd.

Fast forward to 2001, George is worth $10 million. And he married the #8 employee at Yahoo, and they retired at 32 years old.

Assholes.Look at you! That handsome, chiseled face is now coming out.  Great work, great discipline.   Great job.Its a stunning change.  I imagine the reaction of people you run into that have not seen you in a few years is one of shock.

You also learn the cold, hard truth that people are much nicer to you if you are attractive.  When I lost 30lbs (for a 5'3 woman, that makes a big difference) suddenly both men and women were much friendlier.  And, for the first time in my life, I had some really shitty experiences with female friends who were still overweight and became bitter and did some pretty malicious things, even though I did not discuss my weight change or try and shove my new lifestyle in their face.Is that what Predator babies look like? Nice mandibles.You think its WTF because...why?  They should fork out $200 at some fancy restaurant that serves 2 ounces of food instead?

I think they look happy, they have a reason to pick that spot and they don't give a rat's ass about impressing anyone.At least you were aware enough to catch your unhappiness regarding your manner of thinking.  I look back at stupid, judgmental shit I have said and done over the years and can only hope nobody overheard me.  A few times I did say such things and my mom was quick to put me back in my place.  

OP here took all the time to upload this pic and make a post in the "WTF" sub, instead of UpliftingPics or something nice like that.  Can't two people have fun without someone making a judgment that its too 'low class'?Why?  I got married in a courthouse and our "reception dinner" was at a little Mexican restaurant where we ordered tacos for about $10. Some nice lady was our impromptu "wedding photographer" and took some pix of us with the disposable camera we brought.

We were very happy with our decision. And those people in the pic hardly look sad.Why did these women ruin their faces? They appear to be quite attractive had they left their faces alone.  I admire your maturity in reading and listening to the constructive criticism with the replies.  Most kids your age would have all the answers, get pissed and tell everyone to fuck off.  But not you.  That shows you are open minded, know you have lots to learn and experience and are willing to really listen to what others have to say.

I wish I could say that about people my own age (41).

Ok, so, you admittedly have it a bit rough.  You live out in the middle of nowhere.  I grew up in an area where everything was available, I was just too lazy and unmotivated to do anything.

Here is what I suggest:  you need to incorporate excercise in your life.  Not because you need to look fit or ripped, but because you need the endorphins that exercise naturally produce.  This will make you happier and more positive. It will activate chemical processes in your system that will do wonders for feeling better about life.

Are you close to a YMCA?  I took martial arts and dance at your age, and while it took me awhile to actually enjoy it because I was fucking hard at first, each of these activities became passions.  It can be any activity, just something to get you away from video games. 

Video games are fun, but I have seen something very scary happen over the past 20 years:  20 years ago, issues like social anxiety certainly existed, but it wasn't really talked about because it (along with depression) was seen as something shameful that needed to be hidden.  I am glad that it is no longer seen as a shameful thing to have a mental condition, but I firmly believe that social anxiety has skyrocketed because so many kids spend hours upon hours behind a computer screen.

They don't develop social skills.  (I am not saying this is your problem at all, just another reason why its good to get away from the computer and video games) and these people suffer crippling anxiety and have trouble finding jobs, meeting an SO, or making new friends.

I highly recommend any activity that either gets your heart rate up, or gets you outside, or both. Another downside of having easy access to such awesome games and the internet is it makes it very easy to just stay at home.  I'm certainly guilty of it.  We have completely forgotten just how much we need nature in our lives to feel "right", so to speak. 

I'm not saying going out into nature every day will solve your problems, but it really can open your eyes to things you've blocked out without realizing it over the years. Our attention span has dropped significantly because we are now conditioned to always have something going on in the background or foreground, and we cannot sit still and do nothing.

If a YMCA is not accessible, or money is an issue, how about getting an inexpensive mountain bike, a helmet (yes, get the helmet, one bad crash and you'll be in slobbering and eating through a straw and shitting in a diaper). Save up some money, get the bike, and get pedaling. You can explore.  Even if you live in the most boring, flat place, you can at least get exercise, get out of the house, and breath in air, have some fun, find some hills, and feel like a little kid again when life was simple and innocent.

Another thing:  study! Stay in school, and do well.  Unless you have a great trade skill, you will not get far without an education unless you have connections or are very, very lucky.  If you do well in high school, you can escape your home town by going to college.  And then you can do these study abroad courses that can really change your life.

You can spent a year studying in Italy, or England or wherever you pick.  You will see new cultures, architecture, meet people with such different backgrounds (and never compare the place or people to Americans because you will only disappoint yourself). You will realize how huge the world is, and how many incredible things are out there.  

I remember myself at 15. I felt hopeless, bored, miserable and couldn't wait to be on my own.  And I grew up in the Bay Area, CA, where everyone is more or less pretty nice and there is always something to do.

I finally had to push myself to get off my ass.  I tried new things. Some I liked, other things I found boring, so after a fair shot, I did new things.  I got into motorcycle roadracing (which is very expensive, I'd recommend a dirt bike instead).  I studied hard in community college for two years, then transferred to a four year school.  I wasn't the party type and didn't really fit it, but I made the best of it.

I did a lot of traveling.  Europe, Asia, Middle East.  Then grad school then the grind starts.  You don't have to follow those "rules".  You make your own rules.  I don't want kids, don't have them and am quite happy that way.  You can have a life where you work for six months, save up, live frugally, and travel the other six months.  You can get your scuba certification at a YMCA (although you do need a large body of water for your open water cert), get heaps of hours under your belt, and go live in Thailand and teach scuba to tourists.  

I guess my point is, you are growing up in one of the most open minded countries on the planet that will provide assistance for study and growth that is just not available in many other places.  Take advantage of all this.  The better you do in school, the cheaper all your study abroad, tuition, etc, can be.  

Hedonism can be a lifestyle that works for some people, but for most, it isn't sustainable.  Unless you have a trust fund, you will run out of money and have nothing to show for your time.  Or you die of a drug overdose.  You can have a blast, travel the world, not have a 9 to 5 job, and still make enough money to live comfortably.

Most of my friends and colleagues followed "the rules".  They bought a house after college and getting a job. It was always a house they really could not afford without busting their asses.  Then they followed "the next logical step" (yes, one friend told me those exact words) and had kids.  Didn't matter that their marriage was already unhappy or they were deeply in debt for a house they couldn't afford and thus trapped in soul-sucking jobs they hated.  They simply added a kid because everyone else was having kids and they figured the kid would change things.

You don't have to do any of that.  Try and follow blogs of people who took the road less traveled and made their own rules.  You will have to make sacrifices, but that is ok.  I actually felt a whole lot better after I got rid of most of my material possessions. Life became very simple.  I didn't need a BMW when a Honda worked beautifully.  

You mentioned piano - do you have a piano at home? I used to play before my back got fucked up, and I cannot encourage it enough.  Any instrument is wonderful. Be patient, be willing to put in the practice if you want to improve, and enjoy it!  

There is so much to see and do.  Even if you can't skydive in Paris, just touching the walls of Notre Dame and envisioning the lives of the everyday people who touched those same walls hundreds of years ago can be enchanting.  

I hope you don't smoke.  Not because I believe weed is bad, just because if you are bored, it might end up becoming a thing you feel you need to do to escape.  It can really kill motivation.

Ok, I have babbled enough.  I just want you to feel there is hope.  Life can be wonderful if you put in the effort, and it sounds like you already are trying and study hard as it is.  15 is a tough age for anyone, but if you live out in the middle of nowhere, it is tougher.

In a few short years you will be a legal adult.  Start thinking and planning now.  Where would you like to be 3 years from now? Heading off to college?  Or spending a summer backpacking across Europe? A 2 month summer trip such as that can really change you. 

And keep up with the drawing.  It can turn from a hobby into a passion. You'll get better and better and may really surprise yourself with some talents you have hidden inside.

Thanks for listening.  I wish I had the maturity to listen like you do when I was 15.Um....I was just gonna say we should get the pitchforks, but hey, I get you.Mine was many moons ago.  Only regret is that I didn't do it earlier in life.  Would've saved me a lot of grief!  Your weight loss is really quite impressive.  You did it in a short but reasonable time, and are still so young but have likely learned so much during the process about yourself.  

As for people not recognizing you, just wait until your 10 year high school reunion.  This is fucking terrifying. I was an attorney for 15 years, and I always wondered about shit like this. Especially when I had a hearing or trial before a judge known to be a fucking asshole.If his parents have money, its no surprise at all that he got away with all this shit.No its not rewarded.  Its that they have money, which means power.  Money means you can buy your way out of any bad shit you've done.  His parents likely enabled him, bailed him out of each bad thing he did, so he never had to pay the consequences the rest of us would've faced.  OP says his dad made enough donations to keep this scumbag son of his out of trouble.  His dad deserves a kick in the ass.

I hope one day all his past shit comes out, or he pulls an Anthony Weiner and just becomes so used to getting away with doing illegal or fucked up shit, that he gets cocky, confident and sends some dick pic to the wrong person.When I met my then- husband, he was 6'4, a trainer, and in excellent shape.  I could not comprehend why a guy as handsome as he (he'd get asked to be a model but he had no interest in that and found himself quite average at best) would be interested in me.  I was 25, 5'3 and about 145lbs.  I was obviously overweight and I hated my body and my gargantuan ass.

I was so suspect that I thought maybe he was just putting on a ruse to get a green card.

A year into our marriage, I finally said ok, I'm ready, please train me and help me with nutrition.  And within one year I had this incredible, fit, strong, sexy body.

I asked him straight up:  why did you ever like me before I lost those 30lbs? How could you have found me remotely attractive?

He told me I was a flower that just had not bloomed yet.  That he didn't marry me expecting me to get fit.  That he loved me for me, that I was beautiful to him, and because we connected in a way that he never felt with any other woman.  

He was also very honest.  He said yes, you were bigger. You did have some extra weight to lose.  But you were beautiful. You were not that troll or monster you were convinced you looked like.  You were always my flower.

Before we got married, women warned me he only wanted the green card (he was European) because he was 'too good looking for me'.  At a work xmas party, after we were married and before i got into shape, one woman joked, "how did you get such a good looking guy?" (Real funny, yeah.)

We are no longer together, but we will always be family, and he will be my most trusted friend.  He never lied about my weight.  The few times I was brave enough to ask if I was 'fat' (I really don't know what response I was expecting as I WAS fat), he said, 'You could stand to lose weight, but that does not mean I do not find you beautiful.'

There is no reason to lie to her and pretend she is not overweight. Its not healthy, its disingenuous, and she and you will both know you are lying. You can tell her the truth (if she asks) in a very kind and loving way, and assure her that despite her being overweight, she is still beautiful.

There is one reality though - if she hates her body and is depressed and miserable with the way she looks (and I have been there) it is highly unlikely she will ever feel confident until she gets into shape.  You can only say so much, and its also not your responsibility to convince her she is beautiful.  That can only come from within her.  

There is a very small minority of overweight people who are genuinely happy and confident with their appearance, but that minority is small. Most of those overweight women who take selfies and insist they are hot babes despite being obese are not fooling themselves and deep down they hate the way they look.  Otherwise, why would they put so much effort into seeking validation?

The best thing for depression (along with seeing a doc and all that) is physical activity.  Its really hard the first few months. But if she can stick with it - whatever the activity is - she will build up stamina and notice that she is getting stronger.  That will motivate her to continue doing whatever it is.  Endorphins will do wonders for her sadness.  

You are a caring, loving man to her.  For her sake (and yours) I hope she can find it within herself to make a lifestyle change so she won't hate herself, won't feel ashamed and need to hide her body and not leave the house, and can get out and enjoy life and all it has to offer.Because people are assholes.  Or, people don't understand what depression truly feels like. "Snap out of it" they advise.  Really? If it were that easy, nobody would be depressed.

I don't understand how anyone could truly believe that yelling or putting down a suicidal person could possibly believe that such a reaction would be helpful.  We all did stupid shit when we were young. Please forgive yourself.  If you can find him, maybe send an apology if you feel its right.  I cringe at stuff I did when I was younger.  You are human.  What makes you a good person is that you remember this and know it was wrong and feel bad.  But continuing to feel bad about it will serve no useful purpose.  Forgive yourself, and now if you see some kid bullying some other poor kid, you know what to do.Hey, I did find someone, but in the end it didn't work out and we split up.  Its ok, shit happens, it was heartbreaking and hard, and I never thought I'd get divorced (what the hell made me so special?) but, shit happens.

It really sounds like you need a break.  A break from the okcupid sites and all that. You're understandably jaded.  I had hit a point where dates were so disappointing, or the few guys who I did like never followed up with me, that I began to expect the worst out of every date.  I am sure I gave off body language that made me appear unapproachable and not fun to be around.

Be by yourself for awhile.  If finances are an issue, then maybe take nice walks in nice areas, if there are any nice areas around you. I was so lonely in grad school that it physically hurt.  I got so tired of dating that I just ended up putting all my time into school and my job. And FUCK it was lonely. 

But, it was better than forcing myself to go on dates.  Those were even more depressing, because after each date where I met a guy that I couldn't connect with, or the one guy I did connect with never followed up, I beecame more convinced that something was wrong with me.

I became completely convinced I would be single forever.

Later I realized there was nothing wrong with me.  I just hadn't met the right guy where we both shared that chemistry and physical attraction along with an emotional one. There is no way to say when you will meet a person with whom you connect, but it can happen, and you are still so young, although I know you don't feel it.

Please don't compare yourself to other women your age who have boyfriends or who are married.  I did that.  And later i learned that the majority of these relationships were not as happy and stable as they appeared on the outside.  We all put our best faces on in public, and nobody likes to advertise that our relationships are going through a rough patch or generally suck wanker.  You never know what's truly going on behind the curtain.

During a rough time in my marriage, I remember wishing so badly I was single and free to do whatever I wanted, and had no responsibility to try and work it out, or be patient.  I wished I could be selfish and do whatever I wanted at any time.  I wished I didn't have to put in effort to be patient with a person I was ready to strangle (figuratively, of course).  And I was stunned by the irony, because only a few short years prior I felt so empty, so useless, so mis-wired, all because I was single.

I promise you, you are NOT old.  You feel old because you are comparing yourself to what the media pushes out and the fairy tale it creates along with those rules that you are supposed to meet that right person during college, then you graduate, get married, buy a house and all that shit.

I think the best you can do is stay off  OkCupid, do your own thing, live your life, and if you happen to stumble across a nice guy and want to meet him for coffee, go for something like that. That's wonderful that you both are adopting a healthy lifestyle.  I promise you, the first two months are the most difficult, but then it becomes a permanent lifestyle change.

You both will feel SO DAMN GOOD.  I don't mean just from looking better on the outside, which is a factor and is not necessarily shallow because being visibly healthy is appealing.   

You will feel good because you will feel in control again. When I had a shitty diet and didn't exercise, one of the things contributing to my depression (didn't realize it at the time) was I felt like I had no control over my life and it would continue to stay on that miserable path.  

When you take control of your health, something changes in your soul.  You feel much more confident.  You care a lot less about what other people may think or say.  When I was out of shape, I dreaded leaving the house and being in public.  When I got into shape, that was no longer an issue and so much anxiety and worry went away.

Your body will have energy you never knew existed. You'll develop a taste and craving for food that is wholesome and nutritious.  And the best part is that it can kick depression and anxiety right in the ass.

I wish all the best to you and your lovely lady.  You are going to really surprise yourselves as you will discover how strong you are and that underneath your fear, anxiety, depression and extra weight, there is a confident, happy person ready to live a full life.What kind of asshole takes a selfie in a movie theater? Just how narcissistic have people become? Are they gonna post that selfie on Facebook and hope for some social attention? 

I would've complained, or went out and told a manager to handle that shit.  Movies are freakin expensive and its common freakin courtesy to not be using your goddamn phone or be taking fucking SELFIES during a movie.Am I the only one that thinks that these issues are nothing new and have been around more or less since the dawn of civilization?  

Or this this sort of an in joke and I'm missing something?Damn, I'm sorry.  That was a really rude thing to say.   In my chubbier years my parents said shit like that so often I stopped visiting them.  Just the idea of visiting them started a mild panic attack.  If I lost weight, the first thing upon opening the door would be their face lighting up with relief and happiness. "Oh, you look SO MUCH BETTER!" My mom would want to take me shopping and spend time with me.

But if I came home and I was 10lbs heavier, oh, the disappointment was obvious when that door opened.  And they were very vocal about the size of my ass.  And when I told my mom it was very hurtful and for now on, please make no comments about my body, whether positive or negative, she turned it all on to me. "But, I only say it because I thought YOU wanted me to tell you.  You are the one who likes being in shape.  I don't need to say anything.  I was just  doing what I thought you wanted me to do."

Its pretty heartbreaking when you go visit your family that you have not seen in months, especially during a holiday, you are excited to spend some time with them and are looking forward (naively) to a good time, and the only thing they can focus on is if you have gained or lost weight.

No interest in your school, grades, social life, job. Nope.  Just your weight.

You don't need that shit.  When your precious free time comes up, don't visit them next time around.Please, eat! Not eating means no nutrition, weakness, inability to focus, messed up sleep.  You will not build any muscle or strength if you undereat.  You will feel like shit. 

Please stop feeling guilty over eating anything. You need food.  Your car will not run without gas, right? Your body won't run without food.  Shitty gas, your car will run like shit. Not enough food? Your body will stop functioning.   

Who cares if you ate an entire chocolate cake earlier today? Its over and done with.  Focus on the now.  You are in physical pain from hunger and that is never healthy or ok. 


I had eating disorders and really toxic relationships with food and eating until my mid 20s.  What helped was getting away from the toxic people in my life (family, in my case) who helped create those issues.

I also had to take responsibility and make those changes I knew nobody could do for me.  It took awhile to work through those eating issues.  I'd starve, get skinny, get accolades, feel mentally good yet physically feel weak, about to keel over, ready to cry at anything.

Get the professional help you need.  Be kind to yourself.  Be patient.   Be strong.  Go eat!  I promise you can have a healthy relationship with food again. It may take time and it will not be easy, but it can happen.

Eat.  Now!I am sure you are not as "unintelligent" as you think you are.  Can you honestly say you tried your best in college?

I've also known some very intelligent people that just were not cut out for certain thing.  One old boyfriend just could not get through an electrical engineering undergrad degree.  He switched to physics and became much happier.  

Another friend who studied his ass off took five times before he passed the bar exam.  FIVE TIMES.  They administer the bar only twice a year.  That means his student loans came due (he had dropped out of dental school and entered law school already owing 60k, graduating law school owing close to 200k) and he flunked the bar four times.

This guy was not dumb by any means.  He just had a hard time with the bar and lost confidence.  He kept it up, didn't give up, and now has a successful practice.  He's a very good lawyer.

If you gave me a basic math test, I'd fail miserably.  In other areas I do just fine.  Why not focus on your strong points?No, don't get me wrong, not belittling at all, just curious what the post meant by we are millennials and we aren't going to take it anymore. It sounded like some sort of revolutionary proclamation.  

Gay marriage and 9/11 are very important and life-changing issues.  My only point was that there are always social, economic and political issues.  Vietnam.  Race riots.  Men legally permitted to rape their wives. Public lynchings.  Separate but equal. Laws preventing interracial marriage.  The US carpet bombing countries or overthrowing governments for its own self-interests.

I was just curious as to what makes millennials any different that past advocates for change, but I am probably reading too deeply into the open post.How am I being a jerk? Because I asked what makes this era any worse or different than another era?  Why are you so aggressive and actually insulting when I am simply asking a question?

Do you really want to get into a debate over what was the "worst"? The Valdez spill was the "worst" until something worse came along.  Does one oil spill being worse than another make it more important? Do you even know why the BP oil spill happened? It was not because some drunk captain was fucking around with his ship.

Yes, I read the entirety of the post and it honestly sounded like a whiny high-school kid with no understanding of history is proclaiming this generation is stronger, or different, or more engaged ad aware of social issues because a small, fringe extreme religious church acts like assholes and protests funerals, or because the US finally got an understanding of the horror of terrorist attacks that have been happening for decades all over the world, but the US just didn't care all that much because an attack in an embassy in Kenya didn't affect us, etc.  That's why I responded with the question I had.  Do you genuinely think this current period is any worse than before?  

Good luck with your revolution because you millennials aren't gonna take it anymore! YEAH!"We've had our tools for self expression and personal freedom overtaken by corporations and big business."

Huh? And you just typed your self-expression and exhibited your right to express this personal freedom (doing this in China or Saudi could get you arrested or killed) on Reddit.  A private corporation.

Oh, the irony.Hey, its never too late to dedicate your time to something that is meaningful to you.  Its ok to feel envious and disappointed that you didn't take full advantage of your time in the past, but you have great awareness and a desire to accomplish things like your friend did.  There is no reason why you can't do the same thing and start right now.  You are not a worthless person.  You had a tough year for whatever reasons.  You don't need to be gung-ho and dedicate every ounce of energy in your being at all times for the greater good.Can I ask why you called a group of soldiers cowards? Did you just waltz right up to them and say that? I am sorry I made you feel like it was a joke.  I'm am old fart at 41, and the reason I asked if it was a joke was because another person responded with a reference I knew nothing about, and I thought maybe there was more to it than I was aware of.  I truly did not mean to offend you.

I think its great that you are passionate about injustices and want to do something about it.  It will be people like you who help make those changes.  Most people can see things that are wrong, but are not bothered enough by it and will expect and wait for other people to put in the effort to make those changes.Wait...a 40 year old did this to you?

I'd wait until you cool off and he sobers up, and rip him a new one.  Does he pull shit like this on a regular basis?GOOD!  See? It wasn't that bad.  Just as your finacee will need discipline in maintaining a healthy diet, you will need discipline in eating in sufficient quantities.   

How about you learn to treat yourself as kindly as you treat her?Ok, got it, you know it all.  Good luck with your call to arms and being mad as hell and all that.

And if I read correctly, you were once a dog breeder? Which means you raised and sold purebred puppies for exorbitant amounts of money, while millions of unwanted dogs are suffering in shelters and being put to sleep because there are not enough good homes out there?

It must be nice to be able to so easily dismiss your own behavior and condemn that of others.  You actually contributed to needless animal suffering and death by being a part of the purebred industry and thus perpetuating the problem. 

But hey, what do I know.I realize I'm starting to sound like an annoying gung-ho nag trainer, but I truly hope you and your fiancee give this new lifestyle a fair 2 month shot.  It changed my life in so many ways.  Wish I had done it earlier.I would have a hard time not beating his ass in.  Banging on anyone's door like that is not funny past the age of 17 or so.  You could break an ankle running to the door or whip out your gun and accidentally blow his head off if he did something like try and shove the door open.  If someone pulled that shit on me I'd be fucking scared shitless and furious.

Time to boot this useless ass out of your life.I will be waiting.Then how about leak a bit of that dirt you have on him?  He scared the shit out of you and it probably took a few hours at least to get your heart rate and anger back down to a normal level.  If he's incapable of taking responsibility for intentionally trying to scare the shit out of you, he deserves to face some consequences.  

And maybe that will get him to leave you the fuck alone.I am sorry to hear that they accused you of being dramatic.  You probably had to garner up the courage to expose your most vulnerable self to them, and you got kicked in the gut.

I think some people are just incapable of believing a suicidal person can actually, truly, for real, carry out their plans.  Or feel so miserable that they wish their house would cave in and crush them and kill them to make it all easier.

I hope you learned that for emotional help, your family is not a good source.  I once went to my dad at about age 19.  It took me a few weeks to get the courage to expose my deepest and most shameful insecurities that were becoming obsessions.  Sobbing, I told him I felt so ugly since I had gained 15lbs, and worthless as a human being and ashamed to leave the house.  I just wanted some sort of comfort that I was still valued and lovable and worthy as a person despite a 15lb weight gain.

His response? "You used to be pretty, and you wore makeup, and boys called you. Now, look at you. You don't do your hair, nobody calls and you're fat." 

He did say it really nicely, so all I could do was just drop my jaw and stare in shock.  I said nevermind, he kept saying 'what? what? do you feel better?" and I ran to my room and vowed to never, ever seek help from him again.

I hope you are feeling better now, and have a source you can go to during tough times.Why did he take back gifts? Those belonged to you.  Who the fuck does such an evil, malicious and pointless thing?Why would your wife (and I meant this with respect) want to preserve a friendship with a drunken shit?  He sounds like he has nothing positive to offer either of you.  What does he bring to the table that makes it worth it for her?so...if you aren't happy with that, what's stopping you from changing?So, he slapped you? (Assault and battery).  Then she slaps you (assault and battery) and you defend yourself and he beats the hell out of you and you get arrested? 

And nothing happens to them?

Was there a surveillance cam since this happened at a restaurant?


Did this occur in some pro-military redneck town?Oh jesus christ, I am so sorry.  That is pure fucking evil.  That motherfucker is just pure evil.  I would be so heartbroken.  I wish I could take away your pain.Hey man, you need outside help. You have a great education, no debt, a great job (that you are succeeding at, yet you feel like you are not qualified for it) and you are tossing it all away.  You're also dragging your wife down.

You have so many things that people state they wish they had on this subreddit every single day.  What a shame it would be to lose it all.

There is help out there, but only you can make it happen.  As your wife for help if you need to make some phone calls and get talking to a therapist.  You've lost control and are barely hanging on.  If you lose your job, you're gonna be fucked.  Get help so you can take control now.Does this guy's wife have any awareness that her husband is a shit and acts like a 15 year old?  I'm not saying go tell her every single detail, but if he won't listen, maybe telling her just about the police prank in a nice way, but firmly, and explain that you can't get through to him that the prank was a really shitty thing to do, yet still want to maintain a friendly relationship, and maybe she, as his wife, would have better success at communicating to him that that kind of shit is unacceptable?Please get a trainer.  At 24 I was where you are now.  I got a very good trainer who never shamed me, who taught me proper nutrition and who taught me that exercise needs to be done with proper form, in a certain order, and cardio done at specific intervals, to maximize the effectiveness of your workout.

I thought I was eating healthily, but turned out I was not getting any of the protein I needed and thus just gained weight and built no muscle.  I also thought losing weight required starvation.  

My trainer completely changed my life.  I was convinced I could never, ever have a beautiful, strong and sculpted physique and would have to starve, eat cottage cheese and work my ass off at the gym 12 hours a week.

No no no.  In one year I had a fucking badass body.  Beautiful, small sculpted muscles.   I never starved.  I learned proper nutrition and stopped eating empty calories and learned to slow down, put down the fork, and really wait to make sure if I was still hungry.  

It can work, and it WILL work if you genuinely put in the effort the right way and don't cheat.  I still enjoyed dessert and all that, just a lot less of it and all in moderation.

And I so enjoyed seeing my body transform.  My confidence shot up, I lost the anxiety of leaving the house, I actually started to enjoy (shock) going to the gym.  I was amazed that I could run a hard mile and not be tired, or hike up a very high mountain in Brazil (forgot which one) on vacation and actually run up it at times and feel great the entire time, while my friends were slogging away.

You can accomplish it, you just need guidance.  I saw so many people busting ass at the gym but their body never changed, most likely because their diet was wrong. 90% of it is truly diet.  Its not about deprivation and starving, but eating non processed, healthy whole foods and getting proper protein and nutrition intake.

You are not hideous. I promise.  Can you give it a six month effort? I mean a genuine effort, not cheating, not pretending to fool yourself, but really doing it right, with proper nutrition and training?  If you cannot afford a trainer, there are millions of resources to educate yourself.  There are great books with programs to follow. 

But if you don't follow it, you won't get the results you want.  So be True to yourself.  Just think:  if you start tomorrow, six months from now you can have a completely different physique, love your look, feel great, and love strutting down the street in public.Right now I live in Mexico.  I see some shit that makes me just shake my head in frustration. Little kids are plopped down in water to play.  This water stinks and is filled with sewage.  Dogs, cows and horses shit in this water.  And what do the parents do? Laugh and giggle while their kids splash and play in a cesspool of filth.

At least there are no corpses.No, you did not molest your sister. It was totally and completely innocent. When I was 6 and my brother was 8, he asked me to touch his penis because it 'felt good'. So I did.  I thought it looked funny, and sort of poked and flicked at it, and he just laid back.  Then I asked him, hey, what about me? And he said nope, I like this better when you play with me.  

Selfish ass.

I think my mom saw at one point. She didn't do anything.  She knew it was harmless kid stuff.In junior high I watched one too many ninja movies and decided I had to marry a Japanese ninja.  I told my mom this.  She reacted as well and said she was sure I would find a nice ninja one day.I had a really hard time when I switched schools.  I went into a much better school system. I was behind everyone, in every class.  I felt like such an idiot.  
Its not your fault.  Going to a new school that has a huge gap in standards is very difficult.  You can catch up, but its going to take a lot of time and effort on your part. Stay late after school and get help from the teachers.  You will also have to develop new study skills so you can study in a more efficient and meaningful manner.

You are not dumb.  You are simply thrown into a new situation where everyone else had a sort of "head start" compared to your background, and you just need to catch up.26? Let's say he went to law school straight out of undergrad like me and graduated at 25.  The judge position he has is absolute bullshit. He won't know a fucking thing about what he is doing.  Its also likely an administrative judge at best.  A brand new lawyer is typically walking malpractice.  I had a great job during law school and was drafting appellate briefs and law and motion, but because I was a law student, I had zero experience of actually being alone, on my own, of litigating in trial, speaking before a judge and jury or negotiating settlements.  You aren't allowed to do that stuff as a non-lawyer, and law students are not lawyers.

If this fool is 26, it means he will make a heap of wrong decisions, or will be relying on unpaid interns to do the work for him (and they will be fucking up too).    Nobody should be a judge at 26.Ok, so you really are out in the middle of nowhere with no options.  I was a dumbass and assumed you were American (you sounded American with the way you typed).  The best you can do is try and say outside.

And why can't you play the piano for an hour a day? What's the purpose of having a piano in the house if nobody is allowed to play it? I cannot imagine your siblings are truly studying every waking moment. I suppose if your parents refuse, what can you do? Maybe buy a small, portable instrument and take it somewhere out in nature where nobody will bother you.

You are in a tough spot with the lack of things to do, so best thing is to try and keep exercising, even if its home along in your room when too cold or too hot out  (I'm a fragile, pathetic Californian who things anything below 60 degrees F is unacceptably freezing.)  

Its very positive that you can see the good points about living in a rural area.  Just imagine how shitty it would be if in you lived in some high density ghetto full of garbage, noise and pollution.

Best you can do is just keep busy until you can get out. It may be boring, but this is the time to really cultivate your knowledge and continue your disciplined studying.  When you get old enough to move and do some new things, you will be better prepared.  If you spend your time now doing nothing to challenge yourself, you will become a child in an adult's body.  

I saw it happen to a lot of my friends. They never got their act together.  One joined the military, then soon got kicked out because she did not quite grasp that she was now the property of the government and she had to do whatever they told her to do, no matter how stupid or seemingly "unfair" it was.

I know its tough. You've made a good choice to keep studying.  University is very pricey, but I think in your country its much, much cheaper than the US, which is out of control.  You do not want to be an adult and stuck in a low-wage job for life. That just sucks the life out of your soul.

Good luck!Be kind to yourself. If you had a friend who went through what you went through the past year, would you expect them to be out conquering the world? What advice would you give to them? Use that same advice for you.This was beyond cringe. It was vomit.I made an 80K profit buying and selling my condo. You can make a profit with any piece of real estate if your timing is right, you choose well, you factor in all the costs and have a dash of good luck.Trainers are pricey.  There is so much free info available on-line. You do NOT need to do keto or paleo or any of that stuff.  Pick what is right for you, but make sure it is something sustainable.  If you try and cut out everything remotely tasty, you will hate every moment of it.  I love carbs and had to lower them, but I never went the keto route. I'm sure my weight loss would've gone faster had I done so, but I just wasn't willing to do it.  

So it took a few months longer, but I wasn't a raging, screaming angry person during that time.  If keto does work for you, by all means, do it.

One thing I didn't realize was how much I was eating.  I ate little things throughout the day and had no idea how much it was piling up. 

I promise you can do this.  Just be prepared to work hard, and sweat, and push yourself.  I don't mean torture, I don't mean pain, but intensity.  

Good luck!If the story is as accurate as OP says, I certainly hope the marine is prosecuted.  Imagine just getting your ass beat because a woman attacks you and as a man, you are not entitled to defend yourself.Didn't he act as the PTSD soldier with Tommy Lee Jones in that knife fighting movie? I loved that movie.I'm a 5'3 woman.  I know better than to attack anyone who can kick my face in.  Elections in the US do not affect other countries?

Are you that dumb?  

So if Bush and Cheney were not in office, would the Iraq invasion still have occurred?

You are hopelessly stupid.Can you change any of these variables? Not all, but maybe just one or two? Change won't come overnight, but sounds like you are stuck in a rut and bored, depressed, lonely and miserable.

Is there one new thing you can do? One new activity at the YMCA or something similar to where you live that you can sign up for? Some new exercise (swimming is very peaceful, quiet and relaxing) that can give your mind a break from it all?If you happen to still be fit and attractive, you still get stares.  I'm 41, and of course I am no goddess, but goddamn it still happens and I fucking hate it.  I think by the time I'm 50, I'll be invisible no matter how fit I am and I'll never have to worry about it again.My husband told me (after I complained that men still were asking me on dates despite me showing them my ring) that many scumbag men see the ring as a challenge.  They don't give a fuck.  One guy asked me out once while I was minding my own damn business at a cafe.  He was with his friend - no shame at all.  I told him, "no thanks, I'm married'. He says, "that's ok, I don't mind."  Some fucking cocky-ass firefighter.  Appreciating is ok.  Noticing an attractive person is normal and its in our genetics. But blatantly staring is NOT OK.  It does offend, it makes us nervous and uncomfortable. Why do you have to stare? Why can't you glance discreetly and move on with your business?

And I don't care what you are thinking or whether you do sunsets - how on earth are sunsets remotely relevant to the fact that you stare?

Its ok to have a quick, discreet glance. It is not ok to stare.  And we women should not have to drop hints to make the guy to stop staring.  For fuck's sake, this is common behavior. Why can't men be proactive and not do the offensive behavior to being with? Why must it fall on women to be responsive and "hint" (and men don't' get hints) and why are we forced to engage with a guy who stares?

Its like a little child misbehaving. The child tries to take candy that doesn't belong to him and the mom is expected to teach him right from wrong.  

You are a grown ass man.  Stop staring, and stop expecting women to drop hints.And sunsets and motorcycles do not feel nervousness or discomfort when being stared at.  We are human beings with emotions, feelings and for fuck's sake, is he really comparing women with inanimate things?Half a second is not "staring".  There is nothing wrong with any gender taking a glance and discreetly having a momentary glance.

Staring is something quite different.Oh for fuck's sake, really?If you are suffering from chronic pain, you need a pain management doctor.  A GP has no clue how to handle it safely.

You gotta stop being afraid to "rock the boat". Its not your fault you are sick. Select carefully whom you choose to share your health with, as not everyone will be supportive.  

Rock the boat as much as you need to in order to get the health care you need.You are depressed.  I was so devastated when I was still so sad despite hitting my major life goals.  Graduated post grad school, had a great job, making good money, lot weight and became a hot babe, married an incredible man, had everything I wanted.

And I was even more depressed than before because I was sure that once i had reached these goals, I'd no longer be unhappy.

Get some outside help.You are human.  You've been so used to being at the top level of things, you maybe have forgotten that there are always people who are smarter, better, stronger, no matter how incredible you may be at anything.

Why be so harsh on yourself?  I dropped classes when I was overwhelmed and it was the smart decision to make because it means my other grades did not suffer.  Being successful is more than just top grades and a high amount of class credits.  Is also about making smart decisions in tough situations.That IS a tough job.  I truly do not know how you guys stick it out. And its not necessarily inspiring because many of the people you are helping are on their way out.

I suppose you can take comfort in that you are giving them comfort as best you can in their last few months or years, but I am sure it takes a huge toll emotionally.  Why are you letting ONE professor destroy your passion?  You are giving him way too much power.

If you get a dream job, but you have a boss or colleague that is an asshole, do you start hating your passion or job, or find a different job in the same field?

Nobody can take away your passion unless you let them.  Nobody is forcing you to hate something.  You have a prof who is a dick.  It will be like that in life forever. There will always be assholes.  Now is a good time to learn how to deal with them and not let them have so much power over you.You think you're the only one that feels left out of society, or different? Most of us feel that way at some point.  We just figure out a way to deal with it and most of all, do not blame others or hate the world or dream of hurting people.

You need help to get past this "I am a beta  and I am forced to be a beta and I can never change it" along with your violent attitude.

Its all on you to change.  I don't believe for a second that you "tried" to be "normal" and failed.  There is no such thing as normal.  And trying isn't two months of good behavior. It involves going to therapy long term, getting help, making an effort, and being patient. You don't change overnight.

Take responsibility over your life and please don't hurt innocent people just because you hate the world.Jesus, would you guys stop with this 'friendzone' bullshit?

Its an imaginary place that does not exist.  All it mean is a certain woman is not attracted to you for whatever reason and does not want to date you.

And if you are texting this girl and she either does not respond or she logs off,that means she doesn't want to interact with you. So, leave her alone and move on.
Do you put all women you do not want to date in a "friendzone?" Of course not.  I wish you would be kinder to yourself.  I promise you that a comment made at 11 years old did not push this person over the edge.  That person has deep issues that evolved over a lifetime.

It also comes to us to be an adult at a certain point. No matter how awful our parents were or an ex SO may have been, at one point we have to be an adult and accept responsibility to make the change needed for our lives to be better.

If you have such a level of self-hatred or guilt, it sounds like there is something much deeper going on inside your soul, just as you say.  Maybe talking to an outsider, without a bias, could help you get over this crippling guilt and sense of responsibility on a person's life that is so outside the proportion of the one comment you actually made such a long time ago.

Best of luck.I really love it when I have a bowel movement that is done and over with in 20 seconds.  Does that mean I name my kid Power Dump?  No.I was not expecting that.  I've been so desensitized by the NSFW warnings that I was eating my nice vegetable stir fry and just got a close up of something I never again want to see.Gods and Generals. I'm getting so bored.  I wanted so much to learn about the Civil War but not in a boring, straight-historical recitation of events.  This just sucks.Don't talk shit about the boss, even if everyone else is.Its completely worth it. Your brain will catch up and in the meantime, enjoy shopping now that it isn't a downer of an experience.Bill, in most of your movies you portray a character with a really unique charm and sweetness. Your interviews are pure sweetness.  Are you that sweet in real life? Because I like how sweet and kid you are.I just love how men who do this always find a way to twist it around to blame the woman. "you are too sensitive."  "i was trying to make you laugh."  "cmon baby, don't be like that."   "be nice".  (Those last two make me want to kick the shit out of the guy who does that.)I hope you live far, far away from these people.If someone else accomplished what you have accomplished, you'd be hitting them up with accolades.  Somehow when its yourself, it seems less a big deal because you managed to do what you once thought impossible for you.  Then you did it, didn't drop dead, and it was sort of anti-climatic because it didn't happen overnight.  The change was slow.  Nobody gave you a medal, it was just small steps (big steps behind the scene) but small noticeable differences along the way.  

So it doesn't seem like such a big deal.  Yet look at how many people are still where you once were. Full of excuses, or they just believe they can do it.  He is the definition of a stalker and abuser of women.  He went out of his way into an abnormal, uncomfortable and unnatural body position (at least for in public) to LOOK UP YOUR SKIRT.  

To make it appear that you were doing something wrong, and he was the victim, and therefore confusing you so you could not blame him for doing anything wrong, he then said those vile words. That was his psychological mechanism to preemptively defend himself from you attacking him or reporting him to the police.

That's a milder version of saying a woman asked for rape by wearing a skirt.  

I am very sorry this happened.  There will sadly always be horrible men like this who are abusive to women.  What's difficult it these things have a huge effect on us.  We are dressed appropriately and do not expect such an assault out of nowhere.  We are neither expecting it nor prepared to defend ourselves or be able to brush it off.

Making it worse it affected your mindset for your job interview.

Next time, there is something you can do, many things, in fact, if you choose.  You can say loudly "stop looking up my skirt and stop harassing me right now."  There are often security cameras and even if there are not, a response like this from a woman might scare them off.

However, given that this man was sick enough to do what he did, you can never anticipate how he will respond.  Will he attack you even if there are people around?  Its always a possibility given just how vile he was.  

The best thing you can do - since we cannot eradicate the problem of sick men doing this - is if a man every "ties his shoes" or does suspect behavior again, be very aware. Also, while it will take time and practice, learn how to accept that this vile act and commentary does not represent you.  Of course it made you feel sick - I felt sick just reading this.  We should not HAVE to develop a thicker skin because "boys will be boys".

I often get harassing comments by perfect stranger as I am walking by. "Damn, TITS" (which isn't as bad as what that guy did to you).  It took awhile, and I'm not perfect at it yet, to let it roll off and remind myself that this behavior is coming from one fucked up individual.

Never be afraid to make a "scene". Most men who engage in this type of "subtle" behavior" count on exactly that - that women are taught to be quiet and if you do react, you will be accused of being "dramatic".  

Fuck that fear.  Any man that pulls this shit again? Make that damn scene.I had a man come up to me once and smile and say hi in a nice way.  said hello back.  He stared me dead in the eye and with a smile said, "I would love to lick your pink pussy lips. I bet they are so pink and delicious."

I was so stunned I had nothing to say.  Speechless.

Now I'm older.  If I feel reasonably safe (not alone, know he won't attack me) I feel very comfortable saying something that I know will go right for their jugular "you wish, you limp-dimp motherfucker."  They usually do not expect that and shut up, maybe cursing me a bit more, then leave.

I am not saying you should do that, or that that is the correct thing to do in every situation. Its just what I do if I feel the situation is safe and calls for it.

Some police will do nothing.  Others may - in fact, they may have already had reports of a man harassing women (and staring up skirts can be considered illegal in some areas, not sure where, but its very possible.)  When it is possible to contact the police, evven after the fact (try and remember the man's clothing, hair, eyes, height, etc.) you may be surprised to know that maybe the cops are looking for him for the same reasons.  Maybe there was a security camera where you were waiting and would show how he bent down.

I know many cops do not give a fuck, so be prepared to be dismissed.  But if you are willing to give the cops a try, knowing they may blow you off, it can't hurt to simply file a report of harassment. (A guy almost crawling on the floor to look up your skirt is considered harassment).I don't think so.  Its all done for marketing and to make money.  The companies are not using plus size models in order to change perception of beauty or to celebrate women's bodies. 

They are doing it to reach to a broader audience and sell clothes and make money.

Even a company like Dove, which sells soap and shampoo and not clothing, is not "celebrating" women's larger figures, but is trying to appeal welcoming to women of larger sizes in order to generate more sales.

That's what is popular right now.  It all comes down to money."most models are an unhealthy weight".

Did you do a scientific study on this?  I think you mean most models are very thin.  Does it mean they will keel over? Most of them will not.  They ARE on the thinner side - fair or not, that is what is popular these days.  But to throw out a comment like that with zero scientific proof (and how do you define "unhealthy"?) is specious at best.Thanks - I will check it out.  In high school the teachers I had were so boring (and I wasn't the stellar student so I can't blame it all on the teacher) but now at 41 I suddenly realize just what an event it was and how its effects are still affecting us today.Its far more extreme to have an elective surgery done, with all its risks that can kill you or give you brain damage, or permanent chronic pain or a million other things that can go wrong - than simply lose the extra bit of weight.

And, losing 30lbs will give you more energy and you will feel great!! 

I think surgery should always be a last option.  First, try to lose 30lbs.  At your height, 30lbs can really change your body makeup. I speak from experience because at 5'2ish I also lost 30lbs and damn, it completely changed my body (and face).  

So give the weight loss a try.  30lbs is a lot for 5'2 and any extra weight will put you into the obese category which is not good for your health, your joints or your confidence.Its really hard tell in that pic since you are heavily clothed and at an angle and crouched over.  You have a lovely figure I am sure. But unless you are a body builder, at 5'2, 30lbs overweight is quite a bit.

Why not lost just 20lbs and see how it goes? If your breasts are still bothering you that much, then speak to a cosmetic surgeon (several of them) and research your options.)I had a very unhealthy issue with food all my life.  It was only when I removed the toxic people from my life, and got a trainer and learned nutrition (and the trainer was someone I trusted and never, ever shamed me) that I lost 30lbs and became healthy and fit.

And it completely changed me.  I became happy.  My relationship with food changed.  My eating disorders stopped.  I learned that I could eat what I wanted, in moderation, and that healthy whole foods taste a whole lot better than processed foods (just takes a  month or two to have your body make that switch).

You will feel a million times better.  

What makes me nervous is you wanting surgery as a means to avoid a possible trigger into understandably scary memories and depressive thoughts of food and weight and eating issues.  But surgery alone will not resolve those problems.  You need to face those problems and resolve them, otherwise you will never have a healthy relationship with food.  What happens if you have the surgery, its successful, yet you gain weight because you don't have a healthy relationship with food and fitness?  

i wish I had started getting fit much younger (I finally did it at 25, and I am 41 now.)  It was a lifestyle changed that helped me in so many ways. I developed confidence and felt in control of my life.  In no way do I have a perfect body, but I felt strong and happy and healthy.

There is never a reason to starve when you are either getting fit or staying fit.  Its all about learning proper nutrition, and if you don't eat right, you WILL starve even if you eat plenty of calories, because they will be empty calories.

You and your body deserve the best chance - so why not devote six months or one year (no cheating, no excuses, I mean really devote yourself with discipline and the proper knowledge) to getting fit. And with therapy, developing a healthy relationship with food.  

Then, once you are fit, if your breast size is still bothering you, at that point speak to a surgeon.  You truly have very little to lose.  For me, losing 30lbs seemed insurmountable, but if you commit to it the right way, it will come off faster than you know.Listen -  I didn't read what you wrote because of your title.
THE FRIEND ZONE DOES NOT EXIST.  
All it is is a way of describing, broadly, the reaction of a man when a woman does not want to date him, no matter the reason.

Do you "friend zone" women that you are not attracted to, for whatever reason, and don't want to date? Or, do you simply consider them women that at most may be a friend (unlikely until they get over their feelings for you).

If you cannot communciate with her, and if she is playing games, then this is a waste of your time.  Be an adult, look for hints, or straight up ask her. If she says she is not romantically interested, be kind to her, keep your dignity, and move on. It doesn't mean there is anything wrong with you.To me, absolutely nothing.Please try to get her into professional therapy.   None of us (nor you) are qualified to help her and she needs help in a big way.I really have angered you, and I am sorry. 

I never said you "NEED" to lose weight.  Those are your words not mine.  But the fact is you ARE unhappy with your chest size, and you are moderately overweight, and losing weight can be a healthy, harmless alternative than spending 5k for an elective surgery that has all sorts of risks. You asks for opinions, and you got them, yet are angry because you don't like some of the reasonable options given.

 That was not my intention to hurt you.  You did mention you were overall "ok" with being a bit chubby, and to me that didn't sound like a person who was happy or confident with it, but as someone who is tolerating it.  You also mentioned you had issues with eating disorders and issues with food, so I felt that you should know there are ways out of it and life doesn't need to be that way.

I've been in a place similar to where you are, where eating a tiny bit of food caused me a mental breakdown, or where driving to the gym would cause such anxiety I'd have to pull over, sob, then turn around and race home.  

I am sorry you felt I was attacking you or simply saying "eat better!" In fact I thought I emphasized that outside, professional help could really be a benefit for you, because you deserve to have a healthy relationship with food and not suffer anxiety over it.  I needed that help myself.

Your response is also full of presumptions about me, but I'm not going to go down that road because you seem so angry and upset that I don't think you could even digest what I write, and this isn't about me.

You asked a question about whether surgery was a good idea, and you raised salient points about being overweight and your emotional issues related to food. I am sorry my answer touched a nerve.  Sometimes the truth is a very painful thing.  If you are perfectly happy with your weight, then good for you.  Elective surgery is a big, big deal and it doesn't always go the way you hope, especially cosmetic surgery.  

Good luck to whatever route you choose.

Edit: You stated this: "This thread isnt about my diet plans, its about whether or not its feasible to get smaller tits."

Diet IS an option as to whether it is feasible to get smaller tits.  If you were underweight or at a healthy weight, I'd say no, don't lose weight.  But you have an extra 30lbs.  That does not make you bad, evil, a pig, worthless or any less of value if you weighed 30lbs less.  It is a FACT that you have the option to lose weight and still be healthy and that could potentially affect your breast size.  I am not going into emotions or issues, or how strong you are at farming. I am speaking of your OWN questions that you want smaller breasts and are asking how to go about getting them.

Your extreme reaction shows me that actually, you are not at all "ok" with being 30lbs heavier that what you could be.  

Would you have the same reaction if you went to a surgeon and they first suggested trying weight loss?Ok, sorry to have upset you.  Best of luck.Everything hurts men more.   Listen to them whine about childbirth.Thanks. I was preparing myself for a barrage of hate but a surprisingly reasonable response came up.Thanks for your response. Yep - pretty much describes the pure hell he caused.You are a fool.  Why do men constantly whine about being "friendzoned?"  Why are there memes dedicated to the "friendzone"?

Why is there no comparative "friendzone for women who are romantically rejected by men? Maybe a small one, but nothing like the "friendzone" that men have created in their minds and whine endlessly about.

If you are rejected, accept it with dignity and move on without coming up with "friendzones" or other bullshit.

Half the time the woman doesn't even wish to be "friends".  She's just too nice to say it to your face.You are absolutely right.  The inability of some men to grasp this very basic concept is quite depressing.

Nice core strength.Chunderfest.  I think its a pretty accurate re-creation of how beer festivals (or whatever they were called) went during that time.  Outdoor pissing and sex.  I do hope you get help because it sounds like you're bearing an unsustainable load that is not justified and which will bring you down.

I also realized that my previous message didn't come out as I intended.  When I wrote about "there comes a time that a person must be an adult and can no longer blame bad things that happened to them as a kid", I didn't mean you.  I meant the person you said is suffering from an eating disorder.  Of course if our parents are are abusive, or we are relentlessly bullied as a kid it will undoubtedly have an effect on us as an adult but we all have a responsibility (and I know its easier said than done, having been there myself) to get help.  I hope that the person you made that comment to at age 11 is aware of this and is seeking help, otherwise she will forever be miserable.

Best of luck - forgive yourself, let it go and move on with your life. You've unfairly burdened yourself in a manner that completely outweighs the innocent comment you made at such a young age.  You seem to have a sense that you feel guilty and take responsibility over far too much. An outside opinion and help can really assist with that.

(I came from a family that managed to twist and blame everything on me, no matter how far-fetched, and I felt immense guilt.  A good therapist and time and soul searching allowed me to work that shit out.  I also realized that I was being pretty self-centered and had overstated my importance and effect on others by thinking that any of my single acts could truly ruin someone's life or lead them to depression.)When you, OP, tell a person that they should not say certain things despite the good intentions behind them because those certain things MIGHT offend certain people, it makes you, OP, sound like a whiny, self-centered spoiled brat.

Why can't someone state that they don't see skin color? Because you disapprove? Your morals and values do not dictate those of others.  You are preaching the exact same thing you are doing yourself - not allowing someone to feel and who they are."I started off leaving fairly mean comments about how she was ungrateful, a terrible person, and a drug addict. I agreed with her idea that her family would be better off without her, and thought she was a stupid kid who would wind up dead from drugs, self harm, or an eating disorder. I didnt much care because i dont know her."

Why would you do such a thing?If this problem lasts longer than a few weeks, you may qualify for state disability.  Best to start going to a doc now and get a diagnosis and establish a medical record.I think it comes down to a lack of respect.  If someone is whining about hating something that they have the control to change, yet do nothing to make the change, I lose respect for them, and any empathy.

If someone wanted to stop smoking, stank horribly of nicotine and always said they hated being a smoker, yet made no genuine effort to quit, how could I respect them?   

Fuck whatever is politically correct these days.  It is unhealthy and ridiculous that there is this small fringe group promoting HAES and that obesity is beautiful.

I do not like or approve of FPH or fat-shaming.  But neither do I approve of a person engaging in gluttony or laziness, complaining they hate their body or its effects socially (because face it, people who seriously abuse their body by allowing themselves to be morbidly obese often stand out as someone who is completely unable to exhibit any form of reasonable self-control) yet make no effort to change it.

I've been fat.  I had all the excuses.  And the one thing that changed me was stopping the bullshit, putting the fork down, exercising and taking responsibility for my own adult body. It didn't happen the first time around, but it happened when I realized only I could change it.

To anyone whining that "oh, but you have NO IDEA WHAT I GO THROUGH OR WHAT I FEEL", yeah, you're right, I don't, but so what? You have no idea what I went through, or that my mother beat the shit out of me and broke my nose when I was 11 because i was hungry and ate food, then actually started hiding food from me (and I was a skinny 11 year old at that point).  

It does not matter what you've been through. Take action. Get professional help.  If that's not affordable or accessible, try to get self-help.  If you do not make the change on your own, you will never improve your life.

Ok, rant done, sorry to highjack your thread, I just get what you are saying.According to you, I am not allowed to say that I am color-blind and don't "see" or attach significance to race/color of people merely because it offends you?  That is essentially what you are saying.  I understood exactly what you wrote and I reiterate:  you are a self-centered, whining woe-is-me, "everyone oppresses me", who cannot accept that the world does not revolve around your desires, preferences or feelings.For this letter to be effective, you need to specifically state what was said and the context of how it was said.Thanks for sharing this!  A few questions.  1)  Did you ever try a TENS unit, and did it help at all, prior to this?  2)  How would you describe your pain pre-SCS? Burning? Electric zaps? Numbness/tingling/pins and needles? Or more like crushing or a deep ache?   3) What area of your body hurt and why?

I'm also trying to decide if I should go for the SCS, but I don't have neuropathic pain. Just ("just"...hahahahah) crushing and a deep ache in my spine as if someone strapped a 500lb velcro vest around my torso that is smushing my spinal column to dust. But never numbness or pins/needles.Because its easy to paint all white people as the bad guy.  I'm "white" but nevermind that my family was both tortured and killed in the holocaust and suffered torture, unjust arrest and had to flee the Islamic Revolution.

The blanket statement that people who claim they do not see "color" are thus "racist" is inherently wrong on so many levels.  One does not equate to the other.  OP's reasoning is hopelessly circular and faulty and OP cannot see that. 

If I see all people as simply members of the human race, how does that make me racist?  Does that mean I hate blacks, gypsies or Asians or muslims? No. That is an irrational jump OP makes and is fatal to her argument.

Maybe OP argues because I see all people as members of the human species as some sort of "denial" that racism exists.  OP is thus making a huge guess and presumption that, in my case, is dead wrong. OP doesn't know what goes on in my mind.

OP is trying to push her values and what OP thinks is correct on to everyone else. I grew up all over the world and as I am used to see so many different looks and backgrounds,  I just see "people".  

OP expects that every person must qualify their "colourblindness" with an extensive discourse that racism DOES exist (why am I obligated to do that? That is like when a woman raises the issue of date rape and a man comes barging in complaining, "but, but, MEN GET RAPED TOO!" Of course we know men get raped too, but why can't we discuss one issue without someone screaming 'oppression' simply because we did not discuss all issues that can be remotely related to the initial issue?)

OP's post is incredibly racist.  OP is not a mind reader and has no idea what I think. So, OP relies on her unsupported conclusion (I mean by actual data with a control group) that being "colorblind" directly leads to racism.

That's OP's contention.  If you are colorblind when you view people, you are perpetuating racism.  

How about the contention that the more we become accustomed to viewing people as members of the human race, with no qualifications, then maybe, over generations, racism could slowly lessen in impact or die out.

OP's position actually FORCES us to continue the distinction of people wholly based upon ethnicity, culture or race (ie: OP WANTS us to always remain focused on our physical and cultural differences.)

Who is the racist here?

Edit: And THIS is how OP responds to a counter-argument in this same thread where 